The
Encyclopedia of
ADDICTIVE DRUGS
RICHARD LAWRENCE MILLER
GREENWOOD PRESS
The
Encyclopedia of
ADDICTIVE DRUGS

The
Encyclopedia of
ADDICTIVE DRUGS
RICHARD LAWRENCE MILLER
GREENWOOD PRESS
Westport, Connecticut • London
Library of Congress Cataloging-in-Publication Data
Miller, Richard Lawrence.
The encyclopedia of addictive drugs / Richard Lawrence Miller.
p. cm.
Includes bibliographical references and index.
ISBN 0–313–31807–7 (alk. paper)
1. Drugs of abuse—Handbooks, manuals, etc. I. Title.
RM316.M555 2002
615'.78—dc21 2002075332
British Library Cataloguing in Publication Data is available.
Copyright _ 2002 by Richard Lawrence Miller
All rights reserved. No portion of this book may be
reproduced, by any process or technique, without
the express written consent of the publisher.
Library of Congress Catalog Card Number: 2002075332
ISBN: 0–313–31807–7
First published in 2002
Greenwood Press, 88 Post Road West, Westport, CT 06881
An imprint of Greenwood Publishing Group, Inc.
www.greenwood.com
Printed in the United States of America
TM
The paper used in this book complies with the
Permanent Paper Standard issued by the National
Information Standards Organization (Z39.48–1984).
10 9 8 7 6 5 4 3 2 1
Contents
Introduction 1
Drug Types 11
Alphabetical Listings of Drugs 31
Sources for More Information 445
Drug Name Index 453
Subject Index 489

Introduction
The Encyclopedia of Addictive Drugs will save readers many hours of time that
would otherwise be spent tracking down basic facts in science journals and
libraries. This book is useful to a wide variety of persons—from a student
doing a term paper to reporters preparing a story, from parents reading that
story to a narcotics law enforcement officer needing extra information for a
public presentation.
In writing this book the approach has been multidisciplinary, meaning that
perspectives from several fields of research have been pulled together. The
same substance may mean different things to a chemist, a biologist, a physician,
or an anthropologist. Thousands of scientific reports were sifted for information
and concepts that will be meaningful to readers seeking basic
information about specific substances and about drugs in general.
The core of this book is an alphabetical listing of substances. Some are not
ordinarily thought of as drugs, but all have been misused in ways indistinguishable
from drug abuse. While information in the individual listings and
elsewhere may refer to various physical effects, such information does not
constitute medical advice. Anyone with a medical difficulty needs to consult
a medical practitioner, not this book.
In addition to meaty information about what drugs do, this book includes
trivia that might interest, for example, a student preparing a report or a homework
assignment. For instance, some individual listings of drugs mention
little-known military usage that might intrigue teens interested in the armed
forces. Some experiments are mentioned not because they are necessary to
know about, but because they might add depth to a term paper or inspire a
student to pursue a new angle. Material about effects on pregnancy is inherently
important but might also have special interest for female readers.
In addition to alphabetical listings of substances, this book includes a section
about drug types in which substances are arranged in general categories, such
2 The Encyclopedia of Addictive Drugs
as stimulants, with further grouping by classes of stimulants (amphetamine,
anorectic, cocaine, pyridine alkaloid). Such an arranging of drugs puts them
in a broader context of information. A chemist knows that a certain element
has particular characteristics because of its place in the periodic table, and a
biologist knows that a certain organism will have particular characteristics
because of its species classification. A reader of this book can automatically
glean information about an individual substance because of the way it is classified.
For example, everything said in this book about stimulants applies to
the class of stimulants known as amphetamines; everything said about amphetamines
applies to the particular drug methamphetamine. (Substances
printed in bold have main entries in this book’s alphabetical section.) A reader
familiar with basics about stimulants and who only needs a few specifics about
methamphetamine can quickly find those details. A reader who needs to understand
more about the general nature of stimulants can find that background
information as well. Persons desiring to go deeper than the summaries
of scientific information in alphabetical entries can consult reliable sources
listed at the end of each entry. Many of those sources list still more references.
This book concludes with a guide to finding general information about
drugs. Here readers are directed not only to ostensibly neutral sources of
information but also to sources taking explicit and differing stances on various
aspects of drug use.
The index lists street names and other alternate names (used in various
communities at various times), giving page numbers where information can
be found about those drugs.
Descriptions of individual drugs in the alphabetical section of this book
present the scientific consensus about those substances, based mainly upon
reports from refereed science journals. A refereed journal is one that does not
merely accept an author’s word but instead has the articles critiqued and
approved by assorted experts prior to publication. Articles in such journals
are fundamental sources of scientific information. Although findings reported
in this book come from scientific investigations around the world, not everyone
agrees with what scientists discover about drugs. Sometimes scientists
themselves disagree with one another. The history of science is filled with
detection of errors, and future research will no doubt provide new understandings
of these drugs. This book, however, presents scientific consensus
concerning these drugs as the twenty-first century begins.
DRUG ABUSE
Drug abuse is an emotionally charged topic involving more than facts about
pharmaceuticals. Personal and moral values are involved, as are fears that
sometimes transform into anger. The author of this book has studied drug
abuse questions since the 1980s; visited with prosecutors, judges, and health
care givers, along with drug abusers and their families; drafted drug control
legislation introduced by Republican and Democratic legislators; testified before
legislative committees; and given public presentations. In all settings, facts
have rapidly disappeared in discussion of the topic.
For most of the twentieth century, addiction was considered a physical efIntroduction
3
fect of some drugs. If a drug failed to produce physical symptoms associated
with addiction, the substance was classified as nonaddictive. In the 1980s,
however, some researchers began arguing that addiction could exist without
associated physical symptoms, that mental craving alone was enough to
power addiction.1 An important boost to acceptance of that concept came in
1987 when the American Psychiatric Association declared that “cocaine dependence”
did not require physical dependence for diagnosis.2 The APA
stated, “Continuing use of cocaine appears to be driven by persistent craving
and urges for the substance rather than attempts to avoid or alleviate withdrawal
symptoms.”3 That approach yielded a broader understanding: that
people could be addicted to things other than drugs, a new and controversial
concept but one that was becoming more accepted as the twenty-first century
began.
Regardless of whether addiction can be more of a mental process than a
physical one, the likelihood of a user developing a harmful relationship with
drugs is greater with some substances than with others. The harm may be
physical. The harm may be disruption of a user’s life. Experience shows, for
example, that cocaine is far more risky to use than caffeine.
Some drugs can be used so much that they and a person’s body develop
what may be called a physical resonance. That is not a standard drug abuse
term, but it communicates the concept more vividly than other terminology.
Resonance means that an individual’s body has adapted to the drug in such a
way that stopping use of the drug makes a person feel ill. Symptoms depend
on the drug and can range from a runny nose to convulsions. Not all drugs
can produce such a state, but those that can are traditionally called addictive.
Indeed, appearance or nonappearance of an “abstinence” or “withdrawal”
syndrome of illness upon sudden end to drug dosage used to be considered
a definitive test of whether a drug is addictive and whether a user is an addict.
Some specialists might use the term neuroadaptation for the mechanism that
creates resonance, but here more conservative language that asserts less about
roles of the brain and nervous system will be used.
Resonance is typically, and somewhat misleadingly, called “dependence”
by many persons. An addict who temporarily feels sick upon stopping a drug
but who later feels better is not really “dependent” on it, in the ordinary
dictionary sense of that word’s meaning. Granted, physical dependence upon
a drug is possible, in the dictionary sense, regardless of whether the underlying
mechanism is neuroadaptation. An example is a diabetic who needs
insulin. Cutting off insulin supply would make the diabetic sicker and sicker,
so the person truly is dependent on the drug. Its presence is necessary for
good health. Normally, however, that is not what is meant by saying a drug
abuser is dependent on a substance; rather, one means the abuser will feel
temporarily ill if dosage suddenly stops. Nonetheless, some drug addictions
can involve the dictionary meaning of dependence. For example, persons extremely
addicted to alcohol or barbiturates can die if cut off from their supply.
Death typically comes from cascading problems culminating in convulsions.
That dismal outcome is uncommon but possible. In addition, dependence is
sometimes used in contexts making it synonymous with addiction, perhaps
referring to persons undergoing treatment to break dependence on some drug
4 The Encyclopedia of Addictive Drugs
they crave and are unable to stop taking. Because dependence has multiple
meanings, the term is not ideal. However, this book uses the term because of
its familiarity to specialists, despite its potential for causing confusion among
general readers.
The concepts of addiction and dependence differ. Someone who takes a lot
of barbiturates may experience both states. Someone who uses a lot of marijuana
may experience neither. Knowing the differences between those two
concepts can help a person spot confusion in rhetoric about drug abuse.
A person who has dependence on a drug may experience an abstinence or
withdrawal syndrome if the supply runs out. The syndrome may begin several
hours or several days after drug use stops, depending on how long a drug
and its by-products last in the human body. Different drugs have different
withdrawal symptoms, and they are specified in this book’s alphabetical listings.
Often a withdrawal symptom is the opposite of what a drug does. For
example, if a drug constipates a person, withdrawal from that drug may include
diarrhea. If a drug makes a person sleepy, withdrawal may include
insomnia. Sometimes the withdrawal syndrome can be avoided if dosage is
gradually reduced rather than stopped suddenly. At times the syndrome is
avoided by substituting another drug that has “cross-tolerance” with the first
one. Cross-tolerance means that one drug can substitute for another in some
ways, typically in ways that prevent a withdrawal syndrome from emerging.
A classic example allows methadone to be substituted for heroin. This book’s
alphabetical section notes cross-tolerance among assorted drugs. Crosstolerance
is a concept that differs from tolerance described below.
Tolerance means that as time passes, a person must use more and more of
a drug to get the same effect. Such an outcome is a traditional sign of addiction.
Tolerance can develop to some effects of a drug and not to others. For
example, an amphetamine addict may become tolerant to euphoric properties
of the drug, but not to its poisonous qualities. A cocaine addict may build
tolerance to appetite-loss properties of the drug but not to other actions. The
opposite may also happen, in which a person becomes sensitized to a drug
and needs less and less. Evidence for such a development has been seen in
humans with DOM and benzodiazepines and in animals with cocaine and
DMT. Such a development, however, would not be considered evidence of
addiction. Tolerance can have a strong mental component; the same phenomenon
can be seen in reduced pleasure gained from continual indulgence in
wild music events or a particular food or shopping. Recreational and medical
users can take the same drug, often with medical users never developing tolerance—
perhaps because of the purpose for which they take the drug and not
because of its chemistry, although that possible explanation is not yet confirmed.
Some experts argue that tolerance is indeed a physical effect, caused
by organic brain changes induced by a drug. Ultimately those experts are
correct: All mental feelings and processes result from changes in the brain’s
electrochemical activity. Some of these changes can even be measured and
correlated with broad psychological characteristics. For example, changes in
brain waves and emotions can be seen after some drugs are administered. Our
understanding of such things remains crude, however. We don’t know how
brain chemicals and electricity induce a person to love someone or hate an
Introduction 5
idea. Ultimately some still unknown physical process may explain why people
who take a drug for pleasure develop a tolerance to its effects, while people
who take the same substance for medical purposes never experience a change
in what the drug does.
From a purely physical standpoint, someone who has recreationally abused
a drug for years may indeed be able to tolerate a stronger dose than someone
who takes the same drug for the first time. The abuser’s body may develop
physical adaptations permitting high doses. For instance, body chemistry can
change in ways that counteract a drug, requiring more and more of the substance
to overcome the change. Nonetheless, for many practical purposes we
can say the cause of tolerance is psychological. This was implied in medical
research comparing the amount of meperidine required to relieve pain in
appendectomy patients.4 The study was conducted in Beirut and examined
records of patients who underwent surgery before, during, and after a brutal
civil war that destroyed much of that city. For pain relief, prewar patients
needed more of the drug than wartime or postwar patients did. Researchers
concluded that part of the reason was a psychological change in how pain
was evaluated during those years of brutality. The study did not directly investigate
tolerance, but it did demonstrate that a change in attitude can change
the amount of drug effect perceived by users.
Change in attitude illustrates the influence of set and setting on drug effects.
Set describes someone’s basic personality and expectations about what a drug
does. Setting is the environment in which drug use occurs. Rat experimentation5
demonstrated that the setting in which a drug is administered can alter
the amount of tolerance, with those conditions demonstrating a psychological
component in physical tolerance. Countless human examples demonstrate that
set and setting can determine how much effect a given drug dose produces,
whether it is pleasant or unpleasant, even whether a dose is tolerable or fatal.
Dosage affects a drug’s impact. Overdose of most drugs can produce serious
unwanted effects, including death. In addition to the amount of drug, the
method of dosage (injection, oral, smoking, or other routes) can make a huge
difference in effects. The same amount of drug can have a much different
impact depending on route of administration. A “safe” dose by one route can
be fatal by another. An effect at one dosage level may be the opposite of what
happens at a different dosage level. Sometimes a drug can cause a condition
that it is supposed to prevent. Such paradoxical actions illustrate hazards involved
in reckless drug use.
Taking more than one drug of a given type can be expected to increase
effects typical of that type. For example, a person who ingests the depressant
alcohol simultaneously with an opiate depressant will normally experience
deeper depressant effects than if just one of the drugs was used. Taking a
normal dose of several drugs from one type can be the practical equivalent of
overdosing on any one of them. Taking drugs of different types can also be
hazardous. For example, the stimulant cocaine and the depressant heroin do
not cancel each other’s effects if taken together; instead, the body may be
assaulted from different directions simultaneously and break down under the
attack.
6 The Encyclopedia of Addictive Drugs
HOW ARE ABUSE RISKS MEASURED?
Historical experience shows addiction to be more likely with some drugs
than with others, just as some road intersections are more hazardous than
others even though anyone might drive through them safely at a given time.
Whether the subject be drugs or intersections, persons concerned about dangers
attempt to discover if similarities exist. Do certain characteristics of intersections
(speed limits, stop signs, obscured vision) indicate whether danger
is more likely? Characteristics of drugs, particularly their chemical formulas,
are examined to determine similarities that might indicate whether particular
drugs have more addictive or abuse potential than others. For example, the
shape of a drug’s molecule may determine how a user’s body reacts, so drugs
with molecules of a similar shape might be expected to have similar effects.
Also, new substances derived from an old drug may be assumed to have
similarities to the old drug.
Schedules
In the United States the result has been a blend of science and law called
“scheduling,” set up in 1970 by the federal Comprehensive Drug Abuse Prevention
and Control Act, which replaced all previous federal narcotics laws.
(The legal definition of “narcotics” includes stimulants such as cocaine and
hallucinogens such as LSD.) Scheduling is an ongoing process affected by the
same influences that shape other laws. Sometimes Congress or a state legislature
puts a drug in a particular schedule. Sometimes a federal or state official
does so. Like all law, scheduling has an element of arbitrariness, enhanced as
federal statutes interact with state laws and local ordinances. Nonetheless,
even though results can be puzzling, basic principles in scheduling are clear.
In the United States drugs are either scheduled or unscheduled. Unscheduled
drugs may be benign or highly dangerous, available over the counter or
by prescription only, perhaps even available to children through a plant growing
wild in the woods. A hospital emergency room may deal with someone
who uses an unscheduled drug, but the U.S. Drug Enforcement Administration
probably will not. Almost all drugs are unscheduled, whether they be
pharmaceutical creations from a laboratory or natural products harvested
from the soil.
Scheduled drugs are theoretically ranked by their potential for abuse. Not
all abuse is addictive, but the rankings imply that some drugs are more of an
addiction hazard than others. At the time this book was written, five schedules
existed. Generally drugs in a lower-numbered schedule are considered more
prone to abuse than those in higher-numbered schedules. Heroin is a Schedule
I drug. A cough medicine available without prescription might be in Schedule
V. Schedule I is also used for abused drugs having no medical use approved
by regulatory agencies in the United States. Thus Schedule I includes marijuana
even though decades of research have shown it to be more benign than
most drugs listed in other schedules. Schedule I also includes some drugs
(dextromoramide, dipipanone, phenoperidine, and others) used routinely by
doctors in other countries but that lack approval from U.S. authorities. So
Introduction 7
although Schedule I is often viewed as a list of the most dangerous drugs,
relatively harmless ones are listed if they are unapproved for medical use in
the United States, while drugs that can easily kill even when administered in
a hospital setting are listed in schedules indicating less danger of abuse. Still,
the general rule is that drugs are scheduled according to their abuse potential,
with drugs in lower-numbered schedules having more abuse potential than
drugs in higher-numbered schedules. Some illicit drug makers try to avoid
scheduling regulations altogether by tweaking the chemical composition of a
substance just enough that it is no longer the molecule defined in a schedule.
Such “designer drugs” remain legal until schedules are updated again.
Schedule I is for drugs ruled as being most prone to abuse, lacking generally
accepted use in the American health care system, and being so dangerous that
health practitioners cannot safely administer these drugs to patients. Except
for specially authorized scientific studies, possession of a Schedule I substance
is illegal under any circumstance. No physician can authorize a patient to use
a Schedule I item. Schedule II is for drugs ruled as being most prone to abuse
but in use in the American health care system and carrying the potential to
cause major physical or mental dependence upon continued usage. Schedule
III is for drugs ruled as being less prone to abuse; these are generally accepted
by the American health care system but pose risks of “moderate or low” physical
dependence or “high” psychological dependence. Schedule IV is for drugs
ruled as being still less prone to abuse; these are generally accepted by the
American health care system and are less likely to result in physical or psychological
dependence than Schedule III substances. Schedule V is for drugs
least prone to abuse; they are generally accepted by the American health care
system and are less likely to result in physical or psychological dependence
than Schedule IV compounds.
This book’s alphabetical listings give each drug’s federal schedule status.
States also have schedules. At times, state and federal schedules may
not “match” for a particular drug. For example, under international treaty the
U.S. government put flunitrazepam in Schedule IV, but federal authorities
believed it should be Schedule I. So states have been encouraged to put the
substance in Schedule I. Sometimes federal authorities change a drug’s schedule,
and states may lag behind in conforming. For practical purposes, federal
and state schedules have equal legal standing. A drug user who runs afoul of
a state schedule can be punished as severely as a person who runs afoul of a
federal schedule. A further complication is that although a drug that is unlisted
in any schedule is presumed to be unscheduled, official pages of schedules
do not necessarily specify all scheduled substances. Sometimes the official
pages have not caught up with official decisions; sometimes a chemical is
covered if it is derived from a scheduled substance, without a separate listing
for the chemical being required. The list of sources at the end of this book
tells how to find the official pages of schedules.
For many years, stimulants, depressants, and hallucinogens basically comprised
the entire contents of schedules. In the 1990s another type of drug was
added, anabolic steroids. Various types of steroids exist. The anabolics can be
used to build muscle mass and have long been popular among athletes seeking
an edge in competitions. Anabolic steroids can have other effects as well,
8 The Encyclopedia of Addictive Drugs
effects particularly harmful to young persons whose bodies are still developing.
Attainment of adult height can be thwarted, and sexual organs can be
damaged. Rising concern about injury to younger athletes caused the strict
regulations of scheduling to be applied to these drugs, although other types
of control (requiring prescriptions and suppressing nonmedical sales) had
long been in place.
Scheduling is an element of law enforcement. Penalties for illegal use or
possession of a drug depend partly upon its schedule. A related purpose of
scheduling involves control of scheduled substances through tracking prescriptions
written by health care practitioners and by tracking inventory records
of pharmacies.
Pregnancy Categories
Legal drugs are placed in a Pregnancy Category, a system used to classify
the risk of birth defects if the substance is used by a pregnant woman. Different
countries have different systems of categories. The alphabetical entries
in this book use the U.S. Food and Drug Administration system that was in
place as the twenty-first century began.
Pregnancy Category A. Studies using pregnant women do not show birth defects
caused by the drug in the first trimester, and evidence has not emerged showing
risk later in pregnancy.
Pregnancy Category B. Studies using pregnant women have not been conducted,
but experiments with pregnant animals fail to demonstrate birth defects. Alternatively,
animal experiments have produced birth defects, but studies using
pregnant women have not.
Pregnancy Category C. Animal experiments have produced birth defects, but no
studies have used pregnant women to examine the potential for human birth
defects. Alternatively, no animal or human studies have been conducted to
determine the drug’s potential for causing birth defects.
Pregnancy Category D. Studies or reports of clinical experience indicate that the
drug causes human birth defects, but using the drug during pregnancy may
be so important to the woman’s health that fetal risk is justified (for example,
no acceptable alternative therapy is available to deal with the woman’s illness).
Pregnancy Category X. Animal or human studies or clinical reports indicate the
drug causes birth defects, and the drug’s potential benefits for a pregnant
woman’s health do not justify risk to fetal development (for example, acceptable
therapies are available that do not involve the drug).
Often a birth defect is thought of as something apparent upon birth, but
scientists have found that some problems from fetal drug exposure such as
cancer do not become evident until adulthood. And even though problems
might not be observed among infants of women who used a certain drug
during pregnancy, that fact does not necessarily mean the drug has no impact
on fetal development. Drugs discussed in this book typically affect a user’s
brain, suggesting that they may be particularly prone to harming fetal brain
and nervous system development. Due to the course of fetal development,
Introduction 9
those effects may occur in a later stage of pregnancy than types of harm involving
bones or other organs. In addition to matters affecting fetal development,
pregnancy can alter a drug’s effect on the woman, for example,
causing a dose to last longer than in a nonpregnant woman. That, in turn,
could cause a pregnant woman to receive a cumulative overdose if she uses
an amount suitable for a nonpregnant woman.
STATISTICS
Numbers are a common element in articles and speeches about drugs. Numbers
can seem to provide precise information. Occasionally, however, the precision
is illusory. For example, a study6 of drug deaths in major U.S. cities
during the early 1970s found that 60% of deaths in New York involved methadone,
but it was involved in under 1% of deaths in Los Angeles and 0% in
Chicago. Depending on which city’s experience someone was inclined to cite,
methadone could be made to appear as a major or as an insignificant problem.
Statistics may lump substances together, perhaps saying that a particular percentage
of persons who died had marijuana or cocaine in their blood. Those
are two very different drugs. What percentage was marijuana and what percentage
was cocaine? What percentages were at a level of intoxication? Would
intoxication have had anything to do with the cause of death? If so, was the
death due to a poisonous effect of the drug, or was it due to a poor decision
while intoxicated? Many statistics offer no answers to such questions. Even
when statistics are both reliable and meaningful, often they are rapidly outdated.
For all those reasons, The Encyclopedia of Addictive Drugs offers few statistics.
Numbers found in this book are solid and should still have meaning years
from now. The list of general sources at the end of this book includes Internet
Web sites that can provide the latest statistics. They may be accurate, but (as
indicated above) their meaning may be uncertain.
NOTES
1. For an overview see J. Orford, “Addiction as Excessive Appetite,” Addiction 96
(2001): 15–31. For example, cocaine was long considered non-addictive because usage
did not produce physical symptoms of addiction. In the 1980s this traditional understanding
was challenged by research reports such as F.H. Gawin and H.D. Kleber,
“Abstinence Symptomatology and Psychiatric Diagnosis in Cocaine Abusers: Clinical
Observations,” Archives of General Psychiatry 43 (1986): 107–13; H.D. Kleber and F.H.
Gawin, “In Reply,” Archives of General Psychiatry 44 (1987): 298; H.D. Kleber, “Epidemic
Cocaine Abuse: America’s Present, Britain’s Future?” British Journal of Addiction 83
(1988): 1364. Those challenges met skepticism or even outright rejection from A.E.
Skodol, “Diagnostic Issues in Cocaine Abuse,” in H.I. Spitz and J.S. Rosecan, eds.,
Cocaine Abuse: New Directions in Treatment and Research (New York: Brunner/Mazel,
1987), 120; D.W. Teller and P. Devenyi, “Bromocriptine in Cocaine Withdrawal—Does
It Work?” International Journal of the Addictions 23 (1988): 1197–1205; A.S.V. Burgen and
J.F. Mitchell, Gaddum’s Pharmacology, 9th ed. (Oxford: Oxford University Press, 1985),
76; J.E.F. Reynolds. Martindale: The Extra Pharmacopoeia, 28th ed. (London: The Pharmaceutical
Press, 1982), 914; J.M. Arena, ed., Poisoning: Toxicology, Symptoms, Treat10
The Encyclopedia of Addictive Drugs
ments, 5th ed. (Springfield, IL: Charles C. Thomas, 1986), 557; Drug Facts and
Comparisons, 1990 ed. (St. Louis: Facts and Comparisons, 1989), 2078; A. Goth, Medical
Pharmacology: Principles and Conduct, 11th ed. (St. Louis: C.V. Mosby Company, 1984),
350; B.K. Colasanti, “Contemporary Drug Abuse,” in C.R. Craig and R.E. Stitzel, eds.,
Modern Pharmacology, 2d ed. (Boston: Little, Brown and Company, 1986), 620; F.J. Goldstein
and G.V. Rossi, “Pharmacological Aspects of Drug Abuse,” in A.R. Gennaro, ed.,
Remington’s Pharmaceutical Sciences, 17th ed. (Easton, PA: Mack Publishing, 1985), 1351;
G.K. McEvoy, ed., American Hospital Formulary Drug Service Information (Bethesda, MD:
American Society of Hospital Pharmacists, 1989), 1508; Sidney Kaye, Handbook of
Emergency Toxicology: A Guide for the Identification, Diagnosis, and Treatment of Poisoning,
5th ed. (Springfield, IL: Charles C. Thomas, 1988), 272; R.E. Gosselin, R.P. Smith, and
H.C. Hodge, Clinical Toxicology of Commercial Products, 5th ed. (Baltimore: Williams &
Wilkins, 1984), III–117.
2. Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, 3rd ed., rev. (Washington, DC:
American Psychiatric Association, 1987), 166–68.
3. Ibid., 179.
4. H.K. Armenian, M.A. Chamieh, and A. Baraka, “Influence of Wartime Stress and
Psychosocial Factors in Lebanon on Analgesic Requirements for Postoperative Pain,”
Social Science and Medicine 15E (February 1981): 63–66.
5. J. Vila, “Protection from Pentobarbital Lethality Mediated by Pavlovian Conditioning,”
Pharmacology, Biochemistry, and Behavior 32 (1989): 365–66; R.E. Hinson and S.
Siegel, “Pavlovian Inhibitory Conditioning and Tolerance to Pentobarbital-Induced Hypothermia
in Rats,” Journal of Experimental Psychology: Animal Behavior Processes 12
(1986): 363–70.
6. E.C. Dinovo et al., “Analysis of Results of Toxicological Examinations Performed
by Coroners’ or Medical Examiners’ Laboratories in 2000 Drug-Involved Deaths in
Nine Major U.S. Cities,” Clinical Chemistry 22 (1976): 847–50.
Drug Types
This section of the book groups drugs in common ways that help readers make
basic distinctions among them. For example, a drug grouped here among stimulants
has basic differences from one grouped with depressants. Likewise, all
drugs in the same classification share common attributes. Many details about
drugs in the following classes are in the alphabetical listings of specific substances,
in addition to the general overview below.
STIMULANTS
As the name implies, these drugs stimulate the user. A trucker might use
stimulants to drive a cargo cross country without rest. A soldier might use
them to perform strenuous action that would otherwise be impossible. Stimulants
frequently achieve such ends by drawing upon a person’s reserves of
stamina and energy. Occasional use in that way can help accomplish tasks,
and if a person is able to rest and recuperate afterward, perhaps no harm is
done. Abusing powerful stimulants, however, is like burning a candle at both
ends to produce more light. The quick burst of energy may be followed by
collapse.
Not all stimulants are powerful. Some are so mild that they are readily
available in certain foods such as caffeine in coffee, tea, and soda. A person
taking a few ounces of such a beverage will likely need no recuperation at all
from the stimulative action. Nonetheless, multiple doses of caffeine can produce
a strong effect, and some natural products can be massaged to increase
the dose. Caffeine is far less powerful than cocaine, but a person using a lot
of caffeine can become as jittery and hyperactive as a person using a little
cocaine. A mild drug can be abused.
Using potent pharmaceutical stimulants is a way to improve feelings of
well-being because increased energy can improve self-confidence regardless
12 The Encyclopedia of Addictive Drugs
of any other effects on body chemistry. Such a mental state can make current
problems seem less troublesome. They may not go away, but worries about
them can decline. That effect of stimulants can be seductive. Moreover, if that
is the reason someone uses stimulants, stopping the drug can be doubly difficult.
Not only are feelings of self-confidence and energy replaced by selfdoubt
and exhaustion, but problems that never went away will probably seem
all the worse. And indeed they may really be worse if the stimulant user has
taken no effective action to deal with them.
For information about specific stimulants not otherwise classified below, see
the entries on: caffeine, modafinil, pemoline, and yohimbe.
Amphetamine Class
Amphetamine stimulants are pharmaceutical products created in laboratories,
not harvested or refined from natural products. When amphetamines
debuted under the brand name Benzedrine during the Great Depression of
the 1930s, they were an ingredient used for inhalers that people would sniff
to relieve stopped-up noses. Another effect was a burst of energy and alertness,
sometimes accompanied by a brightening of mood into euphoria, and
people began using the nonprescription inhalers for recreational purposes.
Such drugs were called Cartwheel, Euphodine, and Halloo-wach. Amphetamines
became accepted therapeutically as a treatment for depression and
worked best if a person simply had difficulty coping with stress during part
of a day, as a dose wears off quickly and can leave a person feeling lower if
nothing has changed in the situation causing the stress. For example, a dose
might deal effectively with occasional aggravation in the workplace but not
work so well for a person who stayed at home all the time with continual
depression. In the 1930s oral tablets of Benzedrine (“Bennies”) became available.
Both inhalers and tablets tended to promote insomnia, and that effect
was soon used medically to fight narcolepsy, an affliction in which a person
suddenly falls asleep numerous times throughout the day. The drug was also
used to treat Parkinson’s disease, epilepsy, and alcoholism and to help persons
suffering from attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). ADHD begins
in childhood and involves difficulty in paying proper attention to surroundings
while also acting restless. Usually the condition goes away as children
grow older, but it can continue into adult life. Treating the condition with a
stimulant may sound counterproductive, but experience shows that low doses
of amphetamine class stimulants can ease ADHD. Practitioners had to learn
caution in prescribing to children, however, as occasionally this treatment
could intensify rather than diminish the undesired conduct.
World War II brought wide use of amphetamines as military forces on all
sides issued “pep pills” to give personnel an edge in combat. The most prominent
combat pills were Benzedrine (amphetamine sulfate), Dexedrine (dextroamphetamine),
and Methedrine (methamphetamine). Combining such
drugs with hard physical labor can be risky, with a user crumpling from
overexerting the heart and overheating the whole body, an additional combat
hazard for users. In contrast to some other military forces, the United States
did not routinely issue the pills except to bomber crews. Nonetheless, the drug
Drug Types 13
was freely available to U.S. personnel who wanted it and was a standard item
in survival packs. To improve alertness, national leaders such as British Prime
Minister Winston Churchill and, later on, President John F. Kennedy freely
used amphetamines as well.1 Kennedy’s New Frontier rhetoric was characterized
by his frequent call for “vigor,” a prime effect of amphetamines, and a
state of being that was important to him.
In athletic events, long-standing records fell after amphetamines became
available; speculation exists about whether diet and training were solely responsible
for a sudden burst of feats that no human had ever been able to
perform. We know for sure that racehorses were doped with amphetamines
in that era.
The wartime habit of using amphetamines to increase worker productivity
made a peacetime transition in Japan and Sweden, where amphetamine abuse
became a major concern in the 1950s. In the United States concern also grew
with publicity about dangerous ingestion of these tablets by exhausted longhaul
truckers. Even though federal officials had cracked down on “upper”
sales at truck stops and gas stations, in 1965 the Interstate Commerce Commission
(ICC) described amphetamines as a serious threat to motorists sharing
the road with trucks, a claim disputed by the American Trucking Association.2
Reports that a drug is used for recreation traditionally raise suspicions about
it in America, and an undercurrent of such reports about amphetamines
picked up strength in the 1950s. Members of New York’s fashionable “beautiful
people” who used the drug were called the Benzedrine Set, and in Hollywood
the tablets were called “Dolls.” Connoisseurs began dosing themselves
simultaneously with barbiturate depressants for what was called “a bolt and
a jolt.” At the social scale’s other end, investigators confirmed a brisk business
at various prisons where guards were illicitly selling inhalers to prisoners.
Outside the jails, crimes against property and persons were attributed to inhalers.
Although restrictions governed sales of inhalers, they were officially nonprescription
and priced under a dollar. One inhaler would yield the equivalent
of 25 Benzedrine tablets. The original manufacturer of amphetamine sulfate,
along with competitors who produced the drug, tried to mix substances into
inhalers that would thwart misuse. Abusers found ways to overcome those
deterrents, however.
Hearing about alleged results of amphetamine abuse may have been exotic
entertainment for most Americans, but they became alarmed by stories of
pleasure usage by youths. Inhaler parties by teenagers became so notorious
around Kansas City, Missouri, that a U.S. senator introduced federal legislation
to curb inhaler sales (Kansas City merchants were retailing hundreds
more a week than would be expected in a medicinal context).3 Pharmaceutical
companies began withdrawing brands from the market, and in 1959 the U.S.
Food and Drug Administration (FDA) announced that the product would
henceforth be available by prescription only.
In the 1960s amphetamines received publicity as an element of the hippie
pharmacopeia, with that association promoting disdain for a type of drug that
had originally been welcomed by ordinary people. Illicit usage of injectable
amphetamines became known as “speeding,” a reference to hyperactivity re14
The Encyclopedia of Addictive Drugs
sulting from such needle work. Federal authorities placed new restrictions on
these stimulants during the 1960s. Varieties available from drugstores declined,
as did physicians’ ability to prescribe them. The 31 million prescriptions
made in 1967 comprise a number never equaled since.
Amphetamines stimulate the central nervous system (the brain and associated
anatomy). At one time evidence of damage to nerve cells was not clear
enough to satisfy some credible researchers that such a hazard exists, despite
any theoretical reasons for concern, but in the 1990s evidence was becoming
persuasive. Among other things, researchers have found that persons who
continually abuse amphetamines and persons with a certain type of organic
brain injury (“focal damage to orbitofrontal PFC [prefrontal cortex]”) have
similar problems in making decisions.4 Severity correlates to length of amphetamine
abuse. Nonprescription sales have long been banned in Sweden
due to kidney system damage, and amphetamines are suspects in liver damage
involving hepatitis. Amphetamines also excite the heart, increasing pulse
rate and blood pressure. Normally cardiac effects are unharmful but can be
risky at high doses. To a lesser extent, amphetamines help to open air pathways
in the lungs while stimulating breathing. A less welcome action can be
promotion of muscle and vocal tics, causing users to jerk or cry out uncontrollably.
This problem, however, applies more to persons already troubled
by tic afflictions than to persons having no such disability. Amphetamines can
also cause rashes or hives. Libido can also change, perhaps involving a
stronger sex drive, perhaps involving impotence.
Various foods and drugs can interact with amphetamines. Vitamin C and
fruit juices lessen amphetamine effects, while common stomach antacid preparations
increase them. Amphetamines can boost actions of widely prescribed
psychological medicines called tricyclic antidepressants, an interaction also
affecting heart action. Amphetamines can counteract medicines intended to
control high blood pressure and can also release extra noradrenaline hormone
that is stored in the bodies of people taking monoamine oxidase inhibitors
(MAOIs, found in some antidepressants and some Parkinson’s disease medication).
That release can raise blood pressure enough to create headaches
while simultaneously raising body temperature enough to kill a person. The
danger of MAOI interaction is far less with oral amphetamine dosage than
with intravenous injection, and some medical practitioners have simultaneously
prescribed oral forms of amphetamine and MAOI drugs, believing that
probable benefits outweigh possible risks. Lithium carbonate, a medicine used
to control manic behavior, can reduce central nervous stimulation caused by
amphetamines.
Psychological effects vary. In addition to results that many persons would
find attractive (noted above), users can also become grouchy, jittery, unable
to sleep, and suspicious of other persons. Someone highly intoxicated on amphetamines
can act mixed up and pugnacious, be frightened, and have hallucinations.
This type of drug promotes impulsive actions—not a good
consequence if a user is angry and afraid. Overindulgence can leave a person
tired, peevish, confused, and depressed when the drug session ends. A serious
abuser can develop symptoms duplicating schizophrenia.
Over time some abusers feel a need to increase dosages in order to get the
Drug Types 15
same effects that lower doses once provided. That suggests an abuser has
developed “tolerance” to the drug, a classic component of addiction. In contrast
to abusers of other drugs, amphetamine abusers commonly fight tolerance
not by gradually increasing their dose but by alternating between periods
of little use and binges of massive use, a practice promoting inconsistent behavior
that can bewilder acquaintances. Despite all of this, into the 1980s amphetamines
were described as not addictive.
Although amphetamines have a long history and widespread usage, their
potential for causing cancer is unknown; necessary animal experiments had
not been conducted as the twentieth century closed. Abnormal fetal development
has occurred in mice receiving over 40 times the maximum safe human
dose, but normal development of offspring has occurred despite
administration of 12.5 times the maximum human dose to rats and 7 times
the maximum to rabbits.5 One human study noted a tendency for more cleft
palates than usual if mothers used amphetamines during the first two months
of pregnancy.6 Amphetamines easily pass from a pregnant woman into the
fetal blood supply. Standard medical advice cautions pregnant women against
using the drug without first discussing the issue with a physician. Some studies
claim to find that children born of women who abused amphetamines
during pregnancy will have long-term problems with personality and intelligence—
but these same women abused other drugs as well; some were displeased
about their pregnancies; and about 80% of children in one study had
been taken away from the mothers and put into foster homes.7 Problems faced
by such youngsters may well originate outside amphetamines. Tracking amphetamines’
physical effect on offspring is easier. Babies from women who
abused amphetamines during pregnancy can exhibit anxiety and physical discomfort
suggesting dependence and withdrawal. We know that excessive use
by a pregnant woman can promote premature birth and reduce a newborn’s
weight. Genetic predisposition appears to influence how much this type of
drug will affect fetal development.
Amphetamines enter human milk and can reach levels three to seven times
higher than shown in maternal blood, so nursing mothers can be dosing their
infants. Because this kind of drug can act as an appetite suppressant, causing
a person to take in inadequate nutrition, that effect is still another concern if
infants receive amphetamines through a mother’s milk.
For information about specific amphetamine class stimulants, see alphabetical
listings for: dextroamphetamine, ephedrine, khat, ma huang, methamphetamine,
methcathinone, and methylphenidate.
Anorectic Class
Many persons in the United States consider themselves overweight. That
self-perception may be more prevalent than obesity itself, but even so, by
medical standards a good 33% to 50% of Americans are overweight.8 That
condition can aggravate or even cause serious physical afflictions such as diabetes,
high blood pressure, and heart disease. Persons seeking slimness and
who are dissatisfied with results from changes in diet and exercise may seek
pharmacological help.
16 The Encyclopedia of Addictive Drugs
The first diet drug to receive scientific endorsement was thyroid hormone.
Its use for this purpose began in the 1890s on the theory that it would boost
a person’s metabolism and thereby promote faster use of calories. The same
theory made dinitrophenol a standard diet drug before World War II. Although
it boosted metabolic rate, it also boosted rates of cataracts and of harm
to the peripheral nervous system (which involves the functioning of various
organs and muscles). For those reasons the drug was abandoned. In the 1930s
amphetamines became available and quickly became a popular diet aid despite
their potential for abuse.
Many stimulants suppress appetite, and some are used as medicines to help
people lose weight. Those medicines are called “anorectics.” Their stimulant
effects may be lower than drugs in other classes but can still have potential
for abuse and addiction. For that reason, many anorectics are scheduled substances.
Such drugs are casually described as appetite suppressants, but not all promote
weight loss in that way. For instance, some may affect the way food is
absorbed in the body; some increase a person’s rate of metabolism so the
person burns more calories; some make a person more physically energetic.
Question has even been raised about whether a stimulant’s anorectic action
simply comes from elevating the mood of depressed people and thereby reducing
their need to gain comfort from eating. Mechanisms by which anorectics
work are poorly understood.
Indeed, whether they work at all is uncertain. Compared to placebos, most
studies show additional weight loss among persons taking anorectics to be
measurable but barely noticeable; some studies show anorectics to be no more
effective than placebos. In experiments where anorectics work well, skeptics
wonder if results come from factors other than the drug, such as rapport
between physician and patient, belief that the substance would work, or even
from basics such as controls on food intake during the experiment. Scientists
directing one study of anorectics concluded that sensations of appetite suppression
were so subtle that a user could miss them unless the person was
trying to be aware of them.9 The effectiveness of an anorectic declines as weeks
go by, through development of tolerance. A telling exception to development
of tolerance is methylcellulose, an unscheduled substance used to increase
bulk of consumed food and thereby increase the physical feeling of fullness.
The substance has no psychological effect, and no tolerance develops. Methylcellulose
is also among the least effective dieting aids.
Abusers of stimulant anorectics exhibit symptoms similar to those found
among abusers of amphetamines, from skin rash to psychosis. Some persons
using anorectics properly under medical supervision experience muscle pain
and cramps, weariness, peevishness, depression, difficulty in thinking. That
group of symptoms is the same as those undergone by persons trying to cope
with lack of food regardless of drug use, a coincidence raising question about
whether some undesired effects attributed to anorectics are simply undesired
effects of being hungry.
A harsh fact about anorectics is that weight lost while using them tends to
return if a person stops taking the drugs (and generally they are intended for
short-term use only). Behavioral therapy teaches people how to change their
Drug Types 17
eating and exercise habits. A comparison study10 not only found behavioral
therapy superior to anorectic therapy in preventing regain of lost pounds but
also found behavioral therapy to be more effective alone than when using
anorectics along with it—a troubling result for advocates of anorectics. Skeptics
ask whether drugs that produce only mild temporary improvement in a
chronic condition are worth anything.
For information about specific anorectic class stimulants, see alphabetical
listings for: benzphetamine, diethylpropion, fenfluramine, mazindol, phendimetrazine,
phenmetrazine, phentermine, and sibutramine.
Cocaine Class
As decades change, so do attitudes toward cocaine. In the latter 1800s it
was widely used by ordinary middle-class Americans and had a reputation
no worse than alcohol or tobacco. In the years before World War I, news
media stories tied the drug to African Americans and crime, and public opinion
transformed the substance from a commonplace item into a substance used
mainly by social deviants. Cocaine received little attention from the 1960s
illicit drug culture, which seemingly considered cocaine an archaic item no
longer of interest. In the 1970s cocaine was portrayed as a drug used by
wealthy “beautiful people,” and in the 1980s it was portrayed as a poor ghetto
dweller’s drug. In the 1800s cocaine was considered highly addictive, but from
the 1950s into the 1980s it was described as nonaddictive. By the 1990s cocaine
was called the most addictive drug known, and demand for the product resulted
in accessibility likened to fast-food hamburgers. Although tolerance
develops with abuse of most stimulants and was reported with cocaine in the
1800s, in the 1970s and 1980s a scientific consensus held that tolerance did not
develop among cocaine abusers. On the contrary, abuse was believed to sensitize
people taking the drug, allowing them to achieve the same effects with
smaller and smaller doses. Yet by the 1990s cocaine addicts were believed to
have a compulsive desire to take more and more of the drug. They were seen
to engage in the same kind of binge habit exhibited by amphetamine abusers.
Although a chemical formula stays unaltered as decades pass, ways of using
a substance can change. Long ago cocaine was used to make mildly stimulating
drinks. Velo-Coca and Vin Mariani were popular cocaine beverages of the
nineteenth century, the latter endorsed by notables such as Thomas Edison,
Jules Verne, and Pope Leo XIII. The soft drink Coca-Cola originally contained
cocaine, but the drug was dropped from the soda early in the twentieth century.
These old beverages, however, had about the same relation to cocaine
as beer has to white lightning moonshine. A pint of beer and a pint of white
lightning may both contain alcohol, but their impact on a user will likely
differ. Compared to full-strength pharmaceutical cocaine, old cocaine beverages
were relatively weak concoctions.
Some notables are famed for their use of the full-strength product, the most
famous example being that of the pioneering psychiatrist Sigmund Freud.
When he no longer found the drug useful, he tapered off and eventually quit
with no particular difficulty. His example has been duplicated by many other
users. He and they were persons enjoying lives of fulfillment in which cocaine
18 The Encyclopedia of Addictive Drugs
was simply one part. In contrast, persons who are dissatisfied with their lives,
for whom cocaine brings relief of unhappiness, may face a harder struggle in
giving up the drug if it begins degrading the quality of their lives. The more
needs a drug satisfies for a person, the stronger its appeal. Some needs may
be biological; a study of identical twins finds their cocaine usage patterns to
be remarkably similar.11 Some needs may derive from a person’s life situation.
Cocaine abuse is normally part of a multiproblem lifestyle. A study of
homeless cocaine abusers found that achieving abstinence was easier for them
if they obtained shelter and employment.12 Compared to the whole population,
cocaine addicts are much likelier to be addicted to gambling as well.13
Alcoholism and suicidal thoughts increase the likelihood that a person who
uses cocaine will become addicted.14 One study of persons being treated for
cocaine abuse found over one half to be jobless and over one third to have
jail records.15 A survey of crack smokers found that over one third had been
physically attacked over a one-year period.16 Five years of records at one hospital
showed the following primary reasons for admission of cocaine-using
patients: assaults, stabbings, and bullet wounds.17 Such persons obviously face
serious challenges other than cocaine; any inability to cope with the drug is
but a single element in a general inability to cope with life.
For information about specific cocaine class stimulants, see alphabetical listings
for: coca and cocaine.
Pyridine Alkaloids Class
Tobacco and areca nut are the most widely used substances containing
drugs from this class. Although most Americans think of tobacco’s nicotine
as a recreational drug, it has had agricultural functions as a pesticide and for
ridding farm animals of worms. Nicotine is readily absorbed through the skin
and causes “green tobacco sickness” among farmworkers who handle leaves,
a poisoning sometimes severe enough to require hospitalization. The tobacco
plant has been known to kill livestock that eat it. Humans have also been
poisoned when attempting to use tobacco as food, such as by boiling greens.
Tobacco apparently originated in the Americas, where native peoples did
not seem to regard it as a recreational substance. Their uses were spiritual
and medical. Even in the twentieth century some native peoples used tobacco
to treat conditions ranging from chills to infections and snake bites. When
Europeans discovered tobacco in the New World, they removed it from the
cultural context in which its primary uses had been medical and spiritual.
Used without those restrictions, hazards became obvious soon enough. Lacking
the shared social values that had long limited tobacco’s use in the New
World, Europeans attempted to control the substance by law. Property of cultivators
and traffickers became subject to forfeiture in Hungary and Russia
and even Japan. In the 1600s smoking was condemned by the pope and by
King James of England, and smokers were condemned to death in Turkey,
Iran, Russia, and some German states. Legal harshness, however, was unable
to substitute for the social values that had limited consumption in lands where
tobacco originated.
We often measure drug addiction by the amount of drug used, assuming
Drug Types 19
that the more a person uses, the stronger the drug’s hold. Researchers have
found this assumption to be incorrect for nicotine. Measured by strength of
dependence symptoms, a person who smokes more than a half pack of tobacco
cigarettes each day may be no more addicted than a person who smokes just
half a pack,18 meaning the lighter smoker may have just as much trouble
quitting as the heavier smoker.
Among cigarette users, the amount of smoking depends in part on the tobacco’s
nicotine content, but other factors are also involved. During the 1990s
in the United States female smokers tended to have a higher degree of tobacco
addiction than male smokers did (measured not in number of cigarettes
smoked but in strength of addiction symptoms such as tolerance, withdrawal,
and difficulty in reducing consumption).19 Whites had stronger levels of addiction
than did members of other races.20 Adolescents tended to smoke fewer
cigarettes than middle-aged persons, but despite adolescents’ lower usage,
their addiction symptoms were just as strong as those found in heaviersmoking
middle-aged persons.21 Older smokers were the least addicted even
though they were the heaviest users.22 Researchers are unsure whether such
differences are caused by biology or culture or a combination.
In the United States tobacco smoking is associated with being an adult, and
adolescents may take up the practice partly as a symbol of their passage into
adulthood. Role models are also important; a prominent person who smokes
may inspire admirers to do so. Celebrity endorsements of cigarettes were once
routine in advertising, but the admired person can also be a personal acquaintance.
A survey in Spain revealed that the role model of teachers who smoke
seems to be a major factor in starting the habit among students there.23
The popularity of smoking among American teenagers declined in the 1970s
and 1980s but increased in the 1990s. A cancer statistics authority reported
that by 1997 over 33% of American high schoolers were using cigarettes.24 A
study of Taiwanese high school students published in 1999 found a much
lower usage rate, more like 10%.25 In 1999 a survey of over 14,000 young adult
American college students found about 33% using some sort of tobacco product,
mostly cigarettes.26 The latest statistics can be found through the “Sources
for More Information” at the end of this book.
For information about specific pyridine alkaloids class stimulants, see alphabetical
listings for: areca nut and nicotine.
DEPRESSANTS
Depressants generally have the opposite effect of stimulants. Many depressants
are used as sedatives or tranquilizers, terms often used as if they mean
the same thing even though some experts would dispute such interchangeable
usage of the terms sedative and tranquilizer. Depressant drugs slow a person
down, and one result can be reduction of tension, which in turn can improve
a mentally depressed mood. Depressant withdrawal symptoms typically include
uneasiness and sleeping difficulty. If dependence is strong enough,
withdrawal may also involve tremors, loss of strength, delirium, and seizures.
Gradual reduction in dosage may help avoid withdrawal symptoms, but much
depends on the particular drug and the strength of dependence.
20 The Encyclopedia of Addictive Drugs
For information about specific depressants not listed among the following
classes, see alphabetical listings for: alcohol, chloral hydrate, ethchlorvynol,
GHB, glutethimide, ketamine, mandrake, meprobamate, methaqualone,
PCP, pentazocine, zaleplon, and zolpidem.
Barbiturate Class
Barbiturates were introduced into medical practice during the early 1900s,
for combating insomnia, anxiety, and seizures. Despite occasional flurries of
concern, not until the 1960s did much alarm grow about barbiturates in the
United States. Members of a U.S. Senate subcommittee began portraying the
drug class as a menace in the 1970s, and afterward stricter controls were put
on use.
Barbiturates and alcohol have similar effects. If someone intoxicated by alcohol
takes barbiturates, the drunkenness will deepen as if more alcohol had
been swallowed. Pharmaceutical effects of alcohol alone can kill a person who
overdoses, and adding barbiturates can transform a session of social drinking
into a fatal one. More than one person has died by taking barbiturate sleeping
pills with alcohol instead of water.
The similarity of alcohol and barbiturates is also shown by the appearance
of a serious withdrawal syndrome called delirium tremens in alcohol and
barbiturate abusers who are cut off from their drug. Lesser withdrawal symptoms
for both drugs may include perspiring and vomiting. Barbiturate withdrawal
may involve dizziness, tremors, fidgety behavior, edgy feelings, and
insomnia. Even with strict medical supervision, withdrawal can be fatal. Tolerance
can develop. More details can be found in alphabetical entries for specific
barbiturates.
A person using barbiturates should take the same precautions as a person
using alcohol, for example, using care about running dangerous machinery
such as automobiles.
Barbiturates can cause reflex sympathetic dystrophy of the arm, a disease
in which a hand loses bone density and becomes painful and difficult to move.
This class of drugs may also cause a syndrome that produces pain in the
shoulder and hand, interfering with their movement. Extended dosage with
barbiturates may cause rickets, a disease in which bones soften. One of the
most dangerous effects of barbiturate overdose is temporary stoppage of electrical
activity in the brain, which could lead to premature declaration of a
patient’s death, particularly if the patient is being treated for some injury
without caregivers knowing about the person’s barbiturate usage.
This class of substances may interfere with blood thinner medicine, with
birth control pills, and with other female hormone medications. Barbiturates
may extend the time that an MAOI dose lasts.
In animal experiments barbiturates have encouraged the development of
cancer.
When used by pregnant women, barbiturates can cause birth defects ranging
from internal organ deformities to malformations of the face. If a pregnant
woman uses barbiturates regularly, her offspring may be born resonant with
Drug Types 21
them. This class of drugs passes into the milk of nursing mothers and may
depress consciousness, pulse rate, and respiration of nursing infants.
For information about specific barbiturate class depressants, see alphabetical
listings for: butalbital, mephobarbital, pentobarbital, and phenobarbital.
Benzodiazepine Class
Benzodiazepines became widely available for medical purposes in the 1960s
and replaced barbiturates in treatments of many conditions. Benzodiazepines
proved themselves less prone to abuse than barbiturates, in addition to being
safer—accidental overdose is unlikely because the amount needed for a medical
effect is so much smaller than a poisonous amount. In addition to reducing
anxiety, benzodiazepines may improve quality of sleep—from fighting insomnia
to eliminating sleepwalking. This class of drugs is also used to calm people
and to treat convulsions. Some users experience mild euphoria.
As might be expected with drugs that promote sleep, benzodiazepines can
worsen reaction time, vigilance, and thinking abilities and therefore should be
used cautiously if a person is operating dangerous machinery such as an automobile.
Problems may also develop for persons who are already unsteady
on their feet, such as elderly persons prone to falling. The substances can also
cause memory trouble, typically difficulty in recalling recent experiences.
Headache, peevishness, confusion, and tremors may occur. In unusual cases
rageful outbursts may occur. These are “paradoxical reactions,” meaning they
are the opposite of what would be expected from the drug. Expressions of
rage possibly emerge because the drug reduces anxiety in a person who is
angry about something, and less anxiety can lead to less inhibition against
doing something.
Over a 12-year span a practitioner observed patients taking benzodiazepines
to treat serious sleep problems such as night terrors and sleepwalking. The
practitioner found that 2% of this population (not 2% of all patients but just
those using benzodiazepines against these sleep disorders) occasionally
abused them,27 and this population base included persons with a previous
history of drug abuse; thus we can expect benzodiazepine abuse to be even
lower in a general population. Among persons treated for drug abuse, benzodiazepines
are among the least-abused substances. Experiments giving free
access to benzodiazepines to persons undergoing treatment for drug abuse
revealed little interest in those compounds.28 This class of depressants can be
highly popular among special populations, however. One study noted that
30% of alcoholics were using benzodiazepines.29 When benzodiazepines were
given to rats in experiments, the animals’ consumption of alcohol increased,30
suggesting that human benzodiazepine usage might increase alcohol’s appeal.
Although benzodiazepines are administered to treat alcohol withdrawal, combining
the two substances recreationally is a dangerous mix that can prove
fatal.
Different benzodiazepines have differing attractiveness to abusers. Measured
by amount of misuse, claims made by misusers about drug effects, mental
and physical effects verified in scientific experiments, and impressions
reported by medical caregivers, diazepam is considered to have one of the
22 The Encyclopedia of Addictive Drugs
greatest potentials for abuse. Alprazolam and lorazepam have similar, but
lower, risk. Halazepam and oxazepam seem to be among the least risky for
abuse.
Tolerance to some benzodiazepine effects can develop (many details are in
this book’s alphabetical section). Dependence can also emerge, with a withdrawal
syndrome similar to those of alcohol and barbiturates. Often the syndrome
may be avoided by gradual reduction of dosage.
Small studies have found that women who use benzodiazepines during
pregnancy produce infants who are smaller than normal.31 Children in one of
these studies32 rapidly caught up in some growth perimeters, but at the age
of 18 months head size still remained smaller than normal. Facial deformities
were common. The children had persistent trouble with muscle control. Similar
findings in another small study33 included mental retardation, but still
another study34 noted that such children also had heavy fetal exposure to
alcohol, exposure that is known to produce mental retardation. Thus the actual
role of benzodiazepines was unclear.
Some of these reports did not track outcomes past infancy. Research tracking
children up to four years of age found that early problems attributed to
benzodiazepines cleared up in most of them.35 When teachers were asked to
evaluate schoolchildren who had fetal exposure, the instructors found no difference
between them and classmates.36
Researchers who investigated the outcome of thousands of pregnancies
found no evidence that benzodiazepines cause cleft palate.37 A large study
involving hundreds of pregnancies found birth defects to be no more likely
among women who used benzodiazepines than among women who did not
use them; and even when malformations occurred, no particular kind of birth
defect tended to appear in benzodiazepine offspring.38 Drugs that cause fetal
harm generally cause particular types of damage; lack of a particular type
with benzodiazepines suggests that the drug was not the cause of observed
malformations. Some investigators believe they have detected a particular
birth defect pattern, but such findings have been questioned.39 As the twentyfirst
century began, a research team reported evidence that benzodiazepines
may damage fetal brain development.40 Science has not yet rendered a verdict
on the safety of benzodiazepines during pregnancy. Infants with fetal exposure
can be born dependent on this type of drug. It passes into breast milk,
but the amount from lower-dosage levels probably has no effect on nursing
infants.
For information about specific benzodiazepine class depressants, see alphabetical
listings for: alprazolam, chlordiazepoxide, clonazepam, clorazepate,
diazepam, estazolam, flunitrazepam, flurazepam, halazepam, lorazepam,
midazolam, oxazepam, prazepam, quazepam, temazepam, and triazolam.
Opiate Class
Along with alcohol, opiates are the oldest known depressants. At one time
the term narcotic referred specifically and only to opiates, but when drug control
laws were strengthened in the early twentieth century the language of
Drug Types 23
those laws expanded the dictionary definition of narcotic and made it a synonym
for all controlled drugs.
Although opiates have various medical uses, the main therapeutic application
is pain control. Other common uses are for fighting coughs and reducing
diarrhea. Some other therapeutic uses of specific opiates are given in this
book’s alphabetical listings of drugs.
The chance of medical opiate usage turning a person into an addict is slim.
Very few persons receiving medical opiates find them attractive, and almost
all patients who enjoy opiates already have a drug abuse problem. Researchers
examined records of 11,882 patients who received narcotics and found 4 with
a subsequent addiction problem who lacked a prior drug addiction history.41
The chance of developing dependence is higher, but a patient can be weaned
off opiates in ways that avoid withdrawal symptoms.
Illicit users of opiates generally seek to achieve a mental state of indifference
in which problems and frustrations no longer feel bothersome. A person high
on opiates is oblivious to the world and unlikely to bother anyone. Some users
experience euphoria.
Classic unwanted actions from opiates are constipation, urinary difficulty,
low blood pressure, and breathing trouble. MAOI drugs, described earlier,
may interact dangerously with opiates. In contrast to such problems, a desirable
drug interaction is that opiates may boost pain relief from aspirin.
Originally the phrase “being hooked on a drug” referred to being so resonant
with (that is, dependent on) an opiate that a withdrawal syndrome occurred
if dosage stopped. Symptoms of opiate withdrawal are similar to those
of influenza: sweats, goose bumps, muscle aches, cramps, runny nose, diarrhea,
and sleep difficulties. Although conscienceless and irresponsible addicts
may be particularly short-tempered and dangerous if undergoing withdrawal,
for other persons the experience is miserable, but not horrible, and usually
lasts only a few days. Traditionally those few days are the extent of withdrawal,
but some authorities believe a subsequent stage of withdrawal occurs
in which a person experiences aches, insomnia, and grouchiness for several
months. Such symptoms, however, may simply be signs that the psychological
buffer provided by opiate use is no longer available.
Drug addiction “maintenance” programs are designed to supply enough
drug to hold off withdrawal but not enough to produce recreational sensations.
Unless participants supplement the legal dosage with illicit supplies,
such persons will not experience opiate effects enjoyed by addicts. Someone
on a maintenance dose can adequately perform job duties and safely operate
a motor vehicle. Performance may not be as sharp as in a drug-free state, but
performance is in the normal range.
Opiates have a wide range of effects on fetal behavior. If a pregnant woman
uses opiates regularly the fetus soon adapts to the presence of the drug and
seems to develop normally, although an infant can be born resonant with (that
is, dependent on) the drug and undergo withdrawal. Intermittent use of opiates
is more damaging to a fetus than regular use, with the changing drug
environment causing extra stress as a fetus copes with one condition and then
another. Opiates cause fetal metabolism to increase, diverting energy away
from body development. Infants born to opiate users are commonly smaller
24 The Encyclopedia of Addictive Drugs
than normal, and early slowness of brain development has been observed.
Evidence exists that fetal exposure causes long-lasting problems in children,
involving impulsiveness and inattention, but some researchers feel that home
environment (often involving a single-parent opiate abuser with additional
problems) is a better explanation for those difficulties.
For information about specific opiate class depressants, see alphabetical listings
for: buprenorphine, codeine, dihydrocodeine, etorphine, heroin, hydrocodone,
hydromorphone, morphine, nalbuphine, opium, oxycodone,
pholcodine, and thebaine.
Opioid Class
Opioids are often called opiates, which is satisfactory for practical purposes
because the two classes of drugs basically produce the same effects in the
same way. A technical difference exists between the two classes, however. If
the history of a product were traced backward through its manufacturing
processes, opiates generally would begin with the opium plant, but opioids
would generally begin in a laboratory. Despite this technical distinction, the
terms opiates and opioids are often used synonymously. Some of these substances
are called “semisynthetic” and are referred to as “opiate/opioid.”
Some opiates, such as morphine, can even be manufactured wholly in a laboratory
without starting from the natural product opium; thus the same chemical
can be either an opiate or an opioid.
For information about specific opioid class depressants, see alphabetical listings
for: butorphanol, dextromethorphan, dextromoramide, dextrorphan, diphenoxylate,
dipipanone, fentanyl, ketobemidone, LAAM, levorphanol,
meperidine, methadone, oxymorphone, phenoperidine, piritramide, propoxyphene,
remifentanil, and trimeperidine.
STEROIDS
The steroids governed by schedules of controlled substances are anabolic
steroids. Anabolic substances build up parts of living organisms, as opposed
to catabolic substances, which decompose those parts. Anabolic steroids are
abused mainly by persons desiring to increase muscle mass, such as competitive
athletes and body builders. Steroids can improve muscle strength in females
and in castrated males, but scientific evidence is weaker for intact males.
Still, steroids do seem to promote muscle mass, endurance, and overall athletic
performance while dosage continues. Some scientists suspect that any performance
enhancement experienced from anabolic steroids comes not from muscle
power but from psychological effects, with the drugs increasing a user’s
aggressiveness. Anabolic steroids can produce mania, anger, impulsiveness,
euphoria, and feelings of invincibility—a combination that may lead some
users into harmful social interactions. The combination can produce other
types of unwise behavior as well, such as extravagant expenditures of money
and taking reckless physical risks. Reports exist of paranoia and hallucinations
developing while using steroids and disappearing when steroid usage is
stopped.
Drug Types 25
Sports governing authorities banned the use of anabolic steroids by competitors.
Some athletes ignore the ban in hopes of avoiding detection. Various
other drugs are prohibited as well, but in 1988 most of the failed drug tests
ordered by the International Olympic Committee revealed anabolic steroids,
the most common one being nandrolone.42 Below that elite level, athletic use
of steroids seems uncommon. In the 1990s a study involving 58,625 college
students found only 175 steroid takers to study.43 That small group also had
a much higher consumption of other drugs, legal and illegal, than the average
student—suggesting that the steroid abusers were predisposed to use drugs
for coping with all sorts of life situations, not just sports. Similar association
of steroids with other illicit drug usage is found at the high school level.44
High school steroid statistics are often based on the concept of “lifetime use.”
Lifetime use means a person has taken a steroid at least once, which is not
the same as regularly taking them. The number of regular users will be much
smaller than the number of “lifetime” users.
Anabolic steroids are related to testosterone. Most, if not all, are androgens,
substances promoting male characteristics. A female who uses those drugs
may develop facial hair and a deeper voice, along with unwanted changes in
sexual organs. In a young person who is still growing, androgens can prematurely
halt further growth and thereby cause a smaller adult stature.
Among persons of either gender and any age, androgens may alter blood
composition and increase the body’s retention of various minerals. That retention
is not necessarily good. For example, sodium retention promotes bloating
and can be inadvisable for persons with heart trouble. Liver damage and
reduction of male fertility may occur due to anabolic steroids. Extended use
of the substance may worsen cholesterol levels, thereby narrowing blood vessels,
and such narrowing promotes heart attack and stroke years later. Steroid
abusers tend to take far higher doses than are considered medically safe, thus
further increasing the risks. Oral and slow-release under-the-skin implant formats
of anabolic steroids can be processed in ways that will physically permit
them to be injected. Such a practice is highly dangerous, as noninjectable formats
of drugs have components that are not designed for direct introduction
into the bloodstream.
Anabolic steroid dependence is reported with withdrawal symptoms that
can include weariness and depression. Use by a pregnant woman can permanently
masculinize a female fetus.
For information about specific anabolic steroids, see alphabetical listings for:
boldenone, ethylestrenol, fluoxymesterone, methandriol, methandrostenolone,
methyltestosterone, nandrolone, oxandrolone, oxymetholone, stanozolol,
testolactone, testosterone, and trenbolone.
HALLUCINOGENS
Although various drugs cause hallucinations, some drugs are so notable for
such an effect that they are classified as hallucinogens. Controversy exists
about what a hallucination is. Is it a bluish tint to colors in a normal scene?
Is it wavy motions in a solid and stationary object? Is it shapes in fireplace
flames transforming into animal heads? Is it something that goes away if
26 The Encyclopedia of Addictive Drugs
someone’s eyes open? Is it a creature that appears out of nowhere and provides
mystical insights? Is it sensations of floating? Is it a different flow of
time? Is it cross-wiring of senses, where colors are heard and smells are seen?
Specialists may quibble, but this book classifies all such experiences as hallucinations.
Many people dislike hallucinatory experiences, especially people who like
to be in control of themselves and of situations around them. Such people
often find hallucinations not only unpleasant but downright frightening. Other
people find the sensations intriguing and pleasurable.
Scientific interest in hallucinogens began to emerge in the 1800s, blossoming
in the 1950s and 1960s. In those latter times hallucinogens were popularly
identified with beatniks and hippies, and social disapproval of those lifestyles
promoted legal restrictions on hallucinogens that terminated almost all scientific
research regarding these substances. Thus much of the scientific data
is old.
For information about specific hallucinogens, see alphabetical listings for:
AET, amanita, belladonna, bufotenine, DET, DMT, DOB, DOM, dronabinol,
ergot, ibogaine, jimson weed, LSD, marijuana, MDA, MDEA, MDMA,
mescaline, morning glory, nutmeg, peyote, psilocybin, 2C-B, and yage.
INHALANTS
Although some authorities consider inhalants to be depressants, and inhalants
have hallucinogenic qualities, for several reasons this book lists inhalants
as a substance type in their own right. First, despite easy availability, inhalants
are among the most dangerous of abused substances. There is no range of
inhalants, some of which are benign and some of which are risky, as there is
with stimulants or depressants. All inhalants are dangerous despite wide variations
in their chemistry, and this sets them apart from other types of drugs.
Second, inhalants are generally used by inhaling them in their gaseous state
(which is not the same as smoking and also differs from eating a solid or
drinking a liquid). That dosage format sets them apart from other drugs.
Third, inhalants are used mainly by younger persons (typically teenage
males), a usage pattern that also sets inhalants apart from other drugs.
With some inhalants the amount needed to produce a recreational effect is
close to a fatal dose, and deadly outcomes demonstrate that the difference was
too close for some deceased users to handle. In addition, strenuous exercise
seems related to inhalant death, troublesome for users at dance clubs. The
products are often flammable, sometimes producing serious physical injury
unrelated to pharmacology. Some users act as if they do not realize they need
a continual supply of oxygen, and they administer inhalants in ways that
cause suffocation. In addition to all these acute dangers, long-term use of
many inhalants can produce nerve damage, impairing the ability to use arms
and legs and hands and feet, damage verified scientifically. Another type of
long-term damage appears to be assorted types of psychoses. This consequence
is harder to verify because inhalant users often take other potent drugs,
so proving which mind-altering drug affected the mind can be very difficult.
Unquestionably, however, inhalant users can develop states of mind interferDrug
Types 27
ing with—or even preventing—their ability to function in society. Admittedly,
some users avoid serious outcomes, just as some car drivers run red lights
without harm. Escape, however, does not mean that danger should be disregarded.
Generally, adult drug users shun most inhalants except as a choice of desperation
if nothing else is available. Inhalant users tend to be teenagers or
younger, perhaps because other drugs of abuse (even alcohol and tobacco) are
harder for some young persons to obtain. Sniffing is often a social event with
acquaintances rather than a solitary pastime. As the 1960s began, the average
age among 130 glue sniffers in Denver was 13.45 In this group 124 were male;
most were lower-class Hispanics in trouble with school or law enforcement
authorities; many had emotional problems. Another study found glue sniffers
to have personalities matching those of alcoholics.46 Gasoline sniffers are often
emotionally deprived teens from troubled families, typically living lower-class
lives in rural areas, often members of native populations whose cultures have
been devastated (American Indians in the United States, aborigines in Australia,
Island peoples in the Pacific). Case studies of butane sniffers tell of
lonely persons with difficulties at school or at home. A psychological test of
59 inhalant abusers47 found them to be impulsive persons with little respect
for authority. Most research finds inhalant users to be unhappy persons marginalized
by society. Yet not all researchers find that inhalant users are social
misfits from dysfunctional families; some appear to be ordinary persons,
though still youthful.
That difference in findings—most researchers saying inhalant abusers are
social misfits, with some researchers contending inhalant abusers are normal—
deserves an attempt at explanation. Many inhalant researchers work where
inhalant abuse has been publicized as a major community problem, and those
places tend to have populations of socially marginalized people. Researchers
commonly study persons receiving medical attention for inhalant abuse, and
sometimes the medical attention is received involuntarily by court order. Such
persons may be no more typical of inhalant users than hospitalized alcoholics
receiving court-ordered treatment are typical of most alcohol users. And the
definition of “user” may influence understanding. A user who sniffs several
times a day is not the same kind of user who sniffed with some friends once
or twice over a period of several years. Although most research finds inhalant
abusers to be troubled outcasts, it is possible that such typical findings are
due to the demographics of the population being studied.
For information about specific inhalants, see alphabetical listings for: butane,
ether, freon, gasoline, mothballs, nitrite, nitrous oxide, TCE, and toluene.
NOTES
1. W.P. Czerwinski, “Amphetamine-Related Disorders,” Journal of the Louisiana State
Medical Society 150 (1998): 491; R. Reeves, “President’s Health the Great Coverup of
JFK Years,” Kansas City Star, Oct. 11, 1992, K4; R. Reeves, President Kennedy: Profile of
Power (New York: Simon & Schuster, 1993), 178, 243, 648n. 146; T.C. Reeves, A Question
28 The Encyclopedia of Addictive Drugs
of Character: A Life of John F. Kennedy (New York: The Free Press, 1991), 295–96; C.D.
Heymann, A Woman Named Jackie (New York: Lyle Stuart, 1989), 296–319.
2. R. King, The Drug Hang-up (New York: W.W. Norton, 1972), 271, 283–85.
3. C.O. Jackson, “The Amphetamine Inhaler: A Case Study of Medical Abuse,”
Journal of the History of Medicine and Allied Sciences 26 (1971): 187–96. The author is also
indebted to Jackson’s article for other colorful examples of amphetamine’s history.
4. R.D. Rogers et al., “Dissociable Deficits in the Decision-making Cognition of
Chronic Amphetamine Abusers, Opiate Abusers, Patients with Focal Damage to Prefrontal
Cortex, and Tryptophan-Depleted Normal Volunteers: Evidence for Monoaminergic
Mechanisms,” Neuropsychopharmacology 20 (1999): 322–39.
5. “Adderall,” “Dextrostat,” and “Dexedrine,” in Physicians’ Desk Reference, 56th ed.
(Montvale, NJ: Medical Economics Company, 2002), 1513, 3231, 3237.
6. L. Milkovich and B.J. van den Berg, “Effects of Antenatal Exposure to Anorectic
Drugs,” American Journal of Obstetrics and Gynecology 129 (1977): 637. See also M.A.
Plessinger, “Prenatal Exposure to Amphetamines: Risks and Adverse Outcomes in
Pregnancy,” Obstetrics and Gynecology Clinics of North America 25 (1998): 119–38.
7. L. Cernerud et al., “Amphetamine Addiction during Pregnancy: 14-Year Followup
of Growth and School Performance,” Acta Paediatrica 85 (1996): 204–8; L. Billing et
al., “The Influence of Environmental Factors on Behavioural Problems in 8-Year-Old
Children Exposed to Amphetamine during Fetal Life,” Child Abuse and Neglect 18
(1994): 3–9. See also M. Eriksson et al., “Cross-sectional Growth of Children Whose
Mothers Abused Amphetamines during Pregnancy,” Acta Paediatrica 83 (1994): 612–17.
8. C.M. Apovian, “The Use of Pharmacologic Agents in the Treatment of the Obese
Patient,” Journal of the American Osteopathic Association, pt.2, 99 (1999, Suppl.): S2–S7;
W.S. Poston II et al., “Challenges in Obesity Management,” Southern Medical Journal 91
(1998): 710–20.
9. S.B. Penick and J.R. Hinkle, “The Effect of Expectation on Response to Phenmetrazine,”
Psychosomatic Medicine 26 (1964): 369–73.
10. J. Mellar and L.E. Hollister, “Phenmetrazine: An Obsolete Problem Drug,” Clinical
Pharmacology and Therapeutics 32 (1982): 672.
11. K.S. Kendler et al., “Illicit Psychoactive Substance Use, Heavy Use, Abuse, and
Dependence in a U.S. Population–Based Sample of Male Twins,” Archives of General
Psychiatry 57 (2000): 261–69.
12. J.B. Milby et al., “Initiating Abstinence in Cocaine Abusing Dually Diagnosed
Homeless Persons,” Drug and Alcohol Dependence 60 (2000): 55–67.
13. G.W. Hall et al., “Pathological Gambling among Cocaine-Dependent Outpatients,”
American Journal of Psychiatry 157 (2000): 1127–33.
14. C.S. Lopes and E.S. Coutinho, “Transtornos mentais como fatores de risco para
o desenvolvimento de abuso/dependeˆncia de cocaı´na: Estudo caso-controle” (Mental
disorders as risk factors for the development of cocaine abuse/dependence: Casecontrol
study), Revista de Saude Publica 33 (1999): 477–86 (abstract in English).
15. Hall et al., “Pathological Gambling among Cocaine-Dependent Outpatients.”
16. H.A. Siegal et al., “Crack-Cocaine Users as Victims of Physical Attack,” Journal
of the National Medical Association 92 (2000): 76–82.
17. C.R. Schermer and D.H. Wisner, “Methamphetamine Use in Trauma Patients: A
Population-Based Study,” Journal of the American College of Surgeons 189 (1999): 442–49.
18. D.B. Kandel and K. Chen, “Extent of Smoking and Nicotine Dependence in the
United States: 1991–1993,” Nicotine and Tobacco Research 2 (2000): 263–74.
19. Ibid.
20. Ibid.
21. Ibid.
22. Ibid.
Drug Types 29
23. M.A. Herna´ndez-Mezquita et al., “Opinio´n de los directores escolares sobre la
influencia de factores del medio escolar en la actitud de nin˜os y jovenes ante el tabaco”
(Influence of school environment on student’s attitudes about tobacco consumption in
the opinion of the headmasters), Anales Espan˜ oles de Pediatrı´a 52 (2000): 132–37 (abstract
in English).
24. G.A. Giovino, “Epidemiology of Tobacco Use among U.S. Adolescents,” Nicotine
and Tobacco Research 1 (1999, Suppl. 1): S31–S40.
25. M.Y. Chong, K.W. Chan, and A.T. Cheng, “Substance Use Disorders among Adolescents
in Taiwan: Prevalence, Sociodemographic Correlates and Psychiatric Comorbidity,”
Psychological Medicine 29 (1999): 1387–96.
26. N.A. Rigotti, J.E. Lee, and H. Wechsler, “U.S. College Students’ Use of Tobacco
Products: Results of a National Survey,” Journal of the American Medical Association 284
(2000): 699–705.
27. C.H. Schenck and M.W. Mahowald, “Long-Term, Nightly Benzodiazepine Treatment
of Injurious Parasomnias and Other Disorders of Disrupted Nocturnal Sleep in
170 Adults,” American Journal of Medicine 100 (1996): 333–37.
28. D.A. Ciraulo, “Abuse Potential of Benzodiazepines,” Bulletin of the New York
Academy of Medicine 61 (1985): 728–41.
29. L. Walters and P. Nel, “Die Afhanklikheidspotensiaal van die Bensodiasepiene:
Toepassing van die Resultate van die Behandeling van die Alkoholonttrekkingsindroom”
(The addiction potential of benzodiazepines. Application of the results of treatment
of alcohol withdrawal syndrome), South African Medical Journal 59 (1981): 115–16
(abstract in English). See also L. Walters and P. Nel, “Pharmacological Requirements
of Patients during Alcohol Withdrawal,” South African Medical Journal 59 (1981): 114.
30. A.H. Soderpalm and S. Hansen, “Benzodiazepines Enhance the Consumption
and Palatability of Alcohol in the Rat,” Psychopharmacology 137 (1998): 215–22.
31. In addition to other studies cited in this paragraph, see L. Laegreid, G. Hagberg,
and A. Lundberg, “The Effect of Benzodiazepines on the Fetus and the Newborn,”
Neuropediatrics 23 (1992): 18–23.
32. L. Laegreid, G. Hagberg, and A. Lundberg, “Neurodevelopment in Late Infancy
after Prenatal Exposure to Benzodiazepines—A Prospective Study,” Neuropediatrics 23
(1992): 60–67.
33. L. Laegreid, “Clinical Observations in Children after Prenatal Benzodiazepine
Exposure,” Developmental Pharmacology and Therapeutics 15 (1990): 186–88. See also G.
Viggedal, “Mental Development in Late Infancy after Prenatal Exposure to Benzodiazepines—
A Prospective Study,” Journal of Child Psychology and Psychiatry, and Allied
Disciplines 34 (1993): 295–305.
34. U. Bergman et al., “Effects of Exposure to Benzodiazepine during Fetal Life,”
Lancet 340 (1992): 694–96. See also J.A. Kuller et al., “Pharmacologic Treatment of Psychiatric
Disease in Pregnancy and Lactation: Fetal and Neonatal Effects,” Obstetrics and
Gynecology 87 (1996): 789–94; S.D. Silberstein, “Headaches and Women: Treatment of
the Pregnant and Lactating Migraineur,” Headache 33 (1993): 536.
35. P.R. McElhatton, “The Effects of Benzodiazepine Use during Pregnancy and Lactation,”
Reproductive Toxicology 8 (1994): 461–75.
36. L. Stika et al., “Effects of Drug Administration in Pregnancy on Children’s School
Behaviour,” Pharmaceutisch Weekblad: Scientific Edition 12 (1990): 252–55 (abstract in English).
37. A. Czeizel, “Lack of Evidence of Teratogenicity of Benzodiazepine Drugs in Hungary,”
Reproductive Toxicology 1 (1987–1988): 183–88. See also Kuller et al., “Pharmacologic
Treatment of Psychiatric Disease in Pregnancy and Lactation: Fetal and
Neonatal Effects.”
38. A. Ornoy et al., “Is Benzodiazepine Use during Pregnancy Really Teratogenic?”
30 The Encyclopedia of Addictive Drugs
Reproductive Toxicology 12 (1998): 511–15. See also P.R. McElhatton et al., “The Outcome
of Pregnancy in 689 Women Exposed to Therapeutic Doses of Antidepressants: A Collaborative
Study of the European Network of Teratology Information Services (ENTIS),”
Reproductive Toxicology 10 (1996): 285–94.
39. L. Laegreid et al., “Congenital Malformations and Maternal Consumption of Benzodiazepines:
A Case-Control Study,” Developmental Medicine and Child Neurology 32
(1990): 432–41; P.R. McElhatton, “The Effects of Benzodiazepine Use during Pregnancy
and Lactation,” Reproductive Toxicology 8 (1994): 461–75; U. Bergman, “Pharmacoepidemiological
Perspectives on the Suspected Teratogenic Effects of Benzodiazepines,”
Bratislavske Lekarske Listy 92 (1991): 560–63 (abstract in English).
40. J.W. Olney et al., “Environmental Agents That Have the Potential to Trigger
Massive Apoptotic Neurodegeneration in the Developing Brain,” Environmental Health
Perspectives 108 (2000, Suppl. 3): 383–88.
41. J. Porter and H. Jick, “Addiction Rare in Patients Treated with Narcotics,” New
England Journal of Medicine 302 (1980): 123.
42. “Nandrolone decanoate,” in Therapeutic Drugs, ed. C. Dollery, 2d ed. (New York:
Churchill Livingstone, 1999), N29.
43. P.W. Meilman et al., “Beyond Performance Enhancement: Polypharmacy among
Collegiate Users of Steroids,” Journal of American College Health 44 (1995): 98–104.
44. R.H. du Rant, L.G. Escobedo, and G.W. Heath, “Anabolic-Steroid Use, Strength
Training, and Multiple Drug Use among Adolescents in the United States,” Pediatrics
96 (1995, pt. 1): 23–28.
45. H.H. Glaser and O.N. Massengale, “Glue-Sniffing in Children: Deliberate Inhalation
of Vaporized Plastic Cements,” Journal of the American Medical Association 181
(1962): 300–304.
46. P.W. Lewis and D.W. Patterson, “Acute and Chronic Effects of the Voluntary
Inhalation of Certain Commercial Volatile Solvents by Juveniles,” Journal of Drug Issues
4 (1974): 167.
47. R.J. Goldsmith, “Death by Freon,” Journal of Clinical Psychiatry 50 (1989): 36–37.
Alphabetical Listings of Drugs
All substances listed here have been declared a public concern by government
officials, medical caregivers, or news media. If a listing mentions another
drug’s name in bold type, that drug has an entry of its own in this section of
the book.
Some drugs have similar effects. For example, most anabolic steroids promote
development of male characteristics when used by females. If an individual
anabolic steroid is known to have that effect, that information is given
in the individual listing. Such a style might make some entries seem repetitive
if someone is looking up one anabolic steroid after another, but this approach
improves the odds of important information being communicated. A crossreference
style that expects readers to flip back and forth among pages to “see
this” or “see that” in order to avoid repetition might work for scientists, but
for readers of this book, ease of usage is more important.
Although many drugs of abuse are described in this section, many others
exist that are not included here. The choice of which to include and which to
leave out was based on several factors. The first was whether a drug is listed
in the U.S. government schedule of controlled substances. Another factor was
whether a drug is abused even though it is not a controlled substance. Still
another factor was whether enough data exist in the scientific literature to
provide solid information. With some drugs described here, scientific information
is scanty concerning particular aspects of a given drug, such as potential
for causing cancer; that lack is specifically noted where relevant in drug
descriptions.
Drugs are alphabetized by common name. Listings are arranged in the following
manner:
Pronunciation: The proper way to pronounce a substance’s name is given here.
Sometimes alternative pronunciations are included.
32 The Encyclopedia of Addictive Drugs
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: This number (CAS RN) is unique
to every chemical, just like a fingerprint or a U.S. Social Security number is
unique to each person. Drugs, like people, may go by different names, but
different-sounding drugs having the same CAS RN are identical—that is,
chemically and structurally the same. The CAS RN can be used to search various
databases for more information about a drug and can also be used to
confirm that a scientific report is indeed about the drug in question.
Formal Names: Entries in this section are a partial list of brand names and generic
names. Some are for combination products including the drug. These
names are used by scientists and health care providers.
Informal Names: These are casual and slang terms for the drug. The lists are
not necessarily complete, but they do include typical informal names. Some
nicknames are used for more than one drug.
Type: The type of drug and its class are given so a reader can refer to pages
elsewhere in this book having background information about that substance.
Federal Schedule Listing: The status line gives the drug’s legal standing (see
page 6 for explanations of “schedules”) and the U.S. Drug Enforcement Administration
Controlled Substances Code Number if the drug is a controlled
substance.
USA Availability: The availability line tells what must normally be done to obtain
the substance legally in the United States. Normally Schedule V substances
are prescription, but can be nonprescription in some state jurisdictions. A nonprescription
item may still have other regulations limiting its availability, such
as requiring a purchaser to be an adult or to register the purchase, as with
over-the-counter (OTC) codeine-containing cough medicines. A substance may
be legally available but may become illegal if used in prohibited ways.
Pregnancy Category: Not all drugs have an official pregnancy category designation.
For example, such a rating does not exist for substances lacking official
approval for therapeutic use. See page 8 for an explanation of categories.
Occasionally information in one of the above listings could not be verified
despite diligent search. In such cases the topic is omitted.
The detailed descriptions of each drug are arranged to cover:
• uses
• drawbacks
• abuse factors
• (some but not all) drug interactions
• cancer (risks)
• pregnancy (effects)
• (in some cases) additional information
Reliable sources of additional scientific information are suggested at the end
of each individual substance entry. At the back of this book is a list of general
information sources, some of which may have additional data about the substance
covered in the alphabetical entry. Many drugs have been studied for
decades, and some references reflect the venerable history of such studies.
Alphabetical Listings of Drugs 33
Drug descriptions occasionally mention the following concepts:
One drug may be stronger than another, but such a comparison depends
not only on the effect being measured but on the animal species being tested.
Frogs, chickens, and rats may react very differently than humans would to an
equivalent dose of various drugs. For example, bufotenine and LSD effects
are thousands of times stronger in humans than in monkeys; a dose that leaves
a small monkey unfazed might devastate a human. Animal experiments are
useful to know about, but the results do not necessarily extrapolate to humans.
When this book compares strengths of drugs, the comparison simply gives a
rough idea of strengths and has no bearing on determining what size dose of
one drug would be equivalent to another size dose of a different substance.
When one drug is said to “boost” the effect of another, this means the
increase is more than would be expected from simply adding the effect of one
drug to the other (1 _ 1 _ 2) but instead involves synergistic chemical and
biological processes yielding a total that is more than the combination of parts
(1 _ 1 _ 3).
“Flashback” is an ability (voluntary or involuntary) to reexperience a drug
state without taking the substance. Some details about flashback are given in
this book’s description of LSD, although the phenomenon is not limited to
that drug (see also, for example, this book’s listings about methamphetamine
and psilocybin).
“Polydrug” abuse is a typical element of setting. For example, heroin addicts
normally abuse other drugs as well. Someone who takes MDMA at a
dance club may well take cocaine at the same time, just as some persons
simultaneously smoke tobacco and drink alcohol. Even if all the compounds
inside an illicit user can be verified, determining which is responsible for
which effect can be challenging. This book’s alphabetical section presents both
the conclusions and doubts that scientists express about polydrug use, along
with some classic interactions that occur when more than one drug is taken
at the same time. Individuals who get into a medical emergency after drug
use should bring samples of substances to health care providers; an item may
not be what a user thinks it is, and effective treatment must be based on
chemical reality rather than consumer belief.
Animal experiments may show that a drug can cause cancer or birth defects.
The practical meaning of such results is sometimes clouded because the same
drug may affect different species in different ways. Also animal tests sometimes
involve many times the recommended human dose, perhaps levels high
enough to poison the animals. These kinds of tests are not meaningless but
may involve levels of risk unlikely to be experienced by humans. And yet
large doses having no effect on animals do not guarantee a drug’s safety for
pregnant women. In some countries a compound called thalidomide was approved
for human use after animal tests revealed no potential for causing birth
defects, but in humans the substance produced severe congenital malformations
such as missing or highly deformed limbs.
Experiments testing a drug occasionally produce conflicting results—some
may say a drug does something; some may indicate the drug will not do it.
These kinds of uncertainties are unsatisfying, but that is the way scientific
research operates. Perhaps conflicting results come from differences in dosage
34 The Encyclopedia of Addictive Drugs
size, or the manner in which a dose is given, or diet, or living conditions, or
any number of other causes. Perhaps the conflict is due to researcher errors—a
classic error being failure to run adequate controls (for example, failing to give
the drug and a placebo in the same manner to a large number of the same
kind of experimental subjects). The size of a drug experiment can also be a
problem. Many involve a handful of volunteers. Conclusions from small studies
(that is, studies involving a small number of test subjects) are not as significant
as conclusions from studies measuring thousands of persons.
Sometimes drug effect information is based on medical case reports, in which
something has happened to one person but has not been experimentally tested
to determine how typical the effect is. Malnourishment and physical afflictions
can affect drug actions. Another tricky angle occurs when reports say a drug
is “associated” with an effect, meaning the drug is administered and an effect
follows. “Before and after” time sequence is not the same as “cause and effect”
(chanting may be associated with the subsequent end of a solar eclipse, but it
does not cause the termination). In scientific drug reports what scientists say
about drugs can be less certain than what public policymakers say.
This section of the book strives to present the consensus of mainstream
scientific thought. However, sometimes the only available information comes
from observations lacking experimental confirmation, at the present time; the
reader should keep in mind that by definition such observations are not yet
part of a consensus even if they are reported in scientific journals.
AET
Pronunciation: a¯-ee-tee
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 2235-90-7
Formal Names: Alpha-Ethyltryptamine, Etryptamine, Monase
Informal Names: Alpha-ET, Alpha-Ethyl, ET, Love Pearls, Love Pills, Trips
Type: Hallucinogen. See page 25
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule I (DEA no. 7249)
USA Availability: Illegal to possess
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. This substance has been used for decades. It has similarities to DMT
in chemistry and actions and was made a Schedule I substance partly because
some AET effects are reminiscent of MDMA. As a Schedule I substance AET
has no approved medical use in the United States but has been used elsewhere
(in Europe, for example) as an antidepressant.
Intoxication symptoms can resemble those of amphetamine, and urine tests
for amphetamine can also pick up AET. When AET was given to rats, in some
ways they responded as if they had received either amphetamine or MDMA.
A researcher who used AET reported enjoyable sensations of energy and
contentment. As dosage increased, so did euphoria and enjoyment of sensual
activity such as eating, music, and sex. In several accounts of effects hallucinations
were not reported.
Drawbacks. AET has been associated with agranulocytosis, a blood disease
involving development of sores in various places throughout the body.
Abuse factors. Tolerance is reported. Some opiate abusers trying to break
their addiction have used AET to ease opiate withdrawal symptoms.
Drug interactions. AET is a monoamine oxidase inhibitor (MAOI), a type
of drug that can interact dangerously with some of the other drugs described
in this book.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Not enough scientific information to report.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Daldrup, T., et al. “Etryptamine, a New Designer Drug with a Fatal Effect.” Zeitschrift
fu¨ r Rechtsmedizin 97 (1986): 61–68 (article in German, but summary available in
English).
36 AET
Huang, X.M., M.P. Johnson, and D.E. Nichols. “Reduction in Brain Serotonin Markers
by Alpha-Ethyltryptamine (Monase).” European Journal of Pharmacology 200
(1991): 187–90.
Krebs, K.M., and M.A. Geyer. “Behavioral Characterization of Alpha-Ethyltryptamine,
a Tryptamine Derivative with MDMA-Like Properties in Rats.” Psychopharmacology
(Berlin) 113 (1993): 284–87.
Morano, R.A., et al. “Fatal Intoxication Involving Etryptamine.” Journal of Forensic Sciences
38 (1993): 721–25.
Alcohol
Pronunciation: AL-kuh-hall
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 64-17-5
Formal Names: Ethanol, Ethyl Alcohol, Hydroxy Ethane
Informal Names: Liquor
Type: Depressant. See p. 19
Federal Schedule Listing: Unlisted
USA Availability: Freely available to adults; various jurisdictions limit access to
minors; some pharmaceutical preparations are prescription
Uses. Various kinds of alcohol exist; many are poisonous, such as wood
alcohol, and are not intended for drinking. Those types are not substances of
abuse and are not discussed in this book.
In former times physicians prescribed alcohol as a treatment for assorted
afflictions. That usage is largely outmoded, but alcohol is still a common ingredient
in cough remedies, is applied to skin as a disinfectant, and is a component
of some injectable solutions. Alcohol is used as a partial antidote for
methanol poisoning associated with inhalant abuse, and it is used to combat
glycol poisoning. In some medical procedures alcohol is administered to create
a form of anesthesia called a nerve block. Around 1970 at one hospital a combination
of alcohol and chloral hydrate was routinely given to make pregnant
women unconscious during labor, although alcohol is also a treatment for
stopping premature labor. The substance can be a sleep aid (a “nightcap”
drink), but researchers have found that it interferes with dreaming, which is
an important component of sleep. Tolerance can develop to sleep-inducing
actions, and dream content can become disturbing for awhile after usage stops.
Some persons drink alcohol to cope with stress. Evidence exists that moderate
consumption of wine may help people live longer by reducing risk of heart
disease and cancer.
Drawbacks. As with many other drugs, moderate recreational use can be
pleasurable while causing little harm. In contrast, excessive use can not only
have psychological effects harmful to family and social functioning but also
injure the stomach, liver, kidneys, heart, and brain. Rat experiments have demonstrated
damage to the pancreas, damage that is boosted by cigarette smoke.
A study found that men with spinal osteoporosis, a disease increasing the
likelihood of broken bones, drink more alcohol than persons without the dis38
Alcohol
ease; this finding does not mean that alcohol causes the affliction, but it does
indicate the need for further research. Alcohol does not make peaceful individuals
rageful, but it can lower inhibitions while leaving a person able to act
out urges. Thus violent and criminal acts are commonly associated with alcohol
intoxication. Impairment of mental and physical activity can occur during
acute intoxication, making operation of dangerous machinery (such as
automobiles) hazardous. During intoxication sensory perceptions are blunted,
reducing awareness of tastes, smells, sounds, and pain.
Lesser known problems are associated with alcohol. Male users experience
a decline in testosterone levels, and females may experience menstrual difficulties.
The nerve inflammation disease beriberi has been linked with alcoholism,
and research has raised the possibility that alcoholism can worsen
Alzheimer’s disease. Some studies report that drinkers have a slightly higher
chance of developing cataracts, but a very large study involving 77,466 women
found little, if any, relationship between the substance and cataracts. Experiments
show that a drink of alcohol encourages more cigarette consumption
and that persons who use both alcohol and nicotine tend to drink more when
cigarettes are unavailable. Although alcohol can make a person feel hotter,
that effect is superficial; the substance actually lowers body temperature, making
alcohol counterproductive if a chilled person is trying to warm up; the
substance should not be given to persons injured by exposure to cold temperatures.
Alcoholics commonly have memory trouble, and small studies find
that heavy-drinking nonalcoholics have impaired thinking skills even while
sober.
Abuse factors. In addition to being a potent intoxicant, alcohol is one of the
most addictive substances. Tolerance (“holding your liquor”) and dependence
may occur. Withdrawal can be dangerous, with death occurring (typically
from difficulties leading to convulsions) despite intense medical supervision.
The withdrawal syndrome is called delirium tremens. Its symptoms are similar
to those of barbiturate withdrawal: weariness, nervousness, perspiration,
tremors, vomiting, cramps, high blood pressure, accelerated heartbeat, convulsions,
and hallucinations. Symptoms may be worse in elderly persons.
Women tend to be more affected by alcohol than men are because, among
other reasons, the drug has more bioavailability in females (more of a given
dose is used in females, so they need less quantity than men do in order to
reach the same level of effect).
Drug interactions. Alcohol lengthens the duration of effects from chlordiazepoxide,
diazepam, and lorazepam. Cocaine worsens liver damage caused
by alcohol. When rats receiving morphine or methadone drink alcohol, the
alcohol blood level takes longer to increase but then lasts longer, a result
suggesting that a human opiate user might have to drink more in order to
get an alcohol effect and would then stay intoxicated longer than someone
who does not use opiates. Rat studies indicate that steady opiate consumption
may intensify alcohol dependence. In rats, alcohol, chlordiazepoxide, and pentobarbital
all have cross-tolerance with one another, meaning that one will
substitute for the other to some extent. So many drugs interact dangerously
with alcohol that a person should always check information labels on drug
containers before using the substances simultaneously with alcohol.
Alcohol 39
Cancer. Most laboratory tests give no indication that alcohol has a potential
for causing cancer. Nonetheless, mice experimentation indicates that long-term
use of alcohol can cause liver cancer. Human reports indicate an increased
risk for prostate cancer. Women who take more than two drinks a day have
an increased risk of breast cancer. A study of 8,006 Japanese men in Hawaii
found an association between alcohol and cancer of the lungs and rectum, but
“association” is not the same as cause and effect. Evidence indicates that saliva
might transform alcohol in ways that promote oral cancer.
Pregnancy. A study of 430 couples in Denmark found fertility to decline
among women as their alcohol consumption increased, but no effect was observed
on male fertility. In contrast, a study of farm couples in Canada found
no difference in fertility between women who did or did not drink alcohol.
Still another study, in the Netherlands, found male alcohol consumers to have
higher fertility as consumption increased, with no difference in fertility rate
between women who drank different amounts. Such findings of sometimes
yes, sometimes no, are a classic sign of an “invalid variable,” which in this
case would mean that no difference in fertility can be attributed to alcohol
(although more studies would be needed to reach a firm conclusion, and some
authorities say the trend of research indicates that alcohol does reduce female
fertility).
A study found that premature infants were more likely among pregnant
teenagers who drank alcohol than among those who did not. That effect was
not seen among older pregnant women who drank. Other research has noted
lower birthweights among children delivered by pregnant alcohol consumers.
A human experiment documented fetal response to two glasses of wine
drunk by women whose pregnancies were close to time of delivery: In that
experiment fetal respiration and sleep were disturbed—which did not surprise
researchers because heavy consumers of alcohol frequently give birth to infants
having sleep difficulties. Such newborns may also have tremors and poor
reflexes and cry more than normal. Children can be born dependent on the
drug.
Alcohol is a well-known cause of birth defects. In mice the substance is
known to cause a facial deformity called holoprosencephaly, and a human
case report suggests that heavy dosage can do the same in humans. Less dramatic
facial characteristics are common after substantial prenatal exposure to
alcohol. Other human birth defects attributed to alcohol include kidney, heart,
and brain trouble. More subtle damage has been measured as a slight decline
in IQ among schoolchildren of mothers who took two or more drinks a day
during pregnancy. Male exposure to some drugs can produce birth defects,
and researchers have found problems in behavior and thinking skills among
children of alcoholic fathers as well as among offspring of pregnant alcoholics.
Fetal alcohol syndrome (FAS) is a collection of afflictions observed in children
typically born to women who had six or more drinks a day while pregnant.
The syndrome may include low birthweight, defective vision, delayed development,
specific facial characteristics, trouble with muscles and joints, heart
abnormality, and mental retardation. Problems can be long-lasting and even
permanent. Prenatal exposure to alcohol can delay motor skill development
in children, cause difficulties in maintaining balance, and limit growth in
40 Alcohol
height. Such children may be more impulsive and aggressive. A study of adolescents
compared two groups, one born with FAS and another whose mothers
drank little or no alcohol during pregnancy. The FAS group showed
impairment in some types of memory, attention, thinking, and learning—findings
supported by other research as well. Some researchers believe that fetal
exposure to alcohol has more to do with teenage drinking than family environment
does. Comparing adults with heavy prenatal alcohol exposure to
those without such exposure, a small study measured significant psychiatric
differences, particularly with the alcohol subjects being more depressed and
fearful.
Fetal damage from maternal alcohol use is unquestionable, but the amount
of use necessary to cause damage is less certain and can be affected by a
woman’s general physical condition and lifestyle (including nutrition and
other drug usage). Occasional binge drinking and routine heavy drinking are
certainly hazardous to fetal development, but for many years pregnant women
have used alcohol in moderation without apparent effect on offspring. Nonetheless,
in general, women are now advised to avoid any alcohol consumption
during pregnancy.
Experimenters note that alcohol consumption reduces mothers’ milk production
but does not affect energy provided by the milk. Alcohol levels in
milk are similar to a mother’s blood levels. A nursing infant may be sickened
by milk from a mother who abuses alcohol—an infant has not yet developed
the proper body chemistry to break down alcohol, so a dose lasts longer in
an infant than in an older child or adult.
Additional information. Beverage alcohol is a powerful intoxicant. Alcohol
is also probably the most familiar drug, used so freely that many persons
regard it solely as a beverage rather than as a drug. Indeed, for many years
excessive drunkenness was considered a moral failing rather than a disease,
and not until the 1950s was alcoholism officially recognized as an affliction
appropriate for medical treatment.
By the 1800s drunkenness had become a major public concern in the United
States. Temperance societies, organizations whose members pledged to avoid
beverage alcohol and to discourage consumption by other persons, became
politically powerful. Before the Civil War such groups had been able to get
laws passed outlawing the sale of beverage alcohol in various communities
and sometimes throughout entire states. Shortly after World War I this agitation
culminated in the Eighteenth Amendment to the Constitution of the
United States, giving the federal government power to ban manufacture and
sale of beverage alcohol. Although purchase and consumption remained legal,
the majority of Americans became so displeased with Prohibition that the
Twenty-first Amendment to the Constitution was passed in the 1930s repealing
the earlier one.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Chasan-Taber, L. et al. “A Prospective Study of Alcohol Consumption and Cataract
Extraction among U.S. Women.” Annals of Epidemiology 10 (2000): 347–53.
Curtis, K.M, D.A. Savitz, and T.E. Arbuckle. “Effects of Cigarette Smoking, Caffeine
Alcohol 41
Consumption, and Alcohol Intake on Fecundability.” American Journal of Epidemiology
146 (1997): 32–41.
Florack, E.I., G.A. Zielhuis, and R. Rolland. “Cigarette Smoking, Alcohol Consumption,
and Caffeine Intake and Fecundability.” Preventive Medicine 23 (1994): 175–80.
Gronbaek, M., et al. “Type of Alcohol Consumed and Mortality from All Causes,
Coronary Heart Disease, and Cancer.” Annals of Internal Medicine 133 (2000):
411–19.
Jensen, T.K. “Does Moderate Alcohol Consumption Affect Fertility? Follow up Study
among Couples Planning First Pregnancy.” BMJ 317 (1998): 505–10.
Kraus, L., et al. “Prevalence of Alcohol Use and the Association between Onset of Use
and Alcohol-Related Problems in a General Population Sample in Germany.”
Addiction 95 (2000): 1389–1401.
Moore, M.H., and D.R. Gerstein, eds. Alcohol and Public Policy: Beyond the Shadow of
Prohibition. Washington, DC: National Academy Press, 1981.
Phillips, B.J., and P. Jenkinson. “Is Ethanol Genotoxic? A Review of the Published
Data.” Mutagenesis 16 (2001): 91–101.
Pihl, R.O., M. Smith, and B. Farrell. “Individual Characteristics of Aggressive Beer
and Distilled Beverage Drinkers.” International Journal of the Addictions 19 (1984):
689–96.
Pollack, E.S. “Prospective Study of Alcohol Consumption and Cancer.” New England
Journal of Medicine 310 (1984): 617–21.
Weinberg, N.Z. “Cognitive and Behavioral Deficits Associated with Parental Alcohol
Use.” Journal of the American Academy of Child and Adolescent Psychiatry 36 (1997):
1177–86.
Alprazolam
Pronunciation: al-PRAY-zoh-lam (also pronounced al-PRAZ-oh-lam)
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 28981-97-7
Formal Names: Alplax, Frontal, Solanax, Tafil, Trankimazin, Xanax, Xanor, Zotran
Type: Depressant (benzodiazepine class). See page 21
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule IV (DEA no. 2882)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: D
Uses. This calming and sleep-inducing substance is probably the most frequently
prescribed drug in the benzodiazepine class. Alprazolam is used
mainly to help persons suffering from panic attacks and other anxiety disorders,
but it is not recommended for posttraumatic stress disorder. The compound
can dramatically lessen premenstrual syndrome (PMS) and is routinely
given to women of child-bearing age. Improvement of PMS is not invariable,
however, and two careful experiments yielded results showing little benefit.
Theoretical reasons and results from a rat experiment suggest that alprazolam
may help maintain bone mass. That action may be especially important to
athletes and elderly women, who commonly suffer loss of bone mass—an
affliction making breakage easier. The drug has been tested as an asthma
treatment with encouraging results, though reasons for success are unclear.
Some researchers believe the drug has potential in diabetes control. In an
experiment measuring alprazolam’s pain-relieving properties, the drug reduced
the severity but not the frequency of chronic tension headaches. The
compound has antidepressant and anticonvulsant properties, has been used
to treat ringing in the ears and to alleviate tremors and catatonia, and has
been found useful in easing alcohol withdrawal symptoms in alcoholics. A
rat study suggests that alprazolam may also have a place in treating cocaine
addiction. Measurements find the drug worsens snoring but improves quality
of sleep (at least for the snorers).
Drawbacks. Motorists have suffered accidents attributed to drowsiness from
alprazolam. Experiments show that the drug reduces startle response in humans,
which may mean drivers are less alert or respond less vigorously to
situations. Case reports tell of alprazolam (alone and in combination with
other medicine) causing the skin to become extra sensitive to sunlight. The
compound may produce jaundice.
Alprazolam 43
Although the drug normally encourages eating, about 20% of persons in
one study experienced weight loss, along with unwanted effects such as difficulty
in controlling muscles (including urinary incontinence), peevishness,
bellicosity, and lowering of inhibitions. Researchers generally believe the drug
interferes with sexual function in men and women. A case report tells of the
drug causing mania with euphoria, high self-confidence, increased energy,
and trouble with getting proper sleep—all rather untypical effects. Despite
such possibilities, one team reviewing scientific literature found reports of
unwanted actions to be uncommon for alprazolam, and another team concluded
that alprazolam generally has fewer such reports than other benzodiazepine
class drugs. Analysts who examined medical records of 10,895
alprazolam patients found little mention of unwanted effects. In evaluating
the infrequent accounts of mania, aggression, hallucinations, or other unexpected
psychological reactions to alprazolam, we should remember that many
such cases involve persons already exhibiting psychiatric disturbances for
which they are receiving the drug. Such reactions may be far less likely in a
psychiatrically normal person.
Abuse factors. An experiment showed no tendency for abuse of alprazolam
among users even though it is a controlled substance. A 1993 review of human
and animal studies of the drug concluded that scientific experimental evidence
failed to support a popular belief that abuse of alprazolam was more likely
than abuse of other benzodiazepine class drugs. Another 1993 report disagreed
but described alprazolam abuse as minuscule and limited to persons
already misusing other drugs, particularly opiates and alcohol. Brainwave and
other measurements imply that alprazolam has more appeal to alcoholic men
than it does to nonalcoholics. Experiments show that persons with a family
history of alcoholism tend to experience more pleasure (even euphoria) when
taking alprazolam than do persons lacking such a history. Tests find the drug
to have stronger effects (positive and negative) on women whose fathers were
alcoholics, compared to women whose immediate family background does not
include alcoholism. When experiments gave drug abusers a choice between
diazepam or alprazolam, the abusers tried both but found alprazolam more
pleasant.
Craving and tolerance do not seem to develop, but alprazolam can produce
bodily dependence, which is a traditional sign of addictive potential. Sudden
stoppage can cause seizures or delirium, so practitioners customarily wean
their patients with tapering dosages. Withdrawal symptoms may include perspiration,
tremors, cramps, vomiting, diarrhea, cloudy eyesight, prickling sensations
on the skin, and general befuddlement. Convulsions and seizures are
reported. One experiment noted that withdrawal signs cleared up in a week.
Drug interactions. Kava is an intoxicating drink prepared from the kava
plant, suspected of interacting so seriously with alprazolam that a coma may
result. Persons taking antifungus drugs such as itraconazole or ketoconazole
are supposed to avoid alprazolam, as those two drugs increase the power and
prolong the effect of an alprazolam dose. The heartburn medicine cimetidine
(Tagamet), the antidepressant fluoxetine (Prozac), and the pain-relieving
opioid propoxyphene each lengthen the time an alprazolam dose lasts, and
ritonavir (used against the human immunodeficiency virus in AIDS [acquired
44 Alprazolam
immunodeficiency syndrome]) can drastically boost the potency of alprazolam.
In contrast, alprazolam’s effects are reduced by the epilepsy drugs phenytoin
and carbamazepine, by the tuberculosis medicine rifampin, and by the
asthma medication theophylline. A case of glaucoma resulting in blindness is
attributed to a multidrug regimen of antidepressants and antianxiety medicines
including alprazolam. Some tests find that the substance worsens reaction
time and memory. Taking alprazolam with diazepam can cause persons
to forget what happened while they were under the drugs’ influence. In one
experiment alprazolam by itself seemed to interfere with memory even weeks
after taking it, but deeper analysis of the results caused investigators to question
any long-lasting effect. Persons functioning adequately while drinking
alcohol decline in performance when a dose of alprazolam is added, and the
combination may increase hostile attitudes and actions. Findings in a mice
experiment showed alprazolam boosting pain relief provided by morphine,
but a human experiment found no such increase (although alprazolam reduced
the typical nausea effect of morphine—a benefit that has also been
demonstrated in cancer chemotherapy patients). Alprazolam has crosstolerance
with chlordiazepoxide.
Cancer. A two-year rat experiment found no evidence that alprazolam
causes cancer. Measurements of persons receiving alprazolam for panic disorder
indicated the substance does not reduce levels of tumor necrosis factoralpha,
a protein that helps the body fight off cancer.
Pregnancy. Alprazolam experimentation with mice yielded no birth defects.
Examination of pregnancies in which women used the drug during the first
trimester found no more birth defects than would be expected if the drug
were not taken at all, but researchers cautioned that the sample sizes (411 in
one study and about 200 in another) were too small to reach firm conclusions
about the drug’s effect on fetal development. A study of 88 infants born to
women who used alprazolam during pregnancy found 10 born with “major”
deformities. Mice having prenatal exposure to the drug show reduced social
interaction, and males are more aggressive than normal. Such mice also exhibit
subtle trouble with hind legs.
Clinicians have observed alprazolam to increase the hormone that prepares
female breasts for milk production. When combined with the pain reliever
tramadol and the antidepressant citalopram, alprazolam has been known to
cause excessive milk flow. Alprazolam passes into milk, and nursing is not
recommended for mothers taking the drug. In one case an infant even exhibited
drug withdrawal symptoms when a nursing mother who was receiving
alprazolam ceased nursing.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Edwards, J.G. “Prescription-Event Monitoring of 10,895 Patients Treated with Alprazolam.”
British Journal of Psychiatry 158 (1991): 387–92.
Jonas, J.M., and M.S. Cohon. “A Comparison of the Safety and Efficacy of Alprazolam
versus Other Agents in the Treatment of Anxiety, Panic, and Depression: A
Review of the Literature.” Journal of Clinical Psychiatry 54 (1993, Suppl.): 25–45.
Nishith, P., et al. “Brief Hypnosis Substitutes for Alprazolam Use in College Students:
Alprazolam 45
Transient Experiences and Quantitative EEG Responses.” American Journal of
Clinical Hypnosis 41 (1999): 262–68.
Romach, M.K. et al. “Characteristics of Long-Term Alprazolam Users in the Community.”
Journal of Clinical Psychopharmacology 12 (1992): 316–21.
Rothschild, A.J. “Comparison of the Frequency of Behavorial Disinhibition on Alprazolam,
Clonazepam, or No Benzodiazepine in Hospitalized Psychiatric Patients.”
Journal of Clinical Psychopharmacology 20 (2000): 7–11.
Rush, C.R., et al. “Abuse Liability of Alprazolam Relative to Other Commonly Used
Benzodiazepines: A Review.” Neuroscience and Biobehavorial Reviews 17 (1993):
277–85.
Sellers, E.M., et al. “Alprazolam and Benzodiazepine Dependence.” Journal of Clinical
Psychiatry 54 (1993, Suppl.): 64–75.
Spiegel, D.A. “Efficacy Studies of Alprazolam in Panic Disorder.” Psychopharmacology
Bulletin 34 (1998): 191–95.
Amanita
Pronunciation: am-uh-NEYE-tuh
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: None
Formal Names: Amanita muscaria
Informal Names: Aga, Fly Agaric
Type: Hallucinogen. See page 25
Federal Schedule Listing: Unlisted
USA Availability: Nonprescription natural product
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. These mushrooms are found in much of the Northern Hemisphere
and are known to grow elsewhere. Due to the possibility that an effective dose
is close to a poisonous dose, and because of variations in potency, these mushrooms
are easily poisonous and have even been mixed with milk as bait to
kill flies. Persons seeking amanita sometimes accidentally ingest Amanita phalloides,
also called Death Cap and Death Cup, which can be deadly poisonous
to the kidneys and liver. Confusion with other dangerous mushrooms has also
harmed people seeking Amanita muscaria.
The Amanita muscaria mushroom has been used to treat alcohol overdose
and to relieve nervousness, fever, and pain of sore throat, nerves, and joints.
The natural product contains muscimol, a chemical that initially acts as a stimulant
but that can later produce temporary loss of muscular control as the
drug action proceeds. Muscarine chloride can be prepared from amanita. In
various animal species muscarine chloride can cause spasms and constrictions
and lower blood pressure. The relevance of those studies to humans is unclear;
for example, a dose that would poison a human leaves a monkey unfazed.
Bufotenine has been reported in amanita, but the report is disputed. The
ibotenic acid in amanita can produce hallucinations; a case report mentions
visual hallucinations lasting for days after ingesting the mushroom. The mushroom
is said to produce euphoria and to cause changes in sensory perceptions.
Some persons consume the fungus for spiritual purpose, a practice that some
authorities date back to ancient Buddhist times, with the Buddhists perhaps
learning the custom from still older examples among forest peoples in northern
Europe and Asia. Usage by Siberian shamans has been documented in
modern times. Drug-induced insight into personal psychological issues is reported.
Amanita 47
Drawbacks. One user describes the experience as lacking in feelings of happiness,
or love, or sexual impulses—a lack that sets amanita apart from many
drugs that are used recreationally. A scientist who engaged in selfexperimentation
had similar results of emptiness. Of 6 subjects who received
the mushroom in an experiment, all were nauseated, 2 vomited, 1 had hallucinations,
and several had sensory distortions. None cared to repeat the
experience. The supervising researcher wondered if variations in supplies of
the natural product explained why the experiment’s results differed so greatly
from hallucinations and pleasures reported by other persons. Personality, expectations,
and surrounding environment can shape the experience. A researcher
interviewed 18 persons who ate Amanita muscaria or Amanita
pantherina; half had eaten the mushrooms deliberately, and half thought they
were consuming something else. Every person who accidentally ate the substance
found its actions unpleasant. In contrast, the mushroom’s effects were
enjoyed by every individual who deliberately ate it.
Because active chemicals from the natural product are excreted into urine,
people can dose themselves again by drinking their own urine, a dosage
method that may horrify Americans but that a few other cultures have accepted
calmly.
Unwanted amanita effects can include twitching, cramps, abdominal discomfort,
sweating, nausea, vomiting, diarrhea, dizziness, confusion, rapid
heartbeat, difficulty in moving around, high body temperature, and convulsions.
Users can become manic and then sleepy, with those conditions alternating
back and forth until a person collapses. Scientific journals contain many
articles about brain damage caused by ibotenic acid, although conditions of
experiments do not necessarily duplicate what happens when mushrooms are
eaten. A person who received a dose of ibotenic acid in an experiment developed
a headache for two weeks. Under laboratory conditions amanita extracts
cause red blood cells to clump together.
Abuse factors. Not enough scientific information to report.
Drug interactions. Not enough scientific information to report.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. The muscimol in amanita causes birth defects in rats.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Davis, D.P., and S.R. Williams. “Amanita Muscaria.” Journal of Emergency Medicine 17
(1999): 739.
Fabing, H.D. “On Going Berserk: A Neurochemical Inquiry.” Scientific Monthly 83
(1956): 232–37.
Horne, C.H.W., and J.A.W. McCluskie. “The Food of the Gods.” Scottish Medical Journal
8 (1963): 489–91.
McDonald, A. “The Present Status of Soma: The Effects of California Amanita muscaria
on Normal Human Volunteers.” In Mushroom Poisoning: Diagnosis and Treatment,
ed. B.H. Rumack and E. Salzman. West Palm Beach, FL: CRC Press, 1978.
215–23.
Ott, J. “Psycho-Mycological Studies of Amanita: From Ancient Sacrament to Modern
Phobia.” Journal of Psychedelic Drugs 8 (January–March 1976): 27–35.
Areca Nut
Pronunciation: AR-i-kuh nut (also pronounced uh-REE-kuh nut)
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: None
Formal Names: Areca catechu
Informal Names: Betel Nut, Katha, Pinang, Pugua
Type: Stimulant (pyridine alkaloids class). See page 18
Federal Schedule Listing: Unlisted
USA Availability: Nonprescription natural product, but restrictions apply to interstate
commerce
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. Accounts of areca nuts date back to at least 504 B.C. They are about
the size of a cherry and come from palm trees in the Indian Ocean region,
grown in countries such as India, China, and the Philippines. Trees reach up
to 90 feet in height, and nuts are about an inch in diameter. The product is
used not only as a drug but also as a dye and in the leather tanning industry.
Drug use of areca nut is common in South Africa, India, Taiwan, and other
areas of South Asia and the Pacific basin. The product has been unfamiliar in
the United States, but is available and is used in some immigrant communities.
Areca nut is a popular recreational stimulant relieving tension and producing
euphoria, regularly used by perhaps 200 million to 600 million persons,
making it one of the most popular substances in the world. Users commonly
put the nuts in a quid (a chewable cut) as with coca or tobacco. Effects may
be unpleasant for new chewers: nausea, dizziness, burning sensation in the
mouth, a closing sensation in the throat. With perseverance, those unwanted
effects are replaced by desired ones. As with alcohol, in lands ranging from
India to New Guinea areca nut has a place in religious and other ceremonies
(engagements to marry, offerings to spirits), but the product’s main use is
secular. In some places, areca nut is a social lubricant, much as beer is used
in the United States. Paraphernalia involved with consuming areca nut may
be either utilitarian or highly decorated functional artwork. The product adds
a smell to the breath that many people find appealing. As with tobacco quids,
users typically spit out areca nut juice, staining walls or other targets. Because
such a practice may potentially promote the spread of disease, in some places
large cans are lined with plastic bags and used as spittoons.
Comments from one user make the substance sound like fast-acting cafAreca
Nut 49
feine; another user talked of a mild background stimulation accompanied by
pleasant enhancements of perception; still another user described a brightening
of colors, with motions around him becoming jerky, as in old-time silent
movies or modern Internet videos, and said he felt relaxed. (Those descriptions
are anecdotal, not from scientific journals.) Areca nut users generally
explain the experience as reducing hunger, tiredness, anxiety, and peevishness
while increasing contentment and alertness—effects reminiscent of coca chewing.
Some people simply use the quids as a cheaper substitute for chewing
gum. Areca nut usage is seen more often in older persons than in younger
and may therefore be declining. Younger persons do indulge, however. One
survey found up to 16% of high school students in Taiwan regularly using
the substance. Areca nut and nicotine both influence some of the same parts
of the central nervous system in similar ways.
Chewers widely believe areca nut aids digestion. Chewing the substance
can slow or accelerate pulse rate, raise or lower blood pressure, promote salivation
and tremors, and increase body temperature and sweating. Outdoor
workers use areca nut to combat cold weather. Areca nut is used to rid humans
of worms. The substance is also a treatment for worms and constipation
in animals. Traditional healing applications include treatment of edema, hepatitis,
gum disease, inadequate urine output, and gastrointestinal complaints
including both constipation and diarrhea. Investigators find that areca nut
reduces schizophrenia symptoms in schizophrenic chewers. Nonetheless, the
natural product has little place in modern medicine.
Some authorities describe areca nut’s actions as similar to amphetamine.
Although areca nut is a stimulant, its ability to improve workplace performance
is unproven. One laboratory study demonstrated that the substance is
unlikely to worsen job performance; another laboratory study showed improvement
in some reaction time; still another showed longer reaction time.
Tests of workers who operated heavy earth-moving equipment while using
areca nut found evidence that the men were more alert, but otherwise they
exhibited no effect that would influence job performance; measurements included
short-term memory, reaction time, and eye-hand coordination.
A chemical refined from areca nut (Areca II-5-C) shows excellent potential
as a medicine to reduce blood pressure, even though the natural product tends
to raise blood pressure. Experiments with areca nut’s pyridine alkaloid arecoline
indicate that the chemical can improve memory in mice, and arecoline
produces the same benefit in persons suffering from Alzheimer’s disease (although
improvement may be marginal). Still other chemicals isolated from
areca nut seem to have potential for inhibiting formation of plaque on teeth,
although in practice areca nut chewers have more plaque than nonchewers.
Chewers, however, also seem to have less tooth decay than nonchewers, and
areca nut toothpaste has been marketed. Areca nut chewing is linked to a
lower prevalence of a bowel disease called ulcerative colitis, but the possible
protective effect has not been differentiated yet from tobacco smoking of
chewers (nicotine is known to improve ulcerative colitis). One alcohol extract
of areca nut has been successfully tested as a treatment for skin wrinkles,
making people look younger. Another alcohol extract shows promise in treating
inflammations, allergies, and cancer. Burning areca leaves at a campsite
50 Areca Nut
helps repel some types of mosquito, effectively enough that researchers say
the practice can reduce spread of disease carried by mosquitoes.
Drawbacks. Overindulgence can produce hallucinations and delusions, but
those effects are uncommon. Based on chemical properties, theoretical reason
exists for expecting areca nut to promote diabetes; animal experiments exploring
that hypothesis have been suggestive but not conclusive. Chewing
areca nut produces large amounts of blood-red saliva, which over the years
can turn teeth brown or black. The physical action of continual chewing day
after day appears to promote breakage of tooth roots, while ever-present
draining of saliva across corners of the mouth can crack that skin. Areca nut
harms the antimicrobial ability of white blood cells, thereby promoting gum
disease, but saliva of chewers apparently inhibits bacterial growth. Areca nut
inhibits the body’s access to vitamin B1 and reduces metabolism of carbohydrates,
a situation that may produce an exhausting disease called beriberi.
The arecoline drug in areca nut can cause asthma. Some researchers speculate
that areca nut chewing helps explain why Asians are the predominant
ethnic group hospitalized for asthma in Great Britain. Areca nut is known to
reduce the healing qualities of asthma medications. Heartbeat abnormalities
serious enough to hospitalize people have followed their chewing of areca
nut, but a cause-effect relationship has not been established even though arecoline
is known to cause cardiac crisis in dogs.
Because of chemical transformations caused by heat, using roasted nut instead
of unroasted may reduce short-term adverse effects.
Pan masala is a product including areca nut and other substances. Pan masala
interferes with liver activity in rats.
Abuse factors. Some researchers have concluded that areca nut is as addictive
as tobacco cigarettes. Unquestionably some users feel a strong continual
need for the product; one person spoke of arising in the middle of the night
to dose herself. Mild withdrawal symptoms are common but can become
strong enough that persons seek medical aid. Withdrawal symptoms can include
fatigue, nervousness, depression, trouble with memory and concentration,
and paranoia. Compared to nonchewers, generally areca nut chewers are
more likely to smoke cigarettes and drink alcohol—although researchers
studying schizophrenics find that, compared to nonchewers, schizophrenic
areca nut chewers are less likely to use recreational substances causing more
damage to themselves than areca nut does.
Drug interactions. Areca nut is believed to interact with psychiatric medicines
that can produce tremors and spasms reminiscent of Parkinson’s disease,
worsening such adverse effects of the medicines. People using a preparation
of areca nut and pumpkin seed have experienced dizziness and stomach upset.
Animal experiments have identified a chemical in areca nut as an antidepressant
operating as a monoamine oxidase inhibitor (MAOI), and various drugs
described in this book react badly if used simultaneously with an MAOI.
Cancer. The nut is rich in tannins, chemicals that inhibit utilization of dietary
protein and that promote cancer. An experiment injecting an areca nut extract
into rats for almost a year and a half gave tumors to every rat. Various other
animal experiments also indicate a danger of cancer from using areca nut, but
Areca Nut 51
scientists are uncertain that the substance causes cancer in humans unless used
in combination with tobacco.
In a mice experiment a small percentage of animals receiving pan masala
developed assorted cancers, but animals receiving no pan masala developed
no cancers. Humans who habitually chew the nut can get noncancerous and
precancerous abnormalities in the mouth. Fatal oral tumors may develop, but
reports are not always clear about persons’ use of other substances that may
promote cancer. Oral submucous fibrosis (OSF) is a serious mouth disease
directly attributed to chewing plain areca nut or pan masala. Some victims
also chew or smoke tobacco. In evaluating precancerous and cancerous
growths in the mouth, however, some researchers analyzing medical cases
have found areca nut to be a far more likely cause of such afflictions than
tobacco. (That type of research examines outcomes of drug usage, not mechanisms
by which usage promotes cancer.) Animal experiments suggest that
consuming alcohol may heighten the risk of mouth cancer from pan masala,
a suggestion supported by clinical experience. Tests on pan masala users find
them to suffer from increased DNA damage in tissues exposed to pan masala,
a tendency duplicated in laboratory tests of pan masala and areca nut. Such
chromosome damage is suspected of causing mouth, throat, and esophageal
cancers ascribed to areca nut. A study examining the combined effects of pan
masala, tobacco smoking, and alcohol drinking found that persons who do all
three are 123 times more likely to get mouth cancer than persons who do
none. Experiments suggest that vitamins A and E might help reduce the health
risks of pan masala.
Pregnancy. In male mice pan masala damages chromosomes and sperm,
and ingestion of pan masala by male rats has caused their gonads to shrink
in weight. Examination of human uterine cells indicates mutation from chewing
areca nut preparations. Examination of human white blood cells shows
increased chromosome damage in pregnant women who chew areca nut preparations
and still more damage if nonpregnant chewers use birth control pills.
Chicken experiments produce birth defects when an alcohol extract of areca
nut is injected into embryos, but results from chicken embryo testing are not
accepted as evidence of human risk. One human study found that pregnant
chewers were almost three times more likely to have adverse pregnancy outcomes
than nonchewers. Another study found that infants of pregnant chewers
had lower birth weight but were also less likely to have jaundice.
Additional information. Betel pepper leaves are chewed, but this plant
(Piper betle, also called Piper betel) is not Areca catechu. Betel pepper leaves,
areca nut, and mineral lime (not the fruit) are combined into a product called
betel. Studies indicate that leaves of betel pepper reduce areca nut’s ability to
cause chromosome damage. Chewing betel is thought to convert arecoline into
arecaidine, which some researchers consider more benign in its effects than
arecoline.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Burton-Bradley, B.G. “Arecaidinism: Betel Chewing in Transcultural Perspective.” Canadian
Journal of Psychiatry 24 (1979): 481–88.
52 Areca Nut
Burton-Bradley, B.G. “Papua and New Guinea Transcultural Psychiatry: Some Implications
of Betel Chewing.” Medical Journal of Australia 16 (1966): 744–46.
Chittivelu, S., and K.S. Chittivelu. “Betel Nut Chewing and Cardiac Arrhythmia.” Veterinary
and Human Toxicology 40 (1998): 368.
Nelson, B.S., and B. Heischober. “Betel Nut: A Common Drug Used by Naturalized
Citizens from India, Far East Asia, and the South Pacific Islands.” Annals of
Emergency Medicine 34 (1999): 238–43.
Norton, S.A. “Betel: Consumption and Consequences.” Journal of the American Academy
of Dermatology 38 (1998): 81–88.
Pickwell, S.M., S. Schimelpfening, and L.A. Palinkas. “ ‘Betelmania.’ Betel Quid Chewing
by Cambodian Women in the United States and Its Potential Health Effects.”
Western Journal of Medicine 160 (1994): 326–30.
Reichart, P.A., and H.P. Phillipsen. “Betel Chewer’s Mucosa—A Review.” Journal of
Oral Pathology and Medicine 27 (1998): 239–42.
Wyatt, T.A. “Betel Nut Chewing and Selected Psychophysiological Variables.” Psychological
Reports 79 (1996): 451–63.
Belladonna
Pronunciation: bell-uh-DON-uh
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 8007-93-0
Formal Names: Atropa belladonna
Informal Names: Black Cherry, Deadly Nightshade, Death’s Herb, Devil’s Cherries,
Devil’s Herb, Divale, Dwale, Dwayberry, Great Morel, Love Apple, Murderer’s
Berry, Naughty Man’s Cherries, Poison Black Cherry, Sleeping
Nightshade, Sorcerers Berries, Sorcerer’s Cherry, Witch’s Berry
Type: Hallucinogen. See page 25
Federal Schedule Listing: Unlisted as natural product
USA Availability: Nonprescription natural product; some pharmaceutical preparations
are prescription
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. Belladonna bushes thrive in the United States, Europe, North Africa,
and Southeast Asia. Some persons seeking a hallucinogenic effect eat the berries.
Leaves and roots are used medically. The wood has an even higher drug
content but does not seem to be exploited medically. The plant grows wild
and has also been cultivated on a commercial scale for the pharmaceutical
industry. Drugs found in the plant include atropine, hyoscyamine, and scopolamine,
all of which are also found in jimson weed and European mandrake.
Belladonna substances can ease premenstrual syndrome. They can reduce
spasms in smooth muscles of the digestive tract, but they cause tremors or
stiffness in other muscles. Heart rate is accelerated. Migraine headaches can
lessen. An experiment showed that belladonna can reduce breathing abnormalities
in infants. Some medical traditions have used belladonna for reducing
sweat and other secretions and against tonsilitis, meningitis, scarlet fever,
whooping cough, and epilepsy. At one time medical practitioners gave belladonna
to fight Parkinson’s disease and drug addiction, but those treatments
have been superseded by others. Belladonna preparations have modern usage
against vesico-ureteral reflux, a condition in which urine flows back toward
the kidney from the bladder. Caregivers have administered belladonna to treat
various pains, ranging from kidney stones to sore throat. Belladonna powders
and cigarettes have been used against asthma. The natural product is considered
effective against afflictions of the gallbladder and liver. Belladonna is
54 Belladonna
used with uncertain results for depression, middle ear inflammation, and
some heart complaints and for attempts to promote weight loss. Depending
on dosage, the substance can act as a depressant or as a stimulant.
At one time the plant had cosmetic uses from which it supposedly gained
its Italian name meaning “beautiful lady.” The precise cosmetic usage is uncertain:
One authority mentions a rouge; another authority says the substance
whitened the skin; still another says that belladonna was simply a medicinal
application to remove pimples and other skin blemishes. Many accounts today
say that the cosmetic function was to make women more alluring by dilating
the eyes’ pupils, but those stories do not explain how flirting women would
have handled the pain and near-blindness caused by artificial dilation. Modern
medicine uses the belladonna component atropine to dilate pupils.
Erotic dreams may occur from ingestion, and reputedly belladonna is considered
an aphrodisiac in Morocco. Users have reported hallucinating interactions
with landscapes and other persons, experiences so compelling that
their hallucinatory nature was unapparent until the belladonna dose wore off.
Drawbacks. Dosage with the natural product belladonna is so risky that
persons are routinely advised to use it only under guidance of a trained
expert. For example, depending on circumstances a fatal dose can vary by a
factor of 10, meaning that a given ingestion might be survivable, but on another
occasion one tenth that amount could just as easily be fatal. Three berries
have been enough to kill youngsters. People have been poisoned by meat from
animals that ate belladonna. Just handling the plant can pass its drugs into
cuts and scrapes and even through unbroken skin. During World War II
troops stationed in East Africa suffered “wholesale poisoning” from belladonna,
presumably due to recreational usage. Yet despite powerful effects on
humans, some nonhuman species (including birds, rabbits, pigs, and sheep)
can consume the plant without injury—an example of why caution is needed
in reaching conclusions from drug experiments on animals.
Experiments show that the scopolamine component of belladonna reduces
attention and vigilance while interfering somewhat with memory. Some volunteers
testing the drug report dizziness and blurred vision. Nonetheless, aerospace
researchers have concluded that scopolamine is a satisfactory motion
sickness medicine for active-duty crews.
Belladonna can interfere with urination and bowel movements—drug actions
that are sometimes desirable, as in persons who have lost the ability to
restrain such body functions. Unwanted belladonna effects include delayed
passage of food from the stomach, overheating (aggravated by diminished
perspiration), dry mouth, skin rash, glaucoma, hyperactivity, jabbering (or
sometimes an opposite inability to speak), mania, anxiety, delirium, and convulsions.
Psychedelic drug advocate Timothy Leary is reputed to have claimed
he was unaware of anyone ever having a good experience with using belladonna
as a hallucinogen, and firsthand accounts do seem mostly negative.
Stories say that in olden times belladonna was a component of witch’s brews;
if so, such persons certainly partook of it for purposes rather different from
those of modern recreational drug users. A medical journal author who observed
several recreational belladonna sessions judged the substance to be
powerful, but none of the users needed medical aid. Modern negative acBelladonna
55
counts often derive from hospitalized individuals, and they are not necessarily
a representative sample of typical users. For example, compilers of one series
of case reports noted that six of the seven patients were psychologically abnormal
before using belladonna. Another pair of case reports noted that both
patients had histories of depression and drug abuse.
Abuse factors. Not enough scientific information to report about likelihood
of addiction, tolerance, dependence, or withdrawal.
Drug interactions. Not enough scientific information to report about the
natural product.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Belladonna is suspected of causing birth defects if used during
pregnancy. Belladonna drugs have been given to pregnant women, however,
to control excessive salivation and vomiting, without apparent injury to offspring.
Additional information. “Belladonna” is a nickname for PCP, but the substances
have no other connection.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Forbes, T.R. “Why Is it Called ‘Beautiful Lady’? A Note on Belladonna.” Bulletin of the
New York Academy of Medicine 53 (1977): 403–6.
Gowdy, J.M. “Stramonium Intoxication: Review of Symptomatology in 212 Cases.”
Journal of the American Medical Association 221 (1972): 585–87.
Nuotto, E. “Psychomotor, Physiological and Cognitive Effects of Scopolamine and
Ephedrine in Healthy Man.” European Journal of Clinical Pharmacology 24 (1983):
603–9.
Schneider, F., et al. “Plasma and Urine Concentrations of Atropine after the Ingestion
of Cooked Deadly Nightshade Berries.” Journal of Toxicology: Clinical Toxicology
34 (1996): 113–17.
Southgate, H.J., M. Egerton, and E.A. Dauncey. “Lessons to Be Learned: A Case Study
Approach. Unseasonal Severe Poisoning of Two Adults by Deadly Nightshade
(Atropa belladonna).” Journal of the Royal Society of Health 120 (2000): 127–30.
Benzphetamine
Pronunciation: benz-FET-ah-meen
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 156-08-1
Formal Names: Didrex, Inapetyl
Type: Stimulant (anorectic class). See page 15
Federal Schedule Listing: III (DEA no. 1228)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: X
Uses. This amphetamine was created in a laboratory in 1953 and is used as
an appetite suppressant. Its qualities are similar to dextroamphetamine, although
users perceive benzphetamine as the weaker of the two in various
aspects and—with one notable exception—do not particularly find benzphetamine
to be a substitute for dextroamphetamine. The exception is that some
persons wanting to boost alertness use benzphetamine in order to avoid the
jumpiness caused by dextroamphetamine.
Experiments with rhesus monkeys show dextroamphetamine to be about 14
times stronger than benzphetamine when used as an appetite depressant; in
dogs the difference is 5 times. Difference in potency also varies depending on
the effect being measured (locomotion, blood pressure). In terms of end result,
studies have been inconclusive when comparing benzphetamine, phenmetrazine,
and dextroamphetamine. One experiment found benzphetamine superior
to dextroamphetamine in weight reduction. In that same study
benzphetamine maintained appetite reduction longer than other drugs did,
but benzphetamine users in another comparison test detected no change in
their feelings of hunger. The drug has little effect on levels of blood pressure
or blood sugar, which some scientists see as positive factors for hypertensive
or diabetic patients.
Benzphetamine is known to cause euphoria, yet that response apparently is
uncommon. Volunteers taking the substance in an experiment acted more
friendly but not euphoric, although they did feel more energetic. In another
study the psychological state of users remained the same as with persons
taking a placebo. In contrast to results from animal experiments, electroencephalograms
(brain wave readings) taken from humans fail to show brain
stimulation by benzphetamine.
Drawbacks. Users occasionally report wooziness, eyesight difficulty, and
Benzphetamine 57
mild insomnia. The compound’s ability to mask fatigue can also cause persons
to overextend themselves—a hazard when operating dangerous machinery
such as motor vehicles. In an experiment, complaint of dry mouth was routine,
and insomnia less so, but the drug did not make people particularly active or
ill-tempered. Once ingested, benzphetamine will convert into amphetamine
and methamphetamine and may cause a person to fail a drug test for those
substances, although skilled interpretation of test results can sometimes suggest
benzphetamine as the source.
People with diabetes, thyroid trouble, epilepsy, or anxiety should use
benzphetamine with caution. Persons with glaucoma, cardiac ailment, high
blood pressure, or narrowed arteries are supposed to avoid benzphetamine
altogether.
Abuse factors. Experiments with rhesus monkeys have been interpreted as
meaning benzphetamine may be more effective in producing desire for the
drug than in producing appetite loss. Human tests find the drug about as
appealing as phenmetrazine. In an experiment with 75 human subjects, 5 reported
experiences likened to those induced by mescaline. Drug abusers may
find benzphetamine attractive, but it lacks a reputation for illicit use. Dependence
can develop.
Drug interactions. People using a monoamine oxidase inhibitor (MAOI,
found in some antidepressants and other medicines) are supposed to stop
taking any such drug two weeks before using benzphetamine. Tricyclic antidepressants
may reduce benzphetamine’s effectiveness. The drug may interfere
with the blood pressure medicine guanethidine, causing pressure to rise.
Cancer. The digestive system can convert benzphetamine into methylbenzylnitrosamine,
a substance identified as causing cancer.
Pregnancy. Benzphetamine is considered to have high potential for causing
birth defects if used by a pregnant woman. The drug may pass into breast
milk.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Chait, L.D., and C.E. Johanson. “Discriminative Stimulus Effects of Caffeine and
Benzphetamine in Amphetamine-Trained Volunteers.” Psychopharmacology (Berlin)
96 (1988): 302–8.
Chait, L.D., E.H. Uhlenhuth, and C.E. Johanson. “Reinforcing and Subjective Effects of
Several Anorectics in Normal Human Volunteers.” Journal of Pharmacology and
Experimental Therapeutics 242 (1987): 777–83.
Patel, N., D.C. Mock, Jr., and J.A. Hagans. “Comparison of Benzphetamine, Phenmetrazine,
D-Amphetamine, and Placebo.” Current Pharmacology and Therapeutics 4
(1963): 330–33.
Poindexter, A. “Appetite Suppressant Drugs: A Controlled Clinical Comparison of
Benzphetamine, Phenmetrazine, D-Amphetamine and Placebo.” Current Therapeutic
Research: Clinical and Experimental 2 (1960): 354–63.
Veldkamp, W., et al. “Some Pharmacologic Properties of Benzphetamine Hydrochloride.”
Toxicology and Applied Pharmacology 6 (1964): 15–22.
Boldenone
Pronunciation: BOHL-duh-nohn
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 846-48-0. (Undecylenate form
13103-34-9)
Formal Names: Dehydrotestosterone, Equipoise, Parenabol, Vebonol
Type: Anabolic steroid. See page 24
Federal Schedule Listing: III (DEA no. 4000)
USA Availability: Prescription
Uses. Boldenone has had experimental use to explore whether it is beneficial
in the treatment of persons suffering from osteoporosis. This disease not only
makes bones fragile, but it also causes pain and loss of appetite. Patients in
the study reported feeling better, but scientific measurements failed to confirm
improvement.
The drug has been given to pigeons, greyhounds, and horses in order to
enhance their racing abilities. Boldenone can promote weight gain in horses.
Drawbacks. A research study administering the drug to stallions found their
testes to be smaller than those of stallions receiving a placebo, and the boldenone
animals had less sperm production. Mares receiving the drug in an
experiment had a shortened breeding season and abnormal sexual behavior
(mounting and male-like conduct), though they seemed to recover several
weeks after drug cessation. The drug has been used illegally to increase cattle
growth, usage that might harm consumers of the meat.
Horses can become aggressive after receiving the drug, a trait that may
continue for weeks after administration stops. A human case is reported in
which a pleasant and easygoing person became rageful after using the drug
at a dosage 20 times higher than an amount sufficient to make horses aggressive.
Abuse factors. A case report notes that someone taking boldenone and other
anabolic steroids for bodybuilding suffered serious temporary depression after
the supply was cut off. Until then the person had been psychologically normal.
Drug interactions. Not enough scientific information to report.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Female rats on boldenone showed lower fertility, and their offspring
had a higher than normal death rate.
Boldenone 59
Additional information. The substance is banned from sporting competitions.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Cowan, C.B. “Depression in Anabolic Steroid Withdrawal.” Irish Journal of Psychological
Medicine 11 (1994): 27–28.
Dalby, J.T. “Brief Anabolic Steroid Use and Sustained Behavioral Reaction.” American
Journal of Psychiatry 149 (1992): 271–72.
Melick, R.A., and C.W. Baird. “Effect of Parenabol on Patients with Osteoporosis.”
Medical Journal of Australia 2 (1970): 960–62.
Melloni, R.H., et al. “Anabolic-Androgenic Steroid Exposure during Adolescence and
Aggressive Behavior in Golden Hamsters.” Physiology and Behavior 61 (1997):
359–64.
Moss, H.B., and G.L. Panzak. “Steroid Use and Aggression.” American Journal of Psychiatry
149 (1992): 1616.
Bufotenine
Pronunciation: boo-foh-TEN-een
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 487-93-4
Formal Names: Chan Su, Mappine, N,N-dimethylserotonin
Informal Names: Cohoba
Type: Hallucinogen. See p. 25
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule I (DEA no. 7433)
USA Availability: Illegal to possess
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. This drug occurs naturally in a number of plants and animals, apparently
including trace amounts in humans. Rainforests in the Amazon and
deserts in the U.S. Southwest have been key regions for natural sources of the
drug, although plants and animals with the substance are found elsewhere as
well. Accounts about natural products containing bufotenine reach back to
ancient times. Amanita mushrooms containing the substance are believed to
have been available to ancient Vikings, and some students of the topic wonder
if the drug powered the Vikings’ famed Berserker rage, in which they would
descend upon opponents and attack them (just as modern soldiers sometimes
take drugs to improve performance in battle). Native American religious use
of a bufotenine snuff called cohoba was reported in 1496. Although bufotenine
gained notoriety from research conducted by the U.S. military and Central
Intelligence Agency in hopes that the substance would be effective in brainwashing
efforts, the drug is perhaps best known for its presence in skins of
certain toads. This source is speculated as the origin of fairy tales about wondrous
experiences that happen when a woman kisses a frog. Such toads were
a traditional component of witches’ brews.
A tropical aphrodisiac compounded from the dried venom of toads has been
found to contain bufotenine. A traditional Chinese medicine called Chan Su
is rubbed on a spot of the body to numb the area and is also used for heart
ailments and to fight nosebleeds; Chan Su is prepared from toads and contains
bufotenine. Other toad venom preparations have been used to relieve toothache,
to help bleeding gums, to promote urination, and to help people cough
up phlegm.
Drawbacks. When scientists administered bufotenine to some individuals
they showed alarming physical symptoms ranging from faces turning purple
Bufotenine 61
to production of so much saliva that medical observers intervened to prevent
the person from breathing it into her lungs and drowning. Other physical
effects can include high blood pressure and a feeling that one’s air supply is
inadequate. Researchers who gave the substance to dogs reported that they
howled in an unnerving manner for hours.
Although bufotenine lowers pulse rate, it has been described as a heart
stimulant. Overdose from products with the substance can cause death from
heart failure, although the fatal poisoning may be from chemicals other than
bufotenine in the products.
Abuse factors. Stories claim that licking bufotenine toads can produce hallucinations.
Some persons familiar with the animals scoff at those tales, but
there is a known case of a child being poisoned from licking one. Controversy
arose when an Australian horse won a race and tested positive for bufotenine,
a substance banned from the sport. Lacking any other explanation, bewildered
observers at first jokingly speculated that the horse had eaten a toad, but
investigators later focused on a variety of pasture grass containing bufotenine.
Typically toad venom is harvested, dried, and smoked. One authority says
that swallowing enough venom to cause hallucinations would be fatal. Smokers,
however, are apparently not automatically poisoned by the product, although
reportedly some persons have instantly passed out upon inhaling the
smoke. Smokers have reported altered consciousness and hallucinations involving
sight, sound, smell, and touch. In research studies volunteers who
took bufotenine have experienced psychedelic effects, such as mild visual hallucinations
(seeing geometric shapes), distortions of time and space, and intense
emotional experiences.
One authority notes that analysis of seeds used by Argentine shamans reveals
bufotenine as their sole alkaloid, a finding suggesting that bufotenine is
indeed psychedelic. Nonetheless, scientific research has not confirmed that the
pure drug, as opposed to natural products containing this drug along with
many other chemicals, is a psychedelic. For example, some toad venom having
bufotenine is also a source of a hallucinogen called 5-MeO-DMT, and a person
who uses this venom may be experiencing effects from 5-MeO-DMT rather
than bufotenine. (Not everyone finds 5-MeO-DMT pleasant. Scientist A.
McDonald, who engaged in self-experimentation, reported “an intense feeling
of unease quite unlike the effects of DMT. My scientific curiosity has not yet
proved sufficient to try it a second time.”)
Although news media stories have described bufotenine as more powerful
than LSD, researchers find that the substance does not readily cross from the
bloodstream into brain tissue. Evidence also exists that a person’s physical
condition might affect bufotenine’s hallucinogenic impact. Some authorities
say the drug’s apparent hallucinogenic qualities are caused instead by its ability
to lower heart rate enough to produce oxygen starvation in the optic
nerves, causing a person to “see stars.” Some natural products containing
bufotenine (such as some kinds of seeds and toads) are unquestionably psychedelic,
but no scientific consensus exists about the psychedelic qualities of
pure bufotenine.
Drug interactions. Not enough scientific information to report.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
62 Bufotenine
Pregnancy. Not enough scientific information to report.
Additional information. Studies have found that levels of the substance are
often elevated in the urine of schizophrenics, in some types of autistic individuals,
and in depressed persons but rarely in psychologically normal people.
Although cause and effect is by no means established, a study found higher
bufotenine levels in urine of paranoid persons convicted of violent crimes than
in urine from nonparanoid violent offenders.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
“Deaths Associated with a Purported Aphrodisiac—New York City, February 1993–
May 1995.” Morbidity and Mortality Weekly Report 44 (1995): 853–55, 861.
Fabing, H.D., and J.R. Hawkins. “Intravenous Bufotenine Injection in the Human Being.”
Science 123 (1956): 886–87.
Horgan, J. “Bufo Abuse: A Toxic Toad Gets Licked, Boiled, Teed up and Tanned.”
Scientific American 263 (August 1990): 26–27.
Lyttle, T. “Misuse and Legend in the ‘Toad Licking’ Phenomenon.” The International
Journal of the Addictions 28 (1993): 521–38.
Lyttle, T., D. Goldstein, and J. Gartz. “Bufo Toads and Bufotenine: Fact and Fiction
Surrounding an Alleged Psychedelic.” Journal of Psychoactive Drugs 28 (1996):
267–90.
McBride, M.C. “Bufotenine: Toward an Understanding of Possible Psychoactive Mechanisms.”
Journal of Psychoactive Drugs 32 (2000): 321–31.
McDonald, A. “Mushrooms and Madness. Hallucinogenic Mushrooms and Some
Psychopharmacological Implications.” Canadian Journal of Psychiatry 25 (1980):
586–94.
Sandroni, P. “Aphrodisiacs Past and Present: A Historical Review.” Clinical Autonomic
Research 11 (2001): 303–7.
Siegel, D.M., and S.H. McDaniel. “The Frog Prince: Tale and Toxicology.” American
Journal of Orthopsychiatry 61 (1991): 558–62.
Buprenorphine
Pronunciation: boo-preh-NOHR-feen
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 52485-79-7. (Hydrochloride form
53152-21-9)
Formal Names: Buprenex, Subutex, Temgesic, Tidigesic
Type: Depressant (opiate class). See page 22
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule V (DEA no. 9064). In 2002 a rescheduling to
III was underway.
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. This pain reliever is produced from thebaine and is both longer lasting
than morphine and 25 to 50 times stronger. Buprenorphine is given to
persons suffering from conditions causing great discomfort, such as cancer,
pancreatitis, and surgery. Experimental use of the drug to treat depression
and schizophrenia has had promising results.
Drawbacks. Typical unwanted effects are sedation, nausea, constipation,
dizziness, sweating, and low blood pressure. Impairment of breathing can
occur. The drug can interfere with skills needed to operate a car or other
dangerous machinery; volunteers in one experiment still had trouble eight
hours after a dose. Visual or auditory hallucinations are possible. A medical
case report tells of a heart attack after someone inhaled powder from a pulverized
oral buprenorphine tablet. Heart trouble has also been noted when
the drug is used medically, but in a therapeutic context, such difficulty is very
unusual. Long-term administration of the drug in mice can change their blood
composition, including a drastic decline in the number of white blood cells,
but these changes clear up after administration of buprenorphine stops.
Abuse factors. Although the drug produces sensations likened to those of
morphine, when this book was written, buprenorphine was a Schedule V controlled
substance, a classification reserved for drugs with the lowest addictive
potential. Research conducted on behalf of the National Institute on Drug
Abuse and published in 2001 found no illicit buprenorphine use in the United
States but described the drug as having appeal to street markets. Such a market
may develop; in an experiment testing opiate users’ ability to detect differences
among drugs, the volunteers misidentified buprenorphine as heroin.
64 Buprenorphine
Buprenorphine abuse is well documented in other countries, ranging from
Scotland and France to India and New Zealand.
People can become addicted to buprenorphine; one study found no difference
other than age between buprenorphine addicts and heroin addicts, suggesting
the two drugs appeal to the same kinds of people. Given that finding,
it is unsurprising that buprenorphine’s experimental use as an alternative to
methadone has been successful in switching heroin addicts to buprenorphine.
Various studies note that buprenorphine may create euphoria, an effect that
is normally considered a drawback if a drug is used for treating addiction.
Some researchers feel that buprenorphine has large potential for abuse. Treating
cocaine addiction with buprenorphine has had mixed success. Indeed, an
experiment indicated that buprenorphine increases pleasurable effects from
cocaine.
After a certain point, buprenorphine’s effects no longer increase as much
when dosage size increases; this characteristic may deter addicts from taking
too much buprenorphine and thereby make it a relatively safe substitute for
heroin. An experiment demonstrated that persons lacking dependence with
opiates could receive 70 times the normal medical dose of buprenorphine
without harm, a safety factor of significance in addiction treatment programs,
particularly since dependent persons (such as those in addiction treatment)
normally can withstand even higher opiate doses than nondependent persons
can. A statistical analysis of drug abuser fatalities in France concluded that
the death rate from buprenorphine is far less than the rate from methadone.
Another advantage to buprenorphine is that maintenance doses can be given
less often than with methadone. Still another advantage is that, unlike most
opiates, buprenorphine can provoke withdrawal symptoms when taken with
another opiate. Thus addicts may be deterred from continuing to take heroin
or other opiates while using buprenorphine. Some addicts, however, are able
to take both heroin and buprenorphine simultaneously.
Tolerance does not necessarily develop with long-term use, although evidence
of tolerance exists among buprenorphine addicts. Animals that are
dosed on buprenorphine develop little or no dependence, a finding duplicated
in a study of heroin addicts receiving maintenance doses of buprenorphine.
Experiments show, however, that when buprenorphine addicts receive a drug
that counteracts opiate actions, subjects experience classic symptoms of withdrawal
from opiate dependence: yawning, muscle ache, and general uneasiness.
Drug interactions. An experiment showed that buprenorphine further accelerates
pulse rates that are already raised by cocaine. Another human study
and a monkey experiment found no significant interaction between cocaine
and buprenorphine, but still another primate study showed buprenorphine as
boosting cocaine effects. Researchers operating a rat study concluded that buprenorphine
boosts cocaine actions, but mice studies found that buprenorphine
diminished some cocaine effects; such varying results from different
animal species indicate the difficulty of applying those results to humans. A
human experiment showed that blood flow damage in the brain caused by
cocaine can improve after taking buprenorphine.
People using buprenorphine have suffered collapse of breathing and blood
Buprenorphine 65
circulation when also taking diazepam. Taking a monoamine oxidase inhibitor
(MAOI—a component in some antidepressants and other medication) may be
risky when using buprenorphine. Evidence exists that the drug may promote
bleeding under the skin when taken with the anti–blood clot medicine phenprocoumon.
Adverse interaction is also reported between buprenorphine and
flunitrazepam. Antihistamines can add to buprenorphine’s general depressant
effects. Another possible drug interaction involves nicotine; people using buprenorphine
tend to increase their tobacco cigarette consumption. Buprenorphine
should be used with particular carefulness if a person suffers from
enlarged prostrate, urination difficulty, alcoholism, thyroid gland deficiency,
or adrenal gland deficiency.
Cancer. Animal experiments have not indicated that the compound produces
cancer.
Pregnancy. Pregnant rats receiving 1,000 times the normal human dose have
had difficulty when giving birth. Early pregnancy failure and fetal deaths
occurred when rats received 10 to 100 times the normal human dose, but not
if they had 1,000 times the standard dose. No birth defects were seen at any
of those dose levels. More experimentation shows that buprenorphine alters
brain development in fetal rats, but the practical effects of those changes are
unclear. Results from other research demonstrate long-term effects on behavior
of offspring if pregnant rats receive high doses of buprenorphine; those
measurements do not indicate what the human outcome would be but nonetheless
serve as a warning. Malformations occurred when pregnant rabbits
received 1,000 times the recommended human dose. A case report says no
malformations occurred when a pregnant heroin addict was switched to daily
doses of buprenorphine for several months; the infant showed mild dependence
but quickly got through the withdrawal symptoms. One group of researchers
who gave daily doses of the drug to pregnant women observed no
withdrawal symptoms in the infants, and offspring also had normal weight.
Another group of researchers found no adverse effect on fetal development
and no harm in infants born to pregnant women who were also using nicotine
and marijuana in addition to buprenorphine. Buprenorphine has been given
to premature newborns with no apparent ill effect.
Milk production declined after nursing rats received buprenorphine, and
the same effect has been observed in women who received the drug during
Caesarean section. The drug passes into human milk, but a case report indicates
the amount is not enough to cause dependence in the infant.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Agar, M., et al. “Buprenorphine: ‘Field Trials’ of a New Drug.” Qualitative Health Research
11 (2001): 69–84.
Bedi, N.S., et al. “Abuse Liability of Buprenorphine—A Study among Experienced
Drug Users.” Indian Journal of Physiology and Pharmacology 42 (1998): 95–100.
Hammersley, R., T. Lavelle, and A. Forsyth. “Predicting Initiation to and Cessation of
Buprenorphine and Temazepam Use amongst Adolescents.” British Journal of
Addiction 87 (1992): 1303–11.
Heel, R.C. “Buprenorphine: A Review of Its Pharmacological Properties and Therapeutic
Efficacy.” Drugs 17 (1979): 81–110.
66 Buprenorphine
Lewis, J.W. “Buprenorphine.” Drug and Alcohol Dependence 14 (1985): 363–72.
Pickworth, W.B. “Subjective and Physiologic Effects of Intravenous Buprenorphine in
Humans.” Clinical Pharmacology and Therapeutics 53 (1993): 570–76.
Zacny, J.P., K. Conley, and J. Galinkin. “Comparing the Subjective, Psychomotor and
Physiological Effects of Intravenous Buprenorphine and Morphine in Healthy
Volunteers.” Journal of Pharmacology and Experimental Therapeutics 282 (1997):
1187–97.
Butalbital
Pronunciation: byoo-TAL-bi-tall
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 77-26-9
Formal Names: Esgic, Fioricet, Fiorinal, Phrenilin, Sedapap
Type: Depressant (barbiturate class). See page 20
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule III (DEA no. 2100)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. The drug is a potent sedative. Butalbital’s primary medical use is for
headache relief, and a product containing butalbital has also been found effective
in treating pain of oral surgery.
Drawbacks. In excessive amounts butalbital can interfere with breathing
and induce coma. The drug can increase body temperature, cause reddening
of the skin, slow manual dexterity, and bring on confusion and glumness, all
rather reminiscent of what alcohol can do. Compared to other barbiturates
butalbital is rather short acting, which can have the advantage of lessening
the time that users experience unwanted effects.
Abuse factors. Excessive use can cause problems both when actively taking
the drug and when the drug is stopped. A case is reported when butalbital
was suspected of promoting periods of wandering with the person having no
recollection of what happened during those times. A single dose of one thousand
milligrams (mg) is considered a poisonous dose, and a woman who took
900 mg daily for more than two years developed hallucinations, seizures, and
delirium when she stopped the drug; hospitalization was needed to cure those
symptoms. Two individuals taking 1,500 mg daily for months became confused,
experienced hallucinations, and needed medical help to wean themselves
from the drug. Persons taking butalbital for migraine have had grand
mal brain seizures upon stopping the drug. Some medical practitioners feel
that drug abuse is a cause of chronic headache, a belief that may make prescribing
a controlled substance such as butalbital a touchy issue if a patient
complains of daily headache.
Drug interactions. Monoamine oxidase inhibitors (MAOIs) can boost the
effects of butalbital. Like other barbiturates, butalbital can increase the effects
of alcohol and tranquilizers. Butalbital is suspected of decreasing the blood
68 Butalbital
levels of imipramine, so persons taking tricyclic antidepressants such as imipramine
may need to have blood levels monitored.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Animal experiments apparently do not indicate butalbital’s potential
for causing birth defects, but a large study of human pregnancy outcomes
found no link between the drug and birth defects. In one case when a
pregnant woman using butalbital gave birth, the child experienced seizures
identified as butalbital withdrawal symptoms. Those symptoms disappeared
when the infant received another barbiturate on a gradually decreasing dose
that weaned the child off the drug.
Combination products. Fiorinal is a headache remedy that has had several
formulations but is typically butalbital, aspirin, and caffeine. The product has
been found useful for pain relief among women who have recently given birth,
apparently more effective than propoxyphene. Also oral surgery patients have
received good pain relief from Fiorinal and codeine. Fiorinal is known to
produce a false positive for phenobarbital in body fluid testing. Abuse of the
butalbital, aspirin, and caffeine (BAC) combination headache remedy can in
itself cause rebound headaches. Although most persons feel no particular attraction
to that combination when they take it, a minority of users experience
elevation of physical energy and psychic mood, which makes the tablets attractive.
Persons have been known to take from 150 to 420 BAC tablets a
month for years, habits requiring hospitalization and psychological help to
overcome. Substituting acetaminophen for aspirin in this combination has
been found to be just as good for treating headache and less likely to cause
unwanted effects. This latter combination, under the brand name Fioricet, has
been found to have the additional effect of relieving tension.
Sedapap and Phrenilin (both with butalbital and acetaminophen) are remedies
for headaches produced by tension or muscle contraction. The combination
is not recommended for preadolescents or for persons suffering from
porphyria, a condition involving disturbances in body chemistry and abnormal
sensitivity to light. Potential for causing cancer or birth defects is unknown,
and the combination is assigned to Pregnancy Category C. The
combination passes into the milk supply of nursing mothers with unknown
effect.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Forbes, J.A. “Analgesic Effect of an Aspirin-Codeine-Butalbital-Caffeine Combination
and an Acetaminophen-Codeine Combination in Postoperative Oral Surgery
Pain.” Pharmacotherapy 6 (1986): 240–47.
Friedman, A.P., and F.J. DiSerio. “Symptomatic Treatment of Chronically Recurring
Tension Headache: Placebo-Controlled, Multicenter Investigation of Fioricet and
Acetaminophen with Codeine.” Clinical Therapeutics 10 (1987): 69–81.
Good, M.I. “Organic Dissociative Syndrome Associated with Antimigraine Pharmacotherapy.”
Canadian Journal of Psychiatry 36 (1991): 597–99.
Preskorn, S.H., R.L. Schwin, and W.V. McKnelly. “Analgesic Abuse and the Barbiturate
Abstinence Syndrome.” Journal of the American Medical Association 244 (1980):
369–70.
Raja, M. “Severe Barbiturate Withdrawal Syndrome in Migrainous Patients.” Headache
36 (1996): 119–21.
Butane
Pronunciation: BYOO-tain
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 106-97-8
Formal Names: Butyl Hydride, Liquefied Petroleum Gas, Methylethylmethane,
Pyrofax
Type: Inhalant. See page 26
Federal Schedule Listing: Unlisted
USA Availability: Nonprescription chemical
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. Some recreational use is for psychic effects: During butane intoxication,
time may appear to pass more slowly, and thoughts may seem to come
faster. Other recreational usage has nothing to do with altered consciousness:
Some persons ingest butane to perform the stunt of fire breathing, appearing
to exhale flames by filling the mouth with butane and then exhaling over a
flame source.
Drawbacks. Inhaling butane to achieve euphoria, hallucinations, and sensory
distortion is one of the riskier forms of substance abuse. The amount
required for hallucinatory action can be close to a lethal dose, making a slight
miscalculation fatal.
Users have complained of headache and coughing. Lung injury is reported,
ranging from fluid build-up and congestion to impaired breathing function
and lung collapse. Unwanted effects can also include cardiac arrest, from
which persons can seldom be resuscitated. A case report tells of a 14-year-old
male who suffered a heart attack due to inhaling butane. Another case report
describes a teenager who became paralyzed on one side of the body due to
butane inhalation. Explosion is a common misadventure; one hospital in South
Korea found that 1.6% of all flame burn patients had been abusing butane.
Most were teenagers. Accidents often happened in a group setting in bedrooms
or motel rooms. Burns typically covered more than 25% of the body:
face, hands, arms, midsection. About half the victims required skin grafts, and
the overall death rate was just over 10%. An American case study noted how
treacherous treatment can be for such injuries. A female was hospitalized after
striking a match in a closed vehicle while inhaling butane. She was released
after a couple of days but died a week later. In addition to external burns, the
explosion had burned interior airways into the lungs, an injury that gradually
70 Butane
destroyed her ability to breathe. Medical caregivers emphasize the importance
of victims honestly describing circumstances of a butane injury so that their
lung condition will be properly examined in detail. Caregivers also emphasize
that a person who experiences seemingly minor burns in a butane explosion
should always seek immediate medical examination of the lungs, because
breathing distress may not occur until several days later, when successful
treatment is less likely.
Butane is suspected of causing liver damage and is suspected of making
users ill-tempered.
Some recreational butane sniffers use sources also containing other ingredients.
Those other substances can be harmful as well. For example, a case
report notes problems encountered by someone who inhaled spray from oven
cleaner that contained butane. Butane spray from aerosol cans and other pressurized
containers can be cold enough to cause frostbite. Cases have been seen
of skin burns from the severe cold, also frostbite damage to the throat, lungs,
and esophagus. Associated inflammation of stomach lining is also known. The
instant severe cold can affect the vagus nerve, which influences voice quality
and affects heartbeat; such impact on the vagus nerve can produce heart
failure.
A case report notes a habitual practitioner of the fire breathing stunt who
developed stomach inflammation and a bleeding esophagus from irritation
caused by repeated exposure to butane. Another case report tells of severe
lung damage caused by exposure to unignited fumes. Judging from the expected
progress of such disease and from autopsy findings, such lung damage
can be fatal. Because butane is heavier than air, it can flow into the lungs even
if a person is trying to hold butane in the mouth without inhaling. One fire
breather routinely swallowed some of the butane, numbing the rear of the
mouth.
Abuse factors. Authorities have described butane’s effects as weaker and
having less addictive appeal than those of toluene. Tolerance and dependence
are reported. Withdrawal may involve several days of nausea, perspiration,
crankiness, troubled sleep, abdominal cramps, and general shakiness.
Drug interactions. Not enough scientific information to report.
Cancer. Potential for causing cancer is unknown.
Pregnancy. Potential for causing birth defects is unknown.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Evans, A.C., and D. Raistrick. “Patterns of Use and Related Harm with Toluene-Based
Adhesives and Butane Gas.” British Journal of Psychiatry 150 (1987): 773–76.
Evans, A.C., and D. Raistrick. “Phenomenology of Intoxication with Toluene-Based
Adhesives and Butane Gas.” British Journal of Psychiatry 150 (1987): 769–73.
Gomibuchi, K., T. Gomibuchi, and H. Kurita. “Treatment and 9-Year Outcome of
Butane-Induced Psychotic Disorder in a Butane-Dependent Japanese Male Adolescent.”
Psychiatry and Clinical Neurosciences 55 (2001): 163.
Gray, M.Y., and J.H. Lazarus. “Butane Inhalation and Hemiparesis.” Journal of Toxicology:
Clinical Toxicology 31 (1993): 483–85. Hemiparesis is paralysis on one side
of a person’s body.
Butane 71
Marsh, W.W. “Butane Firebreathing in Adolescents: A Potentially Dangerous Practice.”
Journal of Adolescent Health Care 5 (1984): 59–60.
Oh, S.J., et al. “Explosive Burns during Abusive Inhalation of Butane Gas.” Burns 25
(1999): 341–44.
Rieder-Scharinger, J., et al. “Multiorganversagen nach Butangasinhalation: Ein Fallbericht
[Multiple Organ Failure Following Inhalation of Butane Gas: A Case Report].”
Wiener Klinische Wochenschrift 112 (2000): 1049–52. Abstract in English.
Rohrig, T.P. “Sudden Death Due to Butane Inhalation.” American Journal of Forensic
Medicine and Pathology 18 (1997): 299–302.
Butorphanol
Pronunciation: byoo-TOR-fa-nohl
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 42408-82-2. (Tartrate form 58786-
99-5)
Formal Names: Dorphanol, Stadol, Stadol NS, Torbugesic
Type: Depressant (opioid class). See page 24
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule IV (DEA no. 9720)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. This pain reliever is a narcotic agonist/antagonist, meaning that it
acts like an opioid when used by itself but counteracts other opioids if given
simultaneously with them; the counteraction can be significant enough to provoke
a withdrawal syndrome if a person is dependent on the other opioids.
Butorphanol is used to control pain in conditions ranging from cancer and
surgery to migraine headache and dental work. Women seem to achieve better
pain control from butorphanol than men. The drug also suppresses coughs,
and researchers have found that it improves appetite. The substance has been
used illicitly by the type of bodybuilders who take nalbuphine and for the
same reasons (to reduce pain from workouts and in hopes of promoting muscle
mass).
Experiments show butorphanol to be about 4 to 7 times stronger than morphine,
20 to 30 times stronger than pentazocine, and 30 to 50 times stronger
than meperidine. Butorphanol is powerful enough that it has been used to
help sedate rhinoceroses. The substance has other veterinary uses as well,
including illicit doping of racehorses to improve performance (at certain dosages
opioids can both excite the animals and mask pain).
Drawbacks. Unwanted effects include uneasy feelings, ill temper, sleepiness,
dizziness, nausea, vomiting, blood pressure changes (up or down), and
impaired breathing. Reports of hallucinations and psychoses exist. People using
the drug can feel faint if they suddenly stand up. The drug can make
people woozy and cloud their thinking, impeding their ability to operate dangerous
machinery. Illicit users who inject butorphanol into muscles can cause
damage that is long-lasting, if not permanent.
Abuse factors. Tolerance and dependence can develop. Withdrawal symptoms
are characterized as minor. Addiction is possible but is not commonly
Butorphanol 73
reported in scientific literature. Two investigators say, however, that dependency
and addiction were the most frequent adverse reaction reports about
the drug received by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration in the early
1990s. Heroin users who received butorphanol in an experiment described
butorphanol as unpleasant. Former opioid addicts have said it reminded them
of pentazocine. At one time in the United States butorphanol was not a controlled
substance, but instances of addiction prompted government authorities
to change the drug’s status to Schedule IV in 1997.
Drug interactions. Some recreational users combine butorphanol with the
common cold and allergy remedy diphenhydramine to produce a typical
opiate-type stupor. Users of that combination sometimes report loss of interest
in other drugs. Unwanted results can include emotional flip-flops, dizziness,
nausea, vomiting, breathing difficulty, and general reduction of mental and
physical abilities. Withdrawal symptoms from the combination may involve
impaired concentration, mental restlessness and unease, and emotional instability
and peevishness.
In a mice experiment butorphanol and acetaminophen (Tylenol and similar
products) boosted each other’s pain relieving effects.
Cancer. Laboratory tests and two-year animal experiments have not indicated
that butorphanol causes cancer.
Pregnancy. Research using rats, mice, and rabbits has not yielded evidence
of birth defects caused by butorphanol, but some of the experiments produced
fetal death. The drug passes from a pregnant woman into the fetus and can
cause abnormal fetal heartbeat. When used in childbirth, impact on newborns
is similar to that of meperidine; respiratory distress can occur in the infant.
One study found the average drug level in newborns to match the maternal
level at time of birth. The amount of drug that passes into milk is believed
unharmful to nursing infants.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Fisher, M.A., and S. Glass. “Butorphanol (Stadol): A Study in Problems of Current
Drug Information and Control.” Neurology 48 (1997): 1156–60.
Gillis, J.C., P. Benfield, and K.L. Goa. “Transnasal Butorphanol: Review of Its Pharmacodynamic
and Pharmacokinetic Properties, and Therapeutic Potential in
Acute Pain Management.” Drugs 50 (1995): 157–75.
Rosow, C.E. “Butorphanol in Perspective.” Acute Care 12 (1988, Suppl. 1): 2–7.
Smith, S.G., and W.M. Davis. “Nonmedical Use of Butorphanol and Diphenhydramine.”
Journal of the American Medical Association 252 (1984): 1010.
Vogelsang, J., and S.R. Hayes. “Butorphanol Tartrate (Stadol): A Review.” Journal of
Post Anesthesia Nursing 6 (1991): 129–35.
Zacny, J.P., et al. “Comparing the Subjective, Psychomotor and Physiological Effects of
Intravenous Butorphanol and Morphine in Healthy Volunteers.” Journal of Pharmacology
and Experimental Therapeutics 270 (1994): 579–88.
Zacny, J.P., et al. “The Effects of Transnasal Butorphanol on Mood and Psychomotor
Functioning in Healthy Volunteers.” Anesthesia and Analgesia 82 (1996): 931–35.
Caffeine
Pronunciation: KAFF-een
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 58-08-2
Type: Stimulant. See page 11
Federal Schedule Listing: Unlisted
USA Availability: Prescription and nonprescription drug; also in food
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. This drug is responsible for the stimulating jolt that coffee drinkers
get. Many drinkers would probably be surprised to see caffeine listed as an
ingredient in medicines they take. Caffeine is so widely used (typically in
coffee, tea, soda, and chocolate) that it is scarcely considered a drug. Yet an
overdose can be fatal.
Caffeine makes people more alert, and experimentation finds that it can help
persons function more effectively during sleep deprivation. Caffeine is commonly
used in the workplace to increase employees’ energy and output. Laboratory
measurements indicate that a single dose of 250 mg to 400 mg at the
beginning of a night work shift is more effective than several smaller doses
spread out during the work period. Some studies find that caffeine helps extroverts
perform simple physical assignments but overstimulates introverts
and thereby worsens their performance. Scientific measurements prove that
caffeine, by itself or in combination with ephedrine, improves athletic performance.
Like some amphetamine class stimulants, caffeine has reduced hyperactivity
in children when they received 600 mg daily, but it has been found ineffective
for attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD).
Studies demonstrate caffeine can mildly help asthma sufferers. Theophylline,
a drug commonly used to widen airways and help asthmatics breathe,
is related to caffeine. Caffeine is a standard drug to help premature infants
that have interruptions in breathing.
Rat experiments indicate that caffeine can promote weight loss. In humans
a combination of caffeine and ephedrine has been used for that purpose. A
study found that caffeine increased women’s energy outlay and body temperature
but that the temperature change correlated with smaller weight and
waistlines only in younger women.
Caffeine has been suspected of promoting osteoporosis, a disease causing
Caffeine 75
loss of bone density in older women; studies controlling other factors (such
as cigarettes and drugs promoting calcium loss) found that caffeine had no
tendency to reduce bone density, but one study published in 2000 and tracking
almost 35,000 postmenopausal women found a slight correlation of caffeine
usage to broken bones—a correlation implying loss of density. Coffee drinking
is associated with loss of density. In contrast, examination of over 1,200 older
women in England showed that tea drinkers were less likely to have osteoporosis,
leading investigators to wonder if something in tea, other than caffeine,
affects bone density.
Investigators examining caffeine consumption in a group of 8,000 men who
were tracked for three decades discovered that the more caffeine someone
ingested over the years, the less likely the person was to come down with
Parkinson’s disease. In a group of 46,000 men tracked for a decade, increased
consumption of caffeinated coffee was linked to decreased likelihood of
having gallstones; consumption of decaffeinated coffee did not have such a
link. As one analyst pointed out, such associations are interesting but do not
prove cause and effect; for example, perhaps some physical aspect leading to
Parkinson’s disease also makes caffeine beverages unappealing—thus persons
without the disease would consume more caffeine beverages than sufferers
do, but that consumption would not mean that caffeine prevents the affliction.
Mice experiments demonstrate that if caffeine is administered in the right
amount and at the right time before exposure to radiation, the drug will allow
mice to survive otherwise lethal amounts of radiation.
Drawbacks. In the 1990s, 20% of the U.S. population was believed to be
using over 700 mg of caffeine each day. That is enough to produce behavior
mimicking an anxiety neurosis. If a person only ingests caffeine through pharmaceutical
preparations or food products with labels listing caffeine amounts,
intake can easily be measured. The amount in a restaurant cup of coffee is
more difficult to measure; one rule of thumb says 100 mg to 150 mg.
The substance can accelerate pulse rate; it can also make people more peevish
and jumpy (even promote panic attacks) and interfere with getting good
sleep. Caffeine can cause heartburn and increase urine output. Experimentation
has confirmed that the drug’s tendency to promote loss of body fluid will
dry the vocal cords and affect voice quality.
Analysis of over 30 years of reports about caffeine and blood pressure found
that the drug reliably increased blood pressure when persons began using it
but that the effect did not persist in all users. Investigators measuring blood
pressure among medical students found caffeine raising the readings far
enough that anyone at risk for high blood pressure should avoid the drug
during times of stress. Persons with coronary artery disease may be at significant
risk for sudden cardiac arrest if they drink more than 10 cups of coffee
a day.
Excessive doses can dangerously reduce blood potassium levels, damage
muscles, produce extremely rapid heartbeat, and cause delirium and seizures.
As the twenty-first century began a case report associated caffeine with retina
damage in several persons.
Abuse factors. Coffee was formerly treated as an illicit drug. Centuries ago
possession was a death penalty offense in Spain and the Near East. In the
76 Caffeine
early twentieth century one standard medical textbook warned of coffee addiction
peril, and another medical volume described coffee as a gateway to
opiate addiction. In a modern study volunteers showed no particular desire
for caffeine but did find that 300 mg mimicked some effects of dextroamphetamine.
Although caffeine is not a scheduled substance, users can develop
a physical dependence on the drug that results in withdrawal symptoms including
weariness and headache. Such symptoms are not inevitable nor are
they necessarily troubling to persons experiencing them. In 2000 an international
panel of experts convened by European drug regulation agencies described
caffeine’s potential for dependence as low. Tolerance can develop to
some of caffeine’s effects.
Drug interactions. Caffeine itself can reduce headache, and an experiment
involving hundreds of participants showed caffeine to substantially improve
ibuprofen’s ability to relieve headache. Phenylpropanolamine is a drug commonly
found in remedies for colds. It seems to increase caffeine levels in a
person using both drugs, and together the two can produce mood elevation,
hyperactivity and manic behavior, confusion, high blood pressure, and stroke.
In rat experiments, caffeine boosts the effects of cocaine and amphetamine,
enough to transform normally tolerable doses into fatal ones. Human observations
show that cocaine users tend to take lower doses of that drug if they
also use caffeine. Perhaps the most common drug taken with caffeine is nicotine.
Animal experiments find that interactions of that combination may
make cigarette smoking more pleasurable. Cigarette smoking increases the
body’s rate of metabolizing caffeine, which decreases the influence from a
given amount of caffeine; British researchers found that smokers tend to use
more caffeine than nonsmokers. Birth control pills can double the time that a
given amount of caffeine lasts in the body. The drug can reduce drowsiness
produced by pentobarbital, and it can reduce diazepam’s interference with
cognitive function. Caffeine is a traditional remedy for alcohol intoxication,
but in fact it does not speed alcohol’s elimination from the body, although
caffeine’s stimulant properties may help a drunken person function better.
Estrogen replacement therapy appears to interfere with women’s ability to
metabolize caffeine.
Cancer. Caffeine does not seem to produce cancer in animal experiments.
Indeed, green and black tea reduce development of cancer in mice, an effect
in which caffeine is believed to play a part. In humans, however, caffeine is
suspected of promoting premenopausal ovarian cancer and also cancer of the
pancreas and bladder.
Pregnancy. Experiments examining caffeine’s influence on pregnancy yield
conflicting results, which may indicate the question is particularly complex or
may simply mean that caffeine is an “invalid variable” having no effect. Here
are examples. A 1994 survey of 259 women in the Netherlands found that
caffeine raised the likelihood of becoming pregnant, but when the same subject
was examined in the 1980s among almost 2,000 women in Connecticut, caffeine
was found to suppress fertility. During the 1990s a study of farm couples
in Canada found that caffeine had no effect on fertility but that coffee-drinking
women and tea-drinking men had lower birthrates, suggesting involvement
of something besides caffeine in the natural products’ effect. Rat experimenCaffeine
77
tation shows that caffeine reduces female fertility, produces smaller than usual
offspring, and may affect brain development.
Research in Yugoslavia indicates that pregnant women who do not smoke
cigarettes but do take more than 71 mg of caffeine daily have smaller infants.
A British study found the opposite; slightly smaller infants came from
cigarette-smoking women who used 1,000 mg or more of caffeine a week, but
the effect was not seen in nonsmokers. Still other studies find no connection
between caffeine and either birthweight or prematurity.
Caffeine affects vital signs in a human fetus even when the dose is so low
as to have no influence on the pregnant woman.
Question has arisen about whether caffeine promotes spontaneous abortion;
a study published in 1994 found 140 mg to 280 mg a day to pose a significant
risk; a rigorous study published in 1999 was unable to find such a hazard
among moderate caffeine users; and a study published in 1993 saw caffeine
as reducing the incidence of spontaneous abortion. Still another study found
that women who drank decaffeinated coffee were even more likely to experience
a spontaneous abortion than women who drank caffeinated coffee. Research
in New Zealand indicated that sudden infant death syndrome (SIDS)
was more likely if a woman had ingested more than 400 mg of caffeine daily
during pregnancy, but an examination of SIDS in Scandinavia found no correlation
with caffeine use during or after pregnancy.
Instant coffee can damage DNA, but implications for general health or birth
defects are unclear. Testing caffeine on mice produced birth defects in limbs,
and tests on chicken embryos produced heart deformities. Chicken embryos,
however, are so sensitive to various chemicals that such results are not considered
a warning of human danger. Indeed, a substantial body of research
indicates that caffeine causes no human birth defects.
Evidence does exist that caffeine can increase the likelihood of birth defects
caused by alcohol and tobacco. An Egyptian study found that caffeine increases
alcohol birth defects in rats.
A statistical study showed that women who use more than 300 mg of caffeine
daily around the time of conception and who do not smoke are less
likely to have infants with Down syndrome.
Given all the uncertainties, pregnant women are advised to use caffeine
“moderately”—no more than 200 mg to 300 mg daily (150 mg or less is considered
“minimal”).
Caffeine increases milk production in nursing mothers and passes into the
milk but appears unharmful to infants if the women are moderate users. On
occasions when mothers use a lot of caffeine, however, their nursing infants
may be fussier and have more trouble sleeping. A dose lasts longer in infants
than in older persons.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Anderson, M.E., et al. “Improved 2000-Meter Rowing Performance in Competitive
Oarswomen after Caffeine Ingestion.” International Journal of Sport Nutrition and
Exercise Metabolism 10 (2000): 464–75.
Eskenazi, B. “Caffeine—Filtering the Facts.” New England Journal of Medicine 341 (1999):
1688–89.
78 Caffeine
Golding, J. “Reproduction and Caffeine Consumption—A Literature Review.” Early
Human Development 43 (1995): 1–14.
Marsden, G., and J. Leach. “Effects of Alcohol and Caffeine on Maritime Navigational
Skills.” Ergonomics 43 (2000): 17–26.
Nurminen, M.-L., et al. “Coffee, Caffeine and Blood Pressure: A Critical Review.” European
Journal of Clinical Nutrition 53 (1999): 831–39.
Reyner, L.A., and J.A. Horne. “Early Morning Driver Sleepiness: Effectiveness of 200
Mg Caffeine.” Psychophysiology 37 (2000): 251–56.
Smit, H.J., and P.J. Rogers. “Effects of Low Doses of Caffeine on Cognitive Performance,
Mood and Thirst in Low and Higher Caffeine Consumers.” Psychopharmacology
(Berlin) 152 (2000): 167–73.
Tanda, G., and S.R. Goldberg. “Alteration of the Behavioral Effects of Nicotine by
Chronic Caffeine Exposure.” Pharmacology, Biochemistry, and Behavior 66 (2000):
47–64.
Chloral Hydrate
Pronunciation: KLOHR-ul HIGH-drait
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 302-17-0
Formal Names: Aquachloral, Chloradorm, Chloralex, Felsules, Noctec, Somnos
Informal Names: Jelly Beans, Knockout Drops, Mickey Finn, Mickeys
Type: Depressant. See page 19.
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule IV (DEA no. 2465)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. This substance is the first synthetic central nervous system depressant,
created in the 1830s. After that creation, however, several decades passed before
chloral hydrate’s medical usage as a sleep inducer began. The anesthetic
chloroform is produced from it. Chloral hydrate has also been used against
pain of rheumatism. In the nineteenth century the drug was popular among
middle-class women and middle-aged men for reducing anxiety.
In former times chloral hydrate was routinely administered to produce anesthesia,
but such use is tricky; the difference between an effective dose and
a poisonous one is so close that the drug has been replaced by other substances
for human anesthesia, although chloral hydrate is still used for that purpose
in animals. The substance has been largely superseded by barbiturates but still
has medical applications as a sedative and to induce sleep. Chloral hydrate is
also used to treat seizures caused by fever and is a secondary choice for controlling
the seizures of status epilepticus (an emergency in which persons keep
having epileptic seizures, one after another, with little or no letup). Medical
caregivers sometimes administer chloral hydrate to help withdrawal from heroin
and GHB dependence and to help alcohol addicts withstand delirium
tremens during withdrawal. The famed “Mickey Finn” drug used by criminals
to knock out victims was a combination of chloral hydrate and alcohol, but
animal and human experiments have failed to demonstrate that the combination
worked as advertised.
Drawbacks. Chloral hydrate users may act drunken and confused. An experiment
found reduction in abilities needed to drive an automobile. The same
research, however, also showed that if the product was taken to induce sleep
the night before, persons performed better the next day after the drug had
worn off, presumably because they were better rested than usual. At normal
80 Chloral Hydrate
doses gastrointestinal distress may occur, and persons suffering from stomach
irritation are supposed to avoid the compound. A case report notes a deliberate
overdose that destroyed part of a patient’s stomach. Heart attack has
occurred from chloral hydrate overdose, but that is unusual. In high quantities
the compound interferes with heart rhythm and reduces blood pressure and
breathing; seizures are possible. Experiments using chloral hydrate on rats and
mice have injured the liver, and inhaling the drug’s vapor has caused lung
damage in mice. Human physical contact with the compound can irritate the
skin, lungs, and eyes. The substance is suspected of causing kidney damage
and colon cysts and of aggravating a disease called porphyria. Reduction may
occur in the number of white blood cells. Although the substance is a depressant,
some persons are stimulated by the drug.
Abuse factors. In the 1800s a number of prominent persons became addicted
to chloral hydrate: English poet and painter Dante Gabriel Rossetti, German
literary figure Karl Ferdinand Gutzkow, and renowned German philosopher
Friedrich Wilhelm Nietzsche. Such addiction grew uncommon in the twentieth
century as the drug itself grew less common. As is so often the case with drug
abuse, chloral hydrate addicts were typically polydrug abusers, often using
alcohol, opium, or morphine as well. Today chloral hydrate does not seem to
be a popular recreational intoxicant, quite possibly because the kind of person
who would enjoy chloral hydrate may instead be attracted to barbiturates, a
type of drug that was unavailable in the nineteenth century.
No dependence developed after experimenters gave chloral hydrate to monkeys
twice a day for six weeks, but tolerance and dependence can develop in
humans. The most common origin of dependence is medical usage. Chloral
hydrate withdrawal symptoms include tremors, worry, sleeping difficulty,
confusion, delirium, hallucinations, and convulsions. Some authorities describe
the syndrome as delirium tremens. Withdrawal may have a fatal outcome.
Drug interactions. Actions of anti–blood clotting medicines may be temporarily
boosted by chloral hydrate, but the amount of change and its medical
significance are disputed. The drug may reduce blood levels of the epilepsy
medicine phenytoin, thereby impeding phenytoin’s therapeutic actions. In
mice experimentation chloral hydrate had inconsistent impact on alcohol
blood level (sometimes raising it, sometimes reducing it) but extended the
time that intoxication lasted. In humans the combination produces changes in
heart rate and blood pressure that might harm cardiac patients (the face and
neck of one volunteer turned reddish purple from the combination). Alcohol
and chloral hydrate are both depressants, and taking them together is like
taking an extra dose of one or the other. Injecting marijuana’s main active
ingredient THC (tetrahydrocannabinol) into animals increases chloral hydrate’s
potency.
Cancer. Lab tests of chloral hydrate’s potential for causing cancer have produced
mixed results. The compound has increased the liver cancer rate in
mice, but skepticism exists about human relevance of those mice results because
dosage was long term and so high as to be poisonous—circumstances
not at all similar to an occasional normal therapeutic dose. Experimenters
administered the substance to hundreds of rats every day for over two years
Chloral Hydrate 81
without evidence developing that the drug causes cancer. The cancer-causing
potential in humans is uncertain.
Pregnancy. Chloral hydrate passes from a pregnant woman into the fetus
but is not considered a cause of birth defects. Infants born to such women are,
however, more likely to have a condition called hyperbilirubinemia, which
can lead to jaundice. Some investigators also believe that administering the
drug to infants after birth causes hyperbilirubinemia. The compound passes
into the milk of a nursing mother, enough to slightly sedate the infant.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Butler, T.C. “The Introduction of Chloral Hydrate into Medical Practice.” Bulletin of the
History of Medicine 44 (1970): 168–72.
Miller, R.R., and D.J. Greenblatt. “Clinical Effects of Chloral Hydrate in Hospitalized
Medical Patients.” Journal of Clinical Pharmacology 19 (1979): 669–74.
Robinson, J.T. “A Case of Chloral Hydrate Addiction.” International Journal of Social
Psychiatry 12 (1966): 66–71.
Sellers, E.M., et al. “Interaction of Chloral Hydrate and Ethanol in Man. II. Hemodynamics
and Performance.” Clinical Pharmacology and Therapeutics 13 (1972): 50–58.
Sourkes, T.L. “Early Clinical Neurochemistry of CNS-Active Drugs. Chloral Hydrate.”
Molecular and Chemical Neuropathology 17 (1992): 21–30.
Steinberg, A.D. “Should Chloral Hydrate Be Banned?” Pediatrics 92 (1993): 442–46.
Chlordiazepoxide
Pronunciation: klor-dye-az-uh-POX-ide
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 58-25-3. (Hydrochloride form 438-
41-5)
Formal Names: Libritabs, Librium, Limbitrol
Informal Names: Libs
Type: Depressant (benzodiazepine class). See page 21
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule IV (DEA no. 2744)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: D
Uses. Chlordiazepoxide was the first benzodiazepine tranquilizer and has
been commonly used since 1960. It is considered one of the safer psychiatric
drugs and has actions comparable to those of barbiturates and alcohol.
This classic benzodiazepine is used mainly for calming anxiety and for treating
symptoms of alcohol withdrawal, including delirium tremens. Studies
have found, however, that alcoholics receiving this drug to help them through
withdrawal are about three times more likely to resume drinking than alcoholics
who receive a placebo. The substance is also used to overcome convulsions
and to treat insomnia, migraine headache, gastric ulcers, and irritable
bowel syndrome (persistent cramps and diarrhea). Actions from a dose of this
drug take longer to appear than actions from a dose of lorazepam or diazepam,
so those latter substances are sometimes preferred when faster results
are needed.
Researchers have used rats and mice to demonstrate partial cross-tolerance
between pentobarbital, alcohol, and chlordiazepoxide, and that relationship
may contribute to the latter’s therapeutic role in treating alcohol withdrawal.
An argument has been made that when clinical signs of alcohol withdrawal
can be treated as well with chlordiazepoxide as with lorazepam, the former
is preferable because of cheaper cost. Chlordiazepoxide can be substituted for
alprazolam to wean someone from that drug, although one study found chlordiazepoxide
to be about 86 times weaker than alprazolam (consistent with
animal experiments, where large doses of chlordiazepoxide are needed to produce
dependence). Chlordiazepoxide can be used in place of most benzodiazepines
if someone who stops taking one of those drugs is troubled by
Chlordiazepoxide 83
withdrawal. An experiment found chlordiazepoxide to be as effective as methadone
in easing opiate withdrawal symptoms experienced by heroin addicts.
Drawbacks. Chlordiazepoxide is one of the longer-lasting benzodiazepines,
which can have advantages—but it can also have disadvantages; for example,
the drug is associated with higher chance of hip fractures in older persons,
perhaps because it makes them unsteady longer and more likely to fall.
Blood disorders can be an unusual unwanted effect, and a case is reported
in which long-term use produced purpura, tiny purple spots in the skin
caused by bleeding under the skin surface. Although the drug is used to relieve
anxiety, studies conflict on whether it increases users’ hostility. The drug
reduces aggression in animal experiments, and human aggression is certainly
not a typical result of a dose; perhaps lowered anxiety among resentful persons
also lowers inhibitions, allowing those angry individuals to engage in
aggression they had been afraid to attempt. That outcome is more likely when
a person using chlordiazepoxide has also been drinking alcohol, and alcohol
definitely can lower inhibitions. Chlordiazepoxide can make people weary,
degrade verbal communication ability, and raise or lower interest in sex.
Among alcoholics, measurements find that chlordiazepoxide reduces rapid
eye movement (REM) sleep and delta (deep) sleep; those types are considered
important for maintaining normal mental functioning. A case report indicates
that the substance may worsen symptoms of Parkinson’s disease, possibly due
to untoward reaction with the Parkinson’s drug levodopa. Another case report
notes a diabetic whose blood sugar levels rose substantially while taking chlordiazepoxide.
An instance is known of continual hiccups starting soon after a
person started taking the drug and stopping soon after the drug dosage
stopped. Still another case report associated the drug with gout.
Persons who receive chlordiazepoxide by injection should avoid hazardous
activity (such as driving a car) for several hours; a test of the oral format
showed that it lowered driving ability as well. Drivers can be unaware that
chlordiazepoxide is affecting them. A study of bronchitis patients found that
the drug worsened their breathing, and in general the compound impairs
respiration. Chlordiazepoxide is also suspected of worsening porphyria, a disease
involving body chemistry and that makes a person extremely sensitive
to light. Porphyria caused the madness of George III, king of Great Britain
during the American Revolution.
Abuse factors. Sudden stoppage of chlordiazepoxide dosage can produce
symptoms similar to those of alcohol or barbiturate withdrawal: tremors and
cramps, vomiting, perspiring, and even convulsions.
Drug interactions. When delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol (also called THC, the
main psychoactive chemical in marijuana) was given to pregnant mice in an
experiment, administering chlordiazepoxide along with THC raised the blood
level of THC. Another mice experiment showed an increase in THC’s cataleptic
effect when chlordiazepoxide was administered. In mice chlordiazepoxide
can increase potency of the anticancer drug ifosfamide, and in both mice and
humans alcohol can boost chlordiazepoxide’s potency (though a rat experiment
did not find that effect). In humans monoamine oxidase inhibitors
(MAOIs) boost chlordiazepoxide actions, and the antacid-heartburn medicine
cimetidine lengthens the effect of a chlordiazepoxide dose. Cigarette smoking
84 Chlordiazepoxide
reduces chlordiazepoxide actions, and morphine and meperidine each make
oral dosage of chlordiazepoxide less effective. The drug is suspected of affecting
blood clotting and is known to constrain the healing abilities of the
anticoagulant medicine warfarin.
Cancer. Chlordiazepoxide has produced DNA damage in experiments designed
to reveal potential for such defects. Under certain laboratory conditions
the drug can promote DNA damage in rats, which theoretically might encourage
development of cancer, but that outcome has not been observed in
practice.
Pregnancy. “Nitrosatable” drugs, of which chlordiazepoxide is one, cause
birth defects in animal experiments. Some studies suggest that using chlordiazepoxide
during pregnancy may cause human birth defects, but confirmation
is elusive. For example, a study of 50,000 pregnancies published in
1975, including many women who used chlordiazepoxide, found no difference
in outcome regardless of whether women used the drug. In contrast, a study
of almost 20,000 pregnancies (published in 1974) compared women who took
chlordiazepoxide to those who took assorted other antianxiety drugs or none
at all in early pregnancy. In the chlordiazepoxide group birth defects were
more than two times as frequent compared to the “other drugs” group and
over four times as frequent compared to the “no drug” group. Some researchers
believe chlordiazepoxide may cause infant skull deformities if a pregnant
woman uses the drug.
Combination products. Limbitrol is a combination product using chlordiazepoxide
to reduce anxiety and amitriptyline as a tricyclic antidepressant.
Taking a tricyclic antidepressant along with an MAOI can be fatal. Tricyclics
are not recommended for persons with glaucoma or urinary difficulties. An
experiment with hamsters showed that the drug combination is more likely
to produce birth defects than either drug alone. Amitriptyline is Pregnancy
Category C and passes into a nursing mother’s milk supply.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Giri, A.K. and S. Banerjee. “Genetic Toxicology of Four Commonly Used Benzodiazepines:
A Review.” Mutation Research 340 (1996): 93–108.
Harmatz, J.S., et al. “Differential Effects of Chlordiazepoxide and Oxazepam on Hostility
in a Small Group Setting.” American Journal of Psychiatry 132 (1975):
861–63.
Palva, E.S., and M. Linnoila. “Effect of Active Metabolites of Chlordiazepoxide and
Diazepam, Alone or in Combination with Alcohol, on Psychomotor Skills Related
to Driving.” European Journal of Clinical Pharmacology 13 (1978): 345–50.
Salzman, C., et al. “Chlordiazepoxide-Induced Hostility in a Small Group Setting.”
Archives of General Psychiatry 31 (1974): 401–5.
Sternbach, L.H. “The Discovery of Librium.” Agents and Actions 43, nos. 3–4 (1994): 82–
85.
Clonazepam
Pronunciation: kloh-NA-zuh-pam
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 1622-61-3
Formal Names: Iktorivil, Klonopin, Lansden, Rivotril
Type: Depressant (benzodiazepine class). See page 21
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule IV (DEA no. 2737)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: D
Uses. Clonazepam is considered one of the more powerful benzodiazepine
class drugs. Primary medical uses are against some kinds of convulsions, particularly
in certain kinds of epilepsy, and against panic attacks. For persons
suffering from panic attacks, measurements indicate the drug improves both
quality of life and work productivity. The drug is also used as an antidepressant
and to treat anxiety, catatonia, obsessive-compulsive disorder, the manic
phase of manic-depressive behavior, and social phobia in general. A two-year
follow-up study of persons receiving brief clonazepam treatment for social
phobia found their improvement to be sustained after dosage stopped, and at
the two-year mark they were doing better than a control group that had received
a placebo. Clonazepam is sometimes preferred over alprazolam in
treating anxiety because that condition seems less likely to reappear between
doses of clonazepam than between doses of alprazolam. Clonazepam can be
substituted for alprazolam in order to withdraw persons who have dependence
with the latter drug. Clonazepam has been used to fight tics and also
to treat muscle control diseases such as akathisia and tardive dyskinesia.
Among children with attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) who
also have tics, a study found clonazepam could help suppress tics without
harming the psychiatric effect of ADHD medicine. Although clonazepam is
not a multiple sclerosis medicine, it is administered to relieve the affliction’s
symptoms. Clonazepam has helped reduce fainting spells. It is prescribed to
relieve insomnia and to reduce a disorder in which sleeping persons thrash
about. The substance has promoted cure of sleepwalking, including a documented
extreme case in which a sleeping person would drive a car and engage
in violence involving knives. The drug can relieve pain caused by jaw trouble
and has been given to cancer patients to reduce vomiting from chemotherapy.
Clonazepam and the antimania medicine lithium have been experimentally
86 Clonazepam
administered together as a successful treatment for cluster headaches. Clonazepam
has eased burning mouth syndrome, a self-descriptive sensation that
can persist for years. The drug has been used experimentally with limited
success to treat ringing in the ears.
Drawbacks. Clonazepam is not recommended for persons suffering from
narrow-angle glaucoma. The compound may worsen respiratory disease. The
substance increases saliva production. It often makes people tired, interferes
with muscular coordination, and can impede decision making; such effects
hinder ability to operate dangerous machinery. Dozens of less common adverse
effects are described, ranging from skin rash to painful gums. One case
report concludes that clonazepam may promote porphyria, a body chemistry
disorder that can make a person violent and supersensitive to light, but such
a result is virtually unheard of. A review of medical records of men being
treated for posttraumatic stress disorder suggested that the drug may commonly
inhibit sexual performance in such a population. Some persons suffer
from a disquieting affliction called apnea in which they temporarily stop
breathing; case reports say clonazepam can cause apnea attacks. An experiment
noted a rebound effect when people stop taking the drug for insomnia,
meaning the condition is not cured but instead returns worse than ever, at
least for awhile.
Contrary to normal expectations, the drug has occasionally been reported
to bring on mania and even aggression. One case report noted that if panic
attacks act as a warning against certain behavior, clonazepam’s ability to reduce
or eliminate panic attacks can also remove a person’s inhibitions against
the behavior. A small study suggests that clonazepam may reduce inhibitions
in children, and case reports exist about the same effect in children, teenagers,
and adults. Researchers curious about whether clonazepam especially reduces
inhibitions examined medical records of 323 persons institutionalized for psychiatric
disturbance, a population in which such a clonazepam effect might be
particularly evident; although the study was not designed to demonstrate
cause and effect, the records were consistent with a low risk of reduced inhibition
from clonazepam and other benzodiazepine class drugs.
Abuse factors. Clonazepam has a withdrawal syndrome similar to alcohol’s:
cramps and tremors, convulsions, hallucinations, and general mental distress.
The syndrome can be avoided if a person reduces dosage gradually. Suddenly
halting the drug after taking it for an extended period of time can cause epileptic
seizures.
Drug interactions. Clonazepam’s actions can be boosted by alcohol, barbiturates,
opiates, tricyclic antidepressants, and monoamine oxidase inhibitors
(MAOIs). A case report suggests that effects may also be boosted by the heart
medicine amiodarone. Another case report indicates that clonazepam reduces
blood levels of the epilepsy medicine phenytoin. Taking clonazepam with the
antidepressant paroxetine is suspected of causing a dangerous reaction called
serotonin syndrome, a serious condition which can involve confusion, tremors,
and high body temperature. Combining clonazepam with the antimania medicine
lithium is suspected of causing muscular discoordination, including
muscles used for speech. A case report noted delirium brought on by simultaneously
taking clonazepam and the schizophrenia medicine clozapine.
Clonazepam 87
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. No increase in birth defects was noted when pregnant rats and
mice received many times the recommended human dose while embryos were
in the organ-forming stage. Pregnant rabbits receiving clonazepam during the
same stage, however, have produced offspring with birth defects such as limb
malformations and cleft palate. Because other drugs in the benzodiazepine
class are assumed to have potential for causing human birth defects, clonazepam
is considered inadvisable for pregnant women unless they and their
physicians have considered the issue. Among 51 infants whose mothers took
clonazepam during pregnancy, almost 10% had “major malformations”; although
that small sample did not compare outcomes in matched women who
took no such drug, the study’s finding nonetheless raises a caution. A much
larger study said that clonazepam taken in combination with other epilepsy
drugs increased the chance of birth defects but said nothing about using clonazepam
alone. Clonazepam may disturb fetal heartbeat. Offspring with fetal
exposure may be sedated, show poor muscle tone, and have low body temperature.
Infants can be born with dependence to the drug. Clonazepam
passes into human milk at levels high enough to affect infants, and breastfeeding
mothers are counseled to avoid clonazepam.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Cohen, L.S., and J.F. Rosenbaum. “Clonazepam: New Uses and Potential Problems.”
Journal of Clinical Psychiatry 48 (1987, Suppl.): 50–56.
Commander, M., S.H. Green, and M. Prendergast. “Behavioural Disturbances in Children
Treated with Clonazepam.” Developmental Medicine and Child Neurology 33
(1991): 362–63.
Davidson, J.R., and G. Moroz. “Pivotal Studies of Clonazepam in Panic Disorder.”
Psychopharmacology Bulletin 34 (1998): 169–74.
Davidson, J.R., et al. “Treatment of Social Phobia with Clonazepam and Placebo.” Journal
of Clinical Psychopharmacology 13 (1993): 423–28.
Morishita, S., S. Aoki, and S. Watanabe. “Clonazepam as a Therapeutic Adjunct to
Improve the Management of Psychiatric Disorders.” Psychiatry and Clinical Neurosciences
52 (1998): 75–78.
Rosenbaum, J.F., G. Moroz, and C.L. Bowden. “Clonazepam in the Treatment of Panic
Disorder with or without Agoraphobia: A Dose-Response Study of Efficacy,
Safety, and Discontinuance.” Journal of Clinical Psychopharmacology 17 (1997):
390–400.
Worthington, J.J., III, et al. “Long-term Experience with Clonazepam in Patients with
a Primary Diagnosis of Panic Disorder.” Psychopharmacology Bulletin 34 (1998):
199–205.
Clorazepate
Pronunciation: klor-AZ-uh-pait
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 23887-31-2. (Dipotassium form
57109-90-7)
Formal Names: Tranxene
Type: Depressant (benzodiazepine class). See page 21
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule IV (DEA no. 2768)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: D
Uses. Clorazepate dipotassium is a “prodrug” related to diazepam. A prodrug
is a substance that may have little effect itself but that the body metabolizes
into another chemical that does have a drug effect. For example, one
metabolite of clorazepate dipotassium is desmethyldiazepam, which in turn
transforms into oxazepam. Prodrugs are prescribed when direct administration
of the desired chemical does not work, such as when the chemical would
degrade before it has time to build up in the part of the body where it is
needed or when the normal dosage form cannot be given (perhaps a substance
that can be absorbed through the skin is needed rather than giving an injection).
Although metabolites of clorazepate dipotassium generally create the
medical actions, for simplicity this discussion usually refers only to the prodrug
clorazepate dipotassium and calls it a drug.
This long-acting drug’s primary medical uses are for anxiety, for convulsions,
and as a muscle relaxant. The substance can be taken on a long-term
basis for successful control of epilepsy but is described as a “second-line”
medication, meaning it is not used unless other drugs have been tried without
success. Clorazepate dipotassium’s long-term effectiveness against anxiety is
unclear. A common short-term use is to reduce nervousness in surgery patients
shortly before an operation. The drug is also given to ease withdrawal
from zolpidem and alcohol (including delirium tremens). An injection can
quickly calm a bellicose individual.
Weight, age, and gender can affect dosage. A study found that an active
metabolite (desmethyldiazepam) from a dose of clorazepate dipotassium lasts
almost three times as long in overweight persons compared to normal weight
persons, apparently due to accumulation in body fat. Another study noted
Clorazepate 89
that the older a male was, the longer the same metabolite from a dose lasted,
but that effect was not seen in women.
Although clorazepate dipotassium is used against anxiety, the drug is generally
considered unsuitable for depressed or psychotic persons. It has nonetheless
been given with success for treating depression (even though
sometimes the drug can instead worsen that condition). The drug has helped
reduce nightmares caused by other pharmaceuticals and has helped alleviate
psychosomatic complaints. It has also been used against tetanus.
Drawbacks. People with severe breathing trouble or acute narrow-angle
glaucoma should avoid clorazepate dipotassium. Loosening of the nails has
been attributed to the drug in a case report, but that is unusual. Somewhat
less surprising is a case report of jaundice, less surprising because many drugs
add a burden to the liver. Oral overdose can provoke rage.
The drug routinely makes people sleepy, and users are cautioned against
operating dangerous machinery. In experiments the drug increases reaction
time and decreases attention. Nonetheless, a laboratory simulation of driving
showed no effect on operating a motor vehicle. One authority contends that
the substance should not impair driving performance but acknowledges that
trouble arises if a driver does not use the drug as medically directed or uses
alcohol simultaneously. Other unwanted effects occur less often: peevishness,
headache, stomach irritation, dry mouth, rashes, double vision, and unclear
speech. Therapeutic advantage sometimes comes from the drowsiness factor,
with patients instructed to take the drug at bedtime to help reduce insomnia,
a technique that then also allows them to obtain the long-lasting antianxiety
effect during daytime hours the next day. In one study people reported more
restful sleep, and measurements after they awoke showed little drug impact
on performance tests (illustrating the difference a few hours can make on how
well someone performs after taking a substance).
Abuse factors. If usage continues for a long time and suddenly stops, a
withdrawal syndrome can occur. Withdrawal symptoms can include trouble
with sleeping and memory, jitteriness and crankiness, sore muscles, and loose
bowels. Those discomforts are similar to what happens in alcohol or barbiturate
withdrawal. Researchers suspect the problem may be worsened if a
person has taken some other benzodiazepine class drug off and on. The withdrawal
problem may be avoided by gradual discontinuation of clorazepate
dipotassium. Experiments with dogs and rabbits also show withdrawal symptoms.
A canine test demonstrated that abrupt clorazepate dipotassium withdrawal
can cause fatal seizures. The kinds of well-documented dependence
mentioned above involve relatively brief withdrawal. Reportedly human withdrawal
symptoms may continue for months, which is an unusual persistence
of dependence. Long-term signs of withdrawal, however, are described as
reappearance of anxiety, sometimes accompanied by psychosis and convulsions.
Such long-term “withdrawal symptoms” sound much like conditions
for which the drug is prescribed, raising a question of whether the victim is
experiencing long-term dependence or simply reemergence of conditions formerly
controlled by the now-absent drug.
A group of recreational drug abusers was tested to determine their likings,
90 Clorazepate
and the group declared clorazepate dipotassium to be less attractive than diazepam
or lorazepam.
Drug interactions. Members in a group of recreational drug abusers reported
that alcohol boosted clorazepate dipotassium’s effect and that the combination
made their mood bleaker, but when subjects in another study took
that combination they felt happier than alcohol normally made them. Another
experiment found that the combination impaired memory, although still another
study found that clorazepate alone did not affect memory. In testing
how long the desmethyldiazepam metabolite lasts from a clorazepate dipotassium
dose, conflicting results have come from experiments comparing cigarette
smokers to nonsmokers. Opiates, barbiturates, and monoamine oxidase
inhibitors (MAOIs) found in some antidepressants may boost actions of clorazepate
dipotassium. Clorazepate dipotassium may boost alcohol’s effects.
Cancer. Animal studies have failed to find evidence of any cancer-causing
potential in clorazepate dipotassium.
Pregnancy. Experiments with pregnant rats and rabbits revealed no impairment
of fertility and failed to produce any birth defects attributable to
clorazepate dipotassium. One rat study also found no behavioral consequences
from prenatal exposure to the drug, but another rat study discovered
that offspring walked more slowly than normal and also had some learning
difficulty. The drug’s potential for creating human birth defects is unknown.
A case report associates it with fatal lung collapse in a newborn whose mother
had used the drug during pregnancy, and another case report associates the
drug with fatal birth defects. “Association” may mean caution is appropriate,
but it does not demonstrate cause and effect. Breast-feeding mothers are
warned to avoid the drug because its metabolite nordiazepam (which is also
a metabolite of diazepam) passes into the milk and into the infant. The metabolite
desmethyldiazepam also passes into milk, as does clorazepate dipotassium
itself.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Fabre, L.F., and H.P. Putman III. “Depressive Symptoms and Intellectual Functioning
in Anxiety Patients Treated with Clorazepate.” Journal of Clinical Psychiatry 49
(1988): 189–92.
Fujii, T., et al. “Clorazepate Therapy for Intractable Epilepsy.” Brain and Development
9 (1987): 288–91.
Henderson, J.G. “Value of a Single Night-time Dose of Potassium Clorazepate in Anxiety:
A Controlled Trial Comparison with Diazepam.” Scottish Medical Journal 27
(1982): 292–96.
Moodley, P., S. Golombok, and M. Lader. “Effects of Clorazepate Dipotassium and
Placebo on Psychomotor Skills.” Perceptual and Motor Skills 61 (1985): 1121–22.
Zung, W.W. “Effect of Clorazepate on Depressed Mood in Anxious Patients.” Journal
of Clinical Psychiatry 48 (1987): 13–14.
Coca
See also Cocaine
Pronunciation: KOH-kuh
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: None
Formal Names: Erythroxylum coca
Informal Names: Cocaine Plant, Cocaine Tree, Cuca
Type: Stimulant (cocaine class). See page 17
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule II (DEA no. 9040)
USA Availability: Prescription (due to Schedule II status, but not a standard medical
drug)
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. The coca bush is native to the Andes, where it has been harvested
since ancient Inca days. Use in that era has been confirmed through analysis
of hair from ancient corpses and from examination of artwork. At first only
upper-class Incas and select individuals were permitted to use coca, but usage
spread to Inca society as a whole after the Spanish conquest. In modern times
the plant has been cultivated in India and Sri Lanka as well as Formosa,
Indonesia, and Malaysia. During the 1960s Malaysia was the world’s primary
source of coca. Its leaves are the natural product from which cocaine is refined,
and blood measurements confirm that coca users receive cocaine from the
leaves. Cocaine content is commonly 0.6% to 1.5% of the leaves by weight.
Cocaine is not the only drug component of coca, but relatively little exploration
has been made of other components. Some investigators suspect that these
other drugs are more important than cocaine in producing coca’s effects.
Traditionally coca has enjoyed wide use and social acceptance in the Andes,
although leaf chewing (as opposed to taking coca in tea) is associated with
lower social classes. Persons from middle and higher social classes who do
not engage in physical labor may use coca recreationally. Short-term mental
effects of coca leaves have been likened to those of coffee. Usage is much more
common among persons living at high altitudes than at sea level. Coca can
be a social lubricant, much in the way that khat is traditionally utilized. As
with wine, coca leaves produced in different regions under different conditions
can have flavor characteristics making some varieties more sought after
than others even if the drug content is virtually identical. Veins are stripped
from the leaves, which typically are then chewed or sucked upon in a small
92 Coca
quantity for hours, much like chewing gum. Coca is a local anesthetic and
numbs the mouth when a person chews coca leaves. Lime (the mineral, not
the fruit) may be added to improve the body’s absorption of cocaine from the
leaves. Habitual leaf chewers routinely receive a daily cocaine dose of 0.25
grams spread over several hours. Coca tea or the leaves themselves are used
to aid digestion, reduce gastrointestinal colic, fight asthma, soothe vocal cords
(laryngitis), relieve stress and elevate mood, alleviate cold and thirst, produce
sweat, and fight motion sickness. Milk with coca has been used against colic
and diarrhea in babies. Coca cigarettes have been used to treat both asthma
and colds. Proposals have been made to produce coca lozenges and chewing
gum to make the natural product available in formats more familiar to persons
coming from a European heritage.
Habitual coca chewing interferes with the body’s insulin and thereby tends
to raise blood sugar levels. That finding should interest diabetic chewers but
is also relevant to persons using leaves at high altitudes (common in the Andes)
because the reduced oxygen supply at upper elevations tends to lower
blood sugar. Habitual coca use apparently compensates for that effect. Blood
sugar tends to decline during exercise; coca can prevent that decline, and
scientists suspect that coca can increase the body’s effective use of blood sugar
during exercise.
Coca leaves improve a person’s access to stored energy sources in the human
body and thereby increase capacity for physical labor. During the nineteenth
century such qualities attracted notice in Europe, but suggestions that
coca be used in industrial and military labor were apparently ignored. In the
1970s a sample of Argentine miners showed that 65% chewed coca leaves
every day, and another 14% used leaves less often. The more physical power
and endurance required for a particular job, the more likely that a miner used
coca leaves each day. One study of coca found the typical stimulant actions
of raising pulse rate and blood pressure but also found that coca had a more
unusual effect of decreasing the volume of blood plasma—a condition normally
associated with bleeding or with not drinking enough fluids. This condition
interferes with proper blood circulation during physical exercise, but
centuries of experience suggest that coca-chewing laborers get along well
enough nonetheless. The study just referred to involved habitual chewers of
coca; occasional chewers may not experience the same results. For example,
in another study scientists concluded that regular chewers had more access to
energy stored in body fat but that occasional chewers did not and also concluded
that occasional chewers would not show the same improved endurance
during physical exercise that is demonstrated by habitual chewers. One investigator
has concluded that coca improves endurance but does not otherwise
help physical labor (a person cannot lift more or run faster).
Like many stimulants, coca reduces feelings of hunger and can thereby reduce
food intake. The appetite suppressant effect is slight, however, simply
helping a person to get by more comfortably when food is scarce. Coca chewers
exhibit robust appetites when victuals are plentiful, and coca preparations
can even be an element of meal-taking. Some research suggests that under
low atmospheric pressure coca can improve the body’s metabolism of carbohydrates
and thereby improve nutrition of users. Coca itself is a good source
Coca 93
of vitamins, iron, and phosphorus; and lime used with coca can provide almost
a gram of calcium per day—important supplements where diet is often
deficient in such factors. Malnourishment exhibited by rural coca chewers
seems related more to poor food supply than to use of coca. Rat experiments,
however, indicate that coca slows growth rate if used in mountainous altitudes.
Drawbacks. Although individuals have to work hard to abuse coca enough
to create problems, persons who succeed at that task can experience the kinds
of hallucinations and other mental afflictions associated with stimulant abuse.
That outcome is very unusual among persons who use coca in traditional
ways. Contrary to what one would expect from a stimulant, scientific tests
show that coca (like khat) retards reaction time and increases errors in work
performance. Long-term mental effects of habitual coca usage decrease thinking
abilities in ways that are seldom noticeable in rural village life but that
are clearly documented through scientific tests. Such decline would put persons
at a disadvantage in coping with modern urban conditions, on or off the
job. The decline is presumed to be evidence of organic brain damage.
Coca depresses the immune system, presumably making users more susceptible
to disease. Coca chewing is suspected of promoting spread of cholera,
not from coca itself but from lime or other alkali substances chewed with the
leaves, having the result of lowering the stomach’s acid content and thereby
providing an excellent environment for growth of microscopic cholera organisms.
Coca is suspected of causing liver damage. Archeologists examining ancient
human remains have concluded that coca chewing may cause tooth
decay and loss. In contrast, modern-day chewers claim that the habit promotes
dental health and makes users less susceptible to disease in general. Coca’s
effects on general physical health remain uncertain. Differing backgrounds of
users and abstainers hinder efforts to measure effects; factors other than coca
may be affecting health.
Abuse factors. Tolerance to the drug effect (resulting in a need to keep
increasing the dose) is not observed among coca chewers; lack of that classic
indication of addiction is evidence of coca’s low addictive potential. Heavy
coca users may exhibit mild signs of physical dependence with the drug if
they stop using it, but any such transitory illness is too slight to be a factor
in choosing to continue using the drug.
Drug interactions. Not enough scientific information on the natural product
to report.
Cancer. Mouths of habitual chewers show tissue abnormalities but no precancerous
conditions. Nonetheless, coca is considered a probable cause of
cancer.
Pregnancy. Coca is considered a probable cause of fetal injury.
Additional information. In the 1970s a lift of all legal controls over coca
was proposed on the theory that the natural product was far less harmful than
pharmaceutical stimulants and might be just as attractive to persons who were
damaging themselves through stimulant abuse. The proposal was rejected.
Cocaine and ecgonine can be removed from coca leaves, and such “decocainized”
leaves are legal to possess without a prescription. Not all leaves
marketed as decocainized have undergone such treatment, and urine tests of
94 Coca
persons drinking tea steeped from such leaves may be positive for cocaine
use.
Coca paste. This substance is made from coca leaves but has the same sort
of relationship to them that 100 proof alcohol has to 3.2 beer. Paste is yielded
midway in the process of refining cocaine from coca; by volume the paste is
anywhere from about 40% to 90% cocaine, thus as potent as typical street
varieties of cocaine itself. Some persons desiring cocaine sensations prefer
paste, which can be smoked without the heat destroying cocaine’s drug effects.
Such persons routinely add the paste to tobacco or marijuana. Because of coca
paste’s high potency, a user basically receives the same impact as with using
cocaine. Descriptions of coca paste smoking and crack smoking are similar:
euphoria, insomnia, compulsive use. Adverse effects duplicate those of cocaine
(even including “coke bugs”—a hallucination of vermin crawling under the
skin). Using coca paste is very different from using coca leaves. The difference
can be inferred from a 1996 report that combined surveys involving over
24,000 persons in several countries of the Andes region. In 1965 about 13% of
Peru’s population apparently used coca leaves, but only 0.8% to 3% of persons
in the 1996 multicountry survey reported “lifetime” coca paste or cocaine
use—meaning people had tried them at least once; the percentage of regular
users would be lower yet. Direct comparison of those 1965 and 1996 figures
would be invalid because of difference in dates and survey designs, but the
huge gap between their percentages is consistent with a general rule that the
stronger a drug is, the less popular it is. Also, the kinds of persons who use
coca leaves and coca paste differ. The 1965 figure included over half the laborers
in Peru’s countryside. The 1996 survey found coca paste and cocaine
to be used predominantly by educated middle-class urbanites. A 1992 study
of hospitalized coca paste smokers also found most to be middle class, but
almost as many were from a low-income background.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Favier, R., et al. “Effects of Coca Chewing on Hormonal and Metabolic Responses
during Prolonged Submaximal Exercise.” Journal of Applied Physiology 80 (1996):
650–55.
Grinspoon, L., and J.B. Bakalar. “Coca and Cocaine as Medicines: An Historical Review.”
Journal of Ethnopharmacology 3 (1981): 149–59.
Hamner, J.E., III, and O.L. Villegas. “The Effect of Coca Leaf Chewing on the Buccal
Mucosa of Aymara and Quechua Indians in Bolivia.” Oral Surgery, Oral Medicine,
and Oral Pathology 28 (1969): 287–95.
Heath, D.B. “Coca in the Andes: Traditions, Functions and Problems.” Rhode Island
Medical Journal 73 (1990): 237–41.
Jeri, F.R., et al. “The Syndrome of Coca Paste.” Journal of Psychoactive Drugs 24 (1992):
173–82.
Negrete, J.C. “Coca Leaf Chewing: A Public Health Assessment.” British Journal of Addiction
to Alcohol and Other Drugs 73 (1978): 283–90.
Weil, A.T. “Coca Leaf as a Therapeutic Agent.” American Journal of Drug and Alcohol
Abuse 5 (1978): 75–86.
Zapata-Ortiz, V. “The Chewing of Coca Leaves in Peru.” International Journal of the
Addictions 5 (1970): 287–94.
Cocaine
See also Coca
Pronunciation: koh-KAIN
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 50-36-2. (Hydrochloride form 53-
21-4)
Formal Names: Methylbenzoylecgonine
Informal Names: All-American Drug, Angie, Apple Jacks, Aunt Nora, Baby T, Bad,
Badrock, Ball, Barbs, Base, Baseball, Basuco, Bazooka, Bazulco, Beam, Beamer,
Beans, Beat, Beautiful Boulders, Bebe, Beemer, Bernice, Bernie, Bernie’s Flakes,
Bernie’s Gold Dust, Big Bloke, Big C, Big Flake, Big Rush, Bill Blass, Billie Hoke,
Bings, Birdie Powder, Biscuit, B.J., Black Rock, Blanca, Blanco, Blast, Blotter,
Blow, Blowcaine, Blowout, Blue, Bobo, Bolivian Marching Powder, Bollo, Bolo,
Bomb, Bone, Bonecrusher, Boost, Botray, Boubou, Boulder, Boulya, Bouncing
Powder, Boy, Bubble Gum, Bullia Capital, Bullyon, Bump, Bunk, Burese, Burnese,
Bush, Butler, Butter, C, Cabello Cadillac, Caine, Cakes, California Cornflakes,
Came, Canamo, Candy, Candy C, Cap, Capsula, Carnie, Carrie, Carrie
Nation, Casper, Casper the Ghost, C-Dust, Cecil, C-Game, Chalk, Charlie,
Chemical, Chewies, Chippy, Chocolate Ecstasy, Choe, Cholly, Climax, Cloud,
Cloud 9, Coca, Coconut, Coco Rocks, Coke, Cola, Combol, Cookies, Coolie,
Corine, Corrine, Corrinne, Crack, Crank, Crib, Crimmie, Croak, Crumbs, Crunch
& Munch, Crystal, Cube, Dama Blanca, Demolish, Devil, Devil Drug, Devil’s
Dandruff, Devilsmoke, Dice, Dip, DOA, Double Bubble, Double Ups, Double
Yoke, Dove, Dream, Duct, Dust, Eastside Player, Egg, Eightball, Esnortiar, Everclear,
Eye Opener, Famous Dimes, 51, Fish Scales, Flake, Florida Snow, Foo
Foo, Foolish Powder, Freeze, French Fries, Fries, Friskie Powder, Garbage Rock,
Geek (with marijuana), Gift of the Sun, Gift of the Sun God, Gimmie (with
marijuana), Gin, Girl, Girlfriend, Glad Stuff, Glo, Gold, Gold Dust, Golf Ball,
Goofball (with heroin), Gravel, Green Gold, Gremmies (with marijuana), Grit,
Groceries, G-Rock, H & C (with heroin), Hail, Half Track, Hamburger Helper,
Happy Dust, Happy Powder, Happy Trails, Hard Ball, Hard Line, Hard Rock,
Have a Dust, Haven Dust, Heaven, Heaven Dust, Hell, Henry VIII, Her, Hit,
Hooter, Hotcakes, Hubba, Hunter, Ice, Ice Cube, Icing, Inca Message, Issues,
Jam, Jejo, Jelly, Jelly Beans, Johnson, Joy Powder, Junk, King, King’s Habit, Kokayeen,
Kokomo, Kryptonite, Lady, Lady Caine, Lady Snow, Late Night, Leaf,
Line, Love, Love Affair, Ma’a, Mama Coca, Marching Dust, Marching Powder,
Mayo, Merck, Merk, Mixed Jive, Mojo, Monkey, Monster, Mosquitos, Movie
Star Drug, Mujer, Murder 1 (with heroin), New Addition, Nieve, Nose, Nose
96 Cocaine
Candy, Nose Powder, Nose Stuff, Nuggets, Number 3, 151, Onion (quantity),
Oyster Stew, Paradise, Paradise White, Parlay, Paste, Patico, Pearl, Pebbles, Pee
Wee, Percia, Perico, Peruvian, Peruvian Flake, Peruvian Lady, P-Funk (crack
cocaine mixed with PCP), Piece, Piedra, Piles, Pimp, Pimp’s Drug, Pipero, Polvo
Blanco, Pony, Potato Chips, Powder, Powder Diamonds, Press, Prime Time,
Primo, Product, Quill, Racehorse Charley, Rane, Raw, Ready Rock, Red Caps,
Regular P, Rest in Peace, Roca, Rock, Rock Attack, Rocks of Hell, Rooster, Rox,
Roxanne, Roz, Rush, Schmeck, Schoolboy, Schoolcraft, Scorpion, Scottie,
Scotty, Scrabble, Scramble, Scruples, Serpico 21, 7-Up, Shabu, She, Sherm,
Sightball, Slab, Sleet, Sleigh Ride, Smoke, Smoking Gun (with heroin), Snowball
(with heroin), Snow Bird, Snowcone, Snow Seals (with amphetamine), Snow
White, Society High, Soda, Space Base (crack mixed with PCP), Space Cadet
(crack with PCP), Space Dust (crack with PCP), Speed, Speedball (with heroin),
Speedboat (crack with PCP and marijuana), Square Time Bob, Squirrel (crack
with PCP and marijuana), Star, Star Dust, Star-Spangled Powder, Stones, Studio
Fuel, Sugar, Sugar Block, Sweet Stuff, Swell Up, T, Talco, Tardust, Teenager,
Teeth, Tension, Thing, Tissue, Toot, Top Gun, Topo, Tornado, Toss Up, Tragic
Magic (crack with PCP), Trails, Troop, Turkey, Tweaks, 24–7, 20 Rock, Ultimate,
Wave, Whack, White Ball, White Dragon, White Ghost, White Girl, White
Horse, White Lady, White Mosquito, White Powder, White Sugar, White Tornado,
Whiz Bang, Wicky Stick (crack with marijuana and PCP), Wild Cat (with
methcathinone), Wings, Witch, Wooly (crack with marijuana), Wrecking Crew,
Yahoo, Yale, Yayoo, Yeaho, Yeah-O, Yeyo, Yimyom, Zip
Type: Stimulant (cocaine class). See page 17
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule II (DEA no. 9041)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. The drug was first isolated from coca plants in the mid-1800s. Cocaine
apparently functions as an insecticide in the plants, but the substance has had
no commercial agricultural use for that purpose. Early medical applications
included administration to treat addiction to alcohol and opiates, but persons
addicted to those drugs did not better on cocaine. Like many stimulants, cocaine
has anorectic (weight-reducing) properties that decline as usage stretches
over time; but the drug’s main medical use has been as a local anesthetic,
particularly in ear, nose, and mouth surgery. Experimental use as an antidepressant
has been unsuccessful. Cocaine has been used to treat tonsillitis, earache,
toothache, burns, skin rash, hay fever, asthma, hemorrhoids, nerve pain,
nausea, and vomiting. It makes the body’s immune system more active. For
medical purposes cocaine has been largely superseded by drugs having less
potential for abuse, but it is still called an excellent anesthetic for nose and
throat surgery, has been used for gynecological surgery in modern times, and
still has ophthalmological use as eye drops, although the latter employment
must be cautious in order to prevent corneal damage. Due to hazards of cocaine
injections, since the 1920s medical usage of cocaine has been largely
limited to topical (applying it directly to a body surface).
Cocaine 97
Like other stimulants, cocaine may improve mood, self-confidence, and sociability.
Taking the drug for such purposes may be recreational or for selfmedication
of psychological distress; for example, a strong association exists
between posttraumatic stress disorder and cocaine use. Cocaine can temporarily
enhance work performance whether the task be manual labor or intellectual
concentration. A century ago railroad engineers, dock workers, and
cotton pickers were reported to be using the drug for that purpose, and it also
received experimental military use in that pre-amphetamine era. On an occasional
basis cocaine can help accomplish intense intellectual effort, such as
staying awake all night to finish a piece of writing, and on a regular basis,
cocaine can help accomplish dull repetitive tasks requiring close mental attention.
As with other stimulants, steady use can eventually worsen work ability
as a person’s physical reserves are exhausted and as a person becomes emotionally
strung out.
For over a century the most popular ways of taking cocaine were by injection
or by inhaling the drug as a snuff. The latter technique inherently produces
sensations of lesser strength than injection does, but a person desiring
more can simply inhale larger quantities of powder.
Drawbacks. Habitually inhaling cocaine powder can cause a runny or congested
nose and nosebleeds. Too much inhalation can bring on nasal ulcers
and in exceptional cases can kill tissue and pierce the cartilage in the middle
of the nose. Snorting can cause headaches. Abuse can also damage muscles
(including heart), kidneys, and liver. Cases of heart attack and stroke are
known, as are cases of serious intestinal damage related to problems with
blood flow. Preexisting asthma can be worsened. Rupture of pulmonary air
sacs and lung collapse are possible, though uncommon, results from cocaine
smoking. The drug may bring on a type of glaucoma.
Some undesired effects are similar to those of amphetamine abuse: peevishness,
nervousness, combativeness, paranoia, insomnia, and (after a dose wears
off) depression. Typical afflictions include repetitions in movement or speech.
Males may engage in sexual intercourse far longer than usual. Abusers may
cut themselves off from other persons and become suspicious of them. Assorted
hallucinations may occur, the classic one being “coke bugs” crawling
under the skin. Psychological problems produced by unwise use of cocaine
are so similar to those from other stimulants that some scientists believe similar
mechanisms must cause the problems. Psychosis can be induced by cocaine
but, as with other stimulants, generally does not continue after the drug
use stops. Smoking cocaine can produce respiratory difficulties reminiscent of
tobacco smoking—difficulties that develop faster than with tobacco because
lungs must deal not only with the “air pollution” but with powerful drug
effects as well. Particles of crack smoke floating in the air and landing on
someone’s eye can damage the cornea.
The amount of drug needed to kill a person varies; depending on a person’s
condition a dose that provides pleasure one day can kill on another. The same
goes for persons sharing a supply: What satisfies one user can cause serious
trouble for another. In rat experiments females are more sensitive to cocaine
than males. Immediate problems in humans may include high blood pressure,
irregular heartbeat, and seizures. The drug promotes rises in pulse rate and
98 Cocaine
body temperature, which can be problems if a person engages in strenuous
physical activity such as wild dancing.
Abuse factors. Before the 1970s cocaine smoking was never popular because
the necessary heat destroyed much of the drug’s potency. In that decade,
however, the practice of freebasing cocaine began. That process allowed the
drug’s potency to be retained when smoking it, thereby allowing a route of
administration providing the same intense impact formerly available only
through intravenous injection. Freebasing, however, involves volatile chemicals
that can explode in a flash fire if they are mishandled. In the 1980s illicit
chemists discovered a much safer way to modify cocaine into a smokable
format. The resultant product was known as crack cocaine and became the
most notorious illicit drug since heroin.
A few seconds after inhaling crack smoke a user can experience a sense of
well-being and joy accompanied by what has been described as a total body
orgasm, followed by a few minutes of afterglow.
Tolerance is reported. Debate exists about whether a cocaine addict experiences
physical withdrawal symptoms upon giving up the drug. A consensus
holds that any physical consequences caused by the initial phase of abstinence
can be less serious than those that develop when withdrawing from opiates
and far less serious than withdrawing from alcohol or barbiturates.
Drug interactions. Cocaine masks some effects of alcohol, encouraging
drinkers to ingest larger quantities of beverages. Alcohol’s effects are longer
lasting than cocaine, however, so a person functioning adequately under both
drugs can suddenly become very drunk as the cocaine intoxication ends. If
that transition happens while a person is operating dangerous machinery
(such as a car), for example, the consequences may be disastrous. Cocaine’s
influence on the heart and liver seem increased by alcohol. Mazindol boosts
the elevation that cocaine causes in pulse rate and blood pressure and makes
those changes last longer. Mice experiments indicate possible fatal interaction
if a cocaine-using asthmatic is treated with aminophylline (a combination of
ethylenediamine and theophylline). Cocaine abusers also tend to be extra susceptible
to the benzodiazepine class of depressant drugs. In animal experiments
caffeine and nicotine boost cocaine effects. Naloxone, a drug used to
counteract opiate actions, can boost cocaine effects in humans. For many years
some medical practitioners have mixed adrenalin with topical applications of
cocaine in order to make anesthetic effects last longer. The reason adrenalin
interacts in that way with cocaine is unclear, and the custom is disputed. What
works when applying cocaine to a body surface for anesthesia does not necessarily
work in other contexts. Seeking to stretch out effects of recreational
cocaine with various substances can be so unsuccessful as to require hospitalization
for unexpected interactions. In some manipulations of a rat experiment
the tricyclic antidepressant amitriptyline reduced cocaine actions.
Cancer. Cocaine’s potential for causing cancer is uncertain.
Pregnancy. The drug’s potential for causing birth defects is uncertain. Some
animal experiments produce birth defects; some do not. In the 1980s and 1990s
cocaine was widely reported to have devastating impact on mental ability of
infants whose mothers used the drug during pregnancy. Scientists have been
unable to verify those reports. Evidence is growing that offspring tend to
Cocaine 99
perform at the lower end of the normal range, but pregnant women who use
cocaine also typically use hefty amounts of tobacco cigarettes and beverage
alcohol while failing to get proper nutrition and prenatal care. Such confounding
factors hinder scientists’ ability to measure what cocaine does to a fetus,
although persistent investigators are beginning to separate cocaine’s influence
from other factors. Even so, despite excellent theoretical reasons to suspect
that cocaine damages fetal development, those suspicions have not been confirmed.
Nonetheless, cocaine is not considered safe for a pregnant woman to
use. Apparently cocaine enters human milk and can be passed to infants via
that route. A case report tells of an infant hospitalized for cocaine overdose
received from the mother’s milk.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Brain, P.F., and G.A. Coward. “A Review of the History, Actions, and Legitimate Uses
of Cocaine.” Journal of Substance Abuse 1 (1989): 431–51.
Gay, G.R., et al. “Cocaine: History, Epidemiology, Human Pharmacology, and Treatment.
A Perspective on a New Debut for an Old Girl.” Clinical Toxicology 8
(1975): 149–78.
Johnson, B., et al. “Effects of Acute Intravenous Cocaine on Cardiovascular Function,
Human Learning, and Performance in Cocaine Addicts.” Psychiatry Research 77
(1998): 35–42.
Lester, B.M., L.L. LaGasse, and R. Bigsby. “Prenatal Cocaine Exposure and Child Development:
What Do We Know and What Do We Do?” Seminars in Speech and
Language 19 (1998): 123–46.
Magura, S., and A. Rosenblum. “Modulating Effect of Alcohol Use on Cocaine Use.”
Addictive Behaviors 25 (2000): 117–22.
Middleton, R.M., and M.B. Kirkpatrick. “Clinical Use of Cocaine. A Review of the Risks
and Benefits.” Drug Safety: An International Journal of Medical Toxicology and Drug
Experience 9 (1993): 212–17.
Rawson, R., et al. “Methamphetamine and Cocaine Users: Differences in Characteristics
and Treatment Retention.” Journal of Psychoactive Drugs 32 (2000): 233–38.
Siegal, H.A., et al. “Crack-Cocaine Users as Victims of Physical Attack.” Journal of the
National Medical Association 92 (2000): 76–82.
Siegel, R.K. “Cocaine and the Privileged Class: A Review of Historical and Contemporary
Images.” Advances in Alcohol and Substance Abuse 4 (1984): 37–49.
Codeine
Pronunciation: KOH-deen
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 76-57-3. (Phosphate hemihydrate
form 41444-62-6)
Formal Names: BRON, Methylmorphine
Informal Names: AC/DC, Barr, C, Captain Cody, Co-Dine, Cody, Coties, Cough
Syrup, Down, Homebake, Karo, Lean, Lean & Dean, Nods, Schoolboy, Syrup,
T-3s. With glutethimide: Doors & 4, 4 Doors, Hits, Loads, Packets, Pancakes &
Syrup, Sets, 3s & 8s
Type: Depressant (opiate class). See page 22
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule II, III, V controlled substance, depending on
product formulation (DEA no. 9050)
USA Availability: Prescription and nonprescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. Codeine was discovered in 1832 by French chemist Pierre-Jean Robiquet.
Typically it is derived from the more potent drug morphine, which,
depending on dosage route (oral, injection), is considered about 3 to 12 times
stronger than codeine. After codeine is administered, body chemistry transforms
it back into morphine; thus employer drug screens on someone who
used a codeine cough remedy can be positive for morphine. Basically codeine
is a prodrug, a substance having little medicinal effect itself but that the body
transforms into a useful drug—in this case, morphine. Although scientists
have long believed that codeine’s therapeutic effects come from morphine, as
the twenty-first century began, one group of researchers reported that persons
whose bodies cannot properly convert codeine into morphine can nonetheless
experience medical benefit from codeine itself.
Codeine is administered for sedation and to stop diarrhea, coughs, and pain.
The substance is considered one of the best cough medicines, although research
in the 1990s indicated the drug has little ability to control coughs from
colds. Some people take the drug regularly to diminish chronic pain. One
study of the drug’s ability to ease pain after tonsillectomy found its effectiveness
comparable to morphine, but another tonsillectomy study found codeine
no more effective than acetaminophen (Tylenol and similar products). Research
examining pain from a wide variety of causes, ranging from cancer to
backache, found no more discomfort relief from a combination dose of codeine
Codeine 101
and acetaminophen than from combining hydrocodone and ibuprofen. Such
findings probably indicate simply that various kinds of pain relievers work
adequately for various discomforts, with codeine often being as good as the
other drugs.
Some regular codeine users take it to reduce anxiety, and some simply find
the substance’s effects pleasant. A clinical test of codeine found no antidepressant
action, but people who use codeine for a long time tend to be depressed
and may be taking that drug to medicate themselves for depression—
so if they have access to antidepressants they may have less interest in codeine.
Codeine cough syrups may include stimulants and other ingredients
that persons find pleasant, increasing the syrups’ appeal.
Drawbacks. Codeine can promote sleepiness, abdominal cramps, constipation,
urinary retention, nausea, and breathing impairment. A case report tells
of a massive dose followed by several days of hallucinations and paranoia in
a person already prone to psychiatric problems. After taking a dose, people
should avoid operating dangerous machinery until they know the drug is not
hindering their ability to do so. When 70 professional army drivers in Finland
were tested in a driving simulator after taking 50 mg of codeine, they ran off
the roadway more frequently than when they were under the influence of
alcohol. Elderly persons who take codeine have an increased likelihood of hip
fracture, presumably because the substance makes them woozy and more
likely to fall. Codeine has been known to cause pancreatitis, particularly if the
victim’s gallbladder has been surgically removed, but this effect is considered
unusual. Medical personnel refrain from administering the drug through intravenous
injection because that route can lower blood pressure and blood
oxygen to fatal levels.
In two studies researchers found that people taking codeine felt few sensations
from the drug and had normal performance on assorted tests of physical
and mental functioning. Those findings, however, may be related to
dosages given by experimenters; higher dosages might well produce different
results.
Abuse factors. Codeine abuse can be troublesome enough that persons need
treatment to break the addiction. Some cases have required hospitalization.
Nonetheless, prevalence of codeine addiction was disputed in 1989 by two
authorities who carefully examined past reports of addiction: Little scientific
research had been done on the topic, and most had involved persons already
addicted to morphine. As morphine addicts will use codeine as a stopgap to
hold off a withdrawal syndrome when their main drug is unavailable, their
responses to codeine are not necessarily representative of a general population’s
reactions. In addition, codeine cough syrups may contain a substantial
percentage of alcohol, so heavy use of such a product can involve a further
confounding factor of alcoholism. The 1989 authorities concluded that verifiable
accounts of people being addicted primarily to codeine (rather than
mainly to some other drug, with codeine on the side) were unusual.
Dependence with codeine can develop; withdrawal symptoms are like those
of morphine withdrawal, but milder. A study of rheumatism patients receiving
codeine found that quite a few needed higher doses to control pain as
102 Codeine
months went by, but the increase was caused by decline of their physical
condition rather than development of tolerance.
The same study noted that almost no patients abused the drug, and of those
few who did, all abused other substances as well. That finding is consistent
with many observations of other drugs having abuse potential; only a small
minority of users misuse them, and this minority is prone to problems with
more than one substance. People having a bad relationship with codeine tend
to have bad relationships with alcohol, marijuana, and (less commonly) heroin.
One study found that almost half the patients requesting treatment for
codeine cough syrup addiction engaged in sexual conduct putting them at
risk for AIDS, conduct illustrating a multiproblem lifestyle in which codeine
abuse was simply one aspect. Background checks of deceased Los Angeles–
area codeine abusers revealed almost 66% had attempted suicide, had a prior
overdose on some drug, had been hospitalized for psychiatric problems, had
been in physical fights, and had an alcohol problem (87% had an alcoholrelated
arrest record). So codeine may be only one of several problems in such
lives.
Not all drug abuse is illicit. Sometimes people develop an abusive relationship
with a drug that is supplied to them through legitimate medical channels.
Swedish researchers compared the use of codeine in that country to the use
of propoxyphene, an opioid related to methadone. Those investigators found
that doctors in two of Sweden’s largest cities typically tended to prescribe
codeine to middle-aged females and that in one of those cities codeine was
used the most in poor areas of town and was often associated with taking
benzodiazepines frequently (in experiments the benzodiazepine diazepam
lengthened the time that a codeine dose lasted, while codeine interfered with
diazepam—suggesting that a codeine user would have to take more diazepam
to get benzodiazepine sensations, consistent with the Swedish findings of increased
benzodiazepine consumption among codeine users). Those kinds of
codeine usage characteristics were not found for propoxyphene in the Swedish
research even though both drugs would have opiate-type effects; the difference
in usage suggests that physicians’ customs may have been promoting
codeine abuse.
In drug abuse treatment programs codeine has been used successfully to
shift addicts from other opiates—so successfully that one group of researchers
suggests that codeine maintenance programs might be an alternative to methadone
maintenance, particularly because codeine produces fewer unwanted
effects than methadone.
Drug interactions. The antidepressants fluoxetine (Prozac) and paroxetine
interfere with the body’s transformation of codeine into morphine; therefore,
persons taking those antidepressants are considered less likely to develop codeine
abuse (because they would experience fewer effects from codeine). Although
codeine is weaker than morphine, similarities between the two drugs
mean that interactions occurring with morphine can be expected to occur with
codeine.
Cancer. Laboratory tests find no evidence that the drug causes cell mutations
that might lead to cancer. Experimenters gave codeine to rats and mice
for two years and looked for evidence of cancer caused by the drug but found
Codeine 103
none. Although no direct observations have noted codeine causing cancer in
rats or mice, computer analysis of data from some experiments indicates that
the drug may cause cancer in rodents. The human body produces very small
amounts of codeine naturally, and researchers suspect this naturally occurring
codeine may deter development of lung cancer; but those natural processes
do not mean that doses of the drug would help prevent cancer.
Pregnancy. Whether codeine causes birth defects is unknown. It produced
no evidence of malformations when given to pregnant rats and rabbits. Codeine
reduced fetal weight in mice and hamsters in one experiment but did
not increase the normal rate of defects in mice, nor was a statistically significant
change in malformation rate observed in hamsters. Investigators running
another mice experiment, however, concluded that codeine does cause assorted
malformations. Researchers seeking evidence about various human
birth defects examined medical records of 100 to 199 women who used a
cough remedy containing codeine and found that none of the offspring had
any of the congenital abnormalities being investigated. Suspicion exists that
codeine may cause cleft palate and cleft lip in humans, but birth defects are
considered unlikely if the drug is used during pregnancy. A pregnant woman
who takes codeine can produce an infant who is dependent on that drug and
who undergoes a withdrawal syndrome upon birth.
Codeine passes into the milk of nursing mothers, but researchers find its
level and that of its metabolite morphine to be acceptable if the woman is
using codeine moderately. Nonetheless, nursing mothers are advised to avoid
codeine because mechanisms that break down codeine in the body are incompletely
formed in newborns, causing them to react more strongly to the drug
than older children or adults.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Eggen, A.E., and M. Andrew. “Use of Codeine Analgesics in a General Population. A
Norwegian Study of Moderately Strong Analgesics.” European Journal of Clinical
Pharmacology 46 (1994): 491–96.
Mattoo, S.K., et al. “Abuse of Codeine-Containing Cough Syrups: A Report from India.”
Addiction 92 (1997): 1783–87.
Romach, M.K., et al. “Long-Term Codeine Use Is Associated with Depressive Symptoms.”
Journal of Clinical Psychopharmacology 19 (1999): 373–76.
Rowden, A.M., and J.R. Lopez. “Codeine Addiction.” DICP: The Annals of Pharmacotherapy
23 (1989): 475–77.
Sproule, B.A., et al. “Characteristics of Dependent and Nondependent Regular Users
of Codeine.” Journal of Clinical Psychopharmacology 19 (1999): 367–72.
DET
Pronunciation: dee-ee-tee
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 61-51-8
Formal Names: Diethyltryptamine
Type: Hallucinogen. See page 25
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule I (DEA no. 7434)
USA Availability: Illegal to possess
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. In rats DET actions resemble some of bufotenine’s, but DET effects
in humans are likened to those of mescaline and LSD. Volunteers report major
changes in body perception, such as feeling porous or having an empty chest
or absent hands. Sometimes users feel they are outside of their bodies. Hallucinations
may seem real; typically they are visual, but sometimes sounds
and smells are perceived as well. Users have reported that faces of individuals
around them look different, taking on a masklike or caricature quality. Barriers
between senses may erode, for example, allowing sounds to be seen. Altered
perception of time is common. Perception of space can also change; a room’s
size may appear to grow, with walls getting further away or becoming curved,
or motionless objects may appear to keep coming closer. Typically consciousness
becomes fuzzy, with persons reporting they feel partially asleep.
Reactions to such experiences differ. A researcher who engaged in selfexperimentation,
once a more common procedure in science but now uncommon,
reported that his mood flipped back and forth between happiness and
anxiety. He also reported temporary autism while intoxicated by the drug.
Another self-experimenting scientist noted a need to avoid interacting with
people. A group of artists and professional colleagues of researchers who
wanted to explore creative possibilities with the drug were ecstatic about what
happened to them. Some had spiritually moving experiences; afterward some
felt impelled to begin creating artwork they had never attempted before. The
substance can promote meditation, allowing repressed concerns to emerge.
For that reason the drug was considered to have potential in psychotherapy.
One research team reported examples of reticent schizophrenics becoming
communicative while under DET’s influence, revealing honest information
that benefitted therapy. In a setting where users feel safe they may become
more sensitive to one another’s emotions and have genial interactions.
DET 105
Drawbacks. If persons want to stay in control of what happens to them,
they may become upset if they are unable to stop DET’s effects. One group
of volunteers found DET unpleasant, and some said the experience was so
negative that they would depart the research center if a repeat performance
was expected. These were unemployed laborers who had no particular interest
in the drug. Some users in another study compared the experience to delirium
caused by typhus or pneumonia. DET typically raises blood pressure, causes
dizziness and perspiration, and may cause tremors and burning sensations.
Rapid heartbeat has been reported. In addition to those symptoms, schizophrenics
have routinely experienced shakiness, nausea, and vomiting. Some
persons feel agitated and have a need to move around. The drug makes people
more open to suggestion and therefore more susceptible to exploitation. In a
research environment, normal subjects often become suspicious of persons
managing the experiment. Performance declines on tests of reaction time and
intelligence. A technically accomplished artist drew with less proficiency during
DET intoxication, but at the time she seemed unaware of decline in performance.
After the drug has worn off, users may feel a little depressed and
suffer from headache; they may be tired but have difficulty sleeping. These
problems clear up in a day’s time.
Abuse factors. Not enough scientific information to report about tolerance,
dependence, withdrawal, or addiction.
Drug interactions. Not enough scientific information to report.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Not enough scientific information to report.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Bo¨szo¨rme´nyi, Z. “Creative Urge as an After Effect of Model Psychoses.” Confina Psychiatrica
3 (1960): 177–26.
Bo¨szo¨rme´nyi, Z., P. De´r, and T. Nagy. “Observations on the Psychotogenic Effect of
N-N Diethyltryptamine, a New Tryptamine Derivative.” Journal of Mental Science
105 (1959): 171–81.
Sza´ra, S. “The Comparison of the Psychotic Effect of Tryptamine Derivatives with the
Effects of Mescaline and LSD-25 in Self-Experiments.” In Psychotropic Drugs, ed.
S. Garattini and V. Ghetti. New York: Elsevier, 1957. 460–67. Sza´ra refers to DET
as T-9.
Sza´ra, S., et al. “Psychological Effects and Metabolism of N,N-Diethyltryptamine in
Man.” Archives of General Psychiatry 15 (1966): 320–29.
Dextroamphetamine
Pronunciation: DEK-stroh am-FET-uh-meen
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 51-64-9. (Sulphate form 51-63-8)
Formal Names: Adderall, Amsustain, Biphetamine, D-Amphetamine, Dexamphetamine,
Dexedrine, Dexidrine, DextroStat, Sympamin
Informal Names: Beans, Black Beauties, Brownies, Christmas Trees, Dexies, Fastballs,
Orange Hearts, Oranges, Purple Hearts
Type: Stimulant (amphetamine class). See page 12
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule II (DEA no. 1100)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Dextroamphetamine is often called amphetamine. To reduce potential confusion,
remember that in this book “amphetamine” refers to a class of stimulants,
and “dextroamphetamine” refers to a specific drug in that class.
Uses. The substance stimulates the central and sympathetic nervous systems
and is comparable to methamphetamine. Dextroamphetamine is typically
used to treat narcolepsy, to treat attention deficit hyperactivity disorder
(ADHD) in adults and children, and to help reduce a person’s weight—in
rhesus monkey experiments it is one of the most effective appetite suppressants.
Some use has been made to help epileptics. The drug can be given in
combination with scopolamine as an anti–motion sickness medicine; astronauts
have used this combination during missions in outer space and consider
it effective.
Dextroamphetamine has been found more effective than standard antidepressants
in alleviating depression among HIV (human immunodeficiency virus)
patients and can also increase their energy. The drug has successfully
treated depression among non-HIV hospital patients and among other persons
as well. The drug has helped restore physical vigor and positive mental outlook
to institutionalized elderly persons, so that older individuals who had
been unable to take care of themselves were able to go home. Experimenters
in the 1970s and 1990s found that the drug could accelerate work rate without
multiplying mistakes in performing tasks. Those laboratory results cannot be
extrapolated to the workplace in general but nonetheless remind us of the
original welcome that employers gave to the first amphetamines. Dextroamphetamine
can help persons maintain satisfactory job performance while being
Dextroamphetamine 107
deprived of sleep. In the Persian Gulf War of 1991, U.S. aviators used the
drug. Some pilots called the substance crucial for top performance of responsibilities.
Outside evaluation concluded that efficiency and safety improved
when pilots were under the drug’s influence. Athletic performance may be
enhanced by the drug, but amphetamine class substances are generally banned
by sports regulatory authorities.
Drawbacks. Tests on healthy volunteers found that taking enough dextroamphetamine
to produce euphoria was also enough to produce mania. The
drug may cause stroke and is normally avoided if patients have heart disease,
hardening of the arteries, high blood pressure, glaucoma, hyperthyroidism,
restlessness, and former or current drug abuse. Heart trouble has been attributed
to several years’ abuse of the drug, and brain damage has been noted.
Abuse factors. Lack of dependency has been noted among juveniles receiving
medical doses of dextroamphetamine. Another study found that adults
with medical authorization to use dextroamphetamine for obesity or depression
often found it no more appealing than a placebo. These results are consistent
with the fact that any drug’s potential for abuse depends on the needs
it satisfies in a user; if a medical need is the only one satisfied, then the person
will have no interest in continuing the drug once the affliction is cured.
Among persons inclined toward abuse, that inclination can be increased by
taking dextroamphetamine with morphine. Those two substances can cancel
out some of each other’s unpleasant physical sensations while retaining the
psychological pleasures of both drugs. Abusers may interpret the situation as
“gain without pain,” but combining stimulants with depressants can give the
human body quite a beating. Moreover, researchers find that abusers can acquire
tolerance to the psychological effects of dextroamphetamine while effects
on blood pressure remain strong. Therefore, boosting the dose to maintain the
level of psychic high may pose as much danger to a habituated user as to
someone unaccustomed to the drug.
Drug interactions. Although the antimania medicine lithium reduces central
nervous system stimulation caused by amphetamine, experiments have not
shown lithium reducing either mania or heart rate and blood pressure increases
caused by dextroamphetamine. Dextroamphetamine is to be avoided
if persons have taken a monoamine oxidase inhibitor (MAOI—in some antidepressants
and other medicine) within the past 14 days. Particular hazard
arises when combining an MAOI and dextroamphetamine while eating foods
containing tyramine. Such foods include beer, some wines, cheese, chocolate,
bananas, raisins, avocados, salami, and soy sauce. Although an experimental
study found that dextroamphetamine could enhance the beneficial effects of
MAOIs, using the two drugs together can be fatal. Tricyclic antidepressants
make a dose of dextroamphetamine last longer and can increase amphetamine
blood levels produced by dextroamphetamine.
Although extrapolation of animal studies to human conditions must always
be cautious, it is known that dextroamphetamine’s effects become stronger in
rats if they take caffeine at the same time. Rat and human experiments also
indicate that dextroamphetamine will improve pain relief provided by morphine.
Animal experiments indicate that dextroamphetamine interferes with
alcohol absorption, suggesting that achieving alcohol intoxication might re108
Dextroamphetamine
quire a dextroamphetamine user to drink more than normal. Upon taking
dextroamphetamine, tobacco cigarette smokers use more cigarettes and report
greater pleasure from smoking.
Combining marijuana smoking with dextroamphetamine does not seem to
affect physical coordination (walking and the like) more than just using marijuana
alone. Each of those two drugs raises heart rate and blood pressure but
do not seem to have a multiplier effect when used together—the increase in
cardiac effects is simply the amount caused by dextroamphetamine plus the
amount caused by marijuana; one does not make cardiac effects of the other
more potent.
Cancer. Potential for causing cancer is unknown.
Pregnancy. As with many drugs, effect on fetal development is unknown.
One instance of serious birth defects is reported from a woman who used
dextroamphetamine in the first trimester, but the meaning of that one instance
is uncertain because she also used lovastatin (a drug for reducing cholesterol
in persons at serious risk of heart attack), and lovastatin by itself is considered
highly dangerous to fetal development. A statistical association has been reported
between maternal dextroamphetamine use and infant heart defects.
Dextroamphetamine has been prescribed for use in pregnancy without apparent
ill effect on infants but is considered potentially hazardous. Possible
consequences merit full discussion between doctor and pregnant patient.
Combination products. Adderall contains several active ingredients: dextroamphetamine
saccharate, amphetamine aspartate, dextroamphetamine sulfate
USP, and amphetamine sulfate USP (the latter substance formerly marketed
as Benzedrine).
Biphetamine, like other dextroamphetamines, is medically used to treat obesity,
narcolepsy, and ADHD. Biphetamine is used recreationally to boost mental
quickness and physical activity and to create euphoria. The compound can
facilitate hallucinations, raise blood pressure, and prevent sleep.
Dexedrine’s oral capsule is designed to deliver some of the drug immediately,
followed by gradual delivery of the remaining drug. Capsule and tablet
products both contain “inactive” ingredients. In this context “inactive” means
an ingredient that does not promote a drug’s medical purpose, not that the
ingredient has no pharmaceutical effect. Inactive ingredients in the tablet include
FD&C Yellow No. 5 (tartrazine), a substance to which some persons are
allergic, particularly if they are abnormally sensitive to aspirin. Their reactions
can include bronchial asthma. When used against ADHD in children Dexedrine
can curtail growth, but that effect is believed to be temporary. Dexedrine
can raise body temperature. Experimenters found that the product can allow
satisfactory performance by airplane pilots on continuous simulator flight
duty for 64 hours straight without sleep.
DextroStat tablets include FD&C Yellow No. 5 (tartrazine).
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Brauer, L.H., J. Ambre, and H. De Wit. “Acute Tolerance to Subjective But Not Cardiovascular
Effects of D-Amphetamine in Normal, Healthy Men.” Journal of Clinical
Psychopharmacology 16 (1996): 72–76.
Caldwell, J.A., et al. “Efficacy of Dexedrine for Maintaining Aviator Performance durDextroamphetamine
109
ing 64 Hours of Sustained Wakefulness: A Simulator Study.” Aviation, Space, and
Environmental Medicine 71 (2000): 7–18.
Domino, E.F., et al. “Effects of D-Amphetamine on Quantitative Measures of Motor
Performance.” Clinical Pharmacology and Therapeutics 13 (1972): 251–57.
Emonson, D.L., and R.D. Vanderbeek. “The Use of Amphetamines in U.S. Air Force
Tactical Operations during Desert Shield and Storm.” Aviation, Space, and Environmental
Medicine 66 (1995): 260–63.
Graybiel, A. “Space Motion Sickness: Skylab Revisited.” Aviation, Space, and Environmental
Medicine 51 (1980): 814–22.
Griffith, J.D., et al. “Dextroamphetamine.” Archives of General Psychiatry 26 (1972): 97–
100.
Jacobs, D., and T. Silverstone. “Dextroamphetamine-Induced Arousal in Human Subjects
as a Model for Mania.” Psychological Medicine 16 (1986): 323–29.
Jasinski, D.R., and K.L. Preston. “Evaluation of Mixtures of Morphine and DAmphetamine
for Subjective and Physiological Effects.” Drug and Alcohol Dependence
17 (1986): 1–13.
Ward, A.S., et al. “Effects of D-Amphetamine on Task Performance and Social Behavior
of Humans in a Residential Laboratory.” Experimental and Clinical Psychopharmacology
5 (1997): 130–36.
Dextromethorphan
Pronunciation: dex-troh-meth-OR-fan
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 125-71-3
Formal Names: Benylin, Cosylan, Creo-Terpin, Demorphan Hydrobromide, Dexylets,
Drixoral, DXM, Medicon, Mediquell, MorphiDex, Pertussin CS,
Robitussin-DM
Informal Names: Bromage, Brome, Cough Syrup, Dex, Dextro, DM, Drix, K (with
alcohol), Mega-Perls, Pole (with heroin), Polo (with heroin), Robe, Robo, Rojo,
Sky, Syrup, Triple C, Tussin, Velvet
Type: Depressant (opioid class). See page 22
Federal Schedule Listing: Unlisted
USA Availability: Nonprescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. This cough and cold medicine has been used in the United States since
the 1950s. Because the drug is an opiate analogue and is related to levorphanol,
for convenience this book lists dextromethorphan as an opioid. Naloxone,
a chemical used to provoke withdrawal symptoms in persons who
have dependence with opiates and opioids, can bring forth those symptoms
in addicts who have switched from methadone to dextromethorphan. That
finding is consistent with dextromethorphan being an opioid; nonetheless, the
substance is not generally classified as an opioid.
The drug resembles codeine but is considered weaker in humans, although
a cat experiment measured dextromethorphan as three times stronger than
codeine. Body processes break down dextromethorphan into other substances
including dextrorphan.
Urinalysis comparing the amounts of dextromethorphan and its breakdown
product dextrorphan can identify a person’s susceptibility to lung cancer.
Case reports tell of dextromethorphan’s success in treating infants’ brain
seizures. One experiment found the substance to be a useful supplement in
treating older epileptics, but another study detected no improvement. Parkinson’s
disease patients have shown encouraging response to treatment with the
drug, but using it against Huntington’s disease and Lou Gehrig’s disease has
brought disappointment. Animal research suggests that the substance may be
useful in treating stroke. A mice experiment in France tested whether dextromethorphan
can protect against the effects of the chemical warfare agent soDextromethorphan
111
man, but the results were negative. A U.S. Army experiment with guinea pigs
also found dextromethorphan to have little value as protection against soman
poisoning.
Dextromethorphan is considered ineffective as a general pain reliever but
does reduce certain kinds of pain: Experiments show the drug can relieve pain
from diabetes, and researchers speculate that the drug may also provide similar
benefit to AIDS (acquired immunodeficiency syndrome) sufferers.
Drawbacks. Most persons find the drug unpleasant if the medically recommended
dosage is exceeded, with unwanted effects such as easy excitability,
memory trouble, nausea, itching, interference with male sexual function,
slurred speech, trouble with thinking, and difficulty with moving arms and
legs. Some persons become tired and woozy even on normal doses. Nonetheless,
one study of cough medicines found that volunteers preferred dextromethorphan
to other remedies that were effective, leading the researchers to
speculate that the drug was providing pleasure unrelated to effectiveness in
relieving cough. Indeed, some users feel more sociable and report euphoria
and hallucinations. Cases of mania are known, likened to the kind of stereotypical
behavior popularly associated with PCP. In one instance, the compound
allowed a lawyer to work industriously for weeks with little sleep,
followed by mental collapse requiring hospitalization. This individual had
engaged in manic episodes and drug abuse in the past, however. A patient in
another mania case report also had a medical history of drug abuse. Persons
without such a history may well be susceptible to manic reactions from overuse
of dextromethorphan, but the examples just cited raise the question of
whether persons prone to drug abuse are particularly susceptible.
Investigators examining dextromethorphan’s potential for treating juvenile
bacterial meningitis called off the experiment when patients began developing
diabetes after receiving high doses of the drug (possibly because of action on
the pancreas inhibiting insulin production), and reports exist about other instances
of juveniles developing diabetes when being treated with the compound.
Abuse factors. Accounts of persons abusing dextromethorphan began appearing
in science journals during the 1960s. In the 1990s news media reports
described the substance as popular among teenagers, who sometimes referred
to this drug use as “robo-copping.” Usage by persons of that age group is not
limited to the United States. For example, authorities in Korea have expressed
concern about fatal overdoses among young illicit users, particularly when
they combine dextromethorphan with another drug to intensify effects.
In the 1960s human addiction to dextromethorphan was dismissed as highly
unlikely. Subsequently, researchers who documented behavior of rats exposed
to drug combinations concluded that dextromethorphan has abuse potential.
Human addiction has indeed been reported, although this is described as unusual.
Scientists have not found dependence or withdrawal symptoms. A rat
study determined that dextromethorphan can reduce alcohol withdrawal
symptoms, and experiments with rats and mice show that dextromethorphan
can reduce morphine withdrawal symptoms. One human study found that
dextromethorphan by itself did not relieve methadone abstinence, but different
research shows that in combination with other substances dextromethor112
Dextromethorphan
phan can relieve abstinence symptoms experienced by heroin addicts. Such
results do not demonstrate whether dextromethorphan has cross-tolerance
with all the drugs just named, allowing it to be substituted for any of them;
their withdrawal syndromes all include elements mimicking the common cold
and flu, and dextromethorphan may simply be able to relieve flulike symptoms
regardless of cause.
Rats that dose themselves with intravenous cocaine have shown less interest
in that drug after receiving dextromethorphan, but the meaning of that reduced
interest is unclear: Does dextromethorphan promote abandonment of
drug use, or do the animals find dextromethorphan so preferable that cocaine
cannot compete?
Drug interactions. Dextromethorphan can boost pain relief actions of morphine,
allowing patients to use less of that opiate. Research has also found
that dextromethorphan does not boost euphoria or dependence produced by
morphine, leading one investigator to conclude that morphine’s illicit attractions
are not increased by dextromethorphan.
Dangerous interactions may occur if dextromethorphan is taken along with
MDMA, with monoamine oxidase inhibitors (MAOIs, found in some antidepressants
and other medicine), or with serotonin uptake reinhibitors (a type
of antidepressant). When taken with dextromethorphan the latter substances
could provoke the “serotonin syndrome,” a potentially fatal emergency involving
muscle tremors, heartbeat and blood pressure abnormalities, changes
in mental state, and loss of consciousness. In rats the drug reduces effects
produced by PCP. Dextromethorphan can cause false positives for PCP in
urine tests, but an experiment failed to produce positives for opioids.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. The drug has been widely used for decades without report of
congenital malformations. After chicken embryo experiments in the 1990s suggested
that dextromethorphan might cause birth defects, a study in Canada
compared women who used the drug during pregnancy with those who did
not and found no increase of congenital defects in the drug group. A study
looking for birth malformations in Spain found none that could be attributed
to dextromethorphan and concluded that normal medical used of the drug
did not produce birth defects. Those negative findings have not surprised
experts familiar with drawbacks in using chicken embryos to test for birth
defects; chicken development can be harmed by conditions having no effect
on humans, and chicken embryo tests are no longer accepted as indicating
human risk of birth defects. Several human studies, however, have found a
slight increase in risk of birth defects among pregnant women using dextromethorphan.
The risk is close to negligible, but, as one authority points out,
that is not the same as zero risk. The small chance can be reduced to zero by
avoiding the drug during pregnancy.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Darboe, M.N. “Abuse of Dextromethorphan-Based Cough Syrup as a Substitute for
Licit and Illicit Drugs: A Theoretical Framework.” Adolescence 31 (1996): 239–45.
Einarson, A., D. Lyszkiewicz, and G. Koren. “The Safety of Dextromethorphan in Pregnancy:
Results of a Controlled Study.” Chest 119 (2001): 466–69.
Dextromethorphan 113
Hinsberger, A., V. Sharma, and D. Mazmanian. “Cognitive Deterioration from Long-
Term Abuse of Dextromethorphan: A Case Report.” Journal of Psychiatry and
Neuroscience 19 (1994): 375–77.
Martı´nez-Frias, M.L., and E. Rodrı´guez-Pinilla. “Epidemiologic Analysis of Prenatal
Exposure to Cough Medicines Containing Dextromethorphan: No Evidence of
Human Teratogenicity.” Teratology 63 (2001): 38–41.
Pender, E.S., and B.R. Parks. “Toxicity with Dextromethorphan-Containing Preparations:
A Literature Review and Report of Two Additional Cases.” Pediatric Emergency
Care 7 (1991): 163–65.
Polles, A., and J.L. Griffith. “Dextromethorphan-Induced Mania.” Psychosomatics 37
(1996): 71–74.
Rammer, L., P. Holmgren, and H. Sandler. “Fatal Intoxication by Dextromethorphan:
A Report on Two Cases.” Forensic Science International 37 (1988): 233–36.
Dextromoramide
Pronunciation: deks-troh-MOHR-a-meyed
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 357-56-2. (Tartrate form 2922-
44-3)
Formal Names: Alcoid, Dauran, Dimorlin, Jetrium, Linfadol, Moramide, Narcolo,
Palfium, Troxilan
Type: Depressant (opioid class). See page 24
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule I (DEA no. 9613)
USA Availability: Illegal to possess
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. This drug was first identified in the 1950s. It has no officially sanctioned
medical role in the United States but is used elsewhere for pain control
in conditions such as kidney stone attacks, cancer, surgery, or injury. A case
report tells of a person who used this drug to diminish pain during selfmutilation.
Dextromoramide can provide relief when standard opiates fail.
Although generally classified as an opioid (a synthetic chemical) the drug is
produced from unripened opium seeds and is 2 to 70 times stronger than
morphine, depending on the animal species being tested and the effect being
measured. Dextromoramide acts quickly; authorities disagree on how long its
effects last.
Drawbacks. Unwanted effects can include nausea, vomiting, perspiration,
rapid pulse, breathing impairment, urinary difficulty, lowered body temperature
and blood pressure, and dizziness. Compared to morphine, dextromoramide
is less likely to cause constipation or sleepiness. Euphoria can occur.
Persons taking dextromoramide are generally warned against driving cars or
running other dangerous machinery. A case report mentions a drug abuser’s
serious, but curable, heart damage caused by injecting crushed oral tablets of
dextromoramide.
Abuse factors. Dextromoramide is chemically related to methadone, and
some researchers believe that dextromoramide could be a useful supplemental
drug for addicts being treated in methadone maintenance programs. Morphine
and dextromoramide have enough cross-tolerance to prevent morphine
withdrawal symptoms. Dextromoramide itself is addictive; around 1990 a survey
of 150 methadone patients in London found that 7 were being treated for
Dextromoramide 115
dextromoramide addiction. At one time some medical observers doubted that
dextromoramide is addictive, but negative results in their research were probably
due to the medical context in which the drug was being used. In rats the
development of dextromoramide tolerance is so much slower than with morphine
that one group of investigators doubted the phenomenon was really
occurring. Researchers have disagreed about how fast tolerance appears in
humans, but it does occur, as does dependence. Disagreement about how
quickly tolerance emerges in humans may be related to which drug effects are
being examined; tolerance does not necessarily develop to all of a drug’s effects
at the same rate. For example, tolerance to pain relief properties might
emerge at a different point of treatment than tolerance to nausea or sleepiness
caused by a drug.
Drug interactions. Taking this drug with antihistamines or depressants
(such as alcohol) can be risky. Monoamine oxidase inhibitors (MAOIs, found
in some antidepressants and other medicine) are particularly dangerous to
take with dextromoramide. Persons with breathing difficulty or poor thyroid
activity should be careful about taking this drug.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. The drug produces massive birth defects in mice, but its ability
to cause human malformations at normal medical dosage levels is unknown.
Dextromoramide has been used to ease childbirth, but if pregnant women
receive the drug shortly before giving birth, their infants may have trouble
breathing. One medical authority has called the substance too dangerous to
use during labor. Dextromoramide passes into milk of nursing mothers.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
De Vos, J.W., et al. “Craving Patterns in Methadone Maintenance Treatment with Dextromoramide
as Adjuvant.” Addictive Behaviors 24 (1999): 707–13.
Jurand, A., and Martin, L.V. “Teratogenic Potential of Two Neurotropic Drugs, Haloperidol
and Dextromoramide, Tested on Mouse Embryos.” Teratology 42 (1990):
45–54.
La Barre, J. “The Pharmacological Properties and Therapeutic Use of Dextromoramide.”
Bulletin on Narcotics 11, no. 4 (1959): 10–19.
Newgreen, D.B. “Dextromoramide: Review and Case Report.” Australian Journal of
Pharmacy 61 (1980): 641–44.
Dextrorphan
Pronunciation: dex-TROR-fan
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 125-73-5
Type: Depressant (opioid class). See page 24
Federal Schedule Listing: Unlisted
Uses. This substance is closely related to levorphanol and can produce a
false positive for levorphanol in drug screen tests. The human body will transform
part of a dextromethorphan dose into dextrorphan. The same transformation
occurs in rats; when comparing results in males and females,
researchers found that a given amount of dextrorphan lasts twice as long in
female rats.
Dextrorphan can fight coughs and reduce epileptic seizures, although test
results differ about how well it diminishes seizures. Mice research has found
that the drug helps mice recover from strokes, and in humans the drug appears
useful for treating minor strokes. Some research indicates that the substance
has potential for treating various human neurological afflictions, but
such potential has yet to be fulfilled. A rat experiment found dextrorphan
ineffective in preventing brain damage caused by the chemical warfare agent
soman. A rat study testing dextrorphan’s potential as an antidote for methcathinone
poisoning had limited success.
Drawbacks. Unwanted side effects may include nausea, vomiting, sleepiness,
high or low blood pressure, uncontrollable eye movement, and hallucinations.
Rat experiments show that high enough does can impair memory and
learning. When one group of researchers tested dextrorphan’s ability to prevent
some types of brain damage, the scientists found instead that dextrorphan
caused damage in rats.
Abuse factors. At one time dextrorphan was a Schedule I substance, but
eventually it was removed from any schedule of controlled substances. Such
a journey is most unusual; assorted drugs have been moved from one schedule
to another over the years, but the direction is almost always to put the drugs
under more controls rather than fewer. Scientists describe dextrorphan as producing
effects similar to PCP. At sufficiently high levels, dextrorphan can
make people feel as if they are intoxicated with alcohol.
Drug interactions. Dextrorphan has reduced cocaine effects in mice.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. After male mice received dextrorphan in an experiment, they
Dextrorphan 117
produced offspring having lower weight, delays in maturation, and abnormal
swimming behavior. Whether the drug passes into a human fetus or the milk
supply of a nursing mother is unknown.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Aylward, M., et al. “Dextromethorphan and Codeine: Comparison of Plasma Kinetics
and Antitussive Effects.” European Journal of Respiratory Diseases 65 (1984):
283–91.
Dematteis, M., G. Lallement, and M. Mallaret. “Dextromethorphan and Dextrorphan
in Rats: Common Antitussives—Different Behavioural Profiles.” Fundamental
and Clinical Pharmacology 12 (1998): 526–37.
“Safety, Tolerability and Pharmacokinetics of the N-Methyl-D-Asparate Antagonist Ro-
01-6794/706 in Patients with Acute Ischemic Stroke.” Annals of the New York
Academy of Sciences 765 (1995): 249–61, 298.
Schutz, C.G., and M. Soyka. “Dextromethorphan Challenge in Alcohol-Dependent Patients
and Controls.” With reply by Drystal and Petrakis. Archives of General
Psychiatry 57 (2000): 291–92.
Szekely, J.I., L.G. Sharpe, and J.H. Jaffe. “Induction of Phencyclidine-Like Behavior in
Rats by Dextrorphan But Not Dextromethorphan.” Pharmacology, Biochemistry,
and Behavior 40 (1991): 381–86.
Diazepam
Pronunciation: dye-AZ-e-pam
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 439-14-5
Formal Names: Alupram, Atensine, Diastat, Diazemuls, Evacalm, Solis, Stesolid,
Tensium, Valium, Valrelease, Vival
Informal Names: Blues, Drunk Pills, Ludes, Mother’s Little Helper, V, Val
Type: Depressant (benzodiazepine class). See page 21
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule IV (DEA no. 2765)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: D
Uses. By the end of the twentieth century diazepam was one of the bestknown
antianxiety agents in America. Other medical uses of this fast-acting
and long-lasting drug include treatment of insomnia, migraine, facial pain,
muscle spasms, convulsions, vomiting, malaria, rattlesnake bite, alcohol and
heroin withdrawal syndromes, cardiac difficulty created by cocaine, and muscle
stiffness from tetanus and other causes. In children the drug is used to
combat seizures caused by fever. Diazepam is commonly administered to calm
patients just before surgery. The body converts the drug into other chemicals,
including temazepam and oxazepam.
Drawbacks. Unwanted actions of diazepam include weariness and weakness
and occasionally headache, dizziness and vertigo, nausea, fuzzy or double
vision, urinary control problems, and depressed mood. A case report tells
of the drug bringing on an attack of gout. Diazepam is not recommended for
persons with acute narrow-angle glaucoma.
The compound can make users tired and impair vigilance, judgment, reaction
times, and movement. A person using diazepam should be cautious
about operating dangerous machinery; simulated driving tests demonstrate
reduced ability after a dose. The drug can cause memory problems. A study
of newborn rats receiving the drug found that it slowed learning, but their
learning capacity was normal even though the rats needed more time to learn
something. Diazepam can interfere with the ability to recognize an angry expression
on someone’s face—a disability with distinct potential for social consequences—
and a laboratory experiment demonstrated the drug’s ability to
make people more aggressive if they are provoked.
Diazepam is given to treat epileptic seizures, but long-term use can increase
Diazepam 119
epileptic seizures. Among epileptics the drug can also cause status epilepticus,
a potentially fatal condition in which seizures occur back to back.
Injecting diazepam into an artery is perilous. This mishap has been known
to occur even when medical professionals administer the drug, and most recreational
users lack training in anatomy. This mistake can cause gangrene,
leading to amputation of appendages. Intravenous injection of diazepam can
stop breathing and heart action; when administering the drug intravenously
hospitals are prepared for such emergencies, but most street users are not.
Intravenous injection can also lower muscle strength and blood pressure. In
a small percentage of human volunteers (5% or less), rectal administration has
produced euphoria, breathing difficulty, skin rash, runny nose, or diarrhea.
Diazepam is one of the few drugs that can cause flat brain wave readings
in a living person. Such readings are a classic sign of death, and medical
personnel seeing such readings might decide to stop efforts that are keeping
a patient alive.
Abuse factors. Among illicit drug users in the 1990s diazepam was the most
common benzodiazepine. When researchers supplied recreational drug users
with several benzodiazepine class substances, diazepam was rated as having
the most abuse potential. In testing of the drug’s appeal, volunteers reported
that the higher the dose, the higher the attractiveness. Researchers evaluating
results of an experiment involving recreational drug users judged diazepam
to be even more effective in producing pleasure than in producing medical
effects.
In one experiment with recreational drug users over one third of them described
diazepam’s effects as reminiscent of barbiturates, which produce effects
similar to alcohol. Perhaps such effects explain why tests of drug
preference show diazepam to be popular among moderate alcohol drinkers.
Research indicates that euphoria from diazepam is more likely in a person
with a family history of alcoholism. Moderate drinkers find diazepam more
appealing than light drinkers do, but that may be due less to alcohol per se
than due to a personality that finds drugs generally attractive.
A rat experiment measured development of diazepam tolerance in those
animals. Humans can develop dependence with diazepam, causing a withdrawal
syndrome if dosage ceases all at once instead of gradually. Depending
on how much of the drug has been used for how long, withdrawal symptoms
can be mild or strong. Mild cases may simply involve trembling, reduced
appetite, and trouble falling asleep. In bad cases a person can experience perspiration,
muscle cramps and tremors, vomiting, and convulsions. Sudden
stoppage of long-term diazepam dosage can provoke seizures, so doses need
to be tapered off instead.
Drug interactions. Alcohol and diazepam can boost each other’s actions.
Diazepam effects can also be intensified by barbiturates, opiates, and monoamine
oxidase inhibitors (MAOIs—found in some antidepressants). Those interactions
can be fatal. Effect of a diazepam dose can be lengthened by
propoxyphene and by the ulcer drugs omeprazole and cimetidine. One study
found that a dose tends to last for a shorter time among alcoholics. In a dog
experiment phenobarbital decreased diazepam levels in the animals. In mice
diazepam has boosted toxic effects from the cancer medicine ifosfamide. The
120 Diazepam
more tobacco cigarettes people smoke, the less drowsy diazepam makes them.
Body weight also affects diazepam actions, with drug build-up and elimination
taking longer in bodies of fatter people. Experimenters have even found
that drug effects can vary by time of day; at night diazepam prolongs the
presence of an ibuprofen dose.
Cancer. Experimentation shows diazepam to have potential for causing
cancer in mice, results causing researchers to suspect the same possibility in
humans. Tests with rats, gerbils, and hamsters produced no cancer risk. Examination
of medical records from almost 13,000 diazepam users found no
link to a higher cancer rate. Several other investigations found no connection
between the drug and assorted human cancers, but results have been mixed
on association with ovarian cancer.
Pregnancy. Hamsters receiving the drug during pregnancy can produce offspring
with cleft palate and other skull abnormalities. Similar results are seen
in mice, particularly if cocaine is used as well. Chicken embryos exposed to
diazepam develop malformations. Diazepam experiments with rats have resulted
in fewer pregnancies and higher death rates for pups. Some rat experiments
produce birth defects and some do not; size of dose may be important.
If pregnant mice receive the drug, their male offspring may have difficulty
with sexual functioning as adults. (In contrast, the drug is used for treating
impaired male sexual functioning in humans.) Rodent offspring may suffer
from compromised immune systems. They also may act more nervous than
pups who lack fetal exposure, although rats that have no fetal exposure, but
instead receive multiple doses soon after birth, act less uneasy in later life
after dosage has stopped. A number of rodent studies find that prenatal exposure
to diazepam may produce assorted behavioral effects that do not appear
until adolescence or adulthood. Those effects are measured by various
tests (running mazes and the like) that are difficult to extrapolate to human
experience, but the point is that diazepam’s effects may be unapparent in
newborns and take years to emerge.
A study of 689 pregnant women taking assorted antidepressants was unable
to attribute any birth defects to diazepam, and the same results came from a
smaller study; but nonetheless the drug is suspected of causing malformations.
Measurements from pregnant women indicate that diazepam passes to the
fetus and builds up there; blood levels of the drug in newborns can be higher
than the mother’s. Some researchers find that the drug slows fetal brain development.
A case report notes severe multiple malformations in an infant
whose mother used diazepam during pregnancy but does not establish cause
and effect. Researchers tracked medical histories of several thousand women
whose babies had major malformations and found an association between
diazepam and cleft lip, the association becoming even stronger if women had
smoked while taking diazepam during pregnancy. Additional research has
associated diazepam with birth defects involving the heart, stomach obstruction,
and hernia. Association, however, does not prove cause and effect. Indeed,
other research has found no association between diazepam and cleft lip
or any other congenital malformation. One study found that newborns with
fetal exposure to diazepam tend to weigh less than normal, but they soon gain
weight and reach a normal level. Infants have exhibited withdrawal symptoms
Diazepam 121
if their mothers used diazepam during pregnancy; those symptoms may not
appear immediately after birth.
Nursing mothers are advised to avoid the drug, which can continue to pass
into breast milk long after drug use is halted. The drug can build up in babies,
enough that they can be sedated by milk from mothers using diazepam, and
the infants may lose weight while nursing.
Additional information. Methaqualone and diazepam each have the nickname
“Ludes,” but the drugs are different substances.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Clarke, C.H., and A.N. Nicholson. “Immediate and Residual Effects in Man of
the Metabolites of Diazepam.” British Journal of Clinical Pharmacology 6 (1978):
325–31.
Giri, A.K., and S. Banerjee. “Genetic Toxicology of Four Commonly Used Benzodiazepines:
A Review.” Mutation Research 340 (1996): 93–108.
Gotestam, K.G., and B.E. Andersson. “Subjective Effects and Vigilance after Diazepam
and Oxazepam in Normal Subjects.” Acta Psychiatrica Scandinavica 19, no. 274
(1978, Suppl.): 117–21.
Griffiths, R.R., et al. “Comparison of Diazepam and Oxazepam: Preference, Liking and
Extent of Abuse.” Journal of Pharmacology and Experimental Therapeutics 229
(1984): 501–8.
Griffiths, R.R., et al. “Relative Abuse Liability of Diazepam and Oxazepam: Behavioral
and Subjective Dose Effects.” Psychopharmacology (Berlin) 84 (1984): 147–54.
Juergens, S. “Alprazolam and Diazepam: Addiction Potential.” Journal of Substance
Abuse Treatment 8 (1991): 43–51.
Sutton, L.R., and S.A. Hinderliter. “Diazepam Abuse in Pregnant Women on Methadone
Maintenance. Implications for the Neonate.” Clinical Pediatrics 29 (1990):
108–11.
Willumeit, H.P., H. Ott, and W. Neubert. “Simulated Car Driving as a Useful Technique
for the Determination of Residual Effects and Alcohol Interaction after Shortand
Long-Acting Benzodiazepines.” Psychopharmacology, no. 1 (1984, Suppl.):
182–92.
Diethylpropion
Pronunciation: dye-eth-ill-PROH-pee-on
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 90-84-6. (Hydrochloride form 134-
80-5)
Formal Names: Adiposan, Amfepramone, Anfamon, Apisate, Bonumin, Brendalit,
Dietic, Dietil-Retard, DIP, Dobesin, Frekentine, Lineal-Rivo, Linea-Valeas, Lipomin,
Liposlim, Magrene, Moderatan, M-Orexic, Nobesine, Nulobes, Prefamone,
Propion, Regenon, Regibon, Slim-plus, Tenuate, Tenuate Dospan,
Tepanil
Informal Names: Blues
Type: Stimulant (anorectic class). See page 15
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule IV (DEA no. 1610)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: B
Uses. Humans find the drug’s effects similar to those of dextroamphetamine
but at a weaker level. One experiment found dextroamphetamine 6 to 11 times
stronger than diethylpropion when given orally, 10 to 20 times stronger when
given by subcutaneous injection. Although diethylpropion was created in the
1920s, this amphetamine derivative was not marketed for weight loss until
around 1960. The drug then achieved great popularity. Over 30 million persons
around the globe had taken the drug by 1978. That year 1.5 billion prescriptions
were written, but the number dropped to just one-fourth that
amount by 1988 as the medical world became more aware of the drug’s drawbacks.
Occasional short-term usage rather than continual use has been recommended.
The compound breaks up sleep and interferes with dreaming but
has fewer stimulant effects than some other anorectics. Users feel less fatigue
than with fenfluramine, and undesirable effects of diethylpropion disappear
faster than those of fenfluramine when the drug is stopped. Studies of weight
loss patients using diethylpropion found only trivial impact on heart rate or
blood pressure, and the compound is considered a good choice for patients
with high blood pressure.
Diethylpropion has been used experimentally to reduce craving for cocaine,
with some success. Some researchers question that finding, however, pointing
out that craving for cocaine diminishes in a hospital setting regardless of
Diethylpropion 123
whether patients receive diethylpropion or a placebo. In a two-week study,
former crack cocaine users receiving diethylpropion showed no change in tests
of thinking abilities. That result is interpreted as meaning that short-term use
of diethylpropion may cause no measurable harm to brain function.
Another experimental use of the drug has been for relief of arthritis pain.
Patients experienced increase of comfort but no increase in ability to use affected
joints.
Drawbacks. Minor unwanted actions may include dizziness, dry mouth,
and constipation. In a study of 132 patients taking the drug, about 3% had
experiences such as euphoria, muscle tremors, or trouble with sleeping. Assorted
scientific reports indicate the drug rarely has untoward physical effects;
the medical literature mentions an addict who ingested 30 to 100 times the
recommended amount each day without major impact. Exceptions to the
drug’s relative safety do occur. Diethylpropion is suspected of being involved
in a case where someone suffered minor strokes (transient ischemic attacks),
is suspected of contributing to a case of heart trouble, and is known to cause
heart trouble if an overdose is taken. A rare affliction ascribed to the drug is
overdevelopment of the vestigial male mammary glands.
The drug may bring on psychosis, especially when taken along with a monoamine
oxidase inhibitor (MAOI, found in some antidepressants and other
medicine). One user felt under assault from persons using mental telepathy;
another heard voices; another thought a television set was observing her; another
began worrying about someone using the “evil eye” to kill a child. In
some cases those problems ceased after the diet drug stopped; in others the
affliction reappeared. A therapist reporting on the latter type of cases suspected
that the persons would have developed psychosis regardless of
whether they used diethylpropion. The typical sufferer is a female 25 to 40
years old, leading a troubled life with a history of mental instability and drug
abuse. Drugs abused by these women often include amphetamines, an important
factor because a former amphetamine abuser who later takes another
stimulant can quickly shift back into the old abuse mode. Often such persons
begin taking diethylpropion to help them lose weight but afterward continue
taking it for pleasurable psychic effect. That special group’s experience, however,
is not commonplace among users in general.
Abuse factors. The drug’s amphetamine-type effects are strong enough to
have produced an illicit market for diethylpropion in the 1960s, but large
surveys determining levels of abuse for various drugs yielded no mention of
diethylpropion during the drug’s peak of popularity in the mid-1970s. In that
era analysis of 5,204 street drug samples found 1 containing diethylpropion.
Because the compound is described as producing effects resembling those of
amphetamine, diethylpropion is not recommended for persons who have suffered
from psychological illness or drug abuse. Binge abusers report that
pleasant sensations can be obtained for one to three days, but then nervousness
and restlessness predominate if dosing continues. Tolerance develops to
the drug’s stimulant actions.
Drug interactions. Experiments with mice show that alcohol and diethylpropion
produce more locomotor activity than either drug alone. Researchers
in Brazil speculate that combining the two substances may increase other stim124
Diethylpropion
ulation sensations, perhaps explaining why using alcohol and anorectic drugs
together is allegedly so popular in that country. How popular is that practice?
In the latter 1980s the total distribution of diethylpropion and other anorectics
was compared to Brazil’s population, yielding enough drugs to supply a daily
dose to about 1.4% of the population that could afford to buy it, which is the
same as saying 0.7% of that wealthier population could be taking two doses
a day. The percentage of users becomes one third of those totals if doses are
divided among the entire population rather than just among those with
enough money to buy the drugs. By using a survey other researchers measured
use of anorectics as totaling 1.3% of the population in one area of southern
Brazil in 1994, confined mostly to women from higher classes using the
drugs under medical prescription. Those percentages lump together usage of
diethylpropion with other anorectics, so usage of diethylpropion would be a
fraction of those percentages. And recreational usage of diethylpropion together
with alcohol would be smaller yet.
Cancer. The drug’s potential for causing cancer is unknown.
Pregnancy. Tests with rabbits, mice, and rats produced no birth defects. A
case in which a pregnant woman taking diethylpropion gave birth to a malformed
infant raised fear that it may cause fetal damage, but studies of pregnant
women taking the drug attribute no birth defects to it. Nonetheless,
potential for human birth defects is unknown. The drug passes into breast
milk.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Bolding, O.T. “Diethylpropion Hydrochloride: An Effective Appetite Suppressant.”
Current Therapeutic Research: Clinical and Experimental 16 (1974): 40–48.
Carney, D.E., and E.D. Tweddell. “Double Blind Evaluation of Long Acting Diethylpropion
Hydrochloride in Obese Patients from a General Practice.” Medical Journal
of Australia 1 (1975): 13–15.
Carney, M.W.P., and M. Harris. “Psychiatric Disorder and Diethylpropion Hydrochloride.”
Practitioner 223 (1979): 549–52.
Cohen, S.D. “Diethylpropion (Tenuate): An Infrequently Abused Anorectic.” Psychosomatics
18 (1977): 28–33.
“Diethylpropion Psychosis.” Medical Journal of Australia 2 (1970): 1052–53.
Glazer, G. “Long-Term Pharmacology of Obesity 2000: A Review of Efficacy and
Safety.” Archives of Internal Medicine 161 (2001): 1814–24.
Hoffman, B.F. “Diet Pill Psychosis: Follow-up after 6 Years.” Canadian Medical Association
Journal 129 (1983): 1077–78.
Silverman, M., and Ronald O. “The Use of an Appetite Suppressant (Diethylpropion
Hydrochloride) during Pregnancy.” Current Therapeutic Research: Clinical and Experimental
13 (1971): 648–53.
Dihydrocodeine
Pronunciation: dye-high-droh-KOH-deen
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 125-28-0
Formal Names: BRON, DHC Continus, Drocode, Fortuss, Paracodin, Synalgos
Type: Depressant (opiate class). See page 22
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule II, III, or V, depending on product formulation
(DEA no. 9120)
USA Availability: Prescription and nonprescription
Uses. Cough suppression is a standard medical use for dihydrocodeine, and
it can also improve sleep in chronic coughers by reducing the number of times
that coughing wakes them. Although a dose may briefly impede breathing, in
a successful experiment the drug improved breathing in persons having
chronic airflow obstruction, allowing them to engage in more exercise such as
walking. The compound has also helped respiration of emphysema patients.
Dihydrocodeine has allowed persons with chronic heart failure to become
more physically active. The substance is a standard pain reliever but has been
found ineffective in helping some kinds of discomfort from surgical and dental
procedures, and excessive amounts of the drug can have the paradoxical effect
of increasing pain. Dihydrocodeine has at least the same pain relieving
strength as codeine, perhaps more. Morphine is considered about seven times
stronger than dihydrocodeine.
Drawbacks. Typical unwanted effects include sleepiness, nausea, and constipation.
Euphoria, dizziness, and abnormal dreams are occasionally reported.
Excessive dihydrocodeine dosage can cause muscle damage that is
known to clear up if the drug is discontinued. Hallucinations may occur. An
unusual case report tells of a person developing Alice in Wonderland Syndrome
and Lilliputian hallucinations after routinely drinking a dihydrocodeine
cough syrup for several years. In the Alice Syndrome people may see
real objects as far smaller than they actually are; the Lilliputian situation
(named for an episode in Gulliver’s Travels) involves seeing tiny imaginary
objects. Such conditions have also been associated with migraine, fevers, and
mononucleosis. In the apparently drug-induced case just mentioned, Lilliputian
hallucinations persisted despite psychiatric treatment.
Abuse factors. Although dihydrocodeine addiction rarely arises from medical
use, tolerance and dependence can develop if a person uses the substance
126 Dihydrocodeine
long enough. Drug maintenance programs, in which addicts are weaned off
one drug of abuse and switched to one that treatment authorities consider
preferable, have used dihydrocodeine to switch addicts from heroin and other
opiates. Those programs have also used methadone and dihydrocodeine to
substitute for each other: Methadone addicts have been switched to dihydrocodeine
and vice versa, substitution indicating that drug abusers find the two
substances to be similar. Body chemistry converts dihydrocodeine into dihydromorphine,
a Schedule I controlled substance. Although an illicit market
exists for dihydrocodeine, some physicians believe illegal diversion of prescriptions
is discouraged by the nature of the drug: Dissolving oral tablets for
injection is difficult, and intravenous injection typically produces discontentment
rather than euphoria.
Drug interactions. The drug may boost actions of the anti–blood clotting
medicine warfarin.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Many pregnant women have used dihydrocodeine with no apparent
harm to fetal development. Nonetheless, the compound is not recommended
during pregnancy, and excessive quantities can produce an infant
who is dependent at birth. Although researchers are uncertain if the substance
passes into breast milk, they believe the amount would be too small to noticeably
affect nursing infants.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Frame, J.W., et al. “A Comparison of Ibuprofen and Dihydrocodeine in Relieving Pain
Following Wisdom Teeth Removal.” British Dental Journal 166 (1989): 121–24.
Johnson, M.A., A.A. Woodcock, and D.M. Geddes. “Dihydrocodeine for Breathlessness
in Pink Puffers.” British Medical Journal 286 (1983): 675–77.
Marks, P., H. Ashraf, and T.R. Root. “Drug Dependence Caused by Dihydihydrocodeine.”
British Medical Journal 1 (1978): 1594.
Palmer, R.N., et al. “Incidence of Unwanted Effects of Dihydrocodeine Bitartrate in
Healthy Volunteers.” Lancet 17 (1966): 620–21.
Takaoka, K., and T. Takata. “ ‘Alice in Wonderland’ Syndrome and Lilliputian Hallucinations
in a Patient with a Substance-Related Disorder.” Psychopathology 32
(1999): 47–49.
Wotherspoon, H.A., G.N. Kenny, and C.S. McArdle. “Analgesic Efficacy of Controlled-
Release Dihydrocodeine. A Comparison of 60, 90 and 120 Mg Tablets in Cold-
Induced Pain.” Anaesthesia 46 (1991): 915–17.
Diphenoxylate
Pronunciation: dye-fen-OCK-see-lait
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 915-30-0. (Hydrochloride form
3810-80-8)
Formal Names: Diarphen, Eldox, Logen, Lomotil, Lonox, Protector, Reasec, Retardinr,
Topergan
Type: Depressant (opioid class). See page 24
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule II or V, depending on product formulation
(DEA no. 9170)
USA Availability: Prescription and nonprescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. Diphenoxylate was developed in the 1950s but did not see much use
until the next decade. The drug is related to meperidine. When used alone at
high dosage levels, diphenoxylate produces effects reminiscent of morphine,
although pain relief capability is nil. Experimental rubbing of diphenoxylate
on patches of psoriasis has helped that skin condition. The drug is a standard
remedy for diarrhea and is commonly combined with atropine for that purpose.
Another purpose of the combination format is to deter recreational use
of the controlled substance, by forcing a would-be misuser to experience the
simultaneous unpleasant actions of atropine (such as dry mouth, fever, excited
behavior, and fuzzy eyesight).
Drawbacks. Diphenoxylate can reduce alertness and speed of movements,
making operation of dangerous machinery (such as cars) inadvisable. Other
effects of normal doses may include nausea, vomiting, dizziness, numbness,
despondency, or euphoria. The drug should be avoided by persons who
are prone to intestinal blockage because the compound can aggravate that
condition. Pancreatitis is associated with the drug, but a cause and effect
relationship is unconfirmed. Because diphenoxylate is available in a nonprescription
format, some people do not realize how dangerous an overdose can
be; breathing trouble leading to brain injury and death can occur; those consequences
mostly involve accidental overdose in children. Overdose on the
atropine component of a diphenoxylate combination product is also possible;
atropine poisoning can include fever, agitation, irregularity in heartbeat and
breathing, and psychosis involving hallucinations and delirium.
Abuse factors. Addiction to the diphenoxylate-atropine combination is un128
Diphenoxylate
usual, but a case report tells of someone who used dozens of tablets every
day for years. Under medical supervision the individual gradually reduced
and finally stopped dosage over a two-week period; dependence was only
slight, with mild flulike symptoms. A case is also reported of a drug addict
using diphenoxylate-atropine tablets to hold off withdrawal symptoms when
the person’s abused drug was unavailable. Medical personnel have administered
the diphenoxylate-atropine combination in order to wean addicts off
methadone maintenance. When the combination was used in that context,
recipients showed no signs of tolerance or addiction to it, an intriguing finding
because that population of recipients would be particularly susceptible to such
effects. Diphenoxylate has also been used to help addicts withdraw from
heroin.
Drug interactions. The drug may interact dangerously with monoamine
oxidase inhibitors (MAOIs, a component of some antidepressants and other
medication). Tranquilizers, alcohol, or barbiturates should not be mixed with
diphenoxylate.
Cancer. Diphenoxylate’s potential for causing cancer is unknown, although
animal experiments with the drug have found no tendency for the disease to
appear.
Pregnancy. Fertility of female rats was impaired when they were dosed
daily throughout a three-litter cycle at 50 times the recommended human
level. Litter sizes declined when the females daily received 10 times the human
dose. Tests on rats, mice, and rabbits revealed no birth defects, but results
were not conclusive. A small survey of human medical records found “no
strong associations” between the drug and various congenital malformations,
and associations are only an indication that further investigation is needed,
not that a problem exists. Diphenoxylate’s effect on milk of nursing mothers
is uncertain, but the atropine component in a diphenoxylate combination
product does pass into the milk.
Additional information. Although difenoxin (CAS RN 28782-42-5) is available
as a pharmaceutical preparation, body chemistry also produces this substance
from a dose of diphenoxylate. By itself, difenoxin is a Schedule I
substance illegal to possess under any circumstance (DEA no. 9168), officially
classified as having no medical value. When combined with enough atropine
sulfate, however, difenoxin is a Schedule IV prescription drug known as Lyspafen
and Motofen.
Difenoxin acts much like diphenoxylate and is used to treat diarrhea. Dangers
are similar to diphenoxylate’s. A two-year experiment gave daily doses
of difenoxin and atropine to rats and produced no evidence that the combination
causes cancer.
In rat experimentation the difenoxin-atropine combination (Pregnancy Category
C) had only a weak impact on fertility, and no birth defects were attributed
to the combination after being administered to rats and rabbits at
levels that were dozens of times the amount recommended for humans. Pregnant
rats, however, did have longer labor and more stillbirths, and a higher
percentage of their offspring died as newborns. The difenoxin-atropine combination
is not recommended for pregnant women or nursing mothers.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Diphenoxylate 129
Favin, F.D. “Chronic High-Dose Lomotil Abuse and Safe Withdrawal.” ASHP Midyear
Clinical Meeting 26 (December 1991): 92D.
Ives, T.J. “Illicit Use of Diphenoxylate Hydrochloride to Prevent Narcotic Withdrawal
Symptoms.” Drug Intelligence and Clinical Pharmacy 14 (1980): 715–16.
Kleinman, M.H., and D. Arnon. “Use of Diphenoxylate Hydrochloride (Lomotil) in the
Management of the Minor Withdrawal Syndrome during Methadone Detoxification:
Clinical Report.” British Journal of Addiction 72 (1977): 167–69.
Penfold, D., and G.N. Volans. “Overdose from Lomotil.” British Medical Journal 2 (1977):
1401–2.
Rumack, B.H., and A.R. Temple. “Lomotil Poisoning.” Pediatrics 53 (1974): 495–500.
Whitehead, W.E., A. Wald, and N.J. Norton. “Treatment Options for Fecal Incontinence.”
Diseases of the Colon and Rectum 44 (2001): 131–42.
Dipipanone
Pronunciation: dih-PIP-uh-nohn
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 467-83-4
Formal Names: Diconal, Piperidyl-Methadone, Wellconal
Type: Depressant (opioid class). See page 24
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule I (DEA no. 9622)
USA Availability: Illegal to possess
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. Actions of this drug are similar to those of morphine. Dipipanone has
no officially approved medical usage in the United States, but elsewhere it is
used as a powerful pain reliever for conditions such as surgery and cancer.
Some cancer patients prefer this drug for pain control. The compound can
control coughs.
Drawbacks. Persons are supposed to avoid the drug if they suffer from low
thyroid activity or enlarged prostate. Dipipanone can make people sleepy, and
users are supposed to be cautioned about operating dangerous machinery.
Volunteers in one experiment experienced lower alertness after taking dipipanone,
but other experiments found the substance to lack sedative action.
Study does show that sedation can occur when dipipanone is given together
with the antihistamine triprolidine. Dipipanone can cause headache, tremors,
nausea, and vomiting, impair vision, interfere with breathing, make urination
difficult, lower blood pressure, and reduce production of saliva. Seizures have
been reported. Euphoria may occur. A case study notes delusions and hallucinations
caused by the drug. Paranoia has occurred occasionally. A case report
tells of serious colon difficulty occurring after someone injected three
dissolved oral Diconal tablets, a combination product containing dipipanone
and the antivomiting drug cyclizine, accompanied by drinking three liters of
beer. Even in ordinary medical use, however, dipipanone can cause constipation
and is supposed to be used cautiously if a person has bowel obstruction.
Abuse factors. Dipipanone is related to methadone and can be substituted
for assorted opioids. That property gave dipipanone a role in addiction treatment
programs seeking to switch addicts to dipipanone. Tolerance and dependence
can occur. Reportedly drug abusers find dipipanone more potent
than heroin, and in combination with cyclizine, dipipanone reportedly can
Dipipanone 131
create a rush of enjoyment that some persons prefer over heroin. In the 1980s
some British observers considered dipipanone abuse to be as much a problem
as abuse of methadone and methylphenidate, with some addicts getting their
supplies legally from doctors. Rather little has been heard about the substance
since then, however.
Drug interactions. Dipipanone may interact badly with monoamine oxidase
inhibitors (MAOIs), which are substances found in some antidepressants and
other medication.
Cancer. Potential for causing cancer is unknown.
Pregnancy. Potential for birth defects is unknown. Authorities are uncertain
whether the drug passes into a nursing mother’s milk, but they believe the
level would be so low as to cause no harm to the infant. An infant can be
born dependent on the drug if the mother has been using it during the final
trimester of pregnancy.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Bound, D., and S. Greer. “Psychotic Symptoms after Dipipanone.” Lancet 2 (1978): 480.
Faull, C., et al. “Experience with Dipipanone Elixir in the Management of Cancer Related
Pain—Case Study.” Palliative Medicine 8 (1994): 63–65.
Posner, J., et al. “Effects of an Opiate on Cold-Induced Pain and the CNS in Healthy
Volunteers.” Pain 23 (1985): 73–82.
Stewart, M.J., et al. “Forensic Toxicology in Urban South Africa.” Journal of Toxicology:
Clinical Toxicology 38 (2000): 415–19.
Telekes, A., et al. “Effects of Triprolidine and Dipipanone in the Cold Induced Pain
Test, and the Central Nervous System of Healthy Volunteers.” British Journal of
Clinical Pharmacology 24 (1987): 43–50.
Turnbull, A.R., and P. Isaacson. “Ischemic Colitis and Drug Abuse.” British Medical
Journal 2 (1977): 1000.
DMT
Pronunciation: dee-em-tee
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 61-50-7
Formal Names: Dimethyltryptamine, N,N-Dimethyltryptamine
Informal Names: AMT, Businessman’s LSD, Businessman’s Special, Businessman’s
Trip, Cohoba Snuff, Disneyland, Disneyworld, Dmitri, Fantasia, 45 Minute
Psychosis, 45 Minute Trip, Instant Psychosis, Psychosis
Type: Hallucinogen. See page 25
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule I (DEA no. 7435)
USA Availability: Illegal to possess
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. Various plants contain this chemical, and minute quantities are manufactured
by body processes in mammals. The substance can also be made in
a laboratory and is chemically similar to bufotenine. Grasses containing DMT
can sicken and kill livestock.
Native peoples of the Amazon use snuffs and drinks containing DMT for
religious purposes. Supposedly such drinks can give a person telepathy and
other ESP (extrasensory perception) powers, but one researcher failed to
achieve such states even though he used the drink 30 times while living
among a native population for three years.
In rat experiments the animals acted as if DMT is similar to LSD. A human
study found DMT to evoke visual and auditory hallucinations so intense that
the volunteers lost contact with ordinary reality during the drug experience.
The volunteers vacillated back and forth between euphoria and unease.
In contrast, a different human study comparing DMT and delta-9-
tetrahydrocannabinol (also called THC, the main active ingredient in marijuana)
found their actions to be equivalent. The finding was exceptional,
however; most reports describe DMT as a potent hallucinogen with actions
reminiscent of LSD or mescaline. Some people are said to become relaxed as
DMT’s initial actions wear off.
One commonly mentioned DMT effect is awareness of elves, fairies, or some
alien intelligence—encounters that users do not necessarily find pleasant.
Some users say that time seems to slow. Most scientists seek explanations that
do not require acceptance of alternative realities, because throughout the history
of science the simplest explanations tend to be correct. For example, time
DMT 133
may seem slower if many events crowd simultaneously on someone’s consciousness—
an explanation that does not require time itself to alter. Likewise,
industrious investigators have detected changes in the eye during DMT intoxication,
changes that the brain may interpret as light and that a person can
“see” as hallucinations.
Drawbacks. While under DMT’s influence a person can experience memory
trouble, shortened attention span, and altered perception of one’s body. Physical
effects may include dizziness, nausea, tingling, trembling, weakness, and
breathing difficulty, along with higher body temperature, heart rate, and
blood pressure. Reportedly a typical human-size dose per body weight is
enough to kill a sheep.
Some researchers suspect that excessive natural production of DMT and
related substances by a person’s body processes may be the cause of schizophrenia
and other psychotic conditions. Research along that line has produced
mixed results. One study found that DMT levels generally went up and down
in psychiatric patients, depending on outbreaks of psychotic behavior and
return to normalcy, but timing of the shifts did not always match changes in
patients’ conditions. In addition, psychologically normal persons with liver
disease can have DMT levels about as high as those found in schizophrenic
individuals.
Abuse factors. Human experimentation has detected no development of tolerance
to DMT’s psychological effects. Tolerance to some physical actions
(such as higher pulse rate) has been measured, but tolerance to increase of
blood pressure has not been seen. Mice form a tolerance to DMT, and rats not
only acquire a tolerance to DMT but have also exhibited cross-tolerance with
LSD (meaning the drugs can be substituted for each other, in some ways at
least). Humans have also shown partial cross-tolerance between those two
drugs. Cats and monkeys fail to develop tolerance to various DMT effects
(such as changes in appetite, behavior, and coordination) but apparently tolerance
can develop to other effects. Some researchers feel that DMT tolerance
is an uncertain phenomenon at best.
Drug interactions. Not enough scientific information to report.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Not enough scientific information to report.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Fish, M.S., and E.C. Horning. “Studies on Hallucinogenic Snuffs.” Journal of Nervous
and Mental Disease 124 (1956): 33–37.
Gillin, J.C., et al. “The Psychedelic Model of Schizophrenia: The Case of N,NDimethyltryptamine.”
American Journal of Psychiatry 133 (1976): 203–8.
Riba, J., et al. “Subjective Effects and Tolerability of the South American Psychoactive
Beverage Ayahuasca in Healthy Volunteers.” Psychopharmacology (Berlin) 154
(2001): 85–95.
Rosenberg, D.E., et al. “The Effect of N,N-Dimethyltryptamine in Human Subjects Tolerant
to Lysergic Acid Diethylamide.” Psychopharmacologia 5 (1964): 217–27.
Shulgin, A.T. “Profiles of Psychedelic Drugs—DMT.” Journal of Psychedelic Drugs 8
(1976): 167–68.
Strassman, R.J. “Human Psychopharmacology of N,N-Dimethyltryptamine.” Behavioural
Brain Research 73 (1996): 121–24.
134 DMT
Strassman, R.J., et al. “Dose-Response Study of N,N-Dimethyltryptamine in Humans.
II. Subjective Effects and Preliminary Results of a New Rating Scale.” Archives
of General Psychiatry 51 (1994): 98–108.
Sza´ra, S. “The Comparison of the Psychotic Effect of Tryptamine Derivatives with the
Effects of Mescaline and LSD-25 in Self-Experiments.” In Psychotropic Drugs, ed.
S. Garattini and V. Ghetti. New York: Elsevier, 1957. 460–67.
DOB
Pronunciation: dee-oh-bee
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 53581-53-6
Formal Names: 4-Bromo-2,5-Dimethoxyamphetamine
Informal Names: Bob, Bromo-DMA, Bromo-STP, PBR
Type: Hallucinogen. See page 25
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule I (DEA no. 7391)
USA Availability: Illegal to possess
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. This drug became available in the 1960s. It can produce hallucinations
and affect interpretations of time and space. Some persons who thought they
took LSD were actually on DOB. Research has found DOB effects to develop
more gradually and to be more prolonged than those of LSD.
A chemist who knew he was taking pure DOB reported that a small dose
brightened his perception of colors and created a mellow mood. Larger doses
created muscle tremors and increased insight into psychological issues. The
chemist recommended against attempting to drive a car while intoxicated. In
a controlled experimental setting with volunteers interested in using the drug
to gain better awareness of themselves, the drug stimulated thoughts, feelings,
and physical senses. People became more articulate, saw new meaning in ordinary
experiences, and became more inclined to self-examination. In contrast
to MDA experiences, the DOB volunteers showed less lethargy and were
more interested in what was going on around them. No hallucinations occurred.
Drawbacks. In canines DOB can elevate body temperature and blood pressure.
In humans DOB’s physical effects can include nausea, diarrhea, muscle
spasms, blood vessel spasms, sensations of tingling and burning, impaired
sense of touch, convulsions, and seizures. The drug may be safe from a technical
pharmaceutical standpoint because there is a huge difference between
the size of a therapeutic dose and a lethal one, but the drug is so potent that
small doses are known to kill. Effects may last for hours and suddenly intensify
and become fatal. Characteristics of overdose can resemble those of amphetamine,
including fear and physical aggression. The medical literature
includes a DOB case somewhat resembling ergotism (see ergot), resulting in
the patient’s lower legs being amputated.
136 DOB
Abuse factors. Not enough scientific information to report.
Drug interactions. Alcohol may increase the strength of a DOB dose.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Not enough scientific information to report.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Buhrich, N., G. Morris, and G. Cook. “Bromo-DMA: The Australasian Hallucinogen?”
Australian and New Zealand Journal of Psychiatry 17 (1983): 275–79.
Davis, W.M. “LSD or DOB?” American Journal of Psychiatry 139 (1982): 1649.
Delliou, D. “4-Bromo-2,5-Dimethoxyamphetamine: Psychoactivity, Toxic Effects and
Analytical Methods.” Forensic Science International 21 (1983): 259–67.
Shulgin, A.T., T. Sargent, and C. Naranjo. “4-Bromo-2,5-Dimethoxyphenylisopropylamine,
a New Centrally Active Amphetamine Analog.” Pharmacology 5 (1971): 103–7.
Toennes, S.W., et al. “Aufkla¨rung eines unklaren neurologischen Syndroms durch toxikologische
Untersuchungen [Explanation of an Unclear Neurological Syndrome
by Toxicologic Investigation].” Deutsche Medizinische Wochenschrift 125 (2000):
900–902. (Abstract in English).
DOM
Pronunciation: dee-oh-em
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 15588-95-1
Formal Names: 4-Methyl-2,5-Dimethoxyamphetamine
Informal Names: Serenity, Stop the Police, STP, Super Terrific Psychedelic, Too
Stupid to Puke, Tranquility
Type: Hallucinogen. See page 25
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule I (DEA no. 7395)
USA Availability: Illegal to possess
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. This substance was a classic of the 1960s drug scene, where it was
likened to LSD and nicknamed STP for “Serenity, Tranquility, and Peace” and
apparently performed as advertised. Because of the nickname initials some
persons have confused the drug with a motor oil additive called STP, but they
are different substances.
DOM is a powerful drug, 50 to 100 times stronger than mescaline, to which
DOM is chemically related. Rats respond to DOM and mescaline in similar
ways. Chemically DOM is not only related to mescaline but also to amphetamine,
and an experiment using low dosages of DOM found that the drug
had a typical stimulant effect of improving performance on simple learning
tasks.
Psychological and hallucinogenic effects depend on size of dose. As the size
increases, so do intensity and longevity of effects. Many reports of alleged
DOM experiences exist, but typically we do not know if the illicit substance
really was DOM. One person who did ingest the real thing described hallucinations,
brightened mood, more awareness of colors, more enjoyment of
music and sex, and various insights into personal issues facilitated by the
drug. Volunteers who received DOM in a formal experiment also experienced
improved spirits and insights, but the amount of DOM was not enough to
produce hallucinations. Results from another experiment showed increased
awareness of emotion and thoughts, leading researchers to conclude that the
substance might be useful in psychotherapy. In still another experiment psychological
effects included disturbed perceptions of time and space, a sensation
of voices being distant, echoing sound, seeing sound as light, seeing
138 DOM
ordinary movement as stroboscopic jerkiness, seeing surfaces moving sinuously,
and feeling like one was no longer located in one’s body.
Drawbacks. An experiment documented physical sensations that included
warmth, tingling, dizziness, nausea, tremors, rapid heartbeat, impaired movement,
coughing, sweating, and lack of hunger. Insomnia has also been reported.
In rats DOM can raise body temperature and lower appetite.
Supposedly effects from a single dose can last for three days, but in a group
of 25 volunteers who took substantial doses, only 2 persons experienced effects
lasting past the day of the experiment, and none had any effects on the second
day afterward. Some users who expect the drug to act like LSD have not
realized that DOM effects take longer to develop, and after waiting the
amount of time they would wait for LSD actions to begin, those persons have
taken more DOM in a mistaken belief that the original amount was not
enough. The result can be an overdose emergency. Achieving such an overdose
apparently takes dedication; one estimate puts DOM’s safety index at
10,000 (meaning a person would have to take 10,000 times the amount of a
standard effective dose in order to be poisoned). Some investigators wonder
if previous use of psychoactive drugs makes people more sensitive to DOM,
thereby making overdose easier.
Abuse factors. Tolerance can develop.
Drug interactions. Not enough scientific information to report.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Not enough scientific information to report.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Hollister, L.E., M.F. Macnicol, and H.K. Gillespie. “An Hallucinogenic Amphetamine
Analog (DOM) in Man.” Psychopharmacologia 14 (1969): 62–73.
Ropero-Miller, J.D., and B.A. Goldberger. “Recreational Drugs: Current Trends in the
90s.” Clinics in Laboratory Medicine 18 (1998): 727–46.
Shulgin, A.T., T. Sargent, and C. Naranjo. “4-Bromo-2,5-Dimethoxyphenylisopropylamine,
a New Centrally Active Amphetamine Analog.” Pharmacology 5
(1971): 103–7.
Snyder, S.H., L.A. Faillace, and H. Weingartner. “DOM (STP), a New Hallucinogenic
Drug, and DOET: Effects in Normal Subjects.” American Journal of Psychiatry 125
(1968): 357–64.
Snyder, S.H., L. Faillace, and L. Hollister. “2,5-Dimethoxy-4-Methyl-Amphetamine
(STP): A New Hallucinogenic Drug.” Science 158 (1967): 669–70.
Dronabinol
See also Marijuana
Pronunciation: droh-NAB-i-nol
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 1972-08-3
Formal Names: Delta-9-Tetrahydrocannabinol, Marinol, THC
Type: Hallucinogen. See page 25
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule III (DEA no. 7369)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. This is a pure form of THC, the main active ingredient found in the
Schedule I substance marijuana. Dronabinol can be obtained from marijuana
or manufactured synthetically. Compared to infrequent marijuana users, frequent
marijuana users are better at identifying whether they have received
dronabinol or a placebo.
Dronabinol is used to reduce nausea in persons undergoing cancer chemotherapy
and to stimulate appetite in AIDS (acquired immunodeficiency
syndrome) patients. Alzheimer’s patients who received experimental dronabinol
showed improved appetites and reduction of behavior associated with
the disease. Research indicates that the drug may widen airways, a help to
persons suffering from breathing difficulty. Experimental success has also
been achieved in treating spasticity, reducing not only that affliction but its
associated rigidity and pain. Research has also examined whether dronabinol
may work as a cough medicine. Human testing shows that oral dosage of
dronabinol’s active ingredient THC can help reduce pain.
Drawbacks. Dronabinol can redden eyes and accelerate or slow heartbeat.
Sometimes users feel faint upon suddenly standing up. Many of marijuana’s
actions are experienced with dronabinol: euphoria, hallucinations, more acuteness
in physical senses, altered time perception, memory trouble, confusion,
and drowsiness. Not everyone finds marijuana actions to be pleasant, and
some nausea patients find those effects so unpleasant that they would rather
forgo the dronabinol and endure the nausea. Some other effects associated
with marijuana have not been observed with medical use of dronabinol, such
as trouble with thinking skills and lack of ambition.
Abuse factors. Tolerance occurs to some of the drug’s actions but not to
appetite stimulation. Dependence is reported, with withdrawal symptoms in140
Dronabinol
cluding sleeping difficulty, peevishness, fidgeting, perspiration, runny nose,
appetite loss, and loose bowel movements. In one study withdrawal symptoms
lasted three days and gradually cleared up over that time. Addiction is
uncommon. No one in a five-month study, including persons who had previously
abused other drugs, began abusing dronabinol; nor did any of these
persons exhibit changes of personality or changes of ability to function in
society. An effort to discover evidence of illicit use in San Francisco found
none. Apparently persons interested in recreational effects of dronabinol prefer
marijuana.
Drug interactions. Animal experimentation has found that dronabinol
substantially increases the pain relieving qualities of codeine, heroin, hydromorphone,
meperidine, methadone, morphine, and oxymorphone. The antinausea
drug prochlorperazine appears to reduce the unwanted marijuana
actions of dronabinol.
Cancer. Dronabinol’s potential for causing cancer is unknown. The Ames
test, a standard laboratory procedure for detecting cancer-causing potential,
revealed none.
Pregnancy. No birth defects have been attributed to dronabinol in mice and
rat experiments, although more pregnancy failures occurred. THC passes from
a pregnant animal into the fetus. Pregnant women are advised to be cautious
with the drug. It passes into milk of nursing mothers, and levels in milk are
higher than in the mothers’ bloodstream.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Beal, J.E., et al. “Long-Term Efficacy and Safety of Dronabinol for Acquired Immunodeficiency
Syndrome–Associated Anorexia.” Journal of Pain and Symptom Management
14 (1997): 7–14.
Calhoun, S.R., G.P. Galloway, and D.E. Smith. “Abuse Potential of Dronabinol (Marinol).”
Journal of Psychoactive Drugs 30 (1998): 187–96.
Devine, J.W., L.A. Mahr, and C.R. Rieck. “Effectiveness of Delta-9-
Tetrahydrocannabinol in Chemotherapy-Induced Nausea and Vomiting.” Journal
of the Iowa Pharmacy Association 54 (1999): 22–24, 47–50.
Gonzalez-Rosales, F., and D. Walsh. “Intractable Nausea and Vomiting Due to Gastrointestinal
Mucosal Metastases Relieved by Tetrahydrocannabinol (Dronabinol).”
Journal of Pain and Symptom Management 14 (1997): 311–14.
Haney, M., et al. “Abstinence Symptoms Following Oral THC Administration to Humans.”
Psychopharmacology 141 (1999): 385–94.
Kirk, J.M., and H. de Wit. “Responses to Oral Delta-9-Tetrahydrocannabinol in Frequent
and Infrequent Marijuana Users.” Pharmacology, Biochemistry, and Behavior
63 (1999): 137–42.
Struwe, M., et al. “Effect of Dronabinol on Nutritional Status in HIV Infection.” Annals
of Pharmacotherapy 27 (1993): 827–31.
Wright, P.L., et al. “Reproductive and Teratologic Studies with DELTA-9-
Tetrahydrocannabinol and Crude Marijuana Extract.” Toxicology and Applied
Pharmacology 38 (1976): 223–35.
Ephedrine
See also Ma Huang
Pronunciation: e-FED-rin (also pronounced EF-uh-dreen)
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 299-42-3. (Hydrochloride form 50-
98-6; sulfate form 134-72-5)
Formal Names: Broncholate Syrup, Elsinore, Kie Syrup, Letigen, Marax, Pretz-D,
Primatene, Rynatuss
Informal Names: Chinese Speed, Herbal Ecstasy, Herbal XTC
Type: Stimulant (amphetamine class). See page 12
Federal Schedule Listing: Unlisted
USA Availability: Varies by state and by product formulation
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. Although natural products containing the drug have a long history,
ephedrine was not isolated from ma huang until the 1880s. Ephedrine is found
in other plants as well. It can be refined from plants or synthesized in a laboratory.
Despite ma huang’s familiar use as a medicinal herb, Western medicine
did not accept ephedrine until the 1920s. Ephedrine has found usage in
standard medicine, alternative medicine, and recreation. Responding to a survey,
14 companies reported they sold the equivalent of 425 million individual
doses in 1995, 976 million in 1997, and 3 billion in 1999.
Some early uses have since become outmoded, such as against leprosy and
whooping cough. Weight loss experiments have found ephedrine, alone or in
combination with caffeine or aspirin, to be more effective than placebos and
also more effective than dexfenfluramine (see fenfluramine). A study found
ephedrine useful in helping heavy smokers to reduce the number of cigarettes
they consume. Standard medicine has also exploited ephedrine’s urinary retention
effect to help incontinent persons. The drug has been employed against
asthma, runny noses, narcolepsy, painful menstruation, and depression.
In alternative medicine ephedrine is marketed for losing weight, increasing
muscle mass, facilitating intellectual concentration, and promoting vigor. A
scientific study found that ephedrine in combination with caffeine (but not by
itself) significantly improves endurance in physical exercise. Many sports organizations
ban use of ephedrine by athletes.
Although not a true amphetamine, ephedrine has qualities reminiscent of
that stimulant class and has been commonly used to manufacture illicit meth142
Ephedrine
cathinone and methamphetamine. Indeed, ephedrine’s chemical relationship
to amphetamine and methamphetamine is so close that urine tests can misidentify
ephedrine as those drugs. In an experiment where people received a
substance without knowing what it was, ephedrine produced the same physical
and mental effects as phenmetrazine, methylphenidate, dextroamphetamine,
and methamphetamine. Ephedrine’s legal status was in flux as this book
was written: Depending on the federal or state jurisdiction, ephedrine might
be Schedule IV or a freely available unscheduled substance; commerce as a
medical drug might be legal, but commerce as a raw chemical might be a
crime.
Drawbacks. Amphetamine was designed in a laboratory to provide a substitute
for ephedrine because of the latter’s drawbacks. A double dose of
ephedrine can be poisonous, in comparison to other drugs with the same
therapeutic effects but that require 10 or 20 times the regular dose to become
severely toxic. For that reason many physicians prefer to avoid prescribing
ephedrine.
Ephedrine can cause skin rash, nausea, diarrhea, constipation, hepatitis, rise
in body temperature, jitteriness, insomnia, hyperactivity, irregular heartbeat,
high blood pressure, heart attack, stroke, seizures, kidney stones, visual and
auditory hallucinations, and paranoid psychosis. Ephedrine can worsen muscle
tics; animal experimentation shows the drug causing brain damage that
can lead to the tics seen in Parkinson’s disease. During strong physical exertion,
such as bodybuilding, ephedrine may increase danger of heart attack.
Suspicion exists that persons who stop taking ephedrine may be more sensitive
to it if they start using the drug again.
Many reports of adverse events come from cases in which a person was
using ephedrine diet supplements commonly found in health food stores. Perhaps
people regard such products as inherently “healthy” and fail to realize
that an ephedrine food supplement can produce a drug overdose or be hazardous
if used moderately but for too long.
The U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) became particularly alarmed
at the prevalence of medical problems developed by young healthy users, and
regulatory efforts were increasing when this book was written. Some scientists
say the FDA’s concerns are unfounded and that many physical problems after
ephedrine ingestion derive from a person’s prior medical history or massive
overdose. Nonetheless, the FDA believes that ephedrine may harm people
who already have the following conditions: prostate trouble, psychological
afflictions (including depression and nervousness), high blood pressure, diabetes,
glaucoma, and ailments of thyroid, kidney, or heart.
Alcohol is an ingredient in some ephedrine inhalers and can influence readings
in breathalyzer tests for drunk driving. That problem can be avoided by
a 15-minute wait between using the inhaler and administering a test.
Abuse factors. Historically ephedrine has seldom been abused, but in the
1990s it was cited as growing in popularity among youths, as a recreational
stimulant with euphoric and aphrodisiac effects. Such characteristics have allowed
illicit dealers to market ephedrine falsely as cocaine, methamphetamine,
and MDMA. Some cocaine users find ephedrine less satisfying but still
a satisfactory substitute. Reports of ephedrine addiction exist.
Ephedrine 143
Drug interactions. Caffeine boosts ephedrine’s power and can transform a
normal dose into a dangerous one. Aspirin and yohimbine (from yohimbe)
may also strengthen some ephedrine effects. Dangerous interactions can occur
with monoamine oxidase inhibitors (MAOIs, typically antidepressants). Less
serious adverse effects may occur if ephedrine is taken with the antiasthma
medicine theophylline.
Cancer. The FDA has noted research indicating that substances like ephedrine
may promote lung cancer, especially among tobacco smokers.
Pregnancy. Safety for use during pregnancy is unestablished. The drug is
known to raise fetal heart rate, and fetal blood levels can reach about 70% of
the pregnant woman’s blood level of ephedrine. The drug is transferred to
breast milk in sufficient quantity to affect nursing infants, making them
grouchy and interfering with their sleep. Chicken experiments with ephedrine
produce defects in embryos, but such testing is considered inconclusive regarding
human impact. Rabbit experiments find a mix of ephedrine, theophylline,
and phenobarbital to cause birth defects similar to those observed in
the child of a woman who took that drug combination while pregnant. The
same drug combination is suspected in another birth defect case. Although a
study of 373 human pregnancies found no malformations attributable to
ephedrine even when used in the first trimester, the drug is associated with
a small increase in likelihood of birth defects and is not recommended for use
during pregnancy.
Additional information. Many nonprescription remedies for common colds
include pseudoephedrine (CAS RN 345-78-8), which is related to ephedrine
and has similar effects, both desired and undesired. Depending on actions
being measured, pseudoephedrine may have from 25% to 50% of ephedrine’s
strength. Pseudoephedrine can be used to make methamphetamine and methcathinone.
Pseudoephedrine is believed to promote a dangerous bowel disease called
ischemic colitis, particularly in women around the time they go into menopause.
A case report indicates that taking pseudoephedrine with serotonin
reuptake inhibitor antidepressants may create a medical emergency called “serotonin
syndrome.” Typical signs of that condition are hyperactivity, confusion,
nervousness, vomiting, fast heartbeat, excessive body temperature,
shivering, tremors, weakness, or losing consciousness. Caution is advised
about using pseudoephedrine shortly after receiving vaccinations, which temporarily
increase body temperature. Nonetheless, in the 1980s research on
more than 100,000 individuals using prescription pseudoephedrine found no
hospitalizations caused by the drug.
Influence on fetal development is uncertain, although pseudoephedrine is
suspected of causing birth defects when used in the first trimester. The drug
is known to accelerate fetal heartbeat but has no particular effect on fetal blood
flow, nor does the substance seem to hinder passing nutrients and gases between
woman and fetus. Although excreted into human milk, the amount of
excretion is so slight as to be considered safe for infants of nursing mothers.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
“Adverse Events Associated with Ephedrine-Containing Products—Texas, December
1993–September 1995.” Morbidity and Mortality Weekly Report 45 (1996): 689–93.
144 Ephedrine
Astrup, A., et al. “The Effect and Safety of an Ephedrine/Caffeine Compound Compared
to Ephedrine, Caffeine and Placebo in Obese Subjects on an Energy Restricted
Diet. A Double Blind Trial.” International Journal of Obesity and Related
Metabolic Disorders 16 (1992): 269–77.
“Dietary Supplements Containing Ephedrine Alkaloids; Proposed Rule.” Federal Register
62 (1997): 30677–724.
Gruber, A.J., and H.G. Pope, Jr. “Ephedrine Abuse among 36 Female Weightlifters.”
American Journal on Addictions 7 (1998): 256–61.
James, L.P., et al. “Sympathomimetic Drug Use in Adolescents Presenting to a Pediatric
Emergency Department with Chest Pain.” Journal of Toxicology. Clinical Toxicology
36 (1998): 321–28.
Pipe, A., and C. Ayotte. “Nutritional Supplements and Doping.” Clinical Journal of Sport
Medicine 12 (2002): 245–49.
Whitehouse, A.M., and J.M. Duncan. “Ephedrine Psychosis Rediscovered.” British Journal
of Psychiatry 150 (1987): 258–61.
Ergot
Pronunciation: UR-guht
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 12126-57-7
Formal Names: Claviceps purpurea
Informal Names: Cockspur Rye, Hornseed, Mother of Rye, Muttercorn, Smut Rye,
Spur Kernels, Spurred Rye
Type: Hallucinogen. See page 25
Federal Schedule Listing: Unlisted
USA Availability: Nonprescription natural product
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. The history of ergot is composed of madness and disfiguring disease
but might still be an obscure footnote to medicine except for the discovery of
a related chemical in the 1930s called LSD. That link brought modern attention
to a normally inconspicuous natural product. Ergot comes from a rather fishysmelling
fungus growing on improperly stored grain (typically rye). In cool
and damp conditions ergot is also found on various grains and grasses in the
field. This happens around the world; in the 1990s Iowa’s barley crop suffered
infection. Ergot chemicals are also found in morning glory seeds. Although
ergot is typically an unwanted contamination in grain, sometimes the fungus
is deliberately cultivated to be harvested for pharmaceutical purposes.
Ergot is a traditional treatment to reduce menstrual blood flow and bleeding
after childbirth. The substance promotes contractions of the uterus, and the
raw product has been used for centuries as an aid to birthing. Unskilled administration,
however, can rupture the uterus. In more recent times ergonovine
(CAS RN 129-51-1) has been isolated from ergot as the active chemical
for promoting childbearing. Chemicals from ergot can induce abortions in
cows and sheep, but reports conflict on whether ergot has this effect on humans.
One authority notes that such attempted use can kill the pregnant
woman. Ergot preparations are still used as a fallback if no other drug provides
sufficient aid in childbirth, but they are generally avoided in modern
obstetrics.
Ergotamine, a substance derived from ergot, is used to treat migraine headache.
Raw ergot is not used for that purpose because the unprocessed natural
product would have too many unwanted effects, making the headache cure
worse than the disease. Ergot chemicals have also been used to treat meno146
Ergot
pause and for experimental treatment of patients suffering from Parkinson’s
disease and from mental deterioration associated with old age, including Alzheimer’s
disease. After volunteers took an ergot drug called co-dergocrine
they were stimulated and did better than normal on tests of thinking, decisions,
and physical movement. That finding is not surprising, given that LSD
is related to ergot and can act as a powerful stimulant.
Drawbacks. Entire communities have been devastated when residents ate
food contaminated with ergot. Such outbreaks of ergotism come in two varieties,
convulsive and gangrenous. Both can occur simultaneously. The gangrenous
kind is characterized by weeks of severe burning pain in appendages,
sometimes called St. Anthony’s Fire or Holy Fire. The convulsive kind can
involve dizziness, ringing in the ears, tingling fingers, hallucinations, vomiting,
convulsions, delirium, and a sensation that vermin are crawling underneath
the skin. Ergotism incidents occurred in Ethiopia in the 1970s, in India
during the 1950s, in Russia during the 1920s, and in the United States during
the 1800s. Some authorities argue that convulsions and hallucinations caused
by ergot were responsible for the Salem witchcraft accusations in colonial
America during the 1600s. Such instances are good examples of why herbal
medicine authorities recommend avoiding the natural product.
Ergot constricts blood vessels in fingers and toes, enough that repeated use
can cause gangrene. Extreme human cases can kill substantial portions of
entire limbs; the same result was seen in cows that grazed in an ergotcontaminated
pasture and in cattle that ate contaminated feed. Less serious
unwanted effects can include nausea, vomiting, chest pain, itching, weak legs,
and numb fingers. Extended dosage can cause difficulty in movement, impair
vision by damaging blood vessels in the eye, and produce inability to use
words.
Ergotamine can cause heart trouble and gangrenous ergotism. Rat tests
show that a wide variety of health problems are caused by chronic consumption
of ergocryptine, an ergot chemical.
Abuse factors. Not enough scientific information to report about tolerance,
dependence, withdrawal, or addiction. Deliberate consumption of the natural
product is probably rare.
Drug interactions. Ergot problems can be exacerbated by caffeine, by tobacco
cigarettes, by the HIV/AIDS drug ritonavir, and possibly by the antidepressant
fluoxetine (Prozac). A case report relates instances of bad reactions
occurring when people used ergot products along with “beta blockers,” a type
of drug that is typically prescribed for heart problems.
Cancer. In 1990 a World Health Organization study reported that no information
was available on ergot’s potential for causing cancer. Research published
in 1976, however, said that ergotamine and two other ergot chemicals
did not cause cell mutations in mice and hamsters (mutations can indicate
potential for cancer).
Pregnancy. Using ergot during pregnancy and nursing is considered hazardous.
Ergot chemicals consumed by a pregnant cow can pass into the fetus
and also appear in the cow’s milk. In pigs ergot can interfere with reproduction
and milk supply. Ergotamine is known to cause human fetal stress, is
known to cause birth defects in animals, and is suspected of causing birth
Ergot 147
defects in humans. Pregnant women who took drugs in unsuccessful suicide
attempts were the subjects of a study that tentatively concluded that ergotamine
did not cause congenital malformations, but the researchers felt they
needed more data to be sure. Other investigators have noted reports of ergotamine
birth defects consistent with reduced blood flow (a known action of
ergot preparations), but those reports have not been scientifically confirmed.
Clinical observations have noted that when nursing mothers use ergotamine
in the first week after birth, their infants show normal milk consumption and
normal weight gain during that week. Ergot passes into human milk, however,
and instances have been noted of infants poisoned from ergot in the milk.
Bromocriptine and cabergoline, drugs related to ergot, have been used in
circumstances when milk production needs to be suppressed in women who
have recently given birth. Cabergoline has been used experimentally to treat
pituitary cancer and Parkinson’s disease, and in certain circumstances the
drug should increase female fertility, but scientists are unsure about its potential
for causing birth defects. Cabergoline experiments with rabbits and
mice did not produce malformations. A study of pregnant women who used
cabergoline found several instances of birth defects, but no more than would
be expected if the drug had not been used. Congenital malformations among
offspring were noted in another set of pregnant women who used the drug,
but researchers reported no conclusion on the drug’s role.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Hofmann, A. “Historical View on Ergot Alkaloids.” Pharmacology 16 (1978, Suppl. 1):
1–11.
Merhoff, G.C., and J.M. Porter. “Ergot Intoxication: Historical Review and Description
of Unusual Clinical Manifestations.” Annals of Surgery 180 (1974): 773–79.
Moir, J.C. “Ergot: From ‘St. Anthony’s Fire’ to the Isolation of Its Active Principle,
Ergometrine (Ergonovine).” American Journal of Obstetrics and Gynecology 120
(1974): 291–96.
Van Dongen, P., and A. De Groot. “History of Ergot Alkaloids from Ergotism to Ergometrine.”
European Journal of Obstetrics and Gynecology and Reproductive Biology
60 (1995): 109–16.
Woolf, A. “Witchcraft or Mycotoxin? The Salem Witch Trials.” Journal of Toxicology.
Clinical Toxicology 38 (2000): 457–60.
Estazolam
Pronunciation: ess-TA-zoh-lam
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 29975-16-4
Formal Names: ProSom
Type: Depressant (benzodiazepine class). See page 21
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule IV (DEA no. 2756)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: X
Uses. Estazolam’s main medical uses are for relaxing muscles, fighting convulsions,
and inducing sleep. The compound can also reduce anxiety in insomniacs
but is not intended for long-term use against insomnia. Estazolam
has been used successfully to treat auditory hallucinations and to improve the
general mental state of schizophrenics. The drug is considered more potent
than diazepam. Insomnia studies show estazolam to be about 15 times
stronger than flurazepam.
Drawbacks. Estazolam may, at inappropriate times, make people lightheaded
or sleepy and interfere with movement. Constipation and dry mouth
are common. Even at high doses the drug’s hindrance of respiration is of no
concern in persons who breathe normally but might be troublesome for persons
who have impaired breathing—although experimental results have been
reassuring even for that population. A rebound effect can occur when people
stop taking the drug for insomnia, meaning that sleep disturbance temporarily
becomes worse than it was before treatment. In one study the most common
adverse effect was feeling tired the day after using the drug. Other volunteers
have experienced lower mental acuity and pulse rate 10 hours after taking the
drug, even after getting a good night’s sleep.
Abuse factors. Withdrawal symptoms are usually minor if a person takes
estazolam long enough to produce dependence, but unusual reports exist of
delirium and dangerous seizures during withdrawal.
Drug interactions. Estazolam actions can be boosted by alcohol, barbiturates,
opiates, antihistamines, and monoamine oxidase inhibitors (MAOIs—
found in some antidepressants). Cigarette smoking can shorten the time that
an estazolam dose lasts.
Cancer. Long-term experiments with rats and mice found no sign that estazolam
causes cancer. Potential for causing human cancer is unknown.
Estazolam 149
Pregnancy. A rat experiment produced no change in fertility. Estazolam is
known to cause human birth defects, and pregnant women are never supposed
to take the drug. Analysis of milk from nursing rats shows that estazolam
and its breakdown products can pass into milk.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Astrup, C., and L. Vatten. “Effect of the Benzodiazepine Derivative Estazolam in
Schizophrenia.” Biological Psychiatry 19 (1984): 85–88.
Cohn, J.B. “Hypnotic Efficacy of Estazolam Compared with Flurazepam in Outpatients
with Insomnia.” Journal of Clinical Pharmacology 31 (1991): 747–50.
“Estazolam—A New Benzodiazepine Hypnotic.” Medical Letter on Drugs and Therapeutics
33 (1991): 91–92.
Lingjaerde, O. “Effect of the Benzodiazepine Derivative Estazolam in Patients with
Auditory Hallucinations. A Multicentre Double-Blind, Cross-Over Study.” Acta
Psychiatrica Scandinavica 65 (1982): 339–54.
Pierce, M.W., V.S. Shu, and L.J. Groves. “Safety of Estazolam. The United States Clinical
Experience.” American Journal of Medicine 88, no. 3A (1990): 12S–17S.
Rosen, R.C., et al. “Psychophysiological Insomnia: Combined Effects of Pharmacotherapy
and Relaxation-Based Treatments.” Sleep Medicine 1 (2000): 279–88.
Vogel, G.W., and D. Morris. “The Effects of Estazolam on Sleep, Performance, and
Memory: Long-term Sleep Laboratory Study of Elderly Insomniacs.” Journal of
Clinical Pharmacology 32 (1992): 647–51.
Ethchlorvynol
Pronunciation: eth-KLOR-vih-nahl
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 113-18-8
Formal Names: Arvynol, ECV, Ethylchlorovinyl, Placidyl, Serensil
Informal Names: Green Weenies
Type: Depressant. See page 19
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule IV (DEA no. 2540)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. Insomnia is the main medical condition treated by this drug, although
it has also been used as a tranquilizer. The compound has been used to assist
pain relief, on the theory that its calming and sleep-inducing qualities can
allow pain relievers to work better. Although ethchlorvynol is considered safe
for adults under medical supervision, ordinarily medical personnel are not
supposed to dose children with ethchlorvynol, as adequate testing of impact
on juveniles has not been done. Normally the drug is not supposed to be used
for more than one week, as longer dosage increases risk of adverse effects.
The substance was introduced in the 1950s and is considered old-fashioned.
It has mostly been superseded by newer pharmaceuticals that are more effective
and that have fewer adverse effects.
Drawbacks. Because the drug makes people sleepy, they should avoid running
dangerous machinery (such as motor vehicles) while under the influence.
Symptoms of ethchlorvynol intoxication are similar to those of alcohol intoxication.
The drug can cause nausea and vomiting, dizziness, and fainting. Confusion,
stammering, intense headache, and general loss of vigor have also been
reported. Intravenous abuse of the drug has caused vomiting, low blood pressure
and body temperature, liver damage, fluid buildup in the lungs, and
coma.
Persons suffering from porphyria should avoid ethchlorvynol. Porphyria is
a body chemistry disease that can cause sudden violent outbursts, and the
disease can be promoted by ethchlorvynol. The substance should also be
avoided by people who experience “paradoxical reactions” to barbiturates or
alcohol. A paradoxical reaction is an effect opposite from the expected one—
for example, barbiturates causing hyperactivity rather than mellowness. In an
Ethchlorvynol 151
unusual accident the drug squirted into someone’s eyes and seriously injured
the corneas. One capsule format of an ethchlorvynol preparation called Placidyl
includes FD&C Yellow No. 5 (tartrazine), which can cause asthma attacks
in some people.
Abuse factors. A case report indicates that tolerance may develop, but the
indication was complicated by influence from the patient’s thyroid disease.
Another case report tells of the opposite effect, with a person becoming so
sensitive to the drug that a trivial dose put him into a coma for a week. Experts
generally feel, however, that tolerance is a more typical development. Taking
the drug long enough to produce dependence can also produce slurred
speech, amnesia, discoordination, tremors, eyesight difficulty, and facial
numbness. The drug has a withdrawal syndrome that may not start until days
after dosage suddenly stops. Withdrawal may include the dependence symptoms
just noted, plus excitability, convulsions, delirium, hallucinations, nervousness,
and loss of normal emotional reactions. Delirium tremens can occur.
Standard treatment involves temporary reinstatement of the drug followed by
tapering off doses, but phenobarbital has enough cross-tolerance to substitute
for this purpose. Typically such detoxification is delicate enough to require
hospitalization. In 1981 U.S. Supreme Court Justice William Rehnquist was
reported to be so dependent upon medically prescribed ethchlorvynol that his
mind was clouded while undergoing withdrawal in a hospital. A case report
tells of someone who had months of hallucinations requiring weeks of hospitalization
while trying to cope with ethchlorvynol withdrawal complicated
by alcohol use. Alcohol abusers may find ethchlorvynol attractive. Medical
authorities have noted close similarities between symptoms of dependence
and withdrawal evoked by alcohol and ethchlorvynol.
Drug interactions. Individuals are not supposed to use ethchlorvynol along
with other depressants (including alcohol and barbiturates) or with monoamine
oxidase inhibitors (MAOIs, included in some antidepressants and other
medication). Delirium has occurred in persons who take ethchlorvynol along
with the tricyclic antidepressant amitriptyline hydrochloride, and caution is
advised about taking other tricyclic antidepressants along with ethchlorvynol.
Ethchlorvynol may interact with medications given to prevent blood clots. In
animals injected with THC, the main active component of marijuana, ethchlorvynol
becomes more potent than usual.
Cancer. Rat experiments using many times the recommended human dose
of ethchlorvynol have yielded no evidence that the substance causes cancer.
In contrast, mice experiments indicate (but have not confirmed) a cancercausing
potential. In the body the drug converts into other chemicals; results
from laboratory testing have yielded mixed results concerning their cancercausing
potential.
Pregnancy. The drug is associated with fetal and newborn death in rat experiments.
In one experiment using the drug on pregnant rats, offspring
appeared normal but behaved abnormally and showed body chemistry aberrations.
Effects on human pregnancy are uncertain. The substance passes
into a human fetus, and in dogs the fetal blood level reaches the same strength
as the maternal level. A baby born to a woman using the drug showed with152
Ethchlorvynol
drawal symptoms; in an infant these may include abnormal reflexes, nervousness,
and peevishness. Standard advice is to avoid ethchlorvynol during
pregnancy. Although the drug’s presence in milk of nursing mothers is unclear,
the potential hazard of dosing infants through the milk makes nursing
inadvisable.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Flemenbaum, A., and B. Gunby. “Ethchlorvynol (Placidyl) Abuse and Withdrawal (Review
of Clinical Picture and Report of 2 Cases).” Diseases of the Nervous System
32 (1971): 188–92.
Garetz, F.D. “Ethchlorvynol (Placidyl). Addiction Hazard.” Minnesota Medicine 52
(1969): 1131–33.
Heston, L.L., and D. Hastings. “Psychosis with Withdrawal from Ethchlorvynol.” American
Journal of Psychiatry 137 (1980): 249–50.
Kripke, D.F., P. Lavie, and J. Hernandez. “Polygraphic Evaluation of Ethchlorvynol (14
Days).” Psychopharmacology (Berlin) 56 (1978): 221–23.
Kurt, T.L., G. Reed, and R.J. Anderson. “Pulmonary Edema after Intravenous Ethchlorvynol
(Placidyl).” Veterinary and Human Toxicology 24 (1982, Suppl.): 76–78.
Marshall, E. “Rehnquist’s Drug Dependence Poses Dilemma.” Science 215 (1982):
379–80.
Yell, R.P. “Ethchlorvynol Overdose.” American Journal of Emergency Medicine 8 (1990):
246–50.
Ether
Pronunciation: EE-thur
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 60-29-7
Formal Names: Diethyl Ether, Diethyl Oxide, Ethoxyethane, Ethyl Ether, Ethyl Oxide,
Sulfuric Ether
Informal Names: Anesthesia Ether, Sweet Vitriol
Type: Inhalant. See page 26
Federal Schedule Listing: Unlisted
USA Availability: Some sales of the chemical are restricted because it can be used
for manufacturing controlled substances
Uses. Although the substance has been available for hundreds of years it
was not used as a drug until the nineteenth century began. The compound
relaxes muscles and increases blood sugar levels. For decades it was a standard
anesthetic but has been superseded by chemicals that work faster, that
are better tolerated by patients, and that are less of a fire hazard. Nonetheless,
knowledgeable medical personnel can use ether safely without complicated
equipment, and the drug remains common where high-tech medical facilities
are not common or nonexistent. In liquid form ether is used medically to clean
skin surfaces before putting on adhesive tape and is used to help take off
adhesive tape.
The gas format is used recreationally (sometimes along with chloroform),
but drinking liquid ether is a more common recreational usage. Effects of
drinking are similar to those produced by alcohol but appear faster and last
briefly. People feel stimulated and confused, may experience euphoria and
hallucinations, may have difficulty walking, and sometimes pass out. Ether
drinking is associated with Ireland, where the custom was adopted in response
to temperance movement restrictions on alcohol’s availability in the
1800s. Ether drinking has been known in other European countries also, as
well as the United States. In America during the 1800s ether was drunk on
occasions ranging from a professional medical society meeting to weddings
and quilting bees. Such a range indicates wide social acceptance of the practice.
The substance was considered less harmful than alcohol. While using
ether, nineteenth-century writer and physician Oliver Wendell Holmes made
notes about spiritual insight that he felt was opening to him with the drug’s
help, but afterward he found the notes to be gibberish.
154 Ether
Drawbacks. Lighter doses of the gas stimulate breathing, but larger doses
depress it. The gas irritates airways. At higher doses pulse rate and blood
pressure decline. A serious unwanted effect can be a fatal convulsion. Using
ether as a beverage can cause headache, increase salivation, irritate the passageway
from mouth to stomach (resulting in vomiting), and produce heavy
flatulence. In liquid form the substance can irritate skin and be absorbed
through it.
Ether is highly flammable, and various regulations govern medical usage
to reduce chances of ignition. These rules even control types of clothing worn
by caregivers and types of linen used on carts, lest a static electricity spark
create an explosion. Ether vapor is heavier than air and can accumulate in
depressions such as the area of a pillow around a patient’s head, making
ignition all the more catastrophic. Stories are told of ether drinkers being killed
when lighting a tobacco pipe or while indulging too close to an open flame.
Even releasing ether fumes from the mouth toward a lit fireplace was considered
a hazard to avoid, lest ether ignition flash back and down a person’s
throat.
Abuse factors. Some accounts describe ether usage as potentially addictive.
Drug interactions. Not enough scientific information to report.
Cancer. Laboratory tests indicate ether may have potential for causing cancer,
but whether the substance produces the disease in animals is unknown.
Pregnancy. The drug has caused congenital malformations and fetal death
in experiments on chicken embryos, but impact on humans is unclear. Women
with industrial exposure are somewhat more likely to suffer spontaneous
abortion. Ether passes from a pregnant woman into the fetus, but neither
chronic exposure nor acute medical exposure is known to cause birth defects.
Nursing infants seem unharmed by milk from women using ether.
Additional information. “Petroleum ether” and the drug ether are different
substances.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Connell, K.H. “Ether Drinking in Ulster.” Quarterly Journal of Studies on Alcohol 26
(1965): 629–53.
Nagle, D.R. “Anesthetic Addiction and Drunkenness: A Contemporary and Historical
Survey.” International Journal of the Addictions 3 (1968): 25–39.
Strickland, R.A. “Ether Drinking in Ireland.” Mayo Clinic Proceedings 71 (1996): 1015.
Ethylestrenol
Pronunciation: eth-ill-EHS-treh-nol
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 965-90-2
Formal Names: Duraboral, Maxibolin, Orabolin, Orgabolin
Type: Anabolic steroid. See page 24
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule III (DEA control no. 4000)
USA Availability: Prescription
Uses. Researchers have given the substance to children who needed improvement
in appetite. In places where the drug is illegal for agricultural use,
some stockmen occasionally use it illegally to promote cattle growth.
Ethylestrenol has been used to help normalize blood disorders, including
low white blood cell levels caused by leukopenia and conditions involving
unwanted blood clotting. Experiments indicate that heart attack patients may
gain particular benefit from blood actions of the drug. It has also worked as
an experimental treatment for hemophilia. The drug can reduce purpura (purple
blotches caused by blood leaking just below the skin). Ethylestrenol has
been used experimentally to treat frostbite, and case reports note success in
using ethylestrenol to help treat a painful ulcerative skin disease called livedo
vasculitis and another called atrophie blanche, but experiments with a similar
affliction had mixed results. Persons suffering from rheumatoid arthritis and
from Raynaud’s disease, an ailment involving poor blood circulation in fingers
and toes, have improved while taking ethylestrenol. The drug has also been
used to treat Behcet’s syndrome, another disease involving problems in blood
circulation. Mice experiments using ethylestrenol show limited success in
treating symptoms of the skin disease lupus erythematosus and also Sjo¨gren’s
syndrome, an immune system disease that includes destruction of the salivary
glands and sweat glands.
Drawbacks. Among anabolic steroids ethylestrenol is considered to have
few masculinizing effects, and it also helps maintain normal functioning of
female organs. Nonetheless, in women the drug can cause acne, increase facial
hair, and produce hoarseness that can transform into permanent deepening
of the voice. The substance can bring on premature sexual development in
boys and girls. In sexually mature females ethylestrenol can disrupt or even
halt menstrual periods. Men can become less fertile. The substance promotes
fluid and salt retention, which can aggravate assorted medical conditions. The
156 Ethylestrenol
drug is not recommended for men suffering from breast or prostate cancer.
The substance can worsen porphyria, a disease that can make people violent
and sensitive to light. Ethylestrenol has been used to help short youths grow
taller but if used incorrectly may instead terminate bone growth, preventing
young users from attaining the full adult stature that they would otherwise
have achieved. Effective usage to promote height requires careful medical supervision.
Abuse factors. Some bodybuilders use ethylestrenol in hopes of promoting
muscle mass even though the substance is banned by international athletic
organizations.
Drug interactions. Rats that receive ethylestrenol are better able to survive
massive exposure to meprobamate or nicotine and high exposure to the insecticides
paraoxon and parathion. Ethylestrenol also makes rats act less affected
by LSD. Ethylestrenol can counteract anesthesia actions of barbiturates,
diminish ulcers caused by the pain reliever indomethacin, and reduce consequences
of vitamin D overdose.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Pregnant women and nursing mothers are supposed to avoid
ethylestrenol. In rat experiments the drug masculinized female fetuses.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Chakrabarti, R., and G.R. Fearnley. “Phenformin Plus Ethylestrenol in Survivors of
Myocardial Infarction: Three-Year Pilot Study.” Lancet 2 (1972): 556–59.
Hecht, A. “Anabolic Steroids: Pumping Trouble.” FDA Consumer 18 (September 1984):
12–15.
Kawashima, K., et al. “Virilizing Activities of Various Steroids in Female Rat Fetuses.”
Endocrinologia Japonica 24 (1977): 77–81.
Kerrebijn, K.F., and A. Delver. “Ethylestrenol (Orgabolin): Effects on Asthmatic Children
during Corticosteroid Treatment.” Scandinavian Journal of Respiratory Diseases
68 (1969, Suppl.): 70–77.
Murchison, L. “Uses and Abuses of Anabolic Steroids.” Prescribers’ Journal 26 (1986):
129–35.
Van Puymbroeck, M., et al. “17alpha-ethyl-5beta-estrane-3alpha, 17beta-diol, a Biological
Marker for the Abuse of Norethandrolone and Ethylestrenol in Slaughter
Cattle.” Journal of Chromotography. B, Biomedical Sciences and Applications 728
(1999): 217–32.
Etorphine
Pronunciation: et-OR-feen
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 14521-96-1. (Hydrochloride form
13764-49-3)
Formal Names: Immobilon, M99
Informal Names: Elephant Juice
Type: Depressant (opiate class). See page 22
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule I (DEA no. 9056). Hydrochloride form Schedule
II (DEA no. 9059)
USA Availability: Illegal to possess except in hydrochloride form, which is prescription
Uses. This pain-relieving drug is derived from thebaine. In jurisdictions
where etorphine is legal, it is used as a veterinary sedative. The substance is
powerful. Depending on dosage method and animal species receiving the
drug, its strength is estimated as anywhere from 10 times to 80,000 times that
of morphine, so a person administering the drug must be skilled in order to
avoid a serious overdose. The related Schedule II controlled substance dihydroetorphine
is also powerful—10 to 10,000 times stronger than morphine.
Etorphine acts quickly. Veterinarians and naturalists use etorphine darts to
knock down wild elephants and grizzly bears. Zoos utilize the drug on white
rhinoceros, giraffes, and other animals when medical necessity requires them
to be unconscious.
Human tests show that etorphine can relieve intense pain without causing
unconsciousness. Tests using dihydroetorphine alone and in combination with
acupuncture have found the drug to be safe and effective for easing labor pain
in childbirth. The substance has relieved pain in cancer patients. Experimenters
suspect that as well as being a more powerful pain reliever than morphine,
dihydroetorphine may also be less likely to create dependence in a patient.
Opiates and other depressants normally interfere with physical performance.
Administered in a particular way, however, etorphine reliably produces
a “paradoxical” effect (opposite to an expected effect) of increasing
athletic performance by stimulating physical activity while reducing pain.
Racehorses have been doped with the drug to make them run faster. Many
lovers of the sport disapprove of the practice not only for its illegality but
because the horse is harmed. Perhaps the most notorious incident occurred in
158 Etorphine
the late 1980s when Rocket Racer won the Perth Cup by eight lengths and
continued running. The horse would not stop despite the jockey’s efforts; after
nearly another lap around the track, the horse collapsed and died. Reportedly
some human track competitors have used the same drug, accelerated their
pace as a race progressed, and had difficulty stopping after crossing the finish
line.
Drawbacks. In animal experiments dihydroetorphine interferes with the immune
system, interference that may make infections more likely. Etorphine
can send blood pressure up or down, reduce body temperature, and impair
heartbeat and breathing. Impaired breathing is also an unwanted effect observed
with dihydroetorphine, along with constipation, nausea, vomiting, dizziness,
and drowsiness.
Although etorphine is a standard veterinary medicine, knowledgeable users
treat it with great respect and keep an antidote on hand because accidental
injection can be fatal. The drug may be absorbed though the skin, and supplies
of etorphine are generally dyed red so users can readily tell if they have
touched it (such as a smear across a shirt or hand). Swift administration of an
antidote can prevent death.
The quantity needed to kill a person is so minute that its presence in a body
can be difficult or even impossible to detect. Harmless chemicals added to a
dose can make etorphine even harder to discover through laboratory tests.
The drug has also attracted military attention as a possible chemical warfare
agent.
Abuse factors. When humans in an experiment received etorphine they experienced
euphoria and described the drug as feeling like morphine. Researchers
who administered etorphine in that experiment concluded that the drug
is likely to be abused. Misuse has been noted in China. Other investigators
reached the same conclusion about dihydroetorphine from the way rats responded
to it. The U.S. Drug Enforcement Administration has ruled that dihydroetorphine’s
abuse potential is similar to heroin’s. The government of Hong
Kong has noted dihydroetorphine’s lower price and less stringent control
make it appealing to heroin addicts. Lawsuits against the tobacco industry
unearthed documentation indicating one company considered the possibility
that competitors might lace cigarettes with etorphine to add an addictive need
that could not be satisfied by other brands, thereby coercing consumer loyalty
to a particular product.
A mice study found no dependence at all after dihydroetorphine had been
administered for six days, but rat and mice research demonstrates that dihydroetorphine
eventually produces enough dependence to cause withdrawal
symptoms. Investigators have noted that rats act as if dihydroetorphine is a
satisfactory substitute for heroin. Etorphine can prevent withdrawal symptoms
in morphine addicts, an action demonstrating cross-tolerance between
the two drugs, but an etorphine dose holds off withdrawal symptoms for a
shorter time than morphine would. In rhesus monkey experiments etorphine
and dihydroetorphine are both cross-tolerant with morphine. In those same
experiments, when dihydroetorphine dosage was suddenly stopped, few
withdrawal signs appeared. Withdrawal symptom research on mice indicates
that dihydroetorphine may do more than substitute for morphine: A dihyEtorphine
159
droetorphine dose may actually make morphine withdrawal symptoms go
away, so further doses of either drug become unnecessary. Such a result
would be inconsistent with what is known about opiate dependence, but discovery
of new facts can change scientific understandings. Some researchers
believe that etorphine and dihydroetorphine have potential for treating opiate
addiction. Dihydroetorphine has been used for that purpose in China but
seems to produce even stronger dependence among heroin addicts than methadone.
So perhaps animal experiment findings that indicate low dependence
potential in dihydroetorphine cannot be extrapolated to humans.
Drug interactions. Giving etorphine and morphine together increases pain
relief in mice, while the etorphine does not seem to increase the strength of
opiate dependence in the combination. Researchers speculate that the improved
pain control might be great enough to allow much smaller doses of
morphine in humans than would otherwise be needed, which in turn would
greatly decrease the amount of dependence otherwise created by normal-size
morphine doses.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Not enough scientific information to report.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Firn, S. “Accidental Poisoning by an Animal Immobilizing Agent.” Lancet 2 (1973):
95–96.
“Immobilon: Curiously Strong.” Lancet 2 (1977): 178.
Jasinski, D.R., J.D. Griffith, and C.B. Carr. “Etorphine in Man. 1. Subjective Effects and
Suppression of Morphine Abstinence.” Clinical Pharmacology and Therapeutics 17
(1975): 267–72.
Marcoux, G.S. “Etorphine: A New Opiate of Abuse?” Canadian Journal of Psychiatry 41
(1996): 261.
“Schedule II Control of Dihydroetorphine under the Controlled Substances Act (CSA).”
Federal Register 65 (2000): 69442–43.
Fenfluramine
Pronunciation: fen-FLOO-ra-meen
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 458-24-2. (Hydrochloride form
404-82-0)
Formal Names: Miniphage, Ponderal, Ponderax, Pondimin, Ponflural, Redux
Type: Stimulant (anorectic class). See page 15
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule IV (DEA no. 1670). In 2002 federal authorities
were planning to make the substance unscheduled.
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. For convenience this drug is here classified as a stimulant simply
because other anorectics controlled by the U.S. Drug Enforcement Administration
are stimulants. Chemistry operates independently of classification
schemes, however, and fenfluramine does not act like typical stimulants even
though it is related to amphetamine. Fenfluramine can sedate users and has
only modest influence on body temperature and blood pressure. Yet it also
has characteristics of powerful stimulants: euphoria, hallucinations, paranoia.
High doses can pep up a person rather than sedate. Fenfluramine can alter
time perceptions and snap moods from one extreme to another. Some scientists
classify it as a hallucinogen. Occasionally it can act as an aphrodisiac in
females. Fenfluramine also lowers cholesterol levels.
In humans fenfluramine has been found effective for diminishing panic attacks
but has had mixed success when used to treat obsessive behavior. Experimental
use against schizophrenia has been unsuccessful, with patients
worsening under the drug regimen. Indeed, reports asked whether the drug
might be inducing psychotic reactions. A four-week study found fenfluramine
useful in improving the conduct of mentally retarded children suffering from
attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). A longer study (11 months)
found the drug provided only limited help to autistic children, and a still
longer study (27 months) found such long-term administration impractical
due to unwanted effects and due to changes in the autistic children’s lives. A
scientific review of such studies concluded that the drug’s potential nonetheless
merited further trials.
Fenfluramine is a drug of many effects, but medically its primary use has
been for weight loss. Studies consistently indicate the drug’s effectiveness for
Fenfluramine 161
that purpose. One study found it comparable to dextroamphetamine in producing
weight loss.
Drawbacks. Fenfluramine tends to dry out the mouth, a condition promoting
tooth decay. Other unwanted actions can include headache, peevish feelings,
dizziness, tiredness, nausea, vomiting, diarrhea, and frequent urination.
Experience indicates that persons need to be weaned off the drug; cold turkey
cessation can cause depression or even a medical emergency called “serotonin
syndrome.” That syndrome may include hyperactivity, confusion, nervousness,
vomiting, too-rapid heartbeat, excessive body temperature, shivering,
tremors, weakness, or passing out.
Abuse factors. Experimental animals have shown little interest in receiving
fenfluramine doses, a classic sign of small addiction potential. Human amphetamine
addicts have found fenfluramine to feel like a placebo.
Drug interactions. If the compound is taken along with migraine headache
remedies or antidepressants (particularly monoamine oxidase inhibitors—
MAOIs) serotonin syndrome can arise.
Researchers discovered that fenfluramine could be administered in combination
with phentermine, an anorectic that works in a different way. The
combination became known as fen-phen (or phen-fen). Rat experiments
showed that fen-phen reduces food intake far more than either drug can do
alone, and experience confirmed the same kind of multiplier effect in humans.
Such impact allows persons to take lower doses than would be necessary with
either drug alone, thereby minimizing any undesired actions of the drugs.
Phentermine counteracts fenfluramine’s common sedative quality, allowing
users to function more normally.
Weight control is one of the most challenging conditions encountered by
medical practitioners, and fen-phen became tremendously popular. One study
found that almost 90% of 88 obesity patients taking fenfluramine or the closely
related drug dexfenfluramine were also taking phentermine and that almost
33% of the 88 patients lacked obesity levels for which these or other antiobesity
drugs were an appropriate treatment.
Suddenly, after many years of wide use without much report of alarming
adverse effects, in 1997 accounts began associating fenfluramine with rapidly
developing fatal heart valve disorders. The U.S. Food and Drug Administration
asked the manufacturer to withdraw fenfluramine and dexfenfluramine
from the market. In that litigious era the manufacturer instantly and voluntarily
complied. Hot debate then erupted in medical circles about whether
heart disease was caused by fenfluramine, phentermine, or the two drugs in
combination. Studies purported to confirm that the drugs alone or in combination
really did create heart valve affliction. Other research purported to find
no evidence of the drugs’ involvement. Highly knowledgeable and distinguished
medical authorities took differing stances on the question and raged
at one another in scientific journals. An issue also arose of whether fen-phen
caused fatal pulmonary hypertension (high pressure in blood circulation to
lungs), with researchers reminding fellow scientists that fenfluramine works
in ways similar to the anorectic drug aminorex, which had been linked to
pulmonary hypertension in the 1960s and was thereafter withdrawn from the
market. Particular concern was expressed about fenfluramine’s impact on pul162
Fenfluramine
monary hypertension and edema among users living or traveling in high altitudes.
Phentermine is a monoamine oxidase inhibitor, and despite a lack of
reports about acute adverse interaction with fenfluramine, some researchers
noted that a more chronic interaction could cause the kind of heart and pulmonary
damage that was appearing. Researchers began reporting organic
brain damage from fenfluramine and dexfenfluramine in animal experiments.
Investigators now noticed many instances of psychiatric disturbance among
persons taking fenfluramine and noted that the disorders implied organic
brain damage. The drug was also linked to human angina pectoris (a frightening
sensation of pain and suffocation typically caused by insufficient oxygen
supply to the heart) and to a case of a gangrenous condition resulting in
amputation of fingers. As time passed, evidence appeared that the heart valve
and pulmonary hypertension disorders could stabilize and even improve after
patients stopped taking fen-phen. Scientific debate continues about fenfluramine’s
role in heart ailments and pulmonary hypertension.
Despite the beating that fen-phen took from the news media and from many
scientists, researchers remain curious about whether the drug combination still
has a role in medicine. Even though fenfluramine can cause depression, interest
arose in possible psychotherapeutic uses. As the twenty-first century
began, experimenters reported that fen-phen can ease withdrawal from cocaine.
Rat experiments find that fen-phen reduces alcohol intake and eliminates
alcohol withdrawal symptoms, findings that may be relevant to
treatment of alcoholism. Indeed in 1995 one medical practitioner reported success
in treating alcohol and cocaine addicts with fen-phen, sometimes substituting
pemoline for phentermine.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Experimenters who gave fenfluramine to pregnant mice found
no measurable effect on fetal development and no effect on offspring’s ability
to perform in learning tests. For primates evidence exists that the drug passes
into the fetus and reaches high levels there. The combination fen-phen has not
seemed to harm human fetal development.
Additional information. Dexfenfluramine (CAS RN 3239-44-9) is a stereoisomer
of fenfluramine, meaning the two molecules have the same chemical
formula and the same atomic bonds, but the molecules look different (as a
person’s left and right hands look different even though both have the same
components). Studies comparing the two drugs find little or no difference in
effect, although dexfenfluramine was introduced with the hope that it had
fewer unwanted actions than fenfluramine when used for weight loss. A report
praising dexfenfluramine characterized its weight loss capability as equaling
that produced by the antidepressant fluoxetine (Prozac) or by a
combination of ephedrine and caffeine. Diarrhea is noted as a dexfenfluramine
effect, and concern arose that the drug can aggravate glaucoma. Depending
on laboratory manipulations of circumstances, it can promote or
diminish panic attacks.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Davis, R., and D. Faulds. “Dexfenfluramine. An Updated Review of Its Therapeutic
Use in the Management of Obesity.” Drugs 52 (1996): 696–724.
Fenfluramine 163
Griffith, J.D., J.G. Nutt, and D.R. Jasinski. “Comparison of Fenfluramine and Amphetamine
in Man.” Clinical Pharmacology and Therapeutics 18 (1975): 563–70.
Gross, S.B. “Appetite Suppressants and Cardiac Valvulopathy. Current Clinical Perspectives.”
Advance for Nurse Practitioners 7 (1999): 36–40.
McCann, U.D., V. Eligulashvili, and G.A. Ricaurte. “Adverse Neuropsychiatric Events
Associated with Dexfenfluramine and Fenfluramine.” Progress in Neuropsychopharmacology
and Biological Psychiatry 22 (1998): 1087–102.
McCann, U.D., et al. “Brain Serotonin Neurotoxicity and Primary Pulmonary Hypertension
from Fenfluramine and Dexfenfluramine: Systematic Review of the Evidence.”
Journal of the American Medical Association 278 (1997): 666–72.
Schiller, N.B. “Fen/Phen and Valvular Heart Disease: If It Sounds Too Bad to Be True,
Perhaps It Isn’t.” Journal of the American College of Cardiology 34 (1999): 1159–62.
Vivero, L.E., P.O. Anderson, and R.F. Clark. “A Close Look at Fenfluramine and Dexfenfluramine.”
Journal of Emergency Medicine 16 (1998): 197–205.
Wellman, P.J, and T.J. Maher. “Synergistic Interactions between Fenfluramine and
Phentermine.” International Journal of Obesity and Related Metabolic Disorders 23
(1999): 723–32.
Fentanyl
Pronunciation: FEN-ta-nill
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 437-38-7. (Citrate form 990-73-8)
Formal Names: Actiq, Alfenta, Alfentanil, Duragesic, Durogesic, Innovar, Sublimaze,
Sufenta, Sufentanil
Informal Names: Apache, Bear, China, China Girl, China Town, China White,
Dance Fever, Fen, Friend, Goodfellas, Great Bear, He Man, Jackpot, King Ivory,
Murder, Murder 8, Persian White, Poison, Synthetic Heroin, Tango & Cash, TNT
Type: Depressant (opioid class). See page 24
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule II (DEA no. 9801)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. Developed in Europe during the 1950s, this drug became available for
medical use in the United States during the 1960s. It is also used in veterinary
medicine, especially with cats. Depending on means of administration (injection,
oral) fentanyl can be 10 times stronger than morphine, and fentanyl
citrate can be 8 to 100 times stronger. One report claims fentanyl is 40 times
stronger than heroin.
Relieving cancer pain is a standard use for fentanyl. With cancer, the drug
is normally given only when a patient is dying and unable to experience
enough pain control from other opioids. Fentanyl does not necessarily reduce
the amount of pain per se but can make people less aware of discomfort. The
substance also has sedative actions and suppresses coughs. The drug has been
used to help treat tetanus. Fentanyl can alter a person’s spirits, making someone
euphoric or provoking an opposite feeling of sadness and discontent. One
dosage format is the fentanyl patch, allowing the drug to be absorbed through
the skin.
Drawbacks. Patches are potent enough in themselves, but a case report tells
of one drug abuser who decided to heat a patch and inhale the vapor; he
instantly lost consciousness, but prompt attention by skilled medical personnel
saved his life.
Fentanyl may cause serious and even fatal breathing difficulty, and this
problem can still arise after the drug’s action has apparently lifted. Risk of
that unwanted effect is heightened among “opioid naive” patients who have
not developed tolerance to pain relief from other opioids; so because of the
Fentanyl 165
breathing hazard those opioid-naive patients often do not receive fentanyl.
Nonetheless, it is sometimes used for childbirth, surgery, and dentistry and
for persons suffering from lower back ache and pain in bones and joints.
Physicians even give fentanyl to infants.
The drug can promote sleepiness and slow a person’s pulse rate, alertness,
and physical motions. Such effects interfere with ability to operate automobiles
or machinery. Other unwanted actions include itching, constipation,
urine retention, nausea and vomiting, increased blood pressure, and fainting
upon standing up. Cases of muscle rigidity have been reported. Laboratory
tests suggest fentanyl might worsen a body chemistry disease called porphyria.
Fentanyl can provoke seizures in persons prone to such affliction. A drastic
treatment for seizures is surgical removal of a brain lobe where seizures originate,
and instrument readings during the operation guide surgeons on how
much of the brain to remove. Fentanyl is a standard surgical anesthetic, and
one study found that the drug can temporarily create seizures in healthy portions
of the brain, thereby misleading surgeons about how much they should
remove.
Like many other drugs, fentanyl has stronger effects on older persons, and
dosage should be adjusted accordingly.
Abuse factors. Tolerance and dependence can occur, with typical opioid
withdrawal symptoms. Just three days of medical dosing can produce enough
dependence to cause uncomfortable withdrawal upon sudden stoppage of the
drug, an exceptionally short time compared to most opioids. Animal experiments
indicate that buprenorphine can alleviate fentanyl withdrawal.
Drug interactions. Normally people should avoid fentanyl if they have
taken monamine oxidase inhibitors (MAOIs—found in some antidepressants
and other medicine) in the past two weeks, as MAOIs can greatly increase
opioid actions. For the same reason, using fentanyl with other depressants
(including alcohol) can be risky. Midazolam hydrochloride and fentanyl appear
to boost each other’s actions. The HIV/AIDS medicine ritonavir makes
a fentanyl dose last longer.
Cancer. Whether fentanyl causes cancer is unknown, although laboratory
tests with one version of the drug yielded no indication of cancer-causing
potential.
Pregnancy. Rats receiving fentanyl have lower fertility rates and bring fewer
pregnancies to term, compared to rats not receiving the drug, and those effects
occurred at smaller doses than humans typically receive. When fentanyl citrate
has been given to pregnant rats, birth defects in their offspring have not been
attributed to the drug. Whether fentanyl causes congenital malformations in
humans is unknown. An infant can be born with dependence if the mother
has been using fentanyl. The drug passes into a nursing mother’s milk but
not in amounts deemed harmful to an infant.
Additional information. Alfentanil (Schedule II, CAS Registry No. 71195-
58-9) is a derivative of fentanyl used for pain control and anesthesia. Effects
last only a few minutes. Depending on dosage form, pain relief is 1 to 10 times
stronger than morphine. When given to a pregnant woman alfentanil apparently
passes into the fetus. The drug can produce muscle rigidity in infants.
166 Fentanyl
Sufentanil (Schedule II, CAS Registry No. 56030-54-7, citrate form 60561-17-
3) is a derivative of fentanyl used for pain control and anesthesia. It is 50 to
100 times stronger than morphine and is used to knock out wild animals. The
drug takes effect faster than fentanyl but lasts a shorter time. Sufentanil can
lower heart rate and blood pressure, create muscle rigidity, and cause typical
unwanted opioid effects such as itching and vomiting. At normal doses sufentanil
can halt breathing, so medical personnel stand by to provide respiration
assistance when they administer the drug. Laboratory and animal
experiments indicate no potential for causing cancer. Tests with rats and rabbits
did not produce birth defects. Researchers examining the results when
sufentanil is used in childbirth found no harm to mother or infant. Sufentanil
is assumed to pass into the milk of nursing mothers, but the amount is assumed
harmless to the infant.
Other fentanyl derivatives exist. They are used illicitly to experience heroin
sensations and can be 1,000 times stronger than heroin.
Fentanyl has the same molecular formula as the Schedule I substance acetylalpha-
methylfentanyl (DEA no. 9815), but the two drugs are different substances.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Baylon, G.J. “Comparative Abuse Liability of Intravenously Administered Remifentanil
and Fentanyl.” Journal of Clinical Psychopharmacology 20 (2000): 597–606.
Henderson, G.L. “Designer Drugs: Past History and Future Prospects.” Journal of Forensic
Sciences 33 (1988): 569–75.
Patt, R.B., and L.A. Hogan. “Comment: Transdermal Fentanyl.” Annals of Pharmacotherapy
27 (1993): 795–96.
Schneider, U., et al. “Effects of Fentanyl and Low Doses of Alcohol on Neuropsychological
Performance in Healthy Subjects.” Neuropsychobiology 39 (1999): 38–43.
Zacny, J.P., et al. “Subjective and Behavioral Responses to Intravenous Fentanyl in
Healthy Volunteers.” Psychopharmacology (Berlin) 107 (1992): 319–26.
Flunitrazepam
Pronunciation: flyoo-neye-TRAYZ-eh-pam
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 1622-62-4
Formal Names: Rohypnol
Informal Names: Candy, Circles, Darkene, Date Rape Drug, Drop Drug, Dulcitas,
Forget Me Drug, Forget Pills, La Rocha, La Roche, Lunch Money Drug, Mexican
Valium, Mind Erasers, Pappas, Pastas, Peanuts, Pingus, Potatoes, Remember All,
Reynol, Reynolds, Rib, Roaches, Roachies, Roach-2, Roapies, Robinol, Robutal,
Rochas, Rochas Dos, Roche, Roche Dos, Roches, Rochies, Rohibinol, Roofenol,
Roofies, Ropanol, Ropers, Ropes, Rophies, Rophs, Rophy, Ropies, Roples, Ro-
Shay, Row-Shay, R05-4200, R-25, R-2, Rubies, Ruffies, Ruffles, Trip & Fall,
Whiteys, Wolfies
Type: Depressant (benzodiazepine class). See page 21
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule IV (DEA no. 2763), but Schedule I in many
state schedules
USA Availability: Prescription where legal
Uses. This quick-acting and long-lasting drug is widely used around the
world for legitimate medical purposes. Flunitrazepam is prescribed to treat
insomnia and anxiety, to relax muscles, to stop convulsions, and to calm people.
In the 1990s it was Western Europe’s most commonly prescribed calming
and sleep-inducing medicine. The drug is administered to treat alcohol withdrawal
syndrome, and experimental use in treating depression has found flunitrazepam
promising. Some unauthorized use of the drug is believed to be
for self-medication of depression and low self-esteem. The drug has specialized
usefulness in surgery as a medication given prior to administration of
anesthesia, and its tendency to reduce pressure inside the eyeball can avert
the rise caused by the anesthetic succinylcholine (important if patients are at
risk for glaucoma). In hospice care where doses can be higher and more frequent
than normal, flunitrazepam has reduced nausea and vomiting from cancer
chemotherapy.
Actions are similar to those of diazepam, but flunitrazepam is 7 to 10 times
stronger. Nonetheless, compared to other benzodiazepine class drugs an overdose
of flunitrazepam does not seem more poisonous, nor does flunitrazepam
appear more prone to cause medical crises.
Drawbacks. The drug may cause euphoria, raise self-esteem, and give a
168 Flunitrazepam
sense of power in users while at the same time decreasing fear. Such effects
may promote violence in a person who is already prone to such conduct,
particularly when the substance is combined with alcohol.
Users are sometimes unable to remember what happened while they were
under flunitrazepam’s influence. Immediate effects aside, researchers have
documented that people still experience trouble when doing laboratory memory
tests 10 hours after taking a medical dose of the drug, a dose that may be
much lighter than some abusers take. Many other benzodiazepine class drugs
cause memory trouble as well, although their effect is less publicized than
flunitrazepam’s.
Flunitrazepam can slow reaction times, reduce ability to pay attention to
tasks, and leave people too woozy and discoordinated to drive a car safely.
Difficulty in driving has been demonstrated in simulations and in an instrumented
automobile actually driven for several miles the day after drivers took
a nighttime dose. In experiments (including a test of potential drug effects on
shift workers) people took various sleep aids at bedtime; flunitrazepam
harmed persons’ ability to move their limbs the next day. Such effects appear
to be dose-related; an experiment using much smaller doses found little or no
impact on performance the next day. Large doses can cause breathing trouble.
Injection can kill skin around the needle site.
Abuse factors. Abuse of the drug has become a concern among public health
authorities in several countries. Under provisions of international treaties the
federal government lists flunitrazepam as a Schedule IV controlled substance
but has forbidden sale of this pharmaceutical in the United States. State governments
have begun reclassifying the substance as Schedule I, certifying it
as having no medical value and allowing anyone possessing it to be prosecuted
under state law.
In the 1990s law enforcement agencies declared flunitrazepam to be a date
rape drug, allowing men to commit sexual assault against unresisting victims
who have foggy or even no memory of the circumstances. In this regard the
drug is little different from alcohol, though faster acting. In a survey of 53
women who willingly used flunitrazepam, 10% said they were afterward assaulted
physically or sexually. When 66 other “flunitrazepam users” described
the tablet, many descriptions were of some other drug even though the people
believed they had taken flunitrazepam. Untoward events may be real, but the
identity of an involved drug may be less certain than law enforcement officials
say. The U.S. Drug Enforcement Administration (DEA) says detection of flunitrazepam
is nearly impossible in rape cases because urine samples must be
analyzed within 72 hours of ingesting flunitrazepam, making the drug’s prevalence
as a tool in sexual assault impossible to demonstrate. Nonetheless, the
DEA describes the problem’s extent as serious. A student of the topic found
that from 1994 to 1998 a nationwide total of “at least” 26 sexual assaults “potentially
involved” the drug. One laboratory conducted a two-year study of
1,179 urine specimens from sexual assault victims in 49 states, specimens selected
because of suspicion that some drug was involved—and thereby more
likely to have positive results than if samples were chosen randomly from sex
crime cases. The lab found 6 positive for flunitrazepam (0.5%), 97 (8%) positive
for a benzodiazepine class substance (a category including many drugs other
Flunitrazepam 169
than flunitrazepam), 451 positive for alcohol, and 468 negative for any drug
of abuse that was searched for. A two-year study of 2,003 urine samples from
sexual assault victims believed to have ingested a drug found less than 2%
containing flunitrazepam or GHB. The same study reported that as of 1999
utilization of those two drugs seemed to be waning. Flunitrazepam’s legal
manufacturer has offered to provide free and definitive analysis of samples
submitted by medical and law enforcement personnel. Researchers at the University
of Miami report that detection of flunitrazepam in urine samples is
easy and that, in contrast to ambiguous results from sex crime investigations,
flunitrazepam had been confirmed in “up to” 10% of drunk driving cases in
1995 and 1996 in Miami-Dade County, Florida, but plummeted after the drug
became Schedule I under state law in 1997.
Despite hype about flunitrazepam, a review article published in 1997 noted
absence of evidence that the substance’s actions differ from those of other
drugs in the benzodiazepine class. Flunitrazepam is simply a very strong benzodiazepine,
and its potency may have much to do with stories told about it.
To produce similar drug effects, a small amount of flunitrazepam may be
about equal to a large amount of some other benzodiazepine.
Tolerance can occur. A person’s body can develop dependence with flunitrazepam,
resulting in a withdrawal syndrome if dosage stops. Withdrawal
symptoms are similar to those with other benzodiazepine class substances.
Severe cases can include delirium, hallucinations, and seizures. When researchers
cut off the drug supply to dependent monkeys they became agitated
and peevish, had tremors and poor control of muscles, and sometimes vomited
and ran a fever. Although flunitrazepam is much stronger than diazepam,
a canine experiment found those two drugs roughly equivalent in ability to
produce dependence. Flunitrazepam reduced the morphine withdrawal syndrome
in mice; if the same effect carries over to humans flunitrazepam might
appeal to opiate addicts who have an unreliable supply of opiates. Surveys
show flunitrazepam to be a favorite among opiate abusers, although among
other people the substance seems no more attractive than other benzodiazepines.
Drug interactions. Alcohol and flunitrazepam boost each other’s actions.
Some illicit drug users find flunitrazepam to be a pleasing addition to a dose
of inferior heroin, and some find that flunitrazepam eases harsh effects from
cocaine. However, using multiple illicit drugs, particularly if the combination
tends to make the body produce opposite actions simultaneously, is an invitation
to problems. Buprenorphine disrupts the body’s ability to break down
flunitrazepam.
Cancer. Laboratory testing of the drug itself and of urine from rats and
humans who have received doses indicates that flunitrazepam can induce
gene mutations, a possible sign of cancer-causing potential.
Pregnancy. In pregnant women the drug passes into amniotic fluid and the
fetal blood supply, although fetal levels are lower than maternal levels. Excessive
muscular motions have been observed in a fetus after the drug is
administered to a pregnant woman. When given to infants the drug lowers
their blood pressure (an effect noted in adults as well). Although the drug
170 Flunitrazepam
passes into breast milk, levels are considered too low to affect a nursing infant
if a mother does not take the drug regularly.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Anglin, D., K.L. Spears, and H.R. Hutson. “Flunitrazepam and Its Involvement in Date
or Acquaintance Rape.” Academic Emergency Medicine 4 (1997): 323–26.
Calhoun, S.R., et al. “Abuse of Flunitrazepam (Rohypnol) and Other Benzodiazepines
in Austin and South Texas.” Journal of Psychoactive Drugs 28 (1996): 183–89.
Daderman, A.M., and L. Lidberg. “Flunitrazepam (Rohypnol) Abuse in Combination
with Alcohol Causes Premeditated, Grievous Violence in Male Juvenile Offenders.”
Journal of the American Academy of Psychiatry and the Law 27 (1999): 83–99.
“Flunitrazepam Misuse and Abuse in South Africa.” South African Medical Journal 89
(1999): 1155.
Mattila, M.A., and H.M. Larni. “Flunitrazepam: A Review of Its Pharmacological Properties
and Therapeutic Use.” Drugs 20 (1980): 353–74.
Ott, H., et al. “Anterograde and Retrograde Amnesia after Lormetazepam and Flunitrazepam.”
Psychopharmacology Series 6 (1988): 180–93.
Waltzman, M.L. “Flunitrazepam: A Review of ‘Roofies.’ ” Pediatric Emergency Care 15
(1999): 59–60.
Woods, J.H., and G. Winger. “Abuse Liability of Flunitrazepam.” Journal of Clinical
Psychopharmacology 17 (1997, Suppl. 2): S1–S57.
Fluoxymesterone
Pronunciation: floo-ok-see-MESS-ter-ohn
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 76-43-7
Formal Names: Androfluorene, Android-F, Halotestin, Ora-Testryl, Stenox
Type: Anabolic steroid. See page 24
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule III (DEA no. 4000)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: X
Uses. This compound became available in the 1950s. Standard medical uses
in males include treatment for delayed puberty and underdeveloped male
organs. Experiments demonstrate that fluoxymesterone can improve the
growth, weight, and social interactions of boys having slow physical maturation.
Compared to some other anabolic steroids, this drug has less tendency
to promote masculine body signs (facial hair, deeper voice) in girls, and fluoxymesterone
has been used to nurture increased height in girls. The drug can
be administered to treat female sexual dysfunction.
In women the drug is used to fight breast cancer by interfering with hormones
that encourage the disease. Research has found fluoxymesterone effective
in reducing a cancer called myeloma and for counteracting anemia caused
by myeloma. Mixed results have occurred when using the drug for correcting
anemia associated with kidney failure. The substance has been a treatment for
osteoporosis, a condition in which bones become susceptible to easy breakage,
and for hereditary angioedema—an affliction that may involve throat swelling
that interferes with breathing.
Although anabolic steroids have potential for preventing young users from
achieving expected adult height, with fluoxymesterone that outcome does not
occur among females suffering from Turner’s syndrome (the expected adult
height in persons with this condition, however, is already short). Several studies
tracking boys using the drug under close medical supervision found adult
height to be normal.
A research team studied effects on normal males who received doses three
times a day for a three-month period. Little impact could be detected, although
a few unwanted effects such as headaches occurred. Perhaps the most notable
reported change was a 30% drop in triglyceride levels; excessive triglycerides
are associated with heart attack and stroke.
172 Fluoxymesterone
Drawbacks. Another study using normal men measured a drop in their
testosterone levels, an unsurprising finding as fluoxymesterone is supposed
to replace testosterone. Extended usage may interfere with male sexual function
and fertility. General unwanted actions have included acne, itching, dizziness,
nausea, vomiting, yellowish tinge to body color (an indication of
jaundice), constipation, and frequent urination. Fluid retention can cause
swelling. The drug may interfere with blood clotting and may reduce the
amount of insulin needed by diabetics. The compound also can be harmful to
a person who suffers from porphyria, an affliction that can involve violence
and sensitivity to light. Fluoxymesterone can pass into a sexual partner,
enough to affect that person. Because of that, barrier contraceptives are recommended
for sexually active fluoxymesterone patients and their partners.
The substance is banned from athletic competitions. Scientists have not confirmed
that the substance helps sport abilities, but nonetheless some bodybuilders
use it. Supposedly the drug can increase strength without increasing
weight, an important factor in some classes of sporting competition. Reportedly
the substance promotes aggressiveness, enhancing its appeal to athletes
who must physically attack opponents. Some athletic users describe the drug
as unpleasant. Athletic abuse of fluoxymesterone is not necessarily limited to
human competitions; concern exists that the substance may be given to racehorses.
Abuse factors. Not enough scientific information to report about tolerance,
dependence, withdrawal, or addiction.
Drug interactions. In female breast cancer patients receiving levothyroxine
to boost thyroid gland activity, fluoxymesterone can interact and elevate thyroid
activity too much. Experiments have administered fluoxymesterone in
combination with other drugs to alter the mood of older persons exhibiting
nervousness, irritation, and suspiciousness toward caregivers. One study reported
no change; another reported substantial change; the difference may
have involved what drugs were used in addition to fluoxymesterone, along
with differing dosages.
Cancer. Laboratory tests have provided uncertain guidance on whether
fluoxymesterone causes cancer. A case report mentions that two men developed
prostate cancer after receiving the drug to treat impotence; cause and
effect were not asserted, but the coincidence was considered important enough
to merit caution. Men with prostate cancer should avoid the drug. A case
report mentions liver cancer developing in a patient undergoing fluoxymesterone
therapy for over four years, but again cause and effect were not
claimed. A survey examined all reported deaths from hepatic angiosarcoma,
a type of liver cancer, in the United States from 1964 to 1974; from the total
of 168 cases, 1 was associated with taking fluoxymesterone. Once again, however,
“association” is not “cause.”
Pregnancy. In humans the compound may harm fetal development of female
sexual organs, introducing male characteristics. The drug is not recommended
for pregnant women, but the substance has been used to control milk
production. Fluoxymesterone passes into milk, and nursing mothers should
avoid the drug.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Fluoxymesterone 173
Dhillon, V.S., et al. “In Vitro and in Vivo Genotoxicity of Hormonal Drugs. VI. Fluoxymesterone.”
Mutation Research 342 (1995): 103–11.
Kirkland, R.T., and G.W. Clayton. “Growth Increments with Low Dose Intermittent
Growth Hormone and Fluoxymesterone in First Year of Therapy in Hypopituitarism.”
Pediatrics 63 (1979): 386–88.
Lenko, H.L., J. Maenpaa, and J. Perheentupa. “Acceleration of Delayed Growth with
Fluoxymesterone.” Acta Paediatrica Scandinavica 71 (1982): 929–36.
Novak, E., et al. “Pharmacologic Evaluation of Fluoxymesterone in Normal Men.” Current
Therapeutic Research: Clinical and Experimental 16 (1974): 251–260.
Strickland, A.L. “Long-Term Results of Treatment with Low-Dose Fluoxymesterone in
Constitutional Delay of Growth and Puberty and in Genetic Short Stature.” Pediatrics
91 (1993): 716–20.
Flurazepam
Pronunciation: flur-AZ-eh-pam
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 17617-23-1. (Hydrochloride form
1172-18-5)
Formal Names: Dalmane, Paxane
Type: Depressant (benzodiazepine class). See page 21
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule IV (DEA no. 2767)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: X
Uses. Flurazepam has become one of the most common benzodiazepine
class compounds in medical use around the globe. One reason for its popularity
is flurazepam’s high therapeutic index, meaning the dose needed for
medical action is much smaller than a fatal dose, making accidental poisoning
unlikely. Caregivers mainly use this long-acting drug to help people sleep,
and it has been used experimentally to reduce sleepwalking.
Drawbacks. Flurazepam often leaves people groggy the next day, impairing
their mental abilities (including memory and accuracy of perceptions). Such
problems can decrease after weeks or months of using the drug, but in one
experiment users never achieved normal performance while taking flurazepam.
Researchers find that volunteers may be unaware of the trouble they are
having. In contrast to those typical findings, experiments using healthy college
students found no effect on performance the day after taking a nighttime dose
of the drug.
Laboratory tests of users demonstrate impairment in reaction time, eyehand
coordination, making decisions, and maintaining attention. All those
skills are relevant to operating an automobile. Twelve hours after taking a
nighttime dose of flurazepam, volunteers drove a test vehicle. Researchers
conducting the experiment concluded that such drivers were much more likely
to have a road accident than controls who received a placebo. Bolder experimenters
had drivers take a car into actual traffic the day after ingesting flurazepam,
and drivers had trouble keeping the car aligned in the proper lane.
An experiment using a driving simulator also showed people to have trouble
driving the morning after using flurazepam.
Users tend to be more accident prone in general, not just behind the steering
wheel of a car. A case report tells of a person’s muscular discoordination
Flurazepam 175
clearing up when he stopped taking flurazepam, and experimental work has
documented the drug’s tendency to interfere with movement. In elderly persons
that unsteadiness is associated with falls causing broken hips, and caution
is advised in prescribing flurazepam to older people. One factor with
flurazepam problems experienced by the elderly is that, compared to younger
persons, the elderly maintain higher levels of the drug in their bodies from a
given dose.
Researchers find that the substance can help people shift their sleep schedules
from night to daytime, while promoting good-quality rest, yet the drug
still has hangover effects that degrade ability to function after awakening.
The drug can worsen verbal communication, causing voices to become indistinct
and grammar to become garbled. Studies measuring sleep-time
breathing find that the drug can exacerbate respiration problems; in some
experiments researchers concluded that the change has no practical effect on
health, but medical literature notes an instance in which the drug’s influence
on breathing did cause trouble for a sleeping person. In a mice experiment
flurazepam lowered body temperature. In humans long-term use of the drug
is suspected of causing hallucinations and confusion, and a case report exists
of a single dose creating those symptoms along with euphoria. Investigators
in the 1970s found mild euphoria to be a routine effect of flurazepam. Headache,
low blood pressure, eyesight trouble, nausea, vomiting, and constipation
can occur. A case report relates that a woman’s interest in sexual activity
increased when she stopped taking flurazepam and diazepam. Flurazepam is
believed to interfere with women’s ability to achieve a sexual orgasm.
Abuse factors. Tests with normal persons find that flurazepam has equal or
less appeal compared to placebo. Medical authorities examining the drug in
the 1970s concluded that it probably had little potential for abuse. Despite the
drug’s apparent low appeal, it can create a physical dependence with a person’s
body. Withdrawal symptoms can include peevishness, fidgeting, anxiety,
sweating, tremors, high blood pressure, and intolerance to light and sounds.
One longtime user of flurazepam and diazepam developed such a strong dependence
with them that a severe withdrawal syndrome occurred when she
suddenly halted dosage: cramps, stomach discomfort, nervous unease, sleep
difficulty, and nightmares. Milder versions of such symptoms are reported if
the original level of dependence is lighter. Symptoms can be avoided if flurazepam
usage is tapered off rather than stopped suddenly. Volunteers who
received flurazepam in a long-term experiment consistently detected the difference
between the drug and a placebo, an ability causing investigators to
conclude that users of flurazepam do not develop tolerance to the drug (tolerance
is a classic indicator of addictive potential). This conclusion is not accepted
by all experts, however, and some believe tolerance does occur.
Drug interactions. A catalepsy effect from marijuana may become stronger
in mice if they also receive flurazepam, but the reason is unclear. Alcohol and
flurazepam boost some of each other’s effects. Experimenters find that caffeine
can lessen flurazepam’s adverse next-day effects on performance. The heartburn
medicine cimetidine lengthens the time that flurazepam’s metabolite desalkylflurazepam
stays in the body. In a monkey experiment, that metabolite
176 Flurazepam
produced performance deficiencies reminiscent of those seen in humans with
flurazepam and also lowered inhibitions.
Cancer. No indication of a cancer-causing potential has emerged.
Pregnancy. Experiments with rats and rabbits produced no birth defects.
Researchers tracking assorted birth defects examined medical records of 50 to
99 women who took flurazepam during pregnancy and found no malformations
in offspring. Nonetheless, birth defects are considered a serious risk from
the drug, and pregnant women are advised to avoid it. Newborns from mothers
using the drug may have “floppy infant syndrome” involving sedation,
inferior muscle tone, breathing trouble, and poor feeding.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Council on Drugs. “Evaluation of a New Hypnotic Agent—Flurazepam Hydrochloride
(Dalmane).” Journal of the American Medical Association 218 (1971): 246.
De Wit, H., E.H. Uhlenhuth, and C.E. Johanson. “Lack of Preference for Flurazepam
in Normal Volunteers.” Pharmacology, Biochemistry, and Behavior 21 (1984):
865–69.
“Flurazepam (Dalmane).” Medical Letter on Drugs and Therapeutics 17 (1975): 29–30.
Judd, L.L., E. Ellinwood, and L.A. McAdams. “Cognitive Performance and Mood in
Patients with Chronic Insomnia during 14-Day Use of Flurazepam and Midazolam.”
Journal of Clinical Psychopharmacology 10 (1990, Suppl.): S56–S67.
Juhl, R.P., V.M. Daugherty, and P.D. Kroboth. “Incidence of Next-Day Anterograde
Amnesia Caused by Flurazepam Hydrochloride and Triazolam.” Clinical Pharmacy
3 (1984): 622–25.
Mendelson, W.B., et al. “A Clinical Study of Flurazepam.” Sleep 5 (1982): 350–60.
Wesnes, K., and D.M. Warburton. “A Comparison of Temazepam and Flurazepam in
Terms of Sleep Quality and Residual Changes in Performance.” Neuropsychobiology
11 (1984): 255–59.
Younus, M., and M.J. Labellarte. “Insomnia in Children: When Are Hypnotics Indicated?”
Paediatric Drugs 4 (2002): 391–403.
Freon
Pronunciation: FREE-on
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 11126-05-9
Type: Inhalant. See page 26
Federal Schedule Listing: Unlisted
USA Availability: Generally unrestricted
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. Freon is most familiar as a component of refrigeration and airconditioning
systems. The compound is commonly used to clean metal, and
other industrial uses exist as well. In past times freon was routinely used in
pressurized aerosol spray cans, but that usage ended after scientists discovered
that freon contributes to the destruction of the Earth’s ozone layer. Some
persons have experienced hallucinations from inhaling freon vapor. A medical
case report mentions that heavy polydrug abusers have used freon to experience
flashbacks of those experiences. Various chemical formulations of freon
exist, some of which may have hallucinogenic effect, and some of which may
not.
Drawbacks. Freon may produce lung spasms. The substance has caused
high blood pressure, perhaps as a consequence of kidney damage resulting
from the substance. Users have described accelerated heartbeat. Inhalation has
also brought on a cardiac emergency called ventricular fibrillation, which is
fatal without immediate medical intervention. Even if the person survives,
most individuals do not receive sufficient help in time to prevent lasting brain
injury from lack of oxygen. In one case a 15-year-old freon user not only
experienced the heart emergency but suffered lung and muscle damage as
well. Using enough freon in a closed space can be fatal due to oxygen starvation.
Inhalers have also reported injuries ranging from lacerations to a broken
neck when they lost consciousness and collapsed while sniffing freon;
such harm may not be attributable to the substance itself but can be a consequence
of using it.
Pressurized freon gas can be cold enough to cause frostbite. Case reports
note cold damage to fingers, along with drooling caused by frostbite injury to
lips, tongue, and inside of the mouth. One report described “notable deformation”
of someone’s face; in another case, plastic surgery was necessary to
reconstruct the damaged face of one recreational user.
178 Freon
Injection of freon is possible but seems to occur as industrial accidents to
fingers rather than as an effort to obtain psychological effects. Upon injection,
the gas, which has been under pressure in a container, is free to expand inside
the body, producing uncomfortable results. Case reports indicate that victims
fully recover.
Injury has also occurred from exposure to liquid freon, which is extremely
cold and can cause severe frostbite. In one case, portions of a stomach died
from freezing, causing holes that had to be surgically repaired. As with injections,
injuries from liquid freon seem to be industrial accidents rather than
results of recreational use.
Abuse factors. Not enough scientific information to report about tolerance,
dependence, withdrawal, or addiction.
Drug interactions. Not enough scientific information to report.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Not enough scientific information to report.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
“Aerosols for Colds.” Medical Letter on Drugs and Therapeutics 15 (1973): 86–88.
Brady, W.J., Jr., et al. “Freon Inhalational Abuse Presenting with Ventricular Fibrillation.”
American Journal of Emergency Medicine 12 (1994): 533–36.
Goldsmith, R.J. “Death by Freon.” Journal of Clinical Psychiatry 50 (1989): 36–37.
Lee, T., et al. “Oral Frostbite Secondary to Freon Propellant Abuse.” Journal of Toxicology.
Clinical Toxicology 34 (1996): 562.
Maxwell, J.C. “Deaths Related to the Inhalation of Volatile Substances in Texas: 1988–
1998.” American Journal of Drug and Alcohol Abuse 27 (2001): 689–97.
Wegener, E.E., K.R. Barraza, and S.K. Das. “Severe Frostbite Caused by Freon Gas.”
Southern Medical Journal 84 (1991): 1143–46.
Gasoline
Pronunciation: gas-uhl-EEN (also pronounced GAS-uhl-een)
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 8006-61-9. (Benzine form 86290-
81-5)
Formal Names: Petrol, White Gasoline
Type: Inhalant. See page 26
Federal Schedule Listing: Unlisted
USA Availability: Generally unrestricted
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. Inhaling gasoline fumes can produce effects that researchers liken to
those of mescaline: euphoria, hallucinations, and distortions of sensory perception
including sensations of revolving and floating. Some users experience
feelings of increased power and reduced fear, effects that may encourage mischief
from users who are already social outcasts.
Drawbacks. Sniffers have complained of tasting gasoline for days afterward.
Other unwanted effects may include fear, lonely feelings, sleepiness, weakness,
headache, poor appetite, nausea, too much salivation, breathing difficulty,
dizziness, lightheadedness, ringing in the ears, and amnesia. Conflicting
evidence exists about possible inhalation harm to kidneys in male rats and in
humans, although the human risk is considered low to nonexistent. Case reports
tell of muscle injury from inhaling gasoline. Nerve damage can arise,
causing trouble in walking and other movements. Manic behavior and seizures
are reported. As with most other inhalant abuse, sudden death can
occur.
The human body reacts to gasoline vapor in the same way regardless of a
person’s motive for inhaling it, and researchers have expressed concern about
health hazards faced by automobile filling station attendants who receive
long-term low-level exposure to gasoline fumes.
Fumes from other types of fuels can have similar actions. In a training exercise
JP-5 aviation fuel vapor leaked into the cockpit of a T-34C turboprop
aircraft. One pilot gradually lost control proficiency, becoming euphoric and
mirthful even though he was told an emergency had been declared. The other
pilot was nauseated but managed to land the craft. Both had trouble walking,
were weary, and had problems completing familiar written reports. The next
180 Gasoline
day the pilot who had been more severely affected had allergic symptoms
(sneezing, nasal discharge, eyes watering and itching) and poor appetite.
Sniffing leaded gasoline is uncommon in the United States, as federal regulations
halted motor fuel sales of that substance (although the product was
still available in Mexico and Canada in the 1990s). In addition to injury from
gasoline the product can cause lead poisoning. Leaded gasoline damage to
thinking ability has been documented: attention, learning, and memory. Recreational
users of leaded gasoline may also suffer organic brain damage leading
to tremors, difficulty in moving arms and legs, personality change,
psychosis, sleepiness, and dementia. Recovery may occur, but fatal outcome
is possible. One study of persons hospitalized for chronic leaded gasoline sniffing
in Australia noted a 40% death rate, but that was the death rate for persons
so sick that they required hospital care, not for chronic leaded gasoline users
as a whole. Persons with industrial exposure to leaded gasoline fumes have
exhibited psychotic behavior, occasionally followed by death. Gasoline sold
as a motor fuel may contain toluene or various other chemicals that are hazardous
to breathe and that may account for some unwanted effects attributed
to gasoline.
Injection of liquid gasoline for recreational purposes is disastrous; in Nazi
Germany gasoline injection was an experimental method of execution. A case
report about a drug abuser who survived gasoline injection noted nerve damage
that reduced motion capability in the arm and hand. Drinking gasoline
can also have serious medical consequences; one case report listed kidney and
respiratory failure along with damage to liver and blood, accompanied by
seizures.
Injury may occur by combining dangerous activity with impaired judgment
during intoxication. Unconscious persons may let a gasoline container spill its
flammable contents all over them. Recreational users have suffered major
burns from ignition of vapor and liquid. Open flame is unnecessary; a static
electricity spark can set off the gasoline. Inhaled gases can spread into other
parts of the body besides the lungs, and fire from ignited gasoline vapor can
instantly reach into the body’s interior with devastating consequences. One
scientific journal article is entitled “Death Due to ‘Harakiri’ or Gasoline
Fumes?”
Abuse factors. Gasoline gets little attention as a substance of abuse in the
United States, but researchers in India studied nine teenage and younger persons
who declared gasoline to be their top choice among recreational substances.
These users were all from lower social and economic backgrounds,
and their fathers tended to be alcoholics. Authorities have described the practice
as more popular in rural American communities than in big cities. A study
of the habit among Navajo teenagers found them doing poorly in school and
prone to trouble with police, factors probably having nothing to do with effects
of the chemical but that indicate that gasoline misuse appeals to social
misfits. Research in Australia and Canada has also linked the practice to individuals
experiencing personal and social discontent. The practice seems
more prevalent among males than among females. Gasoline sniffing is often
a social occasion rather than a solitary practice, suggesting that the custom
has elements of promoting group identity and solidarity.
Gasoline 181
Development of dependence with gasoline is indicated by a withdrawal
syndrome: dry mouth, watery eyes, sleeping difficulty, peevishness, problems
in moving arms and legs.
Drug Interactions. Not enough scientific information to report.
Cancer. Some types of DNA damage indicate cancer-causing potential, and
evidence of DNA damage has been detected in persons with workplace exposure
to gasoline fumes. A large study examining medical records of 19,000
automobile service station attendants through a 20-year period found higherthan-
normal rates of cancer in the nose, throat, lungs, and kidneys. Gasoline
vapor is suspected of causing acute myeloid leukemia. Gasoline fumes cause
cancer in animal experiments.
Pregnancy. Infants born to women who were recreational gasoline inhalers
during pregnancy may exhibit improper muscle tension, head deformities,
mental retardation, and other deficiencies, leading some researchers to suspect
that gasoline causes birth defects.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Beckmann, G., and G. Hauck. “Tod durch ‘Harakiri’ oder Benzindampfe? [Death due
to ‘Harakiri’ or Gasoline Fumes?]” Archiv fu¨ r Kriminologie 154 (1974): 77–82.
Edminster, S.C., and M.J. Bayer. “Recreational Gasoline Sniffing: Acute Gasoline Intoxication
and Latent Organolead Poisoning. Case Reports and Literature Review.”
Journal of Emergency Medicine 3 (1985): 365–70.
Maruff, P., et al. “Neurological and Cognitive Abnormalities Associated with Chronic
Petrol Sniffing.” Brain 121 (1998): 1903–17.
Nurcombe, B., et al. “A Hunger for Stimuli: The Psychosocial Background of Petrol
Inhalation.” British Journal of Medical Psychology 43 (1970): 367–74.
Poklis, A., and C.D. Burkett. “Gasoline Sniffing: A Review.” Clinical Toxicology 11
(1977): 35–41.
Seshia, S.S., et al. “The Neurological Manifestations of Chronic Inhalation of Leaded
Gasoline.” Developmental Medicine and Child Neurology 20 (1978): 323–34.
Tolan, E.J., and F.A. Lingl. “ ‘Model Psychosis’ Produced by Inhalation of Gasoline
Fumes.” American Journal of Psychiatry 120 (1964): 757–761.
Valpey, R., et al. “Acute and Chronic Progressive Encephalopathy Due to Gasoline
Sniffing.” Neurology 28 (1978): 507–10.
GHB
Pronunciation: jee-eightch-bee
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 591-81-1. (Sodium salt form 502-
85-2)
Formal Names: 4-Hydroxybutanoic Acid, Gamma Hydroxybutyrate, Gamma-
Hydroxybutyric Acid, Sodium Oxybate, Sodium Oxybutyrate
Informal Names: Blue Verve, Cherry Menth, Cherry Meth, Easy Lay, Everclear, EZ
Lay, Fantasy, G, Gamma Oh, GBH, Georgia Home Boy, Ghana Marijuana, Gib,
Goop, Great Hormones at Bedtime, Grievous Bodily Harm, G-Riffick, Growth
Hormone Booster, Jib, Jib Gamma, Lemons, Liquid E, Liquid Ecstasy, Liquid X,
Max (combination with amphetamines), Mickey Finn Special, Natural Sleep-
500, Nature’s Quaalude, Organic Quaalude, Oxy-Sleep, Poor Man’s Heroin,
Salty Water, Soap, Scoop, Somatomax, Somsanit, Vita-G, Water, Wolfies,
Zonked
Type: Depressant. See page 19
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule I (DEA no. 2010)
USA Availability: Illegal to possess
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. Although GHB is commercially manufactured, it is also produced
within the bodies of mammals where it may promote hibernation and help
the brain to withstand deficient oxygen supply. The substance was once
widely available as a nutritional supplement in health food stores. People
consumed it in hopes that the product would promote fat reduction and muscle
development. Human experiments confirm that the drug can increase the
body’s levels of human growth hormone while the substance is circulating in
the bloodstream, but the studies did not last long enough to show whether
this GHB effect built muscles or reduced fat. The hope for muscle development
has been tested in experiments with rats and dogs, but without success; the
drug failed to increase the animals’ growth hormone levels.
Where this drug is legal, its main medical use is for anesthesia and for
treating drug abuse patients. It has been used experimentally to study epilepsy,
to reduce damage from exposure to nuclear radiation, and to treat fibromyalgia
(a rheumatic disease causing weariness, muscle pain, and stiff
joints). Some efforts to help schizophrenics with the substance have been successful;
some have not. Experiments with hamsters indicate the drug may
GHB 183
have potential for reducing damage from bleeding. Animal experiments also
suggest the drug may have potential in treating heart attack. Although GHB
is a depressant that has been used successfully to treat insomnia, it has also
been used to treat narcolepsy, a condition in which people have difficulty
staying awake.
According to law enforcement authorities, rapists have exploited GHB’s sedative
effect to make victims pliable. From 1996 to 1999 a total of 22 such
reports reached the U.S. Drug Enforcement Administration. From 1996 to 1999
a group of 2,003 urine samples were compiled from victims across the United
States in sexual assault cases where drugs were a suspected weapon used by
the assailant. Analysis found GHB or flunitrazepam in fewer than 2%, and
the number of instances declined in each passing year. At about the same
time, a 26-month study collected 1,179 samples from sexual assault cases nationwide
in which a drug was suspected of playing a role and found 4% to
be positive for GHB.
Persons wanting GHB sometimes obtain GBL instead (gamma butyrolactone,
nicknamed Blue Nitro Vitality or Firewater). The body converts a dose
of GBL into GHB, so their effects are about the same. Products containing GBL
can be poisonous, a fact that some drug abusers learn in dramatic ways.
Recreational users take GHB for euphoria and hallucinations, to increase
sociability, to promote interest in sexual activity, and to lower inhibitions. One
drug misuser who used GBL likened its effects to alcohol. GBL is also marketed
as a mood elevator, a quality that some GHB users ascribe to that substance
as well. Researchers using various scientific measurements have
confirmed that GHB promotes mental calmness but may simultaneously make
a person feel discontented.
Drawbacks. Tests using medical-size doses (which may be smaller than ones
taken by illicit users) reveal no impairment of mental or physical abilities; the
researchers concluded that GHB does not hurt job performance or ability to
drive a car. Nevertheless, GHB is suspected of causing an automobile driver
to pass out, and the drug’s sleep-inducing properties make it inadvisable to
use while operating dangerous machinery. Supposedly the drug causes amnesia
about events that occur while a person is intoxicated with the substance,
although experiments using medical-size doses find no effect on short-term
memory. A large-enough dose can slow heart rate and interfere with a person’s
ability to move and make a person vomit and fall asleep. Breathing
difficulty can occur. Seizures have been reported, but some authorities believe
those reports have misidentified various muscle contractions as seizures. In
monkeys the drug lowers body temperature. In rats that effect depends on a
dose’s size, with small amounts raising body temperature and large amounts
lowering it. An odd overdose effect has been observed in persons who temporarily
stop breathing yet become violent despite that impairment. The drug
reduces control of urination and defecation. Although GHB can cause blood
to appear in urine, no damage to body organs has been observed. People can
take medical doses for years without showing any psychotic symptoms.
Abuse factors. Experiments with monkeys show little abuse potential in the
drug, but some medical personnel who treat drug abusers consider the potential
to be high. GHB abusers, however, tend to have bad relationships with
184 GHB
other drugs as well, so using such a population to evaluate GHB’s particular
abuse potential is treacherous.
GHB has been used successfully to reduce or even eliminate withdrawal
symptoms in alcohol addicts. One alcohol withdrawal study found GHB as
effective as diazepam, a standard drug given to aid alcohol withdrawal; in
addition, GHB worked faster than diazepam at alleviating sadness, restlessness,
and anxiety among patients. GHB has also reduced craving for alcohol
on a long-term basis. One group of researchers administering GHB for this
purpose observed no troublesome unwanted effects, and barely 1% of patients
began abusing GHB—a disturbing percentage in a general population but a
very low rate for a drug addict population. Tightly controlled dispensing conditions,
however, may be the reason for that low rate; abuse might be heavier
among persons with ready access to the drug. GHB is cross-tolerant enough
with heroin and methadone to diminish their withdrawal symptoms. Animal
experiments have found modest cross-tolerance with morphine, dextroamphetamine,
and LSD.
In studies measuring GHB’s usefulness for treating narcolepsy, no tolerance
was observed even though some patients had been taking the drug for up to
nine years. Dispute exists about whether tolerance develops in nonmedical
usage. GHB dependence can emerge after taking large doses for a long time.
Diazepam can ease GHB withdrawal symptoms. Tremors, uneasiness, difficulty
with sleep, visual and auditory hallucinations, high blood pressure,
faster heartbeat, sweating, nausea, and vomiting can be part of the withdrawal
syndrome. Symptoms may last for over two weeks. GHB withdrawal can include
psychosis so severe that people have to be restrained, but how much of
that reaction is caused by the drug and how much is caused by the individual’s
underlying personality may be unclear. Dosage affects severity of withdrawal,
with heavy users having the most trouble.
Drug interactions. The HIV (human immunodeficiency virus) drugs saquinavir
and ritonavir can have serious and potentially fatal interactions with
GHB. Simultaneous use of alcohol or other depressants with GHB increases
risk of overdose. The drug has a high sodium content, which might be a
problem for persons needing to limit their intake of sodium.
Cancer. Tests on rats and mice indicate GHB does not cause cancer.
Pregnancy. Whether the drug causes birth defects is unknown. It passes into
the fetus if a pregnant woman takes a dose and can reduce fetal respiration.
When the substance was still a legal medical drug, GHB was used as an aid
to childbirth.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
“Adverse Events Associated with Ingestion of Gamma-butyrolactone—Minnesota,
New Mexico, and Texas, 1998–1999.” MMWR. Morbidity and Mortality Weekly
Report. 48 (1999): 137–40.
Bernasconi, R., et al. “Gamma-hydroxybutyric Acid: An Endogenous Neuromodulator
with Abuse Potential?” Trends in Pharmacological Sciences 20 (1999): 135–41.
Dyer, J.E. “Gamma-hydroxybutyrate: A Health-Food Product Producing Coma and
Seizurelike Activity.” American Journal of Emergency Medicine 9 (1991): 321–24.
Ferrara, S.D., et al. “Effects of Single Dose of Gamma-hydroxybutyric Acid and LoraGHB
185
zepam on Psychomotor Performance and Subjective Feelings in Healthy Volunteers.”
European Journal of Clinical Pharmacology 54 (1999): 821–27.
Galloway, G.P., et al. “Gamma-hydroxybutyrate: An Emerging Drug of Abuse That
Causes Physical Dependence.” Addiction 92 (1997): 89–96.
Hernandez, M., et al. “GHB-Induced Delirium: A Case Report and Review of the Literature
on Gamma Hydroxybutyric Acid.” American Journal of Drug and Alcohol
Abuse 24 (1998): 179–83.
Li, J., S.A. Stokes, and A. Woeckener. “A Tale of Novel Intoxication: A Review of the
Effects of Gamma-hydroxybutyric Acid with Recommendations for Management.”
Annals of Emergency Medicine 31 (1998): 729–36.
Glutethimide
Pronunciation: gloo-TETH-ih-meyed
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 77-21-4
Formal Names: Doriden, Elrodorm, Noxyron
Informal Names: CB, CD, Ciba, D, Glue, Goofballs, Goofers. With codeine: Doors
& 4s, Dors & 4s, 4 Doors, G & C, Hits, Loads, Packets, Pancakes & Syrup, Sets,
Setups, 3s & 8s
Type: Depressant. See page 19
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule II (DEA no. 2550)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. The substance became available in the 1950s as an alternative to barbiturates.
As a medicine this drug is mainly used to calm people and make
them sleepy. It has also been used to help prevent jaundice in newborns and
to reduce muscle tremors in adults. Glutethimide intoxication has been likened
to that from alcohol or barbiturates.
Drawbacks. Glutethimide can have a rebound effect, meaning that if a person
is taking the drug to combat anxiety or insomnia and stops taking it, those
conditions can temporarily become worse than before. One study found that
after several months the drug’s ability to induce sleep deteriorates so badly
that users have more trouble falling asleep than insomniacs who don’t use
any sleep-inducing drug.
A test of the drug’s influence on mental ability found little effect, but tobacco
smokers seemed to be affected more than nonsmokers. A test of skills
related to automobile driving found little influence from glutethimide. The
drug produced inconsistent results in another experiment measuring alertness,
reaction time, and decision making. Those tests, however, involve normal
doses during relatively brief time spans. Generally people are advised to become
aware of how the drug affects them before attempting to run dangerous
machinery. Long-term heavy abuse can reduce mental skills in ways that resemble
organic brain damage. Animal experiments suggest that the substance
may worsen porphyria, a body chemistry disorder that can make a person
violent. The drug can aggravate urinary tract blockage and should be used
cautiously by persons with enlarged prostate. Eyesight difficulty and dry
mouth are among typical unwanted effects.
Glutethimide 187
A severe overdose can produce what looks like skin burns, and muscle
spasms or even convulsions may occur. Case reports note that long-term use
of glutethimide can decrease a person’s calcium levels; one report tells of
bones softening in a person who took the drug routinely for 10 years, and
another report notes seizures occurring due to low calcium. The drug can also
reduce a body’s supply of vitamin D. After a dozen years of daily glutethimide
ingestion, one person had lost so much muscle control that speech was difficult,
unassisted walking was impossible, and control of urination and bowel
movements was no longer possible. Similar case reports exist. Others, however,
mention persons who took the drug for years without noticeable ill effect.
Abuse factors. Some illicit drug users take glutethimide with codeine. The
combination supposedly produces a euphoria and stupor like heroin’s. Users
of the combination report increased sociability and feelings of intellectual insight
in discussions that were actually about nothing. The drug mix can seriously
impair breathing, and deaths are verified. Some of these deaths involve
dosages of each drug that were theoretically safe, outcomes implying that
glutethimide and codeine may boost each other’s actions. Users of the combination
have experienced typical unwanted actions of both drugs in addition
to headaches, grouchiness, tremors, cramps, and trouble sleeping.
Glutethimide tolerance and dependence can develop. Withdrawal has
symptoms similar to those seen with barbiturates. Seizures are noted in case
reports. Among persons taking medical doses of glutethimide for months, a
withdrawal syndrome can include hallucinations, fever, delirium, and convulsions.
Case reports tell of withdrawal experiences that included catatonia.
For addiction treatment, phenobarbital can be substituted for glutethimide,
and a person can then be gradually weaned off the phenobarbital.
Drug interactions. The drug reduces effectiveness of warfarin, a medicine
that fights heart attack and stroke by reducing blood clotting. Glutethimide is
also supposed to be avoided if someone is taking the anti-blood-clotting substance
coumarin. A U.S. Army aerospace test found that using alcohol with
glutethimide did not harm breathing. That finding has rather narrow significance
for most persons, but a more generally relevant finding came from an
experiment showing that glutethimide raised blood alcohol levels of persons
who had been drinking. Alcohol and glutethimide may be a mix to avoid.
Antihistamines should be used cautiously with glutethimide. Animal experimentation
shows that injection of marijuana’s main active component THC
(tetrahydrocannabinol) increases the potency of glutethimide, thereby increasing
risk of overdose.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Glutethimide is related to thalidomide, perhaps the most notorious
pharmaceutical cause of human birth defects. In experimentation with
rats and rabbits glutethimide did not produce physically apparent birth defects.
The death rate among rabbit offspring was 6%, however, compared to
a 2% rate among offspring with no fetal drug exposure—a rate three times
higher for the glutethimide group than for the nondrug group. One experiment
found the death rate of rats with prenatal glutethimide exposure to be
three times that of rats with no drug exposure. Surviving rats with fetal ex188
Glutethimide
posure to glutethimide exhibit abnormal behavior, but their own offspring
behave normally. Pregnant women have routinely received glutethimide for
insomnia, nausea, and vomiting. Humans with sufficient fetal exposure may
be born dependent on the drug. It has been used to ease labor. Nursing mothers
who take the drug may have enough glutethimide in their milk to make
their infants sleepy.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Bender, F.H., J.V. Cooper, and R. Dreyfus. “Fatalities Associated with an Acute Overdose
of Glutethimide (Doriden) and Codeine.” Veterinary and Human Toxicology
30 (1988): 332–33.
DiGiacomo, J.N., and C.L. King. “Codeine and Glutethimide Addiction.” International
Journal of the Addictions 5 (1970): 279–85.
Haas, D.C., and A. Marasigan. “Neurological Effects of Glutethimide.” Journal of Neurology,
Neurosurgery, and Psychiatry 31 (1968): 561–64
Jones, A.H., and J.F. Mayberry. “Chronic Glutethimide Abuse.” British Journal of Clinical
Practice 40 (1986): 213.
Kovacs, T. “[Acute Toxicological Cases during a Ten-Year Period in Our Clinic].” Orvosi
Hetilap [Hungarian Medical Journal] 143 (2002): 71–76. Abstract in English.
Mould, G.P., S.H. Curry, and T.B. Binns. “Interaction of Glutethimide and Phenobarbital
with Ethanol in Man.” Journal of Pharmacy and Pharmacology 24 (1972): 894–
99.
Reveri, M., S.P. Pyati, and R.S. Pildes. “Neonatal Withdrawal Symptoms Associated
with Glutethimide (Doriden) Addiction in the Mother during Pregnancy.” Clinical
Pediatrics 16 (1977): 424–25.
Shamoian, C.A. “Codeine and Glutethimide; Euphoretic, Addicting Combination.” New
York State Journal of Medicine 75 (1975): 97–99.
Halazepam
Pronunciation: hal-AZ-eh-pam
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 23092-17-3
Formal Names: Paxipam
Type: Depressant (benzodiazepine class). See page 21
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule IV (DEA no. 2762)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: D
Uses. Halazepam’s main medical usage is for reducing anxiety. Because the
drug promotes drowsiness, it is sometimes prescribed to be taken at bedtime,
aiding both sleep and calmness. One experiment found the compound to be
more effective than clorazepate dipotassium in helping anxiety. Another study
found that halazepam can diminish anxiety significantly on the very first day
of administration. Halazepam is also used to treat symptoms of alcohol withdrawal
and has had some experimental success in alleviating schizophrenic
psychoses. Physicians have observed that halazepam can reduce stress and
depression and can improve epilepsy. An experiment found that halazepam
did not increase belligerence, unlike some benzodiazepine class drugs. Canine
studies show that in the body the drug converts into nordiazepam and oxazepam,
which are also metabolites of diazepam.
Drawbacks. The compound can reduce saliva output. With stronger dosages
elderly persons sometimes experience difficulty in manual dexterity and other
muscle control; during an experiment several elderly individuals fell. In certain
kinds of tests mice exhibit memory trouble after the drug is given.
Abuse factors. In an experiment some alcoholics had difficulty distinguishing
halazepam from placebo, an outcome suggesting that the drug has low
potential for abuse (as abusers of alcohol and other drugs should be particularly
susceptible). Nonetheless, a person’s body can develop physical dependence
with halazepam, which is a traditional sign of addictive potential. One
group of researchers found withdrawal symptoms to be so mild, however,
that a placebo could control them.
Drug interactions. The heartburn medicine cimetidine is suspected of interfering
with halazepam’s effects.
Cancer. No cancer developed in rats and mice at daily dosage levels 5 to
50 times the maximum human dose.
190 Halazepam
Pregnancy. Experiments with rats and rabbits have produced no evidence
that the drug causes birth defects.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Fann, W.E., W.M. Pitts, and J.C. Wheless. “Pharmacology, Efficacy, and Adverse Effects
of Halazepam, a New Benzodiazepine.” Pharmacotherapy 2 (1982): 72–79.
Fann, W.E., B.W. Richman, and W.M. Pitts. “Halazepam in the Treatment of Recurrent
Anxiety Attacks in Chronically Anxious Outpatients: A Double Blind Placebo
Controlled Study.” Current Therapeutic Research: Clinical and Experimental 32
(1982): 906–10.
Griffiths, R.R., and B. Wolf. “Relative Abuse Liability of Different Benzodiazepines in
Drug Abusers.” Journal of Clinical Psychopharmacology 10 (1990): 237–43.
“Halazepam (Paxipam)—Another Benzodiazepine.” Medical Letter on Drugs and Therapeutics
24 (1982): 50.
Jaffe, J.H., et al. “Abuse Potential of Halazepam and of Diazepam in Patients Recently
Treated for Acute Alcohol Withdrawal.” Clinical Pharmacology and Therapeutics
34 (1983): 623–30.
Pecknold, J.C., et al. “Controlled Comparative Study of Halazepam in Anxiety.” Current
Therapeutic Research: Clinical and Experimental 32 (1982): 895–905.
Heroin
Pronunciation: HAIR-oh-in (also pronounced HEAR-oh-in)
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 561-27-3
Formal Names: Acetomorphine, Diacetylmorphine, Diamorphine
Informal Names: Agua de Chango, AIP, Al Capone, Alquitran, Alquitranat, Amsterdam
Marble, Antifreeze, Aries, Aunt Hazel, Bad Seed, Ball, Ballot, Bart Simpson,
Beast, Big H, Big Harry, Birdie Powder, Black Pearl, Black Stuff, Black Tar,
Blanca, Blanco, Blows, Blue Bag, Blunt, Bomb, Bombido, Bombita, Bombs
Away, Bonita, Boy, Bozo, Brain Damage, Brea, Brick Gum, Broja, Brown,
Brown Crystal, Brown Marijuana, Brown Rhine, Brown Sugar, Brown Tape,
Bundle, Butu, Caballo, Caca, Calbo, Canade, Cap, Capital H, Carga, Carne,
Chapopote, Charley, Chatarra, Cheese, Chicle, Chieva, China Cat, China White,
Chinese Red, Chip, Chiva, Climax, Cocofan, Coffee, Cotics, Courage Pills,
Crank, Crap, Crop, Crown Crap, Cura, Cut-Deck, Dava, Dead on Arrival, Deck
(quantity), Deuce, Diesel, Dirt, DOA, Dog Food, Dogie, Doogie, Dooje, Doojee,
Dooley, Dope, Dreck, Dr. Feelgood, Dugie, Duji, Dujie, Dust, Dyno, Dyno-
Pure, Eighth, Estuffa, Ferry Dust, Flea Powder, Foil, Foo Foo Stuff, Foolish
Powder, Fry Daddy (with crack), Furra, Galloping Horse, Gallup, Gamot, Garbage,
Gato, George, Georgia Smack, Girl, Glacines, Glass, Gold, Golden Girl,
Golpe, Goma, Good, Good & Plenty, Good H, Good Horse, Goofball (combination
with cocaine), Gravy, H, H & C (with cocaine), H-Bomb (withMDMA),
Hache, H Caps, Hairy, Hard, Hard Candy, Hard Stuff, Harry, Hazel, Heaven,
Heaven Dust, Helen, Hell Dust, Henry, Hera, Hero, Heroina, Herone, Hero of
the Underworld, Hessle, Him, Hombre, Hong-Yen, Horse, Horsebite, Hot
Dope, HRN, Indian Pink, Iroini, Isda, Jee Gee, Jee Jee, Jerry Springer, Jive, Jive
Doo Jee, Joharito, Jojee, Jones, Joy, Joy Flakes, Joy Powder, Junco, Junk, Kabayo,
Karachi (with methaqualone and phenobarbital), Kompot, La Buena, LBJ, Lemonade,
Little Bomb, Load (quantity), Malaysian Pink, Manteca, Matsakow,
Mayo, Mexican, Mexican Brown, Mexican Horse, Mexican Mud, Mojo, Monkey
Water, Moonrock (with crack cocaine), Morotgara, Mortal Combat, Mud,
Murder 1 (with cocaine), Murotugora, Muzzle, Nanoo, New Jack Swing (with
morphine), Nice & Easy, Noise, Nose, Nose Drops, Number 8, Number 4, Number
3, Nurse, Ogoy, Oil, Old Steve, Orange Line, Pack, Pangonadalot, Parachute
(alone or with crack), P-Dope, Peg, Penang Pink, Perfect High, Perica,
Perico, Persian, Persian Brown, P-Funk, Piedra, Poison, Polvo, Poppy, Powder,
Predator, Preza, Primo (with cocaine), Pulborn, Punk Rocker (with assorted
other substances), Pure, Quill, Racehorse Charlie, Ragweed, Rambo, Rane, Raw
192 Heroin
Fusion, Raw Hide, Ready Rock, Red, Red Chicken, Red Eagle, Red Rock, Red
Rock Opium (with barbital, caffeine, and strychnine), Red Rum (with barbital,
caffeine, and strychnine), Red Stuff (with barbital, caffeine, and strychnine),
Reindeer Dust, Rhine, Rufus, Sack, Salt, Scag, Scat, Scate, Schmeek, SCOT,
Scott, Scramble, Second to None, Shit, Shmeck, Shoot, Shoot-Up, Silk, Skag,
Skid, Skunk, Sleeper, Slime, Smack, Smoke (with crack cocaine), Smoking Gun
(with cocaine), Snow, Snowball (with cocaine), Speedball (with cocaine or
methylphenidate), Spider Blue, Spike, Spoon (quantity), Stuff, Sugar, Sweet
Dreams, Sweet Jesus, Sweet Stuff, Tar, Taste, Tecata, Thanie, Thing, Thunder,
Tigre, Tigre Blanco, Tigre del Norte, Tits, TNT, Tongs, Tootsie Roll, Vidrio,
Whack (with PCP), White, White Boy, White Girl, White Junk, White Lady,
White Nurse, White Stuff, Whiz Bang (with cocaine), Wicked, Wings, Witch,
Witch Hazel, Z (quantity), Zoquete
Type: Depressant (opiate class). See page 22
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule I (DEA no. 9200)
USA Availability: Illegal to possess
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. For most of the twentieth century drug addiction and heroin were
synonymous in the United States; all substance abuse was assumed to lead to
heroin. Only in the 1980s did heroin become displaced as the devil drug,
supplanted in public fear and disapproval by cocaine. Being a Schedule I
substance, heroin has no officially approved medical use in the United States.
Heroin is produced from morphine, and body chemistry converts a heroin
dose back into morphine. Most users cannot detect a difference between those
two substances. Depending on means of administration and the effect being
measured, heroin is 1.5 to 8.0 times stronger than morphine and is used medically
to suppress coughs and relieve pain in children and adults. One study
of pain relief found heroin comparable to hydromorphone, a standard medication
administered to fight severe pain. Physicians have judged heroin to be
a safe anesthetic for use during childbirth, with no apparent ill effect on
mother or child. The drug is also used to treat porphyria, a body chemistry
disorder making people sensitive to light and occasionally making them violent.
Heroin users of both genders have reported increased sexual activity
upon starting the compound, with decline in that activity as usage continues.
That sequence would be consistent with the drug at first reducing psychological
anxiety, an effect gradually evolving into indifference about the world.
As noted below, heroin has hormonal actions that reduce male sexual activity.
Extrapolating from severity of withdrawal symptoms, any particular size
heroin dose taken by intravenous injection is five times stronger than one
taken by inhaling heated vapor (“chasing the dragon”). Other measurements
show a dose to be four times more potent when taken intravenously instead
of by inhaling powder.
Sometimes intravenous injection of heroin produces a rush of feeling likened
to a total body sexual orgasm. Heroin may allow some nonmedical users
to experience euphoria, but more typically an intoxicating dose increases psyHeroin
193
chic distance between the user and the world, making reality seem unimportant.
Used in that way the drug is an escape—not into happiness but into
emptiness. Someone intoxicated by a dose of heroin does not care what happens
any more. Lesser doses simply reduce tension, taking the edge off life’s
stresses. People using lesser doses of heroin in that way may function more
productively, or they may experience trouble because they feel confident
enough to get into situations they would otherwise avoid.
Drawbacks. Classic unwanted heroin actions are nausea, vomiting, and constipation.
Many other afflictions attributed to the drug actually come from
adulterants in illicit supplies or from dosage techniques—such as addicts sharing
the same hypodermic needle with one another, a custom promoting diseases
ranging from hepatitis to AIDS (acquired immunodeficiency syndrome).
Researchers find, however, that injectors of a heroin variety called “black tar”
have an increased risk for botulism infection at the injection site, no matter
how hygienic their equipment and technique. Injectors of any type heroin are
more prone to all sorts of infections, and some researchers suspect that heroin
impairs the immune system. Inhaling heated heroin vapor can rapidly produce
enough brain damage to cripple a person, although case reports indicate
that partial recovery is possible. Inhaling either the vapor or powder can also
cause breathing trouble, and injection can cause swift fluid buildup in the
lungs. A study found reduced bone density in chronic male heroin users,
making broken bones more likely, and researchers suspected the problem resulted
from lower testosterone levels caused by heroin (a heroin action that
is also known to reduce male sex drive). Apparently the bone density and
testosterone problems can correct themselves if heroin use stops. Although
stroke is an uncommonly reported outcome of heroin use, autopsy examinations
of 100 heroin addict brains indicate that 5% to 10% of injectors suffer
small strokes that may not cause the person to seek medical treatment but
that may thereafter affect the person’s behavior. One experiment with heroin
addicts found still another unwanted effect: Most of them see colors somewhat
differently than nonusers do.
Abuse factors. All the above hazards are real, but experience also shows
that addicts can take maintenance doses (enough to hold off withdrawal
symptoms but not enough to get high) for years with no apparent ill effect.
The behavior of people on a maintenance dose can be indistinguishable from
someone using no drug at all; while on a maintenance dose of heroin ordinary
middle-class persons can function well in all aspects of life at work and at
home.1 Such factors are highly influenced by the legal setting of heroin use.
When federal legislation outlawed the drug in the early twentieth century, the
kinds of persons who took the drug changed, as did the common reasons for
using the drug.
Achieving heroin addiction is normally a lengthy process; people do not
become addicts instantly with a single dose. Indeed, persons can use heroin
intermittently for years and not develop dependence, let alone develop a compulsion
to take the drug. Someone with a fulfilling life is unlikely to become
addicted even if heroin is used occasionally. In contrast, people with nothing
to live for may find heroin to be the best part of their lives, a discovery leading
to addiction.
194 Heroin
Breaking heroin addiction depends on the reason someone takes the drug.
Severe withdrawal symptoms mimic influenza, but someone willing to put up
with them for a couple of days can emerge with no more dependence on the
drug. Physical dependence with heroin is a relatively trivial part of addiction.
Few addicts take the substance simply to avoid the withdrawal syndrome.
Instead, they take the drug to cope with assorted frustrations in life. If those
frustrations are resolved, the heroin addiction will resolve. If those difficulties
remain, heroin may remain the best way the addict knows to cope with them,
and addiction will persist.2 Both heroin and tobacco can reduce stress, and if
heroin users cut back on that drug, they often increase their cigarette consumption.
Although heroin is traditionally considered the final step in illicit drug use,
with previous substances leading from one to another until the climax of heroin
is reached, scientific research does not support that scenario. Experienced
drug users have typically used assorted substances over the years, but the
“gateway” hypothesis in which one substance leads to another has been refuted
time and again. Nor is heroin necessarily the final stopping place for
addicts. For example, research demonstrates that some heroin users move on
to amphetamines as their main drug.
Drug interactions. Some persons use heroin and amphetamines together or
heroin and cocaine together, a potentially fatal practice called speedballing, in
order to get a variety of simultaneous drug sensations. Analysis of fatalities
attributed to heroin suggests that alcohol increases risk of death.
Cancer. Whether heroin can cause cancer is unknown. One study found that
cells of heroin addicts show chromosome damage that might promote cancer,
but the damage becomes less over a period of months if addicts switch from
heroin to methadone. Other research has found that intravenous heroin users
are more likely to get cancer than the general population, but factors other
than heroin may be involved.
Pregnancy. Although heroin usage apparently damages chromosomes, the
damage may be from breakdown products rather than heroin itself. A study
of several dozen infants found that those from heroin-using mothers had six
or seven times the amount of chromosome damage found in infants from
mothers who did not use the drug. This damage did not translate into congenital
malformations, however. Researchers have examined children born to
women who abused heroin during pregnancy and found no indication that
the drug causes birth defects. Infants may be smaller than normal upon birth,
but heroin’s role is uncertain because the women tend to abuse additional
drugs and engage in other conduct harmful to fetal development. Infants born
to such mothers may have dependence with heroin and undergo withdrawal
symptoms. Sudden infant death syndrome is more common in babies with
fetal exposure to heroin than in babies without any illicit drug exposure, but
researchers are uncertain whether the drug is a more important factor than
overall home environment. Physical and mental development of children
whose mothers used heroin during pregnancy is slightly slower than normal,
an observation supported by findings in rat experiments. Examination of
school-age boys who had fetal exposure to heroin finds them to be much like
other children despite lower scores on various physical and psychological
Heroin 195
tests; one group of researchers noted that prenatal exposure to alcohol has
much more impact than heroin, and another investigator noted that girls’ test
scores were normal.
Among pregnant Australian women in drug treatment programs who use
both heroin and methadone, infant mortality is higher than among women
who only use methadone, but researchers believe the difference is not due to
heroin but due to multiproblem lifestyles in which heroin is just one of many
problems. This theme was also brought out by a study in Israel comparing
children of parents who abused heroin and children of parents who did not,
while at the same time comparing home environments. The investigators discovered
that assorted problems suffered by children of heroin users had much
more to do with general conditions at home than with any chemical influence
of the drug on fetal development, a conclusion supported by still more Israeli
research and consistent with findings by the U.S. National Institute on Drug
Abuse and other researchers.
Breast-feeding by heroin-using mothers is considered safe for their infants.
Passage of heroin into the milk is doubtful, and levels of heroin’s breakdown
products (such as morphine) are low enough to avoid hazard.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Cygan, J., M. Trunsky, and T. Corbridge. “Inhaled Heroin-Induced Status Asthmaticus:
Five Cases and a Review of the Literature.” Chest 117 (2000): 272–75.
“Diamorphine.” In Therapeutic Drugs, ed. C. Dollery. 2d ed. New York: Churchill Livingstone,
1999. D70–D75.
Ornoy, A., et al. “The Developmental Outcome of Children Born to Heroin-Dependent
Mothers, Raised at Home or Adopted.” Child Abuse and Neglect 20 (1996): 385–96.
Sawynok, J. “The Therapeutic Use of Heroin: A Review of the Pharmacological Literature.”
Canadian Journal of Physiology and Pharmacology 64 (1986): 1–6.
Schneider, J.W., and S.L. Hans. “Effects of Prenatal Exposure to Opioids on Focused
Attention in Toddlers during Free Play.” Journal of Developmental and Behavioral
Pediatrics 17 (1996): 240–47.
Sneader, W. “The Discovery of Heroin.” Lancet 352 (November 21, 1998): 1697–99.
Zuckerman, G.B., et al. “Neurologic Complications Following Intranasal Administration
of Heroin in an Adolescent.” Annals of Pharmacotherapy 30 (1996): 778–81.
Notes
1. P. Biernacki, Pathways from Heroin Addiction: Recovery without Treatment. Health,
Society, and Policy series, ed. S. Ruzek and I.K. Zola (Philadelphia: Temple University
Press, 1986), 6, 36, 55; T.S. Blair, “The Relation of Drug Addiction to Industry,” Journal
of Industrial Hygiene 1 (October 1919): 288; Blum, “Student Characteristics and Major
Drugs,” in R.H. Blum, et al., Students and Drugs: College and High School Observations,
The Jossey-Bass Behavioral Science Series and the Jossey-Bass Series in Higher Education
(published jointly) (San Francisco: Jossey-Bass, 1969), 77–78; I. Chein, et al., The
Road to H: Narcotics, Delinquency, and Social Policy (New York: Basic Books, 1964), 358;
T.D. Crothers, Morphinism and Narcomanias from Other Drugs (Philadelphia: W.B. Saunders
and Company, 1902), 31 (Not all of the Crothers book has withstood later scientific
advances); W.R. Cuskey, A.W. Klein, and W. Krasner, Drug-Trip Abroad: American Drug
Refugees in Amsterdam and London (Philadelphia: University of Pennsylvania Press,
1972), 94–96; W.C. Cutting, “Morphine Addiction for 62 Years,” Stanford Medical Bulletin
1 (August 1942): 39–41; T. Duster, The Legislation of Morality: Law, Drugs, and Moral
196 Heroin
Judgment (New York: The Free Press, 1970), 9, 117–28, 241; C.W. Earle, “The Opium
Habit: A Statistical and Clinical Lecture,” Chicago Medical Review 2 (1880): 445; L.S.
Goodman and A. Gilman, The Pharmacological Basis of Therapeutics, 2nd ed. (New York:
The Macmillan Company, 1955), 242–44; N. Hentoff, A Doctor Among the Addicts (Chicago:
Rand McNally, 1968), 43–44; L. Hutchins, et al., “A Two-Year Follow-Up of a
Cohort of Opiate Users from a Provincial Town,” British Journal of Addiction 66 (1971):
129–40; Jaffe, “Drug Addiction and Drug Abuse,” in Goodman and Gilman, Pharmacological
7th ed. (1985), 542, 547; Jaffe and Martin, “Opioid Analgesics and Antagonists,”
in Goodman and Gilman, Pharmacological 7th ed. (1985), 498; L. Johnston, Drugs and
American Youth (Ann Arbor, MI: Institute for Social Research, University of Michigan,
1973), 193, 218; J. Kaplan, The Hardest Drug: Heroin and Public Policy, Studies in Crime
and Justice (Chicago: University of Chicago Press, 1983), 136; R. King, The Drug Hang-
Up: America’s Fifty Year Folly (New York: W.W. Norton & Company, 1972), 18, 76; L.
Kolb, Drug Addiction: A Medical Problem (Springfield, IL: Charles C. Thomas, 1962), 10–
11, 46, 57–58, 64, 104–5, 114; Mellinger et al., “Drug Use, Academic Performance, and
Career Indecision: Longitudinal Data in Search of a Model,” in D.B. Kandel, ed., Longitudinal
Research on Drug Use: Empirical Findings and Methodological Issues (Washington,
DC: Hemisphere Publishing Corporation, 1978), 167–69, 172–73; H.W. Morgan, Drugs
in America: A Social History, 1800–1980 (Syracuse, NY: Syracuse University Press, 1981),
31; H.W. Morgan, Yesterday’s Addicts: American Society and Drug Abuse 1865–1920 (Norman:
University of Oklahoma Press, 1981), 8; E.J. Morhous, “Drug Addiction in Upper
Economic Levels: A Study of 142 Cases,” West Virginia Medical Journal 49 (July 1953):
189; J.A. O’Donnell, Narcotics Addicts in Kentucky, U.S. Public Health Service Publication
No. 1881 (National Institute of Mental Health, 1969) [SuDocs FS2.22:N16/3], 56, 60, 79–
80, 94–98, 204, 211, 214, 217, 223–33, 241; S. Peele, with A. Brodsky, Love and Addiction
(New York: Taplinger Publishing Company, 1975), 35; J.J. Platt and C. Labate, Heroin
Addiction: Theory, Research, Treatment, Wiley Series on Personality Processes, A Wiley
Interscience Publication (New York: John Wiley & Sons, 1976), 171; H.G. Pope, Jr., M.
Ionescu-Pioggia, and J.D. Cole, “Drug Use and Life-Style among College Undergraduates:
Nine Years Later,” Archives of General Psychiatry 38 (1981): 588–91; C. Raymond,
“Researchers Say Debate over Drug War and Legalization Is Tied to Americans’ Cultural
and Religious Values,” Chronicle of Higher Education 36 (March 7, 1990): A6–A7,
A10–A11 (Craig Reinarman comments); “Report of Committee on the Acquirement of
Drug Habits,” Proceedings of the American Pharmaceutical Association 51 (1903): 473; J.
Rublowsky, The Stoned Age: A History of Drugs in America, Capricorn Books (New York:
G.P. Putnam’s Sons, 1974), 138, 191; E.M. Schur, Narcotic Addiction in Britain and America:
The Impact of Public Policy (Bloomington: Indiana University Press, 1962), 28, 151;
G.V. Stimson, Heroin and Behaviour: Diversity among Addicts Attending London Clinics
(New York: John Wiley & Sons, 1973), 149, 178; G.M. Smith, C.W. Semke, and H.K.
Beecher, “Objective Evidence of Mental Effects of Heroin, Morphine and Placebo in
Normal Subjects,” Journal of Pharmacology and Experimental Therapeutics 136 (1962): 53,
58; A.S. Trebach, The Great Drug War and Radical Proposals That Could Make America Safe
Again (New York: Macmillan Publishing Company, 1987), 345; U.S. Congress, House,
Select Committee on Crime, Hearings, The Improvement and Reform of Law Enforcement
and Criminal Justice in the United States (91 Cong., 1 sess., 1969) [SuDocs Y4.C86/3:L41],
287, 291 (Stephen Waldron statement); U.S. Congress, Senate, Committee on the Judiciary,
Subcommittee on Improvements in the Federal Criminal Code, Hearings, Illicit
Narcotics Traffic (84 Cong., 1 sess., 1955) [SuDocs Y4.J89/2:N16/1–10], 1326, 1339 (Hubert
S. Howe testimony); A. Weil, The Natural Mind: An Investigation of Drugs and the
Higher Consciousness, Rev. ed. (Boston: Houghton Mifflin Company, 1986), 55, 57–58;
White House Conference on Narcotic and Drug Abuse, Proceedings (1962) [SuDocs
Y3.W58/5:2P94/962], 305; N.E. Zinberg, Drug, Set, and Setting: The Basis for Controlled
Heroin 197
Intoxicant Use (New Haven: Yale University Press, 1984): 157, 162; N.E. Zinberg and
R.C. Jacobson, “The Natural History of ‘Chipping,’ ” American Journal of Psychiatry 133
(1976): 38; N.E. Zinberg and D.C. Lewis, “Narcotic Usage: I. A Spectrum of a Difficult
Medical Problem,” New England Journal of Medicine 270 (1964): 989, 992.
2. J.B. Bakalar and L. Grinspoon, Drug Control in a Free Society (Cambridge: Cambridge
University Press, 1984), 47, 58, 135, 144; D.J. Bellis, Heroin and Politicians: The
Failure of Public Policy to Control Addiction in America (Westport, CT: Greenwood Press,
1981), 25, 134, 210, 223; Biernacki, Pathways, 27, 43–44, 52, 95, 97, 99, 124–25, 161, 179,
226–28, 231; P.H. Blachly, Seduction: A Conceptual Model in the Drug Dependencies and
Other Contagious Ills (Springfield, IL: Charles C. Thomas, 1970), 30, 37–38, 43, 80; J.S.
Blackwell, “Drifting, Controlling and Overcoming: Opiate Users Who Avoid Becoming
Chronically Dependent,” Journal of Drug Issues 13 (1983): 219–35; P.G. Bourne, “Issues
in Addiction,” in P.G. Bourne, ed., Addiction (New York: Academic Press, 1974), 11;
J.M. Boyle and A.F. Brunswick, “What Happened in Harlem? Analysis of a Decline in
Heroin Use Among a Generation Unit of Urban Black Youth,” Journal of Drug Issues
10 (1980): 109; E.M. Brecher, and the Editors of Consumer Reports, Licit and Illicit Drugs:
The Consumers Union Report on Narcotics, Stimulants, Depressants, Inhalants, Hallucinogens,
and Marijuana—Including Caffeine, Nicotine, and Alcohol (Boston: Little, Brown and
Company, 1972), 39; Chein et al., Road, 6, 14, 22–23, 159, 364; I. Chein and E. Rosenfeld,
“Juvenile Narcotics Use,” Law and Contemporary Problems 22 (1957): 54; Childress, “Extinction
of Conditioned Responses in Abstinent Cocaine or Opioid Users,” in L.S. Harris,
ed., Problems of Drug Dependence, 1986: Proceedings of the 48th Annual Scientific
Meeting, The Committee on Problems of Drug Dependence, Inc. (National Institute on Drug
Abuse, Research Monograph Series, No. 76, 1987) [SuDocs HE20.8216/5:986], 189–95;
Cuskey and Edington, “Drug Abuse as Self-Destructive Behavior,” in A.R. Roberts, ed.
and comp., Self-Destructive Behavior (Springfield, IL: Charles C. Thomas, 1975), 138–39;
Duster, Legislation, 209–11; Falk, “The Place of Adjunctive Behavior in Drug Abuse
Research,” in T. Thompson and C.E. Johanson, eds., Behavioral Pharmacology of Human
Drug Dependence (National Institute on Drug Abuse, Research Monograph no. 37, 1981)
[SuDocs HE20.8216:37], 276; D.B. Graeven and K.A. Graeven, “Treated and Untreated
Addicts: Factors Associated with Participation in Treatment and Cessation of Heroin
Use,” Journal of Drug Issues 13 (1983): 207–18; R.E. Hinson and S. Siegel, “Nonpharmacological
Bases of Drug Tolerance and Dependence,” Journal of Psychosomatic Research
26 (1982): 496–502; L.G. Hunt and C.D. Chambers, The Heroin Epidemics: A Study
of Heroin Use in the United States 1965–75, Sociomedical Science Series (New York: Spectrum
Publications, 1976), 117; R. Jacobson and N.E. Zinberg, The Social Basis of Drug
Abuse Prevention, Special Studies Series, no. 5 (Washington, DC: The Drug Abuse Council,
1975), 8, 14–15, 48, 50, 53, 60; B.D. Johnson, et al., Taking Care of Business: The
Economics of Crime by Heroin Abusers (Lexington, MA: D.C. Heath and Company, 1985),
2; H.F. Judson, Heroin Addiction in Britain: What Americans Can Learn from the English
Experience (New York: Harcourt Brace Jovanovich, 1973), 78, 80, 143–44; Kandel, “Convergences
in Prospective Longitudinal Surveys of Drug Use in Normal Populations,”
in Kandel, Longitudinal, 15–16; Kaplan, Hardest, 10, 33–34, 36–38, 43–46; King, Drug,
234, 261; Kolb, Drug, 83–84, 127; I.D. Leader-Elliott, “Heroin in Australia: The Costs
and Consequences of Prohibition,” Journal of Drug Issues 16 (1986): 136; D.B. Louria,
Overcoming Drugs: A Program for Action (New York: McGraw-Hill Book Company,
1971), 84; E.A. Nadelmann, “Drug Prohibition in the United States: Costs, Consequences,
and Alternatives,” Science 245 (1989): 944; Peele, Love, 19, 59–60, 64–65, 67, 87;
Platt and Labate, Heroin, 102, 107, 159–61, 193; D.H. Powell, “A Pilot Study of
Occasional Heroin Users,” Archives of General Psychiatry 28 (1973): 586–94; V.H. Raveis
and D.B. Kandel, “Changes in Drug Behavior from the Middle to the Late Twenties:
198 Heroin
Initiation, Persistence, and Cessation of Use,” American Journal of Public Health 77 (1987):
607–11; R.M. Restak, The Mind (New York: Bantam Books, 1988), 118; Robins, “The
Interaction of Setting and Predisposition in Explaining Novel Behavior: Drug Initiations
Before, In, and After Vietnam,” in Kandel, Longitudinal, 181; L.N. Robins, The Vietnam
Drug Abuser Returns, Final Report (Special Action Office for Drug Abuse Prevention,
1974) [SuDocs PrEx20.9:A/2], 31–32; L.N. Robins, D.H. Davis, and D.N. Nurco, “How
Permanent Was Vietnam Drug Addiction?” American Journal of Public Health 64 (Suppl.
1974): 38–43; L.N. Robins and J.E. Helzer, “Drug Use Among Vietnam Veterans: Three
Years Later,” Medical World News 16 (October 27, 1975): 44–45, 49; L.N. Robins, J.E.
Helzer, and D.H. Davis, “Narcotic Use in Southeast Asia and Afterward: An Interview
Study of 898 Vietnam Returnees,” Archives of General Psychiatry 32 (1975): 959; Rublowsky,
Stoned, 128; C.R. Sanders, “Doper’s Wonderland: Functional Drug Use by Military
Personnel in Vietnam,” Journal of Drug Issues 3 (Winter 1973): 71–72; Scher, “The Impact
of the Drug Abuser on the Work Organization,” in J.M. Scher, ed., Drug Abuse in
Industry: Growing Corporate Dilemma (Springfield, IL: Charles C. Thomas, 1973), 11; R.C.
Schroeder, The Politics of Drugs: An American Dilemma, 2d ed. (Washington, DC: Congressional
Quarterly Press, 1980), 72–73, 76, 82; H.B. Spear and M.M. Glatt, “The Influence
of Canadian Addicts on Heroin Addiction in the United Kingdom,” British
Journal of Addiction 66 (1971): 141–49; J. Stewart, H. de Wit, and R. Eikelboom, “Role
of Unconditioned and Conditioned Drug Effects in the Self-Administration of Opiates
and Stimulants,” Psychological Review 91 (1984): 251–68; T. Szasz, Ceremonial Chemistry:
The Ritual Persecution of Drugs, Addicts, and Pushers, Rev. ed. (Holmes Beach, FL: Learning
Publications, 1985), 82–83; Trebach, Great, 110; A.S. Trebach, The Heroin Solution
(New Haven: Yale University Press, 1982), 203; Trebach, “The Potential Impact of ‘Legal’
Heroin in America,” in A.S. Trebach, ed., Drugs, Crime, and Politics (New York:
Praeger Publishers, 1978), 167–68; U.S. Congress, House, Select Committee on Crime,
Improvement, 287, 290 (Stephen Waldron statement); Weil, Natural, 108; D.M. Wilner,
et al., “Heroin Use and Street Gangs,” Journal of Criminal Law, Criminology, and Police
Science 48 (1957): 401; C. Winick, “Epidemiology of Narcotics Use,” in D.M. Wilner
and G.G. Kassebaum, eds., Narcotics, University of California Medical Extension Series—
Los Angeles (New York: McGraw-Hill Book Company, 1965), 8–9; N.E. Zinberg,
“G.I.’s and O.J.’s in Vietnam,” New York Times Magazine, Dec. 5, 1971, pp. 122–23; Zinberg,
“Non-Addictive Opiate Use,” in J.C. Weissman and R.L. DuPont, eds., Criminal
Justice and Drugs: The Unresolved Connection, Multi-Disciplinary Studies in the Law (Port
Washington, NY: Kennikat Press, 1982), 5–11, 15; N.E. Zinberg, W.M. Harding, and R.
Apsler, “What is Drug Abuse?” Journal of Drug Issues 8 (1978): 13, 28.
Hydrocodone
Pronunciation: high-droh-KOH-done
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 125-29-1. (Bitartrate form 34195-
34-1)
Formal Names: Anexsia, Dicodid, Dihydrocodeinone, Duratuss HD Elixir, Histussin
D, Hycodan, Hycomine, Hycotuss, Hydrocet, Lorcet, Lortab, Norco, Tussend,
Tussionex, Tylox, Vicodin (tablets, ES tablets, HP tablets, and Tuss
expectorant), Vicoprofen, Zydone
Informal Names: Tuss
Type: Depressant (opiate class). See page 22
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule II if dispensed by itself (DEA no. 9193); Schedule
III if dispensed as part of a combination product
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. Physicians use this drug to suppress coughs and relieve pain. Commercial
formulations of the substance routinely combine it with other drugs
so a patient obtains multiple therapeutic effects. The combinations can also
worsen effects from overdose. Hydrocodone is derived from thebaine, and
body chemistry apparently converts some of a hydrocodone dose into hydromorphone.
Hydrocodone’s effects are likened to those of codeine, but depending
on circumstances of dosage, hydrocodone is two to eight times
stronger. Taking into account the differences in potency, hydrocodone produces
more sedation than codeine.
Drawbacks. Unwanted effects can include hiccups, muscle spasms, dizziness,
nausea, vomiting, constipation, and impairment of breathing. The drug
can dull mental and physical alertness, so users should avoid operating dangerous
machinery. Some pharmaceutical formats of hydrocodone combine
that drug with the pain reliever acetaminophen, and excessive usage of that
combination can cause deafness.
Abuse factors. Hydrocodone can produce euphoria, and the compound’s
potential for abuse is rated similar to codeine’s. A medical experiment testing
both those drugs found that 18 doses were not enough to produce tolerance.
Urine from a person using codeine can test positive for hydrocodone. Drug
abuse treatment programs seeking to switch heroin addicts to some other
opiate have successfully used hydrocodone instead of methadone.
200 Hydrocodone
Drug interactions. Tricyclic antidepressants and monoamine oxidase inhibitors
(MAOIs, found in some antidepressants and other medication) may boost
hydrocodone effects, and vice versa. When taken with other narcotics, hydrocodone
may boost their actions. Taking the substance with anticholinergics,
which are drugs affecting the parasympathetic nervous system that controls
much of the abdomen, can cause intestinal blockage.
Cancer. Hydrocodone’s potential for causing cancer is unknown.
Pregnancy. Hydrocodone’s potential for causing birth defects is unknown,
although malformations occurred when pregnant rabbits received hydrocodone
bitartrate along with the pain reliever ibuprofen at doses strong enough
to be poisonous. Malformations did not occur when the same combination
was given at poisonous levels to rats. Hydrocodone by itself produced birth
defects in hamsters at 700 times the normal human dose. A study of human
pregnancy outcomes found no indication that hydrocodone causes birth defects
or miscarriage, but nonetheless the drug should be avoided during pregnancy
unless the woman’s condition unquestionably requires treatment by the
substance. Infants born to women who have been using hydrocodone can have
dependence with the drug. Whether hydrocodone passes into a nursing
mother’s milk is unknown.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Friedman, R.A., et al. “Profound Hearing Loss Associated with Hydrocodone/Acetaminophen
Abuse.” American Journal of Otology 21 (2000): 188–91.
Hopkinson, J.H. “Hydrocodone—A Unique Challenge for an Established Drug: Comparison
of Repeated Oral Doses of Hydrocodone (10 Mg) and Codeine (60 Mg)
in the Treatment of Postpartum Pain.” Current Therapeutic Research: Clinical and
Experimental 24 (1978): 503–16.
Schick, B., et al. “Preliminary Analysis of First Trimester Exposure to Oxycodone and
Hydrocodone.” Reproductive Toxicology 10 (1996): 162.
Vandam, L.D. “Drug Therapy: Analgetic Drugs—The Mild Analgetics.” New England
Journal of Medicine 286 (1972): 20–23.
Vivian, D. “Three Deaths Due to Hydrocodone in a Resin-Complex Cough Medicine.”
Drug Intelligence and Clinical Pharmacy 13 (1979): 445–46.
Hydromorphone
Pronunciation: high-droh-MOR-fohn
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 466-99-9. (Hydrochloride form 71-
68-1)
Formal Names: Dilaudid, Hydrostat IR, Palladone
Informal Names: Big D, D, Delantz, Delats, Delaud, Delida, Dillies, Drugstore
Heroin, Hospital Heroin, Little D, Lords, Pills
Type: Depressant (opiate class). See page 22
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule II (DEA no. 9150)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. This pain reliever and cough suppressant was first produced in the
1920s. It is made from morphine. For pain relief hydromorphone is 2 to 10
times stronger than morphine (depending on why and how the drugs are
administered), but hydromorphone effects do not last as long as morphine’s.
Hydromorphone is recommended to reduce particularly severe pain, such as
that encountered in cancer, kidney stone attack, heart attack, sickle-cell anemia
crisis, burns, or surgery. One study of seriously ill persons and another study
of surgery patients found hydromorphone to be as effective as morphine in
pain relief. No difference emerged from surveys asking patients whether morphine
or hydromorphone was the more effective pain reliever. In one study
patients preferred hydromorphone to meperidine for reducing pain, although
medical personnel observed no superiority of one over the other. In another
study medical personnel judged hydromorphone as better than meperidine
for pain control, and in still another study hydromorphone’s effects lasted
longer than meperidine’s.
Drawbacks. Unwanted effects can include itching, nausea, vomiting, constipation,
urination difficulty, sedation, sleepiness, dizziness, poor appetite,
low blood pressure, muscle spasms, impairment of breathing, reduced mental
clarity, and impaired male sexual function. Users should avoid running dangerous
machinery such as an automobile until they know the drug is not
impeding skills necessary for such tasks. One study involving abdominal surgery
patients found that hydromorphone impaired thinking and reasoning
more than morphine did, but the same study found that patients’ spirits rose
more with hydromorphone.
202 Hydromorphone
Generally the drug should be avoided by persons suffering from asthma,
urinary retention, enlarged prostate, deficient adrenal or thyroid glands, gallbladder
trouble, or epilepsy.
Abuse factors. Dependence can develop after hydromorphone has been
taken regularly for several weeks. Although tolerance is unusual for medical
effects of drugs, tolerance has been observed when hydromorphone is used
for pain relief, with patients needing more of the drug for the same amount
of relief.
Heroin addicts find hydromorphone to be a satisfactory substitute. Through
cross-tolerance hydromorphone can reduce opiate withdrawal symptoms, and
the drug has been used as an experimental medication in programs trying to
switch opiate addicts to methadone or buprenorphine.
Drug interactions. Normally hydromorphone should not be taken along
with antihistamines or various tranquilizers and antidepressants, including
monoamine oxidase inhibitors (MAOIs, found in some antidepressants and in
other medicine). Taking hydromorphone and cocaine together can increase
each drug’s effects.
Cancer. Hydromorphone does not seem to cause cancer.
Pregnancy. In general the drug fails to produce birth defects, but some did
appear when pregnant hamsters received 600 times the normal human dose.
The potential for malformations is unknown among infants from pregnant
women who use the drug in a medical context. Infants can be born with
dependence if the mother has used hydromorphone during pregnancy. The
drug is used to ease childbirth. Whether the substance passes into a nursing
mother’s milk is unknown but is considered safe for the infant.
Additional information. The cough syrup form of Dilaudid may contain
tartrazine (FD&C Yellow No. 5) to which some persons are allergic, particularly
if they are allergic to aspirin.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Hill, J.L., and J.P. Zacny. “Comparing the Subjective, Psychomotor, and Physiological
Effects of Intravenous Hydromorphone and Morphine in Healthy Volunteers.”
Psychopharmacology 152 (2000): 31–39.
“Hydromorphone HCl.” In Therapeutic Drugs, ed. C. Dollery. 2d ed. New York: Churchill
Livingstone, 1999. H69–H71.
McBride, D.C., et al. “Dilaudid Use: Trends and Characteristics of Users.” Chemical
Dependencies 4 (1980): 85–100.
Walker, D.J., and J.P. Zacny. “Subjective, Psychomotor, and Physiological Effects of
Cumulative Doses of Opioid Mu Agonists in Healthy Volunteers.” Journal of
Pharmacology and Experimental Therapeutics 289 (1999): 1454–64.
Ibogaine
Pronunciation: i-BOH-gah-in
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 83-74-9
Formal Names: Endabuse, Tabernanthe iboga
Informal Names: Bitter Grass, Iboga, Leaf of God
Type: Hallucinogen. See page 25
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule I (DEA no. 7260)
USA Availability: Illegal to possess
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. This drug comes from roots of an equatorial African rainforest shrub
called Tabernanthe iboga. Traditionally the natural product has been used in
low doses as a mild stimulant, rather like coca or areca nut, to fight hunger,
thirst, and weariness and also to improve confidence. The natural product’s
active ingredient ibogaine was found in 1901. Its stimulant qualities gave it a
potential role in Western medicine as a means of treating nervous exhaustion
and generally helping sick persons recover from worn-down states. The drug
was also viewed as a treatment for influenza and for illness caused by microscopic
animals called Trypanosmatina protozoa. None of those applications
received wide use. Ibogaine is, however, used as an aphrodisiac and has also
seen illicit duty as a performance-enhancing substance in athletics.
In strong dosages ibogaine has been a component of African religious life.
In that context the substance is used in its natural product format for meditation
and to facilitate divine communication. Users may see rainbows around
objects, lose barriers between senses (allowing sounds to be tasted, smells to
be heard), and experience hallucinations. Fatal overdose is possible.
Drawbacks. Suspicion exists that ibogaine harms brain function in humans.
Rat experiments show that high doses of ibogaine can injure some types of
brain cells but that lower doses do not cause such damage. High dosage has
caused body tremors and heartbeat trouble in rats. Rat experiments also show
that the drug can impair emotions, reaction times, and ability to move.
Abuse factors. Some persons trying to break drug addiction claim that ibogaine
drastically reduces craving for heroin, cocaine, and other opioids and
stimulants. Switching an abuser from one drug to another one is routine in
substance abuse treatment, but supposedly just one ingestion of ibogaine is
enough to stop another drug’s withdrawal symptoms and to diminish craving
204 Ibogaine
for it, with no need to keep taking ibogaine. Scientific efforts to verify such
claims were under way while this book was being written. Verification would
make ibogaine unique in the history of substance abuse treatment and would
also challenge much of what is known about why people abuse drugs.
Ibogaine was given to 33 heroin addicts who did not reside in a treatment
center; 25 of them exhibited no effort to obtain heroin during the four days
of subsequent observation. These 33 experiences were not, however, part of
an experimental study but instead were individual instances noted from time
to time over a 31-year period, an overall average of about one instance per
year. A group of researchers reported that ibogaine not only suppressed desire
for heroin and cocaine among residents being weaned off those drugs in a
treatment facility but that ibogaine made the people less depressed as well—
an improvement in mood that was still present 30 days after release from
treatment. In another study 7 opiate addicts received a single dose of ibogaine.
Although 1 addict shortly resumed opiate use, 3 avoided further opiate use
for several weeks, and 3 avoided further drug abuse for at least 14 weeks.
None of the 7 experienced an opiate withdrawal syndrome. Ibogaine reduces
intake of alcohol, cocaine, heroin, morphine, nicotine, food, and water by rats.
Lowered consumption of food and water raises question about whether ibogaine
is affecting drug consumption per se or is exerting some broader action.
An ibogaine derivative, however, reduces rats’ drug intake without reducing
water intake.
Results are inconsistent on whether the drug improves or impedes learning
in rats, an effect related to memory. One theory holds ibogaine allows humans
to remember why they started using drugs, thereby helping abusers to stop.
The instant results claimed for ibogaine, however, are inconsistent with the
time necessary for memories to liberate persons from other psychiatric afflictions.
And the memory theory also assumes that the reason an abuser started
using drugs was either invalid in the past or is no longer valid in the present,
an assumption inconsistent with much that is known about drug abuse. Nor
does the memory theory explain why ibogaine reduces drug consumption in
rats. The memory aspect is commonly mentioned by users, however, and some
claim to achieve major positive realignment of their lives through ibogaineinduced
insights into past experiences and allegorical interpretations of
hallucinations. Nonetheless, some heroin addicts who initially announced
themselves cured by ibogaine did not find the change permanent and resumed
heroin use. One report says the ibogaine cure lasted less than a month for
about 25% of heroin addicts who received it, longer for others who received
supplemental therapy and who were dedicated to changing their lives.
A curiosity about the use of ibogaine in addiction treatment is that reported
doses range from 500 mg to 1,800 mg. One authority says 1,000 mg is typical.
An amount of 200 mg is considered sufficient to cause hallucinations. Additional
effects of 200 mg are described as nervousness (perhaps bordering on
fear), unpleasant feelings in arms and legs, difficulty in muscular coordination,
tremors with rapid and repeated contraction and relaxation of muscles, and
inability to sleep. Nausea and vomiting are sometimes reported, along with
so much uncomfortable sensitivity to light that people cover their eyes. Such
unwanted actions might be publicized as substantial drawbacks in a street
Ibogaine 205
drug but receive little, if any, mention in reports where ibogaine is administered
as an addiction treatment. Individual personality and the circumstance
in which a drug is taken can, of course, make a big difference in effects. So
perhaps massive doses of ibogaine do not affect addicts in the same way that
people are affected outside a therapeutic context.
Drug interactions. In rat experiments alcohol raised ibogaine’s effects.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Not enough scientific information to report.
Additional information. “Iboga” is a nickname for MDMA, but they are
not the same substance.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Alper, K.R., D. Beal, and C.D. Kaplan. “A Contemporary History of Ibogaine in
the United States and Europe.” The Alkaloids. Chemistry and Biology 56 (2001):
249–81.
Mash, D.C., et al. “Ibogaine: Complex Pharmacokinetics, Concerns for Safety, and Preliminary
Efficacy Measures.” Annals of the New York Academy of Sciences 914
(2000): 394–401.
Mash, D.C., et al. “Medication Development of Ibogaine as a Pharmacotherapy
for Drug Dependence.” Annals of the New York Academy of Sciences 844 (1998):
274–92.
Popik, P., and S.D. Glick. “Ibogaine.” Drugs of the Future 21 (1996): 1109–15.
Popik, P., R.T. Layer, and P. Skolnick. “100 Years of Ibogaine: Neurochemical and
Pharmacological Actions of a Putative Anti-Addictive Drug.” Pharmacological Reviews
47 (1995): 235–53.
Jimson Weed
Pronunciation: JIM-sn weed
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 8063-18-1
Formal Names: Datura, Datura stramonium
Informal Names: Angel Tulip, Devil’s Apple, Devil’s Trumpet, Green Dragon,
Jamestown Weed, Locoweed, Mad Apple, Malpitte, Nightshade, Peru Apple,
Sacred Datura, Stinkweed, Stinkwort, Thorn Apple
Type: Hallucinogen. See page 25
Federal Schedule Listing: Unlisted
USA Availability: Uncontrolled natural product
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. This bad-smelling plant grows around the world in temperate and
subtropical climates and thrives without cultivation. Jimson weed can cause
hallucinations and has been a component of witches’ potions and shaman
experiences. Archaeological evidence exists for prehistoric spiritual use in
North America, and accounts exist of such usage by native peoples into the
twentieth century. Jimson weed is biologically related to several food plants
including potato, pepper, eggplant, and tomato. Someone was able to graft a
tomato plant onto jimson weed, with the resulting fruit so potent that consumers
were hospitalized; one account described the incident as apparently
“the first known instance of hallucinogenic tomatoes.”
Effects are similar to those of belladonna. Drugs found in jimson weed
leaves, flowers, and seeds include atropine, hyoscyamine, and scopolamine,
which are often called “belladonna alkaloids.” Folk medicine preparations
from jimson weed flowers are put on bruises, wounds, or insect bites to diminish
discomfort; leaves and roots are used in a similar way and also to treat
boils. A drink from the plant is given to help people endure the pain of setting
broken bones. Inhaling jimson weed smoke is a traditional remedy for asthma,
sore breathing, or coughing. Vapor from boiling the substance is used for the
same purposes. Scientific measurement has confirmed that jimson weed smoke
improves airway function of asthmatics. The natural product is also a treatment
against cramps, eye inflammation, and feverish infection. The plant has
been used as an aphrodisiac.
Drawbacks. Jimson weed has anticholinergic actions, meaning it can change
heartbeat, affect eyesight (including extreme and prolonged dilation of pupils),
Jimson Weed 207
and halt progress of material through the intestines. Jimson weed should be
avoided by persons with heart trouble, glaucoma, or slow bowels. Other body
signs indicating that Jimson weed should be avoided include enlarged prostate,
urination difficulty, fluid buildup in lung tissue, and obstruction that
impedes movement of food from the stomach. The substance can raise blood
pressure and body temperature while drying mucous membranes. Persons
hospitalized following jimson weed ingestion have shown a flushed face, exaggerated
reflexes, other reflexes consistent with a poison acting upon the
brain, and changes involving prothrombin (a factor in blood clotting). Paranoia
may be present. More than one report about jimson weed describes users
with a saying such as this: “Blind as a bat, hot as a hare, dry as a bone, red
as a beet, mad as a hatter, the bowel and bladder lose their tone, and the heart
runs alone.”
Fever and breathing difficulty may occur after using jimson weed. People
can become fidgety and even manic, talk continuously, go into delirium
(which may be combative), and fall into an exhausted sleep. Reportedly such
responses to the plant inspired medical use in past times against epilepsy and
psychotic behavior. The atropine component of jimson weed is powerful
enough to agitate an elephant.
Intoxicated persons can be unaware of what they are doing and unaware
of what is going on around them, additional hazards on top of the drug’s
sometimes dangerous physical effects. As with other substances accidental
dosage can occur. Cases are documented of agricultural workers and gardeners
being affected by apparently rubbing their eyes after contact with jimson
weed or other datura plants; a case report also exists of absorption through
the skin. Contamination of food is known, and unsuspecting persons have
used wine and honey made from the plants. Rats on a 90-day diet including
jimson weed seed experienced lower cholesterol levels, less weight gain, and
increased weight of livers. Investigators running the experiment described the
consequences of chronic jimson weed seed diet as undesirable, but of course
humans do not eat the seeds as a regular food. In this experiment female rats
were more affected by jimson weed than males. Jimson seed meal has also
been found to harm development of chickens. Horses, cattle, and pigs react
badly to jimson weed, but rabbits and sheep are relatively unaffected.
Abuse factors. Europeans were using Datura plants such as jimson weed in
the 1500s; one account from that era mentions long-lasting intoxication with
emotions ranging from euphoria to weeping, with people having amnesia
about what they did while under the influence. The same account mentions
prostitutes using Datura to make clients more pliable, and old reports speak
of sexual frenzy induced by the substance. During the 1600s soldiers sent to
suppress Bacon’s Rebellion in colonial Virginia partook of jimson weed, and
according to an account dating from 1722, some were incapacitated for days:
“One would blow up a Feather in the Air; another would dart Straws at it
with much Fury; and another stark naked was sitting up in a Corner, like a
Monkey, grinning and making Mows [grimaces] at them; and a Fourth would
fondly kiss, and paw his Companions, and snear [sic] in their Faces.”1 Such
incidents still occurred in the twentieth century. In a three-week period during
1980 almost two dozen U.S. Marines at Camp Pendleton were treated for
208 Jimson Weed
hallucinations from recreational jimson weed usage. A few years earlier a survey
of drug users in the South African military found about 3% to be using
jimson weed. U.S. military personnel have been known to “accidentally” inject
themselves with the jimson weed component atropine, on hand as a nerve gas
antidote but also able to create hallucinations.
Some jimson weed users describe sensations of flying, instant travel between
one city and another, and communication with plants and inanimate objects.
Although insects are a commonly reported visual hallucination from jimson
weed, one uncommon sensation is a feeling of crawling insects, reminiscent
of the “coke bugs” hallucination associated with cocaine. Jimson weed experiences
have sometimes been likened to those from LSD, but reasons for that
comparison are unapparent from accounts given by users of those substances.
Both may be hallucinogens, but users relate very different observations. Descriptions
of jimson weed experiences often have an ominous tone and lack
LSD qualities such as striking down barriers between senses (hearing colors,
seeing sounds). In keeping with an old but largely abandoned tradition of
medicine, an articulate medical journal author engaged in Datura selfexperimentation
and produced a graphic account of interactions with charms
of nineteenth-century Paris and with horrors of twentieth-century monsters.
A witness later “told me that I fought the restraining devices so violently that
he thought every blood vessel in my face and neck would explode.”2 The
researcher did not repeat the experiment.
Drug interactions. Not enough scientific information to report.
Cancer. The Ames test, a standard laboratory procedure that screens substances
for carcinogenicity, indicates jimson weed seeds have potential for
causing cancer.
Pregnancy. Datura plants are suspected of causing birth defects in farm animals.
Birth defects did not become more common in children of 450 pregnant
women who received the atropine component of jimson weed. The same lack
of effect on congenital abnormalities was observed in a similar number of
pregnancies after the women used the scopolamine component of jimson
weed, a finding consistent with a rodent study.
Additional information. Jimson weed is botanically classified as the stramonium
species of the Datura genus. Other Datura genus plants around the
world are used for similar effects, but they are not jimson weed.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
DiGiacomo, J.N. “Toxic Effect of Stramonium Simulating LSD Trip.” Journal of the American
Medical Association 204 (1968): 265–66.
Gowdy, J.M. “Stramonium Intoxication: Review of Symptomatology in 212 Cases.” Journal
of the American Medical Association 221 (1972): 585–87.
Jacobs, K.W. “Asthmador: Legal Hallucinogen.” International Journal of the Addictions 9
(1974): 503–12.
Johnson, C.E. “Mystical Force of the Nightshade.” International Journal of Neuropsychiatry
3 (1967): 268–75.
Keeler, M.H., and Kane, F.J., Jr. “The Use of Hyoscyamine as a Hallucinogen and
Intoxicant.” American Journal of Psychiatry 124 (1967): 852–54.
Jimson Weed 209
Thabet, H., et al. “Datura Stramonium Poisonings in Humans.” Veterinary and Human
Toxicology 41 (1999): 320–21.
Tiongson, J. “Mass Ingestion of Jimson Weed by Eleven Teenagers.” Delaware Medical
Journal 70 (1998): 471–76.
Notes
1. [R. Beverley], The History of Virginia, in Four Parts, 2nd ed. (London: F. Fayram
and J. Clarke and T. Bickerton, 1772), 121.
2. C.E. Johnson, “Mystical Force of the Nightshade,” International Journal of Neuropsychiatry
3 (1967): 272.
Ketamine
Pronunciation: KEET-a-meen
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 6740-88-1. (Hydrochloride form
1867-66-9)
Formal Names: Ketaject, Ketalar, Ketanest, Ketavet
Informal Names: Bump, Cat Valium, Green, Honey Oil, Jet, K, Kay, Kay-Blast,
Kay Jay, Keets, Keller, Kellys Day, Ket, Kit Kat, Mauve, Purple, Rockmesc, Special
K, Special LA Coke, Super Acid, Super C, Super K, Vitamin K
Type: Depressant. See page 19
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule III (DEA no. 7285)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. Ketamine is related to PCP and can produce a false-positive urine test
for that substance. In contrast to the violent reputation of PCP, however, ketamine
users are described as peaceful. Ketamine is likened to PCP, alcohol,
and LSD—rather vague comparisons given the differences among those
drugs. The substance was invented in the 1960s and was used as an anesthetic
for Vietnam War combat casualties; it has been routinely used for war injuries
ever since. Third World physicians report the drug is safe for surgical use
outside high-tech environments. It is given as a pain reliever and, less commonly,
to reduce convulsions. Ketamine is also a veterinary anesthesia drug
used with wild animals ranging from giraffes and gazelles to polar bears and
arctic foxes.
Success has been reported with using ketamine to supplement alcoholism
therapy. Two researchers reported that ketamine therapy with 42 alcoholics
produced a two-year abstinence from drinking in 15 of them, an outstanding
result. Other researchers report one-year abstinence in almost 66% of 111 alcoholics
who received ketamine therapy (perhaps a single dose), as opposed
to 24% in 100 who did not receive ketamine. Among the 111 in the original
group, 81 were tracked for two years, and 40% of the 81 remained abstinent.
Of 42 who were tracked for three years, 33% remained abstinent.1 Such results
have prompted researchers to speculate that ketamine may also be useful in
treating addiction to drugs other than alcohol. These reported beneficial effects
of ketamine are surprising. Admittedly they are related to self-insights
Ketamine 211
prompted by the substance and guided by psychotherapists, but in principle
a single dose of a drug is unlikely to stop addiction to some other drug.
Experiments indicate ketamine may have potential for treating migraine
headache and depression, and researchers have seen evidence that ketamine
may improve asthma and shrink breast cancer cells. Ketamine can reduce
phantom limb pain, a strange affliction in which a person senses that an amputated
limb is still present and hurting. The drug has been used in psychotherapy
to help persons face and deal with unpleasant memories, a process
accompanied by what researchers described as “mind expanding effects.” Ketamine
has also been investigated as a potential defense against the chemical
warfare agents soman and diisopropylphosphorofluoridate.
Healthy volunteers receiving ketamine in an experiment have experienced
sensations reminiscent of LSD. Researchers have described such effects as
“profound” among alcoholics, and illicit ketamine users have said such effects
are “intense.” The substance can prompt people to feel like they are becoming
transparent, blending into nearby individuals, or becoming an animal or object.
Users may feel like their bodies are transforming into harder or softer
substances. Persons may think they remember experiences from a past life.
Some users take the drug to enter the “K-hole,” a semiparalytic state described
as similar to near-death experiences in which people perceive their consciousness
as floating above their bodies, sometimes accompanied by meaningful
hallucinations and by insights about the user’s life and its proper place in the
cosmos.
Examination of deaths among recreational ketamine users in New York City
in a two-year period during the 1990s found none in which ketamine was the
only substance in the person’s body. Children have accidentally been given 5
to 100 times the normal size dose and have survived with no apparent injury.
Drawbacks. A case report tells of recreational users experiencing temporary
paralysis. Nausea and vomiting have been reported, and scientific literature
contains several mentions of temporary breathing interruption caused by the
drug. Increased pressure within the eye (a potential problem for glaucoma
sufferers) has been measured following a ketamine dose, but not all researchers
looking for that effect have found it. The drug can interfere with a male’s
physical ability to engage in sexual activity. Experiments show that ketamine
can cause brain damage in rats and that simultaneous use of nitrous oxide
worsens the damaging action. Ketamine can cause nervous agitation, extra
salivation, blood pressure elevation, abnormal heartbeat, and muscle injury.
Persons suffering from the body chemistry disorder porphyria should exercise
caution about ketamine use.
The drug can change perceptions of one’s surroundings. Tests indicate ketamine
can alter visual perception for at least 24 hours, causing people to
misjudge size and speed of objects (implying that driving skills may be impaired).
Long-term use may cause persistent difficulties with attention, memory,
and learning ability. The substance can create amnesia about what
happens while a person is under the drug’s influence.
Ketamine’s psychological actions have been characterized as similar to temporary
schizophrenia. A study examining persons who received the drug during
surgery found that upon awakening some felt they were floating; some
212 Ketamine
were euphoric; some screamed in apparent terror. A study found such effects
to be twice as common in female patients as in males. Such effects are stronger
among alcohol abusers. The floating sensation may occur as people regain
consciousness before they regain sense of touch, a sequence that would temporarily
eliminate awareness of gravity. One surgery patient experienced LSDlike
effects that continued even after release from the hospital. Reports exist
of patients experiencing psychological effects for a year after a dose. A reviewer
who examined many years of scientific reports about ketamine, however,
found a consensus that long-term psychological consequences from
ketamine occur no more frequently than with other anesthetics—a conclusion
about incidental effects from anesthetic use, not about deliberate effects induced
as part of psychotherapy or illicit use.
One authority claims that the greatest physical hazard has a psychological
base, as users sometimes become indifferent about death and take risks they
would otherwise avoid. Persons intoxicated with ketamine may be woozy and
have lower perception of pain, conditions that can cause or worsen accidents.
Female lemmings are more susceptible to the drug than males. While the
male-female difference does not necessarily carry over to humans, use of ketamine’s
anesthetic properties by sexual predators seeking to weaken victims
was publicized in the 1990s. Researchers using the drug to treat alcoholism
have found that ketamine makes a person more susceptible to suggestions,
perhaps making a person more vulnerable to manipulation.
Abuse factors. Tolerance and dependence can develop when rats and mice
receive ketamine. Those traditional signs of addictive potential seem unconfirmed
in human use, but people have been known to take the drug daily for
no medical purpose and to feel they have a problem with that usage.
Drug interactions. In surgery patients administering diazepam simultaneously
with ketamine has diminished unwanted psychological effects such as
delirium and nightmares. Midazolam may also help.
In experimentation with rats and mice the actions of ketamine and alcohol
have similarities, and the two have cross-tolerance (meaning one can substitute
for the other in various ways). Human alcoholics report that ketamine
produces sensations like those of alcohol. A small study found that ketamine
has stronger effects on perceptions and thinking skills in alcoholics than in
other persons.
In rats morphine can boost some pain relief from ketamine, and ketamine
can reduce pain relief from morphine. In contrast, a human experiment found
that patients needed less morphine for pain relief if they also received ketamine.
In humans ketamine can boost opiate and barbiturate actions so much
as to be fatal. Lorazepam can boost the sedative and amnesia qualities of
ketamine in humans.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Experimentation on mice shows that birth defects can occur
when ketamine and cocaine are used together, but the impact of just ketamine
seems uncertain. Experiments on pregnant rats, rabbits, and dogs have produced
no harm. Ketamine has harmed hamster genes when they are experimented
upon outside the body. Research published as the twenty-first century
began indicated that the drug may harm fetal brain development in humans.
Ketamine 213
Citing possible danger to fetus survival, one authority recommends caution
about using ketamine as an anesthetic in childbirth. While the drug may pass
into breast milk, nursing is considered safe for infants.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Corrigan, I.J. “Ketamine—A New Anesthetic.” Canadian Nurse 68 (April 1972): 43–44.
Curran, H.V., and C. Morgan. “Cognitive, Dissociative and Psychotogenic Effects of
Ketamine in Recreational Users on the Night of Drug Use and 3 Days
Later.”Addiction 95 (2000): 575–90.
Hetem, L.A., et al. “Effect of a Subanesthetic Dose of Ketamine on Memory and Conscious
Awareness in Healthy Volunteers.” Psychopharmacology 152 (2000):
283–38.
Jansen, K.L. “A Review of the Nonmedical Use of Ketamine: Use, Users and Consequences.”
Journal of Psychoactive Drugs 32 (2000): 419–33.
Krupitsky, E.M., and A.Y. Grinenko. “Ketamine Psychedelic Therapy (KPT): A Review
of the Results of Ten Years of Research.” Journal of Psychoactive Drugs 29 (1997):
165–83.
Weiner, A.L., et al. “Ketamine Abusers Presenting to the Emergency Department: A
Case Series.” Journal of Emergency Medicine 18 (2000): 447–51.
Note
1. E.M. Krupitsky and A.Y. Grinenko. “Ketamine Psychedelic Therapy (KPT): A Review
of the Results of Ten Years of Research.” Journal of Psychoactive Drugs 29 (1997):
165–83; I.P. Sivolap and V.A. Savchenkov. “Opyt Primeneniia Preparatov Ketamina v
Psikhoterapii Alkogolizma [Experience in Using Ketamine Preparations in the Psychotherapy
of Alcoholism].” Zhurnal Nevropatologii i Psikhiatrii Imeni S.S. Korsakova 94
(1994): 76–79. (Abstract in English.)
Ketobemidone
Pronunciation: KEET-ah-behm-ih-dohn
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 469-79-4
Formal Names: Cetobemidone, Ketogan
Type: Depressant (opioid class). See page 24
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule I (DEA no. 9628)
USA Availability: Illegal to possess
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. This substance has no authorized medical use in the United States.
Elsewhere, since the 1950s it has been used as a pain reliever for surgery,
cancer, and other conditions. Figures for total legal usage of opioids/opiates
in Denmark from 1981 to 1993 showed only morphine and methadone were
used more than ketobemidone.
In an experiment ketobemidone caused less breathing difficulty than did
buprenorphine (another opioid used for pain relief). Patients who receive
morphine chronically may develop muscle twitches and experience more pain
rather than less. After studying that problem one group of researchers recommended
that such patients be switched to ketobemidone, methadone, sufentanil,
or fentanyl. A case report indicates ketobemidone works in such a
switch. Despite the drug’s usefulness for pain relief, test results conflict on
whether it is better than a placebo for easing anxiety before surgery.
Drawbacks. Unwanted effects include shivering, coughing, nausea, and
vomiting. Pain may cause vomiting, so paradoxically ketobemidone can also
prevent vomiting through pain relief. A study noted that ketobemidone lowers
blood pressure, but not as much as morphine does.
Abuse factors. Although illicit use of this drug has received little attention
in the United States, ketobemidone has been a prominent substance in the
abuse scenes of Scandinavian countries. The drug is available in a pharmaceutical
intravenous format, but some illicit users crush oral tablets containing
ketobemidone and inject the powder. That practice is suspected of harming
eyesight. The same practice can cause skin to harden around injection sites
and also break open into sores. In one report of several such cases medical
personnel expressed puzzlement that the ketobemidone users acted like they
felt no discomfort and were unconcerned about skin conditions that would
prompt most persons to seek immediate medical aid. Such indifference about
Ketobemidone 215
physical well-being is typical among individuals engaged in self-destruction.
A study of ketobemidone overdose deaths in Denmark was revealing in that
respect as well; victims often had blood alcohol levels that would be fatal in
themselves.
Drug interactions. A study comparing commercial intravenous pharmaceutical
formats found morphine to be only half as strong as a combination product
containing one part ketobemidone and five parts of a drug called A29.
The latter drug is used to fight spasms. Experiments with rats and mice indicate
that A29 boosts ketobemidone’s pain-relieving effect, so the human
research comparing the combination to morphine does not mean that ketobemidone
alone is stronger than morphine. The same study did find, however,
that when doses were adjusted for equivalent strength, the ketobemidone-A29
combination was still more effective at pain relief than morphine.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. The drug passes into human milk. Based on a small number of
cases involving 5,000 micrograms of ketobemidone given during childbirth,
one study estimated that breast-fed infants would receive under 2 micrograms
of ketobemidone from their first day’s milk.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Kjaer, M., et al. “Bioavailability and Analgesic Effect of Sustained Release Cetobemidone
Capsules in Cancer Patients with Chronic Pain of Malignant Origin.” Acta
Oncologica (Stockholm, Sweden) 31 (1992): 577–83.
Ohqvist, G., et al. “A Comparison between Morphine, Meperidine and Ketobemidone
in Continuous Intravenous Infusion for Postoperative Relief.” Acta Anaesthesiologica
Scandinavica 35 (1991): 44–48.
Steentoft, A., and K. Worm. “Cases of Fatal Intoxication with Ketogan.” Journal—Forensic
Science Society 34 (July–September 1994): 181–85.
Wolff, T., et al. “Analgesic Treatment in Acute Myocardial Infarction. A Double-Blind
Comparison of Ketobemidone _ the Spasmolytic A29 (Ketogan) and Morphine.”
Acta Medica Scandinavica 223 (1988): 423–30.
Khat
Pronunciation: kaht
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 71031-15-7 (cathinone component);
492-39-7 (cathine component)
Formal Names: Catha edulis
Informal Names: Abyssinian Tea, Arabian Tea, Goob, Jaad, Miraa, Qaad, Qat,
Shat, Somali Tea
Type: Stimulant (amphetamine class). See page 12
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule I (cathinone DEA no. 1235); Schedule IV (cathine
DEA no. 1230)
USA Availability: Illegal to possess
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. Although amphetamine is a laboratory creation and not a natural
product, the khat plant is likened to a “natural amphetamine” due to the
actions of the two scheduled substances found in it, cathinone and cathine.
Because one of them is listed in Schedule I the plant is illegal to possess even
though all other chemicals in it are legal. Cross-tolerance exists among amphetamine,
cathinone, and cathine. One thorough chemical analysis of khat
found that the natural product also contains ephedrine.
Khat has the same psychological effects as those associated with amphetamine,
both positive and negative. An additional effect can be vivid hallucinations
as people hover between wakefulness and sleep. In contrast to job
performance benefits observed with true amphetamines, airplane crew members
who use khat are found to have poorer visual memory and decisionreaction
times when compared with nonusers. The substance is nonetheless
used as a stimulant assisting physical labor, much as coca leaves are traditionally
used in South America.
The shrub is mainly found in countries along the Red Sea and Indian Ocean
region of eastern and northeastern Africa. Leaves are traditionally harvested
in the morning and wrapped to slow their drying. Potency declines as they
dry out. The main active component cathinone transforms into the less-active
component cathine over time, reducing the strength of a particular batch of
khat. That factor formerly limited the product’s availability, but modern transportation
and freezer technology allows khat to be exported around the world.
The product has been a major cash crop in Ethiopia. Sometimes khat is used
Khat 217
as a tea or in a paste format, but just like coca, users generally chew the leaves
while (in the delicate phrase of one scientist) “rejecting the residues.” Some
people simultaneously drink sweet beverages to mask khat’s bitter flavor. The
natural product’s potency is mild enough that dangerous overdose is unlikely.
During the aftermath of the Persian Gulf War in the 1990s, concern was expressed
that American military personnel in that region might use khat instead
of beverage alcohol.
Although khat has no approved medical use in the United States, elsewhere
it is used against depression, stomach problems, headaches, coughs, as a mild
stimulant, appetite suppressant, bronchodilator, aphrodisiac, and as a gonorrhea
remedy. An antiinflammatory compound has been found in the natural
product. Khat raises body temperature, breathing rate, blood pressure, heart
action, and muscle tension.
Drawbacks. Khat promotes constipation and may damage kidneys and
liver. When fed to rabbits, khat lowers their vitamin C levels. The substance
can raise diabetics’ blood sugar.
Despite theoretical possibilities for afflictions, investigation of khat use in
North Yemen discovered little or no evidence of physical harm. Some researchers
find better dental health among persons who regularly chew khat,
but other researchers find the opposite (such results suggest that khat may be
an “invalid variable” actually having no impact). Investigators in London attributed
very few illnesses to khat in a group of 162 users. Tuberculosis may
be the main physical peril from khat, not from the substance itself but from
disregard of Western hygiene in social use of the drug (spitting around, sharing
a water pipe). Khat psychosis is rare, probably because of the natural
product’s relatively low strength. In two Israeli villages the mental illness rate
for users was no worse than for nonusers; the same was found in Liverpool,
England.
Abuse factors. Known as the “flower of paradise,” khat has wide recreational
use in countries of its traditional origin: A survey of over 10,000 Ethiopian
villagers found that half were currently using the substance; a survey
of Ethiopian high school students found a still higher percentage of users. In
cultures where khat usage originated, it is a social drug used to lubricate
conversation. Users feel more alert and confident and even a little contentious,
making for lively gatherings. Persons who have a troubled relationship with
khat are generally persons who disregard social customs about it. For example,
users will feel a letdown as the drug wears off. People who use khat in
its traditional social context are likely to experience that letdown as simply
part of a genial gathering breaking up as members go about their individual
business and are unlikely to have interest in taking more khat right then.
Someone alone in an apartment who feels let down may see more khat as the
answer instead of more friends. Also, using a drug in a social context differing
from its traditional one can cause trouble. People who use khat at all-night
high-energy rave dance parties are unlikely to experience the same sensations
as are found in an intimate circle of mutually trusting acquaintances who
interact with each other in daily life.
Despite khat’s well-documented stimulant properties, the substance is considered
a threat to economic productivity in countries where it has long tra218
Khat
dition of use. The “threat” probably has less to do with chemistry and more
to do with khat’s traditional societal role—helping people pass time genially
while they sit around and visit.
Around a century ago famed novelist Theodore Dreiser wrote a short story
“Khat” about using the substance. The story is an atmospheric portrayal of
the drug’s cultural context, how khat aided the functioning of a society that
had become archaic by the year 2000. The story is told from the perspective
of a beggar, and ironically, the society that despised the beggar is now itself
despised by Western modernists who condemn khat. A drug viewed as benevolent
by a disappearing world is viewed as a threat in a new world possessing
different values. Yet nothing about khat’s chemistry has changed.
Tolerance appears to develop to some khat effects, such as elevations in
pulse rate, blood pressure, body temperature, and respiration rate.
Drug interactions. The substance can interfere with amoxycillin and ampicillin
antibiotics.
Cancer. A study searching for a link between khat chewing and precancerous
conditions in the mouth found none, but some researchers feel the habit
promotes oral cancer, and others suspect that khat causes cancer of the esophagus
and stomach.
Pregnancy. Researchers have concluded that khat harms human sperm. Experiments
on mice indicate that khat lowers male fertility and promotes fetal
death from matings by those males. Rat experiments on females demonstrate
that khat can cause fetal death and birth defects. Women who chew khat
leaves tend to deliver lower-weight babies, but no birth defects were observed
in infants from a sample of over 500 pregnant khat users. Nursing mothers
can pass a psychoactive khat chemical into their milk, and the chemical can
be measured in an infant’s urine.
Additional information. Khat’s main effects are attributed to the presence
of the illegal drug cathinone (also called norephedrone), which is similar to
dextroamphetamine and can be manufactured in a laboratory. Volunteers taking
cathinone show higher blood pressure and pulse rate, feel pepped up, and
have a brightened mood. Scientists believe the substance has pain-relieving
properties when given to rats. Animal experiments indicate the drug has 50%
or more of amphetamine’s strength and that caffeine has a multiplier effect,
boosting the impact of a cathinone dose. Animal experiments find no aphrodisiac
qualities in cathinone but do find that it lowers testosterone levels and
harms sperm and testes. Compared to the natural product khat, the pure laboratory
drug has much more potential for harm. People can chew wads of
khat for hours and get no more than mild effects, but a person using the
pharmaceutical product can experience a much more powerful dose in an
instant.
Khat also contains cathine. Cathine’s effects are similar to cathinone but so
much weaker that khat users disdain old leaves that have lost cathinone but
still retain cathine. Laboratories can make cathine. The compound has been
known to produce cranial tics (uncontrollable jerking of the head) among persons
using it for weight loss. The drug has been found in ma huang food
supplements. A professional athlete was disqualified from competition after
consuming such a supplement without knowing it was cathine laced.
Khat 219
“Khat” is a nickname for MDMA, but they are not the same substance.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Brenneisen, R., et al. “Amphetamine-Like Effects in Humans of the Khat Alkaloid Cathinone.”
British Journal of Clinical Pharmacology 30 (1990): 825–28.
Kalix, P. “Cathinone, a Natural Amphetamine.” Pharmacology and Toxicology 70 (1992):
77–86.
Kalix, P. “Khat, an Amphetamine-Like Stimulant.” Journal of Psychoactive Drugs 26
(1994): 69–74.
Khattab, N.Y., and G. Amer. “Undetected Neuropsychophysiological Sequelae of Khat
Chewing in Standard Aviation Medical Examination.” Aviation, Space, and Environmental
Medicine 66 (1995): 739–44.
Krikorian, A.D. “Kat and Its Use: An Historical Perspective.” Journal of Ethnopharmacology
12 (November 1984): 115–78.
Nencini, P., and A.M. Ahmed. “Khat Consumption: A Pharmacological Review.” Drug
and Alcohol Dependence 23 (1989): 19–29.
Nencini, P., A.M. Ahmed, and A.S. Elmi. “Subjective Effects of Khat Chewing in Humans.”
Drug and Alcohol Dependence 18 (1986): 97–105.
LAAM
Pronunciation: ehl-a¯-a¯-ehm
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 1477-40-3. (Hydrochloride form
43033-72-3)
Formal Names: Levo-Alpha-Acetylmethadol, Levo-alphacetylmethadol, Levomethadyl
acetate, Orlaam
Type: Depressant (opioid class). See page 24
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule II (DEA no. 9648)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. LAAM has pain-relieving qualities, but its main medical use is for
treatment of opiate/opioid addiction, typically switching addicts from illegal
heroin to the legal substance LAAM.
Drawbacks. LAAM can produce heartbeat irregularity, and although this
unwanted action has not been known to harm users, it is a factor in deciding
between LAAM or methadone for drug addiction treatment. When used for
addiction therapy LAAM is generally considered to produce no significant
reduction in alertness, but persons new to the drug or who take high doses
are told to be careful about engaging in dangerous activity such as driving a
car. One study involving over 600 users found weariness to be a frequent
undesired LAAM effect, also constipation, abdominal discomfort, anxiety, perspiration,
and decreased male sexual ability. In one study scientists found that
testosterone measurements in males declined to levels below normal when
those persons used LAAM, but another study showed no change. In one study
euphoria was an unusual effect, but another study typically found LAAM
users to be “slightly euphoric” in comparison to methadone users. Researchers
have noted aggressiveness in monkeys taking LAAM, but that effect is unconfirmed
in humans. Rodent experiments measuring food intake have produced
conflicting results showing increased, unchanged, and decreased
appetite. One human study reported no appetite change in LAAM users.
Because oral LAAM’s long-lasting effects are slow to start, some illicit users
have taken more and more of the drug in order to feel expected effects and
then died from a cumulative fatal overdose when LAAM’s full actions finally
kicked in.
Abuse factors. In drug abuse treatment programs, some addicts prefer
LAAM 221
LAAM, and some prefer methadone. LAAM is related to methadone and is
generally considered weaker, but some research has found LAAM stronger in
certain ways. A dose of LAAM can last three times as long as one from methadone,
making LAAM more convenient for addicts in a treatment program,
as they can come less often to the clinic to receive LAAM than if they were
receiving methadone. Convenience can influence an addict’s decision on
whether to continue with a program. Another LAAM advantage is that the
long-lasting nature of a dose means that effects may be steadier over a given
amount of time than those from methadone, allowing more consistent job
performance by addicted employees. A case report mentions addicts who preferred
LAAM over methadone because LAAM’s steadiness reduced mood
swings that occurred with methadone. One experiment, however, discovered
that LAAM users are far more physically active on days when they receive
the drug than on days when they don’t—a finding that questions whether
LAAM effects are as steady as commonly believed. Scientists know less about
actions of LAAM than about those of methadone, so sometimes addicts with
complicated medical conditions are given methadone instead of LAAM because
methadone’s influence on those conditions is better understood.
Experimentation with rhesus monkeys revealed that LAAM does not necessarily
have uniform cross-tolerance with other opioids. Thus switching
someone to LAAM from another opioid can be tricky; LAAM may closely
match the other drug in some ways but not in others. For example, the same
level of pain relief may be achieved by particular doses of LAAM or some
other opioid, but those same doses will not necessarily affect breathing to the
same extent.
LAAM is supposed to provide no drug high to persons on maintenance
doses, but by definition a “maintenance” dose is only enough to hold off
withdrawal symptoms and not enough to produce effects desired by drug
misusers. So the lack of a high may be related to size of dose rather than to
chemistry of the drug.
Dependence can develop.
Drug interactions. Because of oral LAAM’s slow onset of effects, judging
safe amounts to take with other depressants can be perilous. Alcohol is considered
especially risky to use with LAAM. Phenobarbital is suspected of
altering the effectiveness of an LAAM dose, and the same suspicion holds for
the epilepsy drugs carbamazepine and phenytoin, the tuberculosis medicine
rifampin, and the antacid-ulcer drug cimetidine.
Cancer. LAAM’s potential for causing cancer is unknown. Data from laboratory
tests are inconclusive. One two-year test of the drug on rats and mice
produced no evidence of cancer, but another two-year test yielded some evidence
of liver cancer in rats. A human LAAM study looking for chromosome
mutations, which can lead to cancer, found none. Another human study found
no evidence of tumor development.
Pregnancy. LAAM’s impact on fetal development is unknown, but concern
is high enough that women of childbearing age are supposed to have monthly
pregnancy tests while on LAAM and to switch to methadone if pregnancy
occurs. Upon examining results from chicken and rat experiments, however,
some researchers suspect that more fetal damage may occur by stopping ex222
LAAM
posure to LAAM than by continuing it, and there has been speculation about
whether the same applies to humans. Abnormal breathing is seen in puppies
that had lengthy fetal exposure to LAAM. Rat experiments have attributed no
physical birth defects to LAAM, but some researchers suspect that fetal exposure
to the drug affects offspring behavior. Animal experiments also indicate
that even if LAAM causes no birth defects, risk of miscarriage may
increase. If pregnant rats routinely receive LAAM, their offspring quickly
show withdrawal symptoms upon birth (an event that stops exposure to the
drug) even though the drug is long-lasting in adults and would not produce
withdrawal symptoms in adults for quite some time after the last dose.
Additional information. Scientific literature often refers to LAAM as methadyl
acetate, short for levo-alpha-acetylmethadol. “Methadyl acetate,” however,
is also the name of a Schedule I substance occasionally called
acetylmethadol, and some scientific literature uses acetylmethadol as a synonym
for LAAM. Even the CAS Registry Numbers of these substances get
mixed up, with articles sometimes assigning CAS RN 509-74-0 to LAAM. Adding
even more confusion, LAAM and the Schedule I substances acetylmethadol,
alphacetylmethadol, and betacetylmethadol all have the same molecular
formula (and Orlaam is similar but with the addition of hydrochloride). Persons
using this book as a starting point for more research about LAAM should
look carefully at other information sources to be sure which drug is being
discussed.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Finn, P., and K. Wilcock. “Levo-Alpha Acetyl Methadol (LAAM). Its Advantages and
Drawbacks.” Journal of Substance Abuse Treatment 14 (1997): 559–64.
Prendergast, M.L., et al. “Levo-Alpha-Acetylmethadol (LAAM): Clinical, Research, and
Policy Issues of a New Pharmacotherapy for Opioid Addiction.” Journal of Psychoactive
Drugs 27 (1995): 239–47.
Rawson, R.A., et al. “A 3-Year Progress Report on the Implementation of LAAM in
the United States.” Addiction 93 (1998): 533–40.
Sorensen, J.L., W.A. Hargreaves, and J.A. Weinberg. “Heroin Addict Responses to Six
Weeks of Detoxification with LAAM.” Drug and Alcohol Dependence 9 (1982):
79–87.
Tennant, F.S., Jr., et al. “Clinical Experiences with 959 Opioid-Dependent Patients
Treated with Levo-Alpha-Acetylmethadol (LAAM).” Journal of Substance Abuse
Treatment 3 (1986): 195–202.
Levorphanol
Pronunciation: lee-VOR-fa-nohl
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 77-07-6. (Tartrate anhydrous form
125-72-4; tartrate dihydrate form 5985-38-6)
Formal Names: Levo-Dromoran
Type: Depressant (opioid class). See page 24
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule II (DEA no. 9220)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. Unlike many pain relievers, levorphanol’s oral formulation has an
effectiveness almost as good as the intravenous version. An animal experiment
demonstrated the drug can work when simply rubbed on an area of the skin
that is hurting; that capability is an asset because it avoids the necessity of
having the substance circulate through the entire body when only a particular
spot needs treatment. Even severe pain can be successfully treated with the
drug, which is used for conditions ranging from surgery to cancer. Studies
have likened it to fentanyl, meperidine, and morphine. Levorphanol is considered
4 to 15 times stronger than morphine. Pain control doses of levorphanol
take effect at about the same speed as morphine but last longer.
Prolonged administration of morphine can reverse pain relief action and instead
increase discomfort, while at the same time causing muscle spasms;
morphine patients can be switched to levorphanol to avoid those outcomes.
Drawbacks. Levorphanol can cause dangerous and even fatal breathing difficulty.
For that reason medical personnel are supposed to carefully adjust
dosage to a patient’s individual needs rather than depend upon customary
amounts of the drug being safe. It is supposed to be used with special caution
in patients with asthma, low thyroid function, urinary difficulty, or an enlarged
prostate. Wariness is also prudent when using the substance to reduce
heart pain, because the drug’s influence on cardiac function has not been confirmed.
The substance can lower blood pressure and may produce nausea,
vomiting, and constipation. Levorphanol can make users woozy and harm
skills needed for operating a car or other dangerous machinery. Although
levorphanol is a depressant in humans, it increases leg activity in ponies—an
effect that may not have escaped notice by persons seeking ways to improve
the animals’ performance in races.
224 Levorphanol
Abuse factors. Tolerance and dependence can develop. When dependent
rats were given a choice between water and a sweetened solution of levorphanol,
they preferred the drug solution, but when the choice was between
the same drug solution and sweetened water they preferred the sweet water.
When experimenters offered another set of dependent rats straight water and
unsweetened levorphanol solution, those animals preferred straight water.
Such results imply that the drug has a low addiction potential, but an implication
is not a fact. Also, animals do not always react to a substance in the
same way humans do.
In humans the drug can improve spirits and even produce euphoria, and
some users say they became addicted. A rat experiment demonstrated partial
cross-tolerance with alcohol, suggesting that the two drugs appeal to the same
kinds of people.
Some employer drug testing cannot distinguish between levorphanol and
dextrorphan.
Drug interactions. Simultaneous use of levorphanol with alcohol or other
depressants increases the possibility of cumulative overdose. In mice the anesthetic
lidocaine boosts levorphanol’s pain relief actions. Antihistamines and
monoamine oxidase inhibitors (MAOIs, found in some antidepressants and
other medicine) should be avoided when taking levorphanol. Levorphanol can
also be dangerous when taken with alprazolam, diazepam, flurazepam, lorazepam,
phenobarbital, or temazepam.
Cancer. Levorphanol’s potential for causing cancer is unknown.
Pregnancy. Mice experiments with the drug have caused pregnancy failures
and birth defects. Offspring from male mice exposed to the drug weighed less
than normal, were slower to mature, and had abnormal motions in water. The
potential for similar outcomes with humans is unknown. Rabbit experiments
show the drug passing into the fetus of a pregnant animal, reducing fetal
respiration. Milk from a nursing mother who uses levorphanol is assumed to
contain enough of the drug to cause unwanted effects in a nursing infant, but
that possibility may be minimized by waiting long enough after a dose before
nursing (the delay can allow much of the drug to wash out of the woman’s
body).
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Chernin, T. “Use of Opioids for Chronic Nonmalignant Pain.” Pharmacy Times 65 (1999):
18–20, 23–25.
Coniam, S.W. “Withdrawal of Levorphanol.” Anaesthesia 46 (1991): 518.
Friedler, G. “Effects of Limited Paternal Exposure to Xenobiotic Agents on the Development
of Progeny.” Neurobehavioral Toxicology and Teratology 7 (1985): 739–43.
Fuchs, V., and H. Coper. “Development of Dependence on Levorphanol in Rats by
Oral Intake of the Drug—The Influence of Taste on Drinking Behaviour in Rats
Physically Dependent on Levorphanol.” Drug and Alcohol Dependence 6 (1980):
373–81.
Knych, E.T. “Cross-Tolerance between Ethanol and Levorphanol with Respect to Stimulation
of Plasma Corticosterone.” Life Sciences 31 (1982): 527–32.
Lorazepam
Pronunciation: lor-A-ze-pam
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 846-49-1
Formal Names: Ativan, Temesta
Type: Depressant (benzodiazepine class). See page 21
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule IV (DEA no. 2885)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: D
Uses. This antianxiety drug is also known for its sedative properties and is
used to promote sleep and to fight convulsions. The substance is given to treat
status epilepticus, a dangerous condition in which people have one epileptic
seizure after another, back-to-back. It can reduce and sometimes even eliminate
vomiting from cancer chemotherapy. Lorazepam has been used to treat
LSD and methamphetamine overdose and has been a standard medicine to
help alcoholics through the alcohol withdrawal syndrome. Recreational sedative
users report euphoria from lorazepam. When given experimentally in
combination with other drugs, it has helped reduce depression. In contrast,
experimentation using motion picture excerpts to evoke particular emotions
found that lorazepam may reduce happy feelings and increase unhappy ones.
One study found that lorazepam worked as well as alprazolam for treating
panic attacks, and a case report tells of success in treating mania. Lorazepam
has been used to cure both catatonia (in which people are frozen in place) and
akathisia (compulsive moving around). Patients being prepared for surgery
receive the drug to calm them and to cloud their memory of the event.
Lorazepam is 5 times stronger than diazepam and 15 times stronger than
oxazepam, and one experiment showed that lorazepam is 370 to 783 times
stronger than meprobamate in producing some effects, ranging from degraded
performance in tests to amount of liking for one drug or the other.
Relatively little research seems to be done on whether members of different
races respond differently to the same drug. This type of uncommon study has
been done with lorazepam. The work found that although doses lasted about
as long in young Americans as in young Japanese, a dose lasted about 20%
longer in elderly Japanese than in elderly Americans—and a dose lasted about
20% longer in elderly Americans than in young Americans, so the difference
became quite noticeable in Japanese subjects. (“American” and “Japanese” are
226 Lorazepam
nationalities, not races, but the research description stated that the issue of
racial effect was being investigated; so those nationality labels were intended
to have racial connotations.)
Drawbacks. Partial amnesia is a typical effect of the substance, and after
using it for several days, people may have trouble gaining new memories.
Investigators have also found that the drug interferes with detecting whether
information is correct, while simultaneously reducing a person’s awareness of
memory trouble. Occasionally lorazepam temporarily stops respiration, and
people suffering from serious breathing trouble should avoid the substance.
The same goes for persons with acute narrow-angle glaucoma. The drug can
reduce body temperature and, depending on circumstances in experiments,
either raise or lower heart rate and blood pressure.
Researchers find that the substance interferes with recognizing common
items shown in distorted pictures; such trouble is considered evidence of the
brain suffering from weakened ability to understand what the eyes see. A case
report notes that lorazepam may impede movements of the mouth and face.
The drug somewhat garbles speech. Because of adverse impact on mental
clarity and physical performance, people are advised to avoid operating dangerous
machinery (such as cars) for at least 48 hours after using lorazepam.
Driving tests have shown the drug to reduce vehicle control skill while increasing
risk-taking. Other tests demonstrate worsened attention, slower reaction
time, and delay in reasoning out the solution to a problem. An
experiment demonstrated that users may be unaware of how much the drug
is interfering with their abilities. Dizziness and weakness may occur. Typically
a dose has greater impact on the elderly, and all persons risk falling down
until the drug wears off. A case report notes that lorazepam can eliminate a
person’s interest in sexual activity. An unusual case report tells of someone
who was hearing noises in an ear, and the noises became musical hallucinations
of popular songs when the person began taking lorazepam. More typically,
however, the drug is able to stop auditory hallucinations. Other case
reports tell of visual hallucinations after taking the compound, and that response
was also observed in 3 children among 112 who were given the drug.
Although lorazepam is used to reduce anxiety, case reports and formal experimentation
show that the substance can increase aggressiveness (perhaps
because people are less afraid to do things). A schizophrenic who received the
drug lost enough inhibitions to start acting out violent impulses, and similar
reports exist. In formal experimentation volunteers receiving lorazepam became
more aggressive but did not realize they were angrier than other persons
in the experiment.
Abuse factors. Various psychological tests measure how much a drug appeals
to someone. Among persons who already have a history of drug abuse
(a population prone to like drugs much more than nonusers do), some results
indicate lorazepam has about the same addictive potential as diazepam or
meprobamate; some results simply show lorazepam to have an unspecified
amount of appeal; and in one experiment abusers found the drug about as
attractive as a placebo (indicating low addictive potential). Rats begin exhibiting
tolerance to lorazepam after several days of dosing. If a person takes
lorazepam enough to develop dependence on it, suddenly quitting the drug
Lorazepam 227
can produce a withdrawal syndrome. If drug use has been heavy the withdrawal
can include confusion, depression, perspiration, cramps, tremors, vomiting,
mania, and convulsions. Lighter use can produce lighter withdrawal
such as insomnia and generally feeling out of sorts. Symptoms can be avoided
altogether if a person gradually takes smaller and smaller doses rather than
stopping abruptly.
Drug interactions. Lorazepam generally makes people more susceptible to
effects of alcohol. If a person taking lorazepam simultaneously ingests other
depressants (alcohol, barbiturates, opiates) the total depressant effects deepen.
Although we might expect stimulants to counteract lorazepam’s actions, research
has found that cocaine can boost some of them, with sleepiness becoming
particularly greater. Thus cocaine users receiving lorazepam for medical
treatment may require lower doses than normal.
Cancer. Mice and rat studies have not yielded evidence that lorazepam
causes cancer.
Pregnancy. In mice lorazepam increases incidence of eyelid malformation
and cleft palate. Mice having fetal exposure to lorazepam exhibit lasting neurochemistry
abnormalities, and rats with fetal exposure demonstrate brain difficulty.
Extrapolating from rat test results, two researchers concluded that fetal
exposure to the drug may result in male offspring having more anxiety than
normal and females having less than normal. Pregnant rabbits receiving lorazepam
in an experiment produced more birth defects than usual. Persuasive
evidence indicates that the drug passes from a pregnant woman into the fetus.
The drug is not recommended for pregnant women unless the need is dire.
Analysts examining thousands of medical records concluded that lorazepam
does not necessarily cause birth defects but found that the drug may be involved
with a deformity blocking an infant’s anal opening. Fetal exposure to
lorazepam is suspected of slowing development of infants’ abilities to move
and think. Case reports say that infants can have withdrawal symptoms if the
mother used the drug during pregnancy, symptoms accompanied by abnormal
muscle tone and trouble with eating. Nursing mothers are told to avoid
lorazepam, as infants might be drugged from the amount of lorazepam that
passes into milk.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Bond, A., and M. Lader. “Differential Effects of Oxazepam and Lorazepam on Aggressive
Responding.” Psychopharmacology 95 (1988): 369–73.
Funderburk, F.R., et al. “Relative Abuse Liability of Lorazepam and Diazepam: An
Evaluation in ‘Recreational’ Drug Users.” Drug and Alcohol Dependence 22 (1988):
215–22.
“Lorazepam.” In Therapeutic Drugs, C. Dollery. 2d ed. New York: Churchill Livingstone,
1999. L98–L100.
O’Hanlon, J.F., et al. “Anxiolytics’ Effects on the Actual Driving Performance of Patients
and Healthy Volunteers in a Standardized Test. An Integration of Three
Studies.” Neuropsychobiology 31 (1995): 81–88.
Schweizer, E., et al. “Lorazepam vs. Alprazolam in the Treatment of Panic Disorder.”
Pharmacopsychiatry 23 (1990): 90–93.
Shader, R.I., et al. “Sedative Effects and Impaired Learning and Recall after Single Oral
Doses of Lorazepam.” Clinical Pharmacology and Therapeutics 39 (1986): 526–29.
LSD
Pronunciation: ehl-ess-dee
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 50-37-3
Formal Names: Lysergic Acid Diethylamide
Informal Names: A, Acid, Acido, Angel Tears, Animal, Backbreaker (combined
with strychnine), Barrel, Battery Acid, Beast, Beavis & Butthead, Big D, Birdhead,
Black Acid, Black Star, Black Sunshine, Black Tab, Blotter, Blotter Acid,
Blotter Cube, Blue Acid, Blue Barrel, Blue Chair, Blue Cheer, Blue Heaven, Blue
Microdot, Blue Mist, Blue Moon, Blue Vial, Boomer, Brown Bombers, Brown
Dots, California Sunshine, Cap, Chief, Chocolate Chips, Cid, Coffee, Conductor,
Contact Lens, Crackers, Crystal Tea, Cubes, Cupcakes, D, Deeda, Delysid,
Domes, Doses, Dots, Double Dome, Electric Kool Aid, Ellis Day, Elvis, Felix the
Cat, Fields, Flash, Flat Blues, Ghost, God’s Flesh, Golden Dragon, Goofy, Grape
Parfait, Green Double Domes, Green Single Dome, Green Wedge, Grey Shields,
Hats, Hawaiian Sunshine, Hawk, Haze, Head Light, Heavenly Blue, Instant Zen,
L, Lason Sa Daga, LBJ, Leary’s, Lens, Lime Acid, Little Smoke, Live Spit and Die,
Logor, Loony Toons, Lucy in the Sky with Diamonds, Mellow Yellow, Mickey,
Microdot, Mighty Quinn, Mind Detergent, One Way, Optical Illusion, Orange
Barrel, Orange Cube, Orange Haze, Orange Micro, Orange Wedge, Owsley,
Owsley’s Acid, Pane, Paper Acid, Peace, Peace Tablet, Pearly Gates, Pellet,
Pink Blotter, Pink Panther, Pink Robot, Pink Wedge, Pink Witch, Potato, Pure
Love, Purple Barrel, Purple Flat, Purple Haze, Purple Heart, Purple Ozoline,
Rainbow, Recycle, Red Lips, Royal Blue, Russian Sickle, Sacrament, Sandoz,
Smear, Snowman, Squirrel, Strawberry, Strawberry Fields, Sugar, Sugar Cubes,
Sugar Lumps, Sunshine, Superman, Tab, Tail Light, Ticket, Trip, 25, Valley
Dolls, Vodka Acid, Wedding Bells, Wedge, White Dust, White Lightning, White
Owsley, Window Glass, Window Pane, Yellow, Yellow Dimples, Yellow Sunshine,
Ying Yang, Zen, Zig Zag Man
Type: Hallucinogen. See page 25
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule I (DEA no. 7315)
USA Availability: Illegal to possess
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. When LSD was invented in Switzerland during 1938 no one realized
that this chemical was a hallucinogen even though it was known to be related
to ergot. Its inventor Albert Hofmann wanted to make a stimulant to help
LSD 229
people push past weariness. Five years passed before he accidentally discovered
the drug’s ability to alter physical and mental perceptions. One element
of his discovery was the drug’s potency. A later estimate calculated that one
ounce is enough for 300,000 doses. Authorities list the substance as 3,000 to
4,000 times stronger than mescaline. One authority lists LSD as 30 times
stronger than DOM.
LSD strikes down barriers. Barriers between physical senses can disappear,
allowing colors to be smelled and sounds to be seen. Psychological barriers
can disappear, allowing insights that help people to cope with long-standing
problems. Barriers between shared realities and personal fantasies can disappear,
with people perceiving sights and sounds that no one around them is
experiencing. Those perceptions can be so compelling that some people believe
the drug strikes down barriers separating us from realities that are otherwise
inaccessible. Some users report a mystical experience; some simply gain
pleasure. Other possibilities include terrifying hallucinations and psychoses
impelling persons to do things that may harm themselves or other individuals
(a 1968 report from a government official about LSD users staring at the sun
until they were blinded turned out to be a hoax, but similar reports have
appeared since then). An LSD user’s personality, expectations, and surroundings
all influence outcome of a dose. The drug’s effects are not invariable.
Investigators have found that LSD is more rewarding for people who are
spontaneous and inspired by impulses from within themselves than for people
who are conforming and controlling.
Some results perceived by users turn out to be illusory. Artists who took
the drug felt more creative for months afterward, but scientists who gave tests
to detect elements of creativity found no change from predrug performance.
On a test of sketching the human form the artists did worse than before,
indicating that technical proficiency declined. An experiment involving word
and image tests found LSD did not enhance creativity of normal persons.
Despite LSD’s power, volunteers have typically been able to push through
their intoxication and produce almost normal results in psychological tests
given during the drug experience. One investigator noted that the experimental
setting of such tests seemed to weaken the drug’s effects. Ability to perform
“almost” normally in a laboratory does not necessarily transfer to tasks of
everyday life, however. For example, a person intoxicated by LSD should not
attempt to engage in dangerous activity such as driving a car. During 1943 in
one of the first recorded LSD experiences the drug’s inventor was barely able
to ride a bicycle, let alone drive a car, while under the influence. He had the
illusion of being almost motionless, although he was actually traveling at normal
speed, an indication that so many events were happening to him at once
that his perception of time contracted—and an indication that he was in no
condition to judge the speed of vehicles on the road. His feeling of time contraction
in turn expanded his perception of space, a linkage that drug researchers
can demonstrate, which probably made him feel he had a vaster
distance to travel and was making little progress.
Before American government authorities certified LSD as having no medical
value in 1970, the substance was used for a variety of therapeutic purposes.
LSD has stimulant effects allowing it to be used as an antidote for barbiturate
230 LSD
poisoning. With varying degrees of success LSD has been used to treat neuroses,
sexual disorders, heroin addiction, alcoholism, and psychopathology.
The drug has also been given to reduce cancer pain, to supplement drugs
used for pain relief in surgery, and to treat phantom limb pain (a sensation
that an amputated limb is still present and hurting). After legal LSD research
was phased out in the 1970s, relatively little new information has emerged
about the drug. In subsequent years even reports in scientific literature occasionally
had a casualness not often associated with science. For example, in
1997 a medical journal published a report about “presumed LSD intoxications,”
but medical personnel did not confirm that their patients had taken
the drug.
Drawbacks. Although LSD fatalities have been reported in animal experimentation,
by the 1990s no human overdose deaths had been documented
despite LSD’s tremendous potency. An overdose nonetheless can produce a
physical collapse requiring hospitalization. In a population of psychiatric patients
who took the drug, only 2 in 1,000 had a resultant psychosis lasting
more than 48 hours; such a result was even less frequent for psychologically
normal persons. In the 1990s, however, one review of LSD research noted that
lengthy psychoses can be instituted by the substance. Research found that the
suicide rate for psychiatric patients who used the drug under medical supervision
was the same as for other psychiatric patients, indicating LSD might
present no peril in that regard—although this aspect might be different in
uncontrolled circumstances.
The drug’s physical effects can include headache, nausea, vomiting, hot or
cold feelings, sweating, elevated body temperature, trembling, dizziness,
blood pressure changes (up or down), increased heart rate, numb hands, sensitive
hearing, and extra urine production. In dog experiments the substance
reduced appetite.
Rat experimentation shows that administering LSD for a month can alter
brain structure and chemistry. LSD has been reported to impair abstract thinking,
but one commentary on those reports noted that alcohol abuse among
the studied persons might also explain their thinking problems. Brief visual
afterimages (such as happens when someone looks at a bright object and then
sees an image of it in opposite colors for a few seconds after looking away)
are normal for everyone, but a formal experiment and a few case reports note
lengthy visual afterimages in proper colors among LSD users. These are not
flashbacks, incidentally.
Flashbacks are one of the most publicized effects of LSD. Flashback is a
reappearance of LSD actions without taking a dose. This phenomenon is normal
in other contexts; something may remind a person of an event that had
high emotional content, and the memory may flood one’s consciousness and
temporarily sweep aside awareness of one’s surroundings. People are usually
able to push out of an LSD flashback if they wish and are not taken over by
it; a survey of 247 persons who experienced LSD flashbacks found only 1 who
claimed to be unable to stop the experience at will. A case report indicates
behavior therapy can stop LSD flashbacks, implying that their cause may have
more to do with psychology than chemistry. Another case report notes additional
evidence that personality affects likelihood of flashback. Still another
LSD 231
case report says that some types of antidepressants appear to promote flashbacks
among LSD users, and a research study concluded that phenothiazine
tranquilizers worsen flashbacks after they start. Investigations have revealed
that many persons who claim to have LSD flashbacks do not really have them,
that people often use the term casually and incorrectly to describe other types
of experiences. Psychiatrists call the LSD type of flashback “hallucinogen persisting
perception disorder.” Some persons, however, regard LSD flashbacks
not as a disorder but as a sign they have learned to achieve altered states of
consciousness without using a drug anymore.
Abuse factors. Tolerance has developed in rats and humans. Humans have
shown LSD cross-tolerance with mescaline and psilocybin and slight crosstolerance
with DMT—meaning that the drugs can be substituted for one another,
for some purposes at least.
Drug interactions. Two case reports indicate that LSD alone or in combination
with alcohol may cause muscles to stiffen, accompanied by fever and
insensibility. Some antidepressants can increase LSD’s psychedelic effects;
some others reduce them. Rat experiments show that various opioids in various
doses can either increase or decrease LSD actions and that the schizophrenia
medicine clozapine can reduce LSD effects. Case reports say that
chlorpromazine (Thorazine) can cause an LSD psychosis among persons who
have used LSD in the past. Ambroxol, a substance used to help people clear
congested respiratory tracts, can give a false-positive urine test for LSD.
Cancer. LSD stopped breast cancer growth in a rat experiment. Researchers
believe this result came not because of hallucinogenic activity but probably
because LSD reduced amounts of a hormone called prolactin. Animal and
plant experiments show that LSD can be a mutagen, meaning it might have
a potential for causing cancer. A mutagen effect has not been observed in
humans who took LSD under controlled conditions.
Pregnancy. Researchers have demonstrated that LSD passes from a pregnant
mouse into the fetus. In other experiments pregnant mice that received LSD
produced offspring with eye defects. The same happened with rats, but in that
experiment investigators noted no significant statistical difference between
LSD and non-LSD rats in malformations of any type, so the LSD may not have
been responsible for the eye problems. Researchers who gave LSD to dozens
of rats, mice, and hamsters found no proof that the drug caused malformations
in their fetuses (which numbered in the hundreds). In the 1970s claims arose
that LSD causes human chromosome damage and birth defects even if the
drug use stops before pregnancy begins, but subsequent research failed to
verify those claims. Some of the original laboratory tests involved conditions
that do not occur in the human body, and early investigators typically did
not know what drug a woman had actually taken, nor what the dose was,
nor did they consider whether a woman’s health problems promoted congenital
malformations. The birth defect rate among children of LSD users is no
higher than the general population’s. A case report notes a woman who took
an LSD dose during early pregnancy with no apparent ill effect on her infant.
A study of pregnant women who attempted to commit suicide with drugs
found no infant malformation attributable to LSD, but the investigators said
data were too scanty to allow a conclusion about LSD’s potential for causing
232 LSD
developmental abnormalities. The rate of birth defects was not elevated in 121
pregnancies of women who took LSD under medical supervision. Another
study of 27 pregnancies reached no conclusion on whether LSD causes miscarriage.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Abraham, H.D., and A.M. Aldridge. “Adverse Consequences of Lysergic Acid Diethylamide.”
Addiction 88 (1993): 1327–34.
Cohen, S. “LSD: The Varieties of Psychotic Experience.” Journal of Psychoactive Drugs
17 (1985): 291–96.
Hofmann, A. LSD, My Problem Child. Trans. J. Ott. New York: McGraw-Hill, 1980.
Li, J-H., and L-F. Lin. “Genetic Toxicology of Abused Drugs: A Brief Review.” Mutagenesis
13 (1998): 557–65.
Mangini, M. “Treatment of Alcoholism Using Psychedelic Drugs: A Review of the
Program of Research.” Journal of Psychoactive Drugs 30 (1998): 381–418.
Masters, R.E.L., and J. Houston. The Varieties of Psychedelic Experience. A Delta Book.
New York: Dell, 1966.
McGlothlin, W.H., and D.O. Arnold. “LSD Revisited.” Archives of General Psychiatry 24
(1971): 35–49.
Novak, S.J. “LSD before Leary. Sidney Cohen’s Critique of 1950s Psychedelic Drug
Research.” Isis 88 (March 1997): 87–110.
Ma Huang
See also Ephedrine
Pronunciation: mah-hwahng
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: None
Formal Names: Ephedra sinica
Informal Names: Chinese Ephedra, Chinese Jointfir, Desert Tea, Herbal Ecstasy,
Mexican Tea, Miner’s Tea, Mormon Tea, Popotillo, Sea Grape, Squaw Tea,
Teamster’s Tea, Whorehouse Tea, Yellow Horse
Type: Stimulant (amphetamine class). See page 12
Federal Schedule Listing: Unlisted
USA Availability: Nonprescription natural product
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. Ephedra sinica is one of several Ephedra species classified as the Chinese
medical herb ma huang (loosely translated as “yellow drug that constricts the
tongue”). Each species is a plentiful source of ephedrine and pseudoephedrine.
A study found that the proportion of ephedrine to other mahuang components
increased if the herb was boiled for two hours. A test comparing the
natural herb to synthetic ephedrine (such as commonly found in medicines)
revealed little difference in how the human body used ephedrine from those
two different sources; investigators concluded that effects depend more on
size of dose than source of drug.
The herb has been used in China for 5,000 years, principally to treat respiratory
ailments. Ancient Greek utilization of Ephedra varieties is also noted.
More recently ma huang has been used against narcolepsy. Though thought
of as a Chinese herb, varieties of Ephedra plants also grow in Mexico and the
American Southwest where they were once used to treat venereal disease.
Mormon pioneers used the plants as alternatives to tea and coffee. Almost
nothing is said of using the plants for food, although reports exist about bread
made from the plants and about eating the berries, which are supposed to be
a good source of vitamin C.
In Eastern medicine ma huang is administered as a tea to fight fever,
asthma, and the common cold but has become popular in the Western world
as a stimulant and for promotion of weight loss. One study found that people
using a ma huang and cola nut combination lost over four times more weight
than persons using a placebo. Ma huang is marketed as a muscle builder, as
234 Ma Huang
a means of improving sexual performance, and also as a legal substitute for
MDMA. How well the product lives up to such advertising is debatable.
In the 1990s retail gross sales of ma huang products was estimated at over
a half billion dollars a year. In the year 2000 surveys from 755 persons undergoing
outpatient surgery were reported, saying that 18% were using ma
huang.
Drawbacks. Purity of ma huang products is uncertain. Examination of 20
ma huang dietary supplements found them to vary widely in content of
ephedrine and pseudoephedrine, and 4 even had inconsistency among various
batches of the same product. One examined product lacked any ephedrine or
pseudoephedrine at all. Many contained cathine, a Schedule IV prescription
drug found in khat. Perhaps the most alarming finding was that actual contents
of half the products did not match the label description. Another study
of 9 ma huang products had similar results. In a separate instance, undeclared
contents of a ma huang product was a factor causing an athlete to flunk when
tested for drugs banned from competitive sports.
The herb is known to cause paranoia, delusions, combativeness, mania, and
hallucinations similar to what amphetamine abuse can do. Someone with such
behavior was diagnosed and medicated for mental illness because no one suspected
ma huang use. Case studies offer vivid accounts of overdose causing
users to direct violence against themselves and others. Psychiatric problems
can persist for quite some time after drug use stops.
A study found that ephedrine did not account for all of ma huang’s adverse
effects and that unwanted actions increased if the herb was ground up. Herbalists
commonly prescribe 5 or 6 grams of ma huang for steeping as one dose
of tea, yielding (depending on potency) perhaps 38 to 75 mg of ephedrine.
The U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) has found many examples of
hazard in an ephedrine dose exceeding 10 mg. Two studies found the substance
to be safe in that amount, although one of those studies and a third
one noted heartbeat irregularity, reduced salivation, and difficulty with sleep.
Headache, dizziness, nausea, vomiting, skin rash, urinary retention, kidney
stones, and heart inflammation have been associated with using ma huang.
Persons with glaucoma should avoid the substance. Ma huang is suspected of
causing liver disease, but investigators are uncertain. Stroke, heart attack, and
death have been attributed to the substance, but those claims are disputed.
An experiment measuring heart rate and blood pressure yielded unclear results
about ma huang’s influence. The herb may cause adverse reaction with
monoamine oxidase inhibitors (MAOIs, commonly found in antidepressants).
Persons with diabetes or thyroid disease should consult with a physician before
using ma huang. Aircraft pilots have been advised to avoid the natural
product.
Abuse factors. Stopping the usage of ma huang can cause a person to be
tired, sleep a lot, be sad, and have trouble concentrating. Those are opposite
of typical effects that the substance has, suggesting that a user’s body has
developed a dependence on ma huang (because withdrawal from dependence
often produces effects opposite to what a drug does). Dependence is a traditional
sign that a substance is addictive.
Drug interactions. The FDA considers combining ma huang with cola nut
Ma Huang 235
to be dangerous. The two prime drug components of those natural products
are ephedrine and caffeine, and caffeine boosts ephedrine effects. Scientific
study finds that ma huang with caffeine, but not ma huang alone, can improve
functioning in physical exercise. The combination of ma huang with another
medicinal herb called guarana may be particularly poisonous to dogs.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Ma huang is supposed to be avoided during pregnancy.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Chen, K.K., and C.F. Schmidt. “Ephedrine and Related Substances.” Medicine 9 (1930):
1–117.
Grauds, C. “Herbal Ephedra and the Pharmacist.” Pharmacy Times 64 (March 1998):
60, 62.
Jacobs, K.M., and K.A. Hirsch. “Psychiatric Complications of Ma-Huang.” Psychosomatics
41 (2000): 58–62.
Mack, R.B. “ ‘All But Death, Can Be Adjusted.’ Ma Huang (Ephedrine) Adversities.”
North Carolina Medical Journal 58 (1997): 68–70.
Powell, T., et al. “Ma-Huang Strikes Again: Ephedrine Nephrolithiasis.” American Journal
of Kidney Diseases 32 (1998): 153–59.
Sprague, J.E., A.D. Harrod, and A.L. Teconchuk. “Pharmacology and Abuse Potential
of Ephedrine.” Pharmacy Times 64 (May 1998): 72–80.
Mandrake
Pronunciation: MAN-draik
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: None
Formal Names: Mandragora officinarum
Informal Names: Satan’s Apple
Type: Depressant. See page 19
Federal Schedule Listing: Unlisted
USA Availability: Nonprescription natural product
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. In some cultures European mandrake has traditional association with
the devil, perhaps because a little imagination can envision the plant’s root as
a small humanoid figure. The plant’s ominous connotation is illustrated in
Romeo and Juliet as Juliet approaches death and shudders about hearing
“shrieks like mandrakes’ torn out of the earth,” referring to a belief that the
plant screams if harvested. Witches reputedly made preparations from the
plant that enabled them to fly.
Medicinal usage of European mandrake may date back as far as ancient
Egypt, but in twenty-first-century Western medicine, only practitioners of homeopathy
use the substance for healing. (Homeopathy uses extremely weak
preparations of medicines.) Folk practitioners have given European mandrake
to fight depression, asthma, hay fever, whooping cough, colic, and stomach
ulcers. The plant has also been administered as a folk treatment to promote
fertility, perhaps inspired by the story in Genesis 30: 14–17. Such usage is
referred to by the line “Get with child a mandrake root” from John Donne’s
sonnet “Song: Go and Catch a Falling Star.” The plant is linked with romance
(Song of Solomon 7:13) and is a traditional aphrodisiac, although such a characteristic
has not received scientific confirmation. Sedative and pain relief actions
made the plant one of the first surgical anesthetics, and an image of it
appears on the coat of arms of the British Association of Anaesthetists. European
mandrake contains the so-called belladonna alkaloids atropine, hyoscyamine,
and scopolamine; therefore, European mandrake produces actions
similar to those of belladonna.
Drawbacks. Unwanted effects can include rapid heartbeat, elevated body
temperature, decrease in sweat and salivation, and difficulty with urination
and bowel movements. The natural product initially acts as a sedative, but a
Mandrake 237
strong enough dose converts mandrake into a stimulant that can cause manic
behavior, delirium, and hallucinations. An amount sufficient to bring on those
latter effects may be an amount sufficient for dangerous poisoning. Expert
guidance is recommended for anyone using the plant.
Abuse factors. Not enough scientific information to report about tolerance,
dependence, withdrawal, or addiction.
Drug interactions. Not enough scientific information to report.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Not enough scientific information to report.
Additional information. Podophyllum peltatum (CAS RN 9000-55-9 for resin)
is the American mandrake, a different plant from the European one and one
that persons sometimes use accidentally when they are seeking the European
variety. The American version is also known as Devil’s Apple, Duck’s Foot,
Ground Lemon, Hog Apple, Indian Apple, May Apple, Peca, Raccoon Berry,
Umbrella Plant, Vegetable Calomel, Vegetable Mercury, Wild Jalap, Wild
Lemon, Wild Mandrake, and Yellowberry. American mandrake is not a controlled
substance.
Odor from the flowers may be unpleasant, yet the small fruit is not only
edible but enjoyed by some persons. Leaves and stems are described as poisonous.
American mandrake is a traditional Native American medicine, and in former
times it was considered a substitute for mercury’s medical employment.
Folk medicine uses the plant to treat fever, worms, constipation, warts, syphilis,
jaundice, liver disease, and cancer. Etoposide, a substance derived from
the plant, is scientifically known to work against cancer. American mandrake
contains podophyllotoxin, a substance that acts against viruses causing measles
and herpes simplex type I. A study found podophyllotoxin and podophyllin
(another American mandrake substance) to be effective against a type
of wart. Application of American mandrake natural product preparations to
the skin must be skillful because the plant can injure the skin and even be
fatal if too much drug content is absorbed.
Animal experiments with the natural product have produced salivation,
vomiting, pain, and straining to defecate. Those unwanted effects also appear
in humans, with enough force to cause hemorrhoids and displacement of the
rectum. One authority warns that if someone eats too much of the fruit, its
laxative effect can become overpowering. Ulcers of the small intestine have
developed in animals that ingest American mandrake. A case is known of
damage to nerves providing sensation to limbs after a person drank an American
mandrake preparation. Persons working in an environment containing
American mandrake dust have suffered irritated eyes and noses, along with
coldness in their hands and feet.
The plant is suspected of causing birth defects, and usage is supposed to
be avoided during pregnancy. A case report tells of fetal death after American
mandrake was used to treat warts on a pregnant woman.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Frasca, T., A.S. Brett, and S.D. Yoo. “Mandrake Toxicity: A Case of Mistaken Identity.”
Archives of Internal Medicine 157 (1997): 2007–9.
238 Mandrake
Lust, J.B. The Herb Book. New York: Benedict Lust Publications, 1974. 259–60.
Millspaugh, C.F. American Medicinal Plants. Philadelphia: John C. Yorston & Company,
1892. Reprint, New York: Dover Publications, Inc., 1974. 61–64.
Morton, J.F. Major Medicinal Plants: Botany, Culture and Uses. Springfield, IL: Charles C.
Thomas, 1977. 87–89.
Vlachos, P., and L. Poulos. “Case of Mandrake Poisoning.” Journal of Toxicology: Clinical
Toxicology 19 (1982): 521–22.
Weiner, M.A. Weiner’s Herbal. New York: Stein and Day, 1980. 124–25.
Marijuana
See also Dronabinol
Pronunciation: mair-i-WAHN-uh (also pronounced mah-ri-HWAH-nuh)
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 8063-14-7
Formal Names: Cannabis, Cannabis sativa, Hashish, Marihuana, Sinsemilla
Informal Names: A-Bomb (with opium or heroin), Acapulco Gold, Acapulco Red,
Ace, Afgani Indica, African Black, African Bush, Airplane, Alamout Black Hash
(with belladonna), Alice B. Toklas (baked in brownie), AMP (with PCP, formaldehyde,
or other substance), Angola, Ashes, Assassin of Youth, Astro Turf,
Atomic Bomb (with heroin), Atshitshi, Aunt Mary, Baby, Baby Bhang, Bad Seed,
Bamba, Bambalacha, Bammy, Banano (mixed with cocaine), Bar, Bash, Bazooka
(with coca paste), Belyando Spruce, B-40 (mixed with tobacco and alcohol),
Bhang, Black, Black Bart, Black Ganga, Black Gold, Black Gunion,
Black Mo, Black Moat, Black Mote (with honey), Blanket, Blast, Block, Blonde,
Blue de Hue, Blue Sage, Blue Sky Blond, Blunt, Bo, Bo-Bo, Bobo Bush, Bohd,
Bomb, Bomber, Bone, Boo, Boo Boo Bama, Boom, Broccoli, Bud, Buda, Buddha
(with opium), Burnie, Bush, Butter, Butter Flower, Cambodian Red, Cam
Red, Cam Trip, Can, Canade (with heroin), Canadian Black, Canappa, Cancelled
Stick, Candy Blunt (with codeine), Carmabis, Catnip, Caviar (with cocaine),
Cavite All Star, Cest, Chamba, Champagne (with cocaine), Charas,
Charge, Cheeba, Cheeo, Chiba Chiba, Chicago Black, Chicago Green, Chips
(with PCP), Chira, Chocolate, Christmas Tree, Chronic, Chunky, Churus, Citrol,
Clicker (with formaldehyde), Clickums (with PCP), Climb, Cochornis, Coli, Coliflor
Tostao, Colombian, Colorado Cocktail, Columbus Black, Cosa, Crack Back
(with crack cocaine), Crazy Weed, Cripple, Crying Weed, Cryppie, Cryptonie,
CS, Cube (tablet form), Culican, Dagga, Dawamesk, Dew, Diablito (with crack
cocaine), Diambista, Dimba, Ding, Dinkie Dow, Dirt Grass, Dirty Joint (with
crack), Ditch, Ditch Weed, Djamba, Domestic, Dona Juana, Dona Juanita, Don
Jem, Don Juan, Donk (with PCP), Doob, Doobee, Doobie, Doradilla, Draf, Drag
Weed, Dry High, Dubbe, Dube, Duby, Durong, Duros, Dust (combined with
other substances), Earth, El Diablito (with cocaine, heroin, and PCP), El Diablo
(with cocaine and heroin), Elephant, Endo, Esra, Fallbrook Redhair, Fatty, Feeling,
Fine Stuff, Finger, Finger Lid, Fir, Flower, Flower Tops, Fraho, Frajo, Frios
(with PCP), Fry (with PCP or other substances), Fry Daddy (with crack cocaine),
Fry Sticks (with PCP), Fu, Fuel (with insect poison), Gage, Gange, Gangster,
Ganja, Garbage, Gash, Gasper, Gauge, Geek (with crack cocaine), Ghana, Giggle
Smoke, Giggle Weed, Gimmie (with crack cocaine), Goblet of Jam, Gold,
240 Marijuana
Golden, Golden Leaf, Gold Star, Gong, Gonj, Good Butt, Good Giggles, Goody-
Goody, Goofy Butt, Grass, Grasshopper, Grata, Green, Green Buds, Green Goddess,
Greeter, Gremmies (with cocaine), Greta, Griefo, Griefs, Grifa, Griff,
Griffa, Griffo, Gunga, Gungeon, Gungun, Gunja, Gyve, Haircut, Hanhich,
Happy Cigarette, Harsh, Has, Hash, Hawaiian, Hawaiian Black, Hawaiian
Homegrown Hay, Hay, Hemp, Herb, Herba, Hit, Hocus, Homegrown, Hooch,
Hooter, Hot Stick, Hydro, Illies (with PCP), Illing (with PCP), Indian Boy, Indian
Hay, Indian Hemp, Indo, Indonesian Bud, Instaga, Instagu, J, Jamaican Gold,
Jane, Jay, Jim Jones (with cocaine and PCP), Jive, Joint, Jolly Green, Joy Smoke,
Joy Stick, Juanita, Juan Valdez, Juice Joint (with crack cocaine), Juja, Ju-Ju, Jumbo
(with crack), Kalakit, Kali, Kansas Grass, Kate Bush, Kaya, Kee, Kentucky Blue,
Key, KGB (Killer Green Bud), Ki, Kick Stick, Kief, Kiff, Killer Weed (with PCP),
Kilter, Kind, King Bud, Kumba, Lace (with cocaine), Lakbay Diva, Laughing
Grass, Laughing Weed, Leaf, Leak (with PCP), Leno, Lid (quantity), Light Stuff,
Lima, Liprimo (with crack), Little Smoke, LL, Llesca, Loaf, Lobo, Loco, Locoweed,
Log, Love Boat (with formaldehyde or heroin), Love Leaf (with PCP),
Lovelies (with PCP), Love Weed, Lubage, M, Machinery, Macon, Maconha,
Mafu, Magic Smoke, Manhattan Silver, Mari, Marimba, Mary, Mary and Johnny,
Mary Ann, Mary Jane, Mary Jonas, Mary Warner, Mary Weaver, Matchbox
(quantity), Maui Wauie, Maui-Wowie, Meg, Megg, Meggie, Messorole, Mexican
Brown, Mexican Green, Mexican Locoweed, Mexican Red, Mighty Mezz, M.J.,
M.O., Mo, Modams, Mohasky, Mohasty, Monte, Mooca, Moocah, Mooster,
Moota, Mooter, Mootie, Mootos, Mor A Grifa, Mota, Mother, Moto, M.U., Mu,
Muggie, Muggle, Muta, Mutah, Mutha, Nail, Nigra, Number, O.J., Oolies (with
crack), Ozone (marijuana alone or with PCP and crack), Pack, Pakalolo, Pakistani
Black, Panama Cut, Panama Gold, Panama Red, Panatella, Parsley, Pasto,
Pat, P-Dogs (with crack), Pin, Pocket Rocket, Pod, Poke, Pot, Potlikker, Potten
Bush, Prescription, Pretendica, Pretendo, Primo (with crack), Queen Ann’s Lace,
Ragweed, Railroad Weed, Rainy Day Woman, Rangood, Rasta Weed, Red Bud,
Red Cross, Red Dirt, Reefer, Righteous Bush, Rip, Roach, Roacha, Rockets, Rompums
(with horse tranquilizer), Root, Rope, Rose Marie, Rough Stuff, Rubia, Salt
& Pepper, Sandwich Bag (quantity), Santa Marta, Sasfras, Scissors, Seeds, Sen,
Sess, Sezz, Shake, Siddi, Sinse, Skunk, Smoke, Smoke Canada, Snop, Speedboat
(mixed with crack cocaine and PCP), Spliff, Splim, Square Mackerel, Squirrel
(with crack and PCP), Stack, Stems, Stick, Stinkweed, Stoney Weed, Straw, Sugar
Weed, Super Grass (marijuana alone or with PCP), Super Pot, Sweet Lucy,
Swishers, T, Taima, Takkouri, Tea, Texas Pot, Texas Tea, Tex-Mex, Thai Sticks,
13, 38 (combination with crack cocaine), 3750 (with crack), Thumb, Toke,
Torch, Torpedo (with crack), Tray (quantity), Turbo (with crack), Tustin, Twist,
Twistum, Unotque, Vega, Viper’s Weed, Wac (with PCP), Wacky Weed, Wake
& Bake, Water (with other substances), Water-Water (with embalming fluid or
PCP), Weed, Weed Tea, Wet (with PCP), Whack (with insect poison), Whackatabacky,
Wheat, White-Haired Lady, Wicky Stick (with crack and PCP), Wollie
(with crack), Woolah (with crack), Wooly (with crack or PCP), X, Yeh, Yellow
Submarine, Yen Pop, Yeola (with crack), Yerba, Yerba Mala (with PCP), Yerhia,
Yesca, Yesco, Zacatecas Purple, Zambi, Zay (with other substances), Zig Zag
Man, Zol, Zoom (with PCP)
Marijuana 241
Type: Hallucinogen. See page 25
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule I (DEA no. 7360)
USA Availability: Illegal to possess
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. As the twenty-first century began, the recreational use of marijuana
was mainly for relaxation. The drug is often used in a social setting of mellow
geniality. The drug can produce euphoria; in that context recreational usage
can leak over into self-medication easing depression. One authority has said
that psychological effects are facilitated by the substance, not caused by it. In
other words, marijuana may help people achieve states of consciousness that
they can learn to achieve in other ways.
When the federal government’s drug scheduling system was adopted in the
1970s, marijuana was classified as Schedule I, certifying it as having no medical
value. Like many other substances, over the years marijuana had been
used for medical purposes that became obsolete as better treatments were
discovered. Then, by accident, a glaucoma sufferer discovered that his condition
improved when he smoked marijuana, and subsequent scientific tests
confirmed that the natural product had a hitherto unknown ability to relieve
that devastating eye disease that can cause blindness. Marijuana’s long-known
antinausea and appetite enhancement qualities also became publicized as a
help to patients undergoing the rigors of AIDS (acquired immunodeficiency
syndrome) and cancer treatments. As researchers began discovering other potential
therapeutic actions of marijuana (including treatment of pain, multiple
sclerosis, muscle spasticity, ulcerative colitis, and hiccups), medical use became
a controversial issue in the 1990s. Among the debated points was
whether the natural product had advantages over pharmaceutical dronabinol
(containing delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol, also called THC, which is marijuana’s
main active ingredient). Instead of swallowing dronabinol capsules,
some patients prefer to smoke marijuana because they can fine-tune the THC
dosage more easily, puffing just enough instead of taking a capsule that might
have more THC than they need. Marijuana smoke may also reduce some of
the unwanted actions of THC. Although belladonna and jimson weed cigarettes
were used for many years to treat asthma, given what is known about
the hazards of both tobacco and polluted air, few medical caregivers today
are likely to favor inhaling any kind of smoke. Ancient Greeks reportedly put
marijuana seeds on hot stones to release vapor, and modern efforts are devising
other ways to produce vapor without igniting the substance, providing
aerosol delivery without smoke.
Scientific debate aside, controversy about medical marijuana also had political
components. Many powerful individuals and institutions had a vested
interest in maintaining marijuana’s Schedule I status. Also, many persons saw
legalization for medical purposes as the first step toward lifting the ban on
recreational use. Passionate claims and counterclaims about marijuana’s medical
value swirled as this book was written, and doctors could not prescribe
marijuana.
242 Marijuana
Drawbacks. Although calling marijuana a hallucinogen stretches the definition
of that type of drug, this book follows the governmental custom of
classifying marijuana in that category. Despite that official classification, reports
of hallucinations from marijuana are uncommon.
Physical effects can include reddened eyes, accelerated heartbeat, higher
body temperature, lower testosterone level, and arousal of senses. In the 1970s
reports began appearing from laboratory and animal experiments indicating
that marijuana’s active ingredient THC harms immune system functions,
meaning infections may become more likely. Those experiments frequently
involved conditions that are not duplicated in the human body, however, and
by the 1990s fears about damage to the human immune system had quieted.
Marijuana is sometimes described as making people less interested in accomplishing
tasks in life. Someone jokingly suggested that the substance instead
creates insatiable ambition to hold elective office. In reality, marijuana
does not make people unambitious. Such persons may be attracted to heavy
marijuana use, but probably they were unambitious before using the substance.
One research study found that marijuana users who lack ambition tend
to be depressed and concluded that depression (not marijuana) was the underlying
cause for these persons’ diminished motivation. Case studies indicate
that marijuana can worsen psychoses, neuroses, and phobias.
In one study a battery of thinking tests given to groups of marijuana users
and nonusers found no difference in performance; in another study daily users
did worse than occasional users. Long-term memory (the ability to recall many
long-known things, such as remembering the year Columbus sailed to America)
has been unaffected in experiments. Short-term memory performance
(brief ability to recall a few newly known things, such as a list of random
words) can decline during intoxication but afterward returns to normal. Some
researchers have found marijuana to have no influence on muscular coordination,
sensory perception, mental ability, or learning; other researchers have
found that marijuana impedes muscular coordination and mental abilities.
Driving skill tests have shown similar variation; some studies find that marijuana
harms such skill, and some do not. Some research shows marijuana
having no effect on users’ performance the next day; some research shows
impairment 24 hours after use. Such differing results may relate to intoxication
levels, to volunteers’ experience with handling the substance, and to how long
persons have been using it (some researchers believe that long-term use produces
long-term effects extending beyond the time of acute intoxication).
The most obvious unwanted physical effects of marijuana are caused or
promoted by inhaling smoke, afflictions caused by the manner of dosing
rather than by the substance itself. In an animal experiment primates that
inhaled marijuana smoke were compared to those in a smoke-free group; the
marijuana group developed lung damage that could have led to bronchitis or
emphysema, had the smoking continued long enough. Among humans frequent
marijuana smoking is known to produce coughing, wheezing, and sputum.
Marijuana smoking reduces lung function in ways suggesting that
chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD) might develop if a person
smokes four or five marijuana cigarettes daily for 30 years (with a lesser
amount needed if a person also smokes tobacco). Certain kinds of lung damMarijuana
243
age have been seen in marijuana smokers but not in tobacco smokers. Marijuana
smokers typically use big puffs and deep inhalations, held for a long
period of time. Such a technique deposits larger quantities of damaging materials
in lungs than the ordinary tobacco-smoking technique. Efforts to document
lesser-known health risks have been flawed or outright unsuccessful.
Reports of physical disease in marijuana users often fail to account for other
possible (and perhaps more likely) causes.
Despite conceivable health hazards from marijuana, it seems safe in moderation,
no more dangerous than many foods (such as items high in sugar,
salt, fat, and cholesterol). The natural product is extraordinarily safe from a
dosage standpoint.1 No human fatality has been confirmed, although cattle
deaths have been reported after consuming bales of dried marijuana.
Abuse factors. Tolerance and dependence have been reported. A marijuana
abstinence syndrome is described as including physical and mental tenseness,
peevishness, less happiness, and diminished appetite. Such symptoms, however,
sound much like the reasons many persons use marijuana. If a chronic
headache sufferer reported discomfort when pain relievers were unavailable,
that would not be considered evidence of dependence on and withdrawal
from pain relievers. Self-administration of a drug by laboratory animals is a
traditional sign of addictive potential, but researchers have mixed success in
getting animals to self-administer THC.
Drug interactions. Not enough scientific information to report, although it
is reasonable to assume interactions could be similar to those occurring with
dronabinol.
Cancer. Laboratory tests indicate that marijuana smoke can cause cancer.
Oral and lung cancer is reported among marijuana users, although we must
remember that typical users also smoke tobacco. One study did find that marijuana,
even when tobacco use is accounted for, increases chances of getting
head and neck cancer. One of the more impressive studies of marijuana’s
cancer-causing potential involved medical records of 64,888 persons and discovered
that people who used marijuana, whether frequently or infrequently,
were in general no more likely to get cancer than anyone else. That study did
find evidence, however, that marijuana promotes prostate and cervical cancer.
Researchers have found that children are more likely to develop acute nonlymphocytic
leukemia if their mothers used marijuana during pregnancy. This
is a rare disease; in a population of 1 million children, about 5 will have the
affliction. The disease is also associated with pesticide exposure, and investigators
are uncertain whether pesticide contamination of marijuana is a more
important factor than marijuana itself.
Chromosome damage can indicate a potential for development of cancer.
Some laboratory and animal experiments indicate marijuana causes chromosome
damage, but a study found human chromosome abnormalities to be
about the same in moderate users of marijuana and nonusers. Researchers
conducting one human study sent the same samples to two laboratories, but
neither lab was able to find chromosome damage attributable to marijuana.
Pregnancy. Normally we think of marijuana as a recreational substance, but
some women use it to ease discomforts of pregnancy and childbirth. Marijuana
chemicals pass from a pregnant woman into the fetus. Almost all re244
Marijuana
search finds no evidence that marijuana causes human birth defects. A study
examining infants of adolescent mothers who used marijuana during pregnancy
noted some “minor” birth defects, but even these researchers did not
conclude that marijuana was necessarily the cause. Studies of newborns’ birthweights
have been inconclusive about an impact from prenatal marijuana exposure.
No major effect on muscular coordination and balance turned up in
an examination of preschool children having prenatal marijuana exposure, but
investigators cautioned that the tests lacked measures of subtle skills. Behavior
problems have been reported among children who had prenatal marijuana
exposure, but we do not know whether those problems were caused by marijuana
or by years of exposure to a particular type of parent. Investigators
watching development of children up to age 5 found no difference attributable
to maternal marijuana use during pregnancy; differences existed but were
ascribed to home environment and schooling. Examination of reading and
language abilities in children aged 9 to 12 years found no significant impact
from prenatal marijuana exposure. Some researchers believe they have found
problems caused by prenatal marijuana, but most research is consistent with
marijuana being benign.
Marijuana’s THC passes into human milk, and researchers report deficient
development of muscle and limb coordination among infants nursed on such
milk. One case report noted the THC level in milk was eight times higher
than the mother’s blood level.
Additional information. Marijuana and hemp come from different portions
of the same plant, Cannabis sativa. Leaves, flowers, and resin are the illegal
drug marijuana; the resin is also called hashish. Stalks and seed (if processed
so it will not germinate) are the legal commercial product hemp. The terms
hemp and marijuana are sometimes used interchangeably, but such use is incorrect.
After marijuana was outlawed in the 1930s, hemp raising continued
to thrive because law enforcement authorities of the era were familiar with
the industry and understood that crops were not entering the illegal drug
market even though the plants had leaves and flowers and resin. During
World War II the federal government subsidized hemp farming to replace
natural fiber supplies cut off by the war. In the 1950s subsidies finally stopped,
and the American hemp industry also stopped because it could no longer
make money at the unsubsidized world market price.
Some food products contain hemp components and can cause false positives
for marijuana in urine drug screen tests. Hemp lotions and creams rubbed on
the skin produce marijuana chemicals in urine, but not enough to cause false
positives in a drug screen.
“Locoweed” and “stinkweed” are nicknames for both jimson weed and marijuana,
but the substances are different.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Carlson, B.R., and W.H. Edwards. “Human Values and Marijuana Use.” International
Journal of the Addictions 25 (1990): 1393–401.
Fried, P., et al. “Current and Former Marijuana Use: Preliminary Findings of a Longitudinal
Study of Effects on IQ in Young Adults.” CMAJ: Canadian Medical
Association Journal 166 (2002): 887–91.
Marijuana 245
Gruber, A.J., H.G. Pope, and P. Oliva. “Very Long-Term Users of Marijuana in the
United States: A Pilot Study.” Substance Use and Misuse 32 (1997): 249–64.
Hendin, H., et al. “The Functions of Marijuana Abuse for Adolescents.” American Journal
of Drug and Alcohol Abuse 8, no. 4 (1981–1982): 441–56.
Iversen, L. “Marijuana: The Myths Are Hazardous to Your Health.” Cerebrum 1, no. 2
(1999): 37–49.
Labouvie, E.W. “Alcohol and Marijuana Use in Relation to Adolescent Stress.” International
Journal of the Addictions 21 (1986): 333–45.
Reilly, D. “Long-Term Cannabis Use: Characteristics of Users in an Australian Rural
Area.” Addiction 93 (1998): 837–46.
Sidney, S., et al. “Marijuana Use and Mortality.” American Journal of Public Health 87
(1997): 585–90.
Solomon, D., ed. The Marihuana Papers. Indianapolis, IN: Bobbs-Merrill, 1966.
Taylor, D.R., et al. “A Longitudinal Study of the Effects of Tobacco and Cannabis
Exposure on Lung Function in Young Adults.” Addiction 97 (2002): 1055–61.
Thompson, K.M. “Marijuana Use among Adolescents: Trends, Patterns, and Influences.”
Minerva Pediatrica 53 (2001): 313–23.
U.S. Commission on Marihuana and Drug Abuse. Marihuana, a Signal of Misunderstanding.
Washington, DC: Government Printing Office, 1972.
Von Sydow, K., et al. “The Natural Course of Cannabis Use, Abuse and Dependence
over Four Years: A Longitudinal Community Study of Adolescents and Young
Adults.” Drug and Alcohol Dependence 64 (2001): 347–61.
Note
1. Decades of studies indicating marijuana’s relative safety when used in moderation
include Advisory Committee on Drug Dependence, Cannabis (Wooten Report) (London:
HMSO, 1968); J. Brandt and L.F. Doyle, “Concept Attainment, Tracking, and Shifting
in Adolescent Polydrug Abusers,” Journal of Nervous and Mental Disease 171 (1938):
559; E.M. Brecher and the Editors of Consumer Reports, Licit and Illicit Drugs: The
Consumers Union Report on Narcotics, Stimulants, Depressants, Inhalants, Hallucinogens,
and Marijuana—Including Caffeine, Nicotine, and Alcohol (Boston: Little, Brown and Company,
1972), 395; N.Q. Brill and R.L. Christie, “Marihuana Use and Psychosocial Adaptation:
Follow-up Study of a Collegiate Population,” Archives of General Psychiatry 31
(1974): 713; Commission of Inquiry into the Non-Medical Use of Drugs (Le Dain Commission),
Interim Report (Toronto, Canada: Addiction Research Foundation of Ontario,
1970); C.M. Culver and F.W. King, “Neuropsychological Assessment of Undergraduate
Marihuana and LSD Users,” Archives of General Psychiatry 32 (1974): 707; E. Goode,
Drugs in American Society (New York: Alfred A. Knopf, 1972), 56, 59 n. 1; Jaffe, “Drug
Addiction and Abuse,” in L.S. Goodman and A. Gilman, The Pharmacological Basis of
Therapeutics, 7th ed. (New York: The Macmillan Company, 1955), 560; The Indian Hemp
Drugs Commission Report (Silver Spring, MD: Jefferson Press, 1969) (reprint of summary
volume); T.H. Mikuriya, “Historical Aspects of Cannabis Sativa in Western Medicine,”
New Physician 18 (1969): 905; J.B. Murray, “Marijuana’s Effects on Human Cognitive
Functions, Psychomotor Functions, and Personality,” Journal of General Psychology 113
(1986): 29, 40–41; National Commission on Marihuana and Drug Abuse, Marihuana: A
Signal of Misunderstanding (Washington, DC: GPO, 1972) (SuDocs Y3.M33/2:2MM33,
plus appendix volumes); H.G. Pope, Jr., A.J. Gruber, and D. Yurgelun-Todd, “Residual
Neuropsychologic Effects of Cannabis,” Current Psychiatry Reports 3 (2001): 507–12;
H.G. Pope, Jr., et al., “Neuropsychological Performance in Long-Term Cannabis Users,”
Archives of General Psychiatry 58 (2001): 909–15; J.F. Siler, et al., “Mariajuana Smoking
in Panama,” Military Surgeon 73 (1933): 269–80; C. Stark-Adamec, R.E. Adamec, and
R.O. Phil, “Experimenter Effects in Marihuana Research: A Note of Caution,” Psycho246
Marijuana
logical Reports 51 (1982): 203; D. Solomon, ed., The Marihuana Papers (Indianapolis:
Bobbs-Merrill, 1966) (including the classic LaGuardia Committee Report); Swiss Federal
Commission for Drug Issues (EKDF), Cannabis Report (1999); G. Teichner, et al., “The
Relationship of Neuropsychological Functioning to Measures of Substance Use in an
Adolescent Drug Abusing Sample,” International Journal of Neuroscience 104 (2000):113–
24; A.S. Trebach, The Great Drug War and Radical Proposals That Could Make America Safe
Again (New York: Macmillan Publishing Company, 1987), 81; J.T. Ungerleider and T.
Andrysiak, “Bias and the Cannabis Researcher,” Journal of Clinical Pharmacology 21
(1981): 153 S-85 S; United Kingdom House of Commons, Cannabis, Library Research
Paper 00/74 (2000); A. Weil, The Natural Mind: An Investigation of Drugs and the Higher
Consciousness, Rev. ed. (Boston: Houghton Mifflin Company, 1986), 47; A. Weil, N.E.
Zinberg, and J.M. Nelsen, “Clinical and Psychological Effects of Marihuana in Man,”
Science 162 (1968): 1234–42; R.C. Wert and M.L. Raulin, “The Chronic Cerebral Effects
of Cannabis Use. I. Methodological Issues and Neurological Findings,” International
Journal of the Addictions 21 (1986): 602–28; R.C. Wert and M.L. Raulin, “The Chronic
Cerebral Effects of Cannabis Use. II. Psychological Findings and Conclusions,” International
Journal of the Addictions 21 (1986): 629–42.
Mazindol
Pronunciation: MA-zin-doll (also pronounced MAYZ-in-dohl)
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 22232-71-9
Formal Names: Mazanor, Sanorex, Teronac
Type: Stimulant (anorectic class). See page 15
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule IV (DEA no. 1605)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. Mazindol reduces appetite, and the drug’s main medical usage is
short-term promotion of weight loss. For that purpose one study showed mazindol
having about 10% to 20% of dextroamphetamine’s strength; another
study noted that regardless of relative strength per milligram, patients on
mazindol shed about twice as many pounds as those on dextroamphetamine.
In studies examining diet drugs, persons using mazindol lost as many or even
more pounds compared to persons using phenmetrazine. One 12-week experiment
found mazindol considerably more effective than diethylpropion for
human weight loss, although a rat study found those two drugs’ effectiveness
comparable. Some human studies put mazindol as about equal to fenfluramine
for weight loss. Still other studies call mazindol’s performance the same
as a placebo. Perhaps these various findings are less a commentary on mazindol
than on the unclear effectiveness of diet drugs in general.
Although mazindol appears to produce depression among some users, in
others the drug works as an antidepressant. This antidepressant characteristic
is considered helpful in promoting weight loss, as some overweight persons
use food to compensate for sadness. As one condition improves, generally the
other one does also. Mazindol’s dual action as an anorectic and antidepressant
can make it especially appropriate for persons struggling to lose both melancholy
and weight.
Some mazindol effects are like those of amphetamine, but the two substances
are described as chemically unrelated. Mazindol seems to pep up rats.
In rat experiments the drug increases tendency to move around, more in females
than in males. In humans the compound is used to combat narcolepsy
and the decline of muscle tone sometimes associated with that affliction. Mazindol
acts as a pain reliever in mice. One study found the drug made humans
more sensitive to pain, but other experimental usage reduced pain in terminal
248 Mazindol
cancer patients. Researchers believe mazindol can aid sufferers from Parkinson’s
disease. A case is reported of the drug acting as an aphrodisiac in a
human female. The compound can reduce cholesterol levels.
Drawbacks. Mazindol increases pulse rate, may cause hallucinations, and
disrupts sleep. In one study users complained of headache, skin rash, dry
mouth, perspiration, tremor in heart and other muscles, nausea, and difficult
urination and bowel movements. Users also report being wired, edgy, and
dizzy. In human males mazindol can make the testes painful, interfere with
erection and ejaculation, and cause urine retention. The latter effect has been
exploited to treat incontinence. Mazindol may interfere with production of
human growth hormone, a consideration when juveniles take the drug. When
tested as a treatment for schizophrenia the drug at best had no effect and even
worsened some symptoms. A medical journal article published in 2000 linked
mazindol to pulmonary hypertension, the first time such an association was
reported. Earlier reports noted development of heart disorder after taking mazindol
in combination with fenfluramine or dexfenfluramine, but such affliction
has been attributed to those latter two drugs by themselves, so mazindol’s
role is uncertain.
Abuse factors. In rhesus monkey experiments the animals show a liking for
mazindol, but a review of clinical studies found no instances of patients becoming
addicted. Although reports exist of mazindol inducing euphoria, human
users show no particular liking for the drug. Volunteers comparing
several diet drugs found mazindol to have the least appeal by far. Scientists
evaluating another experimental study of the drug described it as a “punisher”
that persons wanted to avoid.
Drug interactions. Researchers say mazindol and alcohol have a multiplier
effect when used together, boosting each other’s potency and producing an
extra buzz for recreational users. Mazindol interferes with some cocaine effects,
but studies examining mazindol’s potential for treating cocaine addiction
find a placebo to be about as good. One study even found the two drugs to
have a hazardous multiplier effect raising blood pressure and pulse rate, and
rat experiments find that mazindol reduces the size of a cocaine dose needed
to cause death. Mazindol can react adversely with antimania drug lithium and
can counteract drugs intended to lower blood pressure.
Cancer. Laboratory experiments show mazindol promoting cell mutations
and chromosome breaks (traditional signs of cancer-causing potential), but
that finding’s real-life meaning is unclear.
Pregnancy. The drug’s influence on fetal development is unestablished.
Whether the drug passes into milk of nursing mothers is unknown. Doses that
kill female rats while pregnant or after giving birth can leave males and nonpregnant
females unscathed. Whether such findings mean that pregnancy increases
human sensitivity to the drug is unknown.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Alvarez, B., et al. “Mazindol in Long-Term Treatment of Narcolepsy.” Lancet 337 (1991):
1293–94.
Bierger, P., F. Gawin, and T.R. Kosten. “Treatment of Cocaine Abuse with Mazindol.”
Lancet 1 (1989): 283.
Mazindol 249
Chait, L.D., E.H. Uhlenhuth, and C.E. Johanson. “Reinforcing and Subjective Effects of
Several Anorectics in Normal Human Volunteers.” Journal of Pharmacology and
Experimental Therapeutics 242 (1987): 777–83.
Hagiwara, M., et al. “Delayed Onset of Pulmonary Hypertension Associated with an
Appetite Suppressant, Mazindol: A Case Report.” Japanese Circulation Journal 64
(2000): 218–21.
Preston, K.L., et al. “Effects of Cocaine Alone and in Combination with Mazindol in
Human Cocaine Abusers.” Journal of Pharmacology and Experimental Therapeutics
267 (1993): 296–307.
MDA
Pronunciation: em-dee-a¯
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 4764-17-4
Formal Names: Amphedoxamine, 3,4-Methylenedioxyamphetamine
Informal Names: Chocolate Mescaline, Hug Drug, Love, Love Pill, Mellow Drug
of America
Type: Hallucinogen. See page 25
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule I (DEA no. 7402)
USA Availability: Illegal to possess
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. This drug is a derivative of amphetamine and an analog to MDMA,
with effects similar to the latter and to MDEA. MDA is stronger than those
two hallucinogens. Researchers also report it to be three to five times stronger
than mescaline, to which it is chemically related. MDA is legally defined as
a hallucinogen, but its stimulant qualities put it in the entactogen pharmacological
class—a type of drug with both stimulant and hallucinogenic qualities.
MDA is an illicit drug designer’s delight; by the 1970s thousands of offshoots
had been made.
First produced in a laboratory in 1910, MDA was intended to help people
lose weight. One authority believes the drug has potential for stopping allergic
reactions to a variety of allergens. As the 1960s arrived the drug had been
patented as a cough suppressant and as a tranquilizer, but MDA never went
into legal commercial manufacture.
Reports of MDA’s psychological effects date back to the 1930s, but not until
three decades later did the substance become a recreational drug. It has the
capability to change how a person views time and space. While under the
influence a user’s hearing and sense of touch can become more sensitive, and
a person’s sense of identity can alter. Emotions and caring about other persons
can intensify, as can ability to communicate feelings. Such aspects allowed
MDA to find a niche in psychotherapy as well as on the street. Strong doses
can bring on hallucinations, with experiences so similar to LSD and mescaline
that users cannot tell whether they were dosed with the latter drugs or with
MDA.
Drawbacks. MDA raises heart rate, blood pressure, body temperature, and
salivation. The substance can cause nausea, along with high acid levels in
MDA 251
blood. Although one authority notes that the drug can relax muscles, nonetheless
tremors and seizures are also possible; MDA is known to worsen Parkinson’s
disease. MDA can tense up jaw muscles and cause grinding of teeth.
As drug effects go away, users may experience weariness and muscle aches
accompanied by depression. Users coming off the drug may also be shorttempered,
suspicious of others, and nervous. Typically the effects desired by
a user decline with repeated use of the drug, while undesired postintoxication
effects increase. MDA can cause organic brain damage in rats, in some aspects
worse than what MDMA does.
Overdose symptoms resemble those of amphetamine and MDMA, including
massive perspiration and strange conduct prone to combativeness. The percentage
of fatalities among abusers is small, but the size difference between a
recreational dose and a serious overdose can vary tremendously between individuals.
What one person can tolerate without apparent ill effect can send
another person to a hospital. Blood and urine tests in one fatal overdose case
showed only MDA, demonstrating that this drug can be lethal even when it
is not part of a polydrug abuse mix.
Men may suffer fewer ill effects from MDA than women do. In one animal
study documenting a gender difference in effects, male rats showed a higher
body temperature increase than female rats did, but blood levels of MDA
stayed higher in the female.
Abuse factors. Not enough scientific information to report about tolerance,
dependence, or withdrawal. In animal experiments self-administration is
a traditional sign of addictive potential; rats show mild interest in selfadministration
of MDA.
Drug interactions. Animal experiments suggest that taking certain drugs
along with MDA can reduce its toxicity.
Cancer. MDA causes cancer in mice and rats, with males being more susceptible
than females.
Pregnancy. Not enough scientific information to report.
Additional information. At one time MDA was nicknamed Ecstasy, but that
street name was later transferred to MDMA. An industrial chemical called
MDA (methylene dianiline) is not the drug of abuse.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Climko, R.P., et al. “Ecstacy: A Review of MDMA and MDA.” International Journal of
Psychiatry in Medicine 16 (1986–1987): 359–72.
Hegadoren, K.M., G.B. Baker, and M. Bourin. “3,4-Methylenedioxy Analogues of Amphetamine:
Defining the Risks to Humans.” Neuroscience and Biobehavioral Reviews
23 (1999): 539–53.
Poklis, A., M.A. Mackell, and W.K. Drake. “Fatal Intoxication from 3,4-Methylenedioxyamphetamine.”
Journal of Forensic Sciences 24 (1979): 70–75.
Richards, R.N. “Experience with MDA.” Canadian Medical Association Journal 106 (1972):
256–59.
Richards, K.C., and H.H. Borgstedt. “Near Fatal Reaction to Ingestion of the Hallucinogenic
Drug MDA.” Journal of the American Medical Association 218 (1971):
1826–27.
MDEA
Pronunciation: em-dee-ee-a¯
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 82801-81-8
Formal Names: 3,4-Methylenedioxyethylamphetamine, MDE
Informal Names: Eve, Intellect
Type: Hallucinogen. See page 25
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule I (DEA no. 7404)
USA Availability: Illegal to possess
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. This substance is related to MDA, MDMA, amphetamine, and methamphetamine.
Drug laws call MDEA a hallucinogen, but it has stimulant effects
also. Those dual properties put it in the entactogen pharmacological
group, a type of drug with both stimulant and hallucinogenic qualities. Effects
are similar to those from MDA and MDMA.
MDEA can create contentedness and feelings of intimacy with other persons.
It may promote self-insight, gesturing, and articulate talking. Hallucinations
can occur, described as less intense than those brought on by
psilocybin. Volunteers had normal results in tests of numerical ability while
using MDEA, indicating that people can force themselves to overcome at least
some of the drug’s effects if necessary. Even though users feel more relaxed
after taking the substance, it has general stimulant effects—raising the pulse
rate, blood pressure, and body temperature. It also elevates the level of cortisol,
a hormone that increases blood sugar.
Drawbacks. Apparently MDEA inhibits secretion of human growth hormone.
The drug disrupts sleep and dreaming. Psychosis is possible. In experiments
with normal volunteers a minority had mental aftereffects including
nervousness and discontent.
Some researchers describe MDEA as less toxic than MDMA, but damage is
still possible to kidneys, liver, brain, and heart. Persons with heart disease
may be in particular danger from MDEA. Overdose symptoms include hallucinations,
excessive body temperature, massive perspiration, violent conduct,
muscle spasms, difficulty moving arms and legs, convulsions, distress
in breathing, and passing out. Fatalities have shown blood clots throughout
the body and damage to skeletal muscle. Although deaths from “normal”
MDEA 253
doses are unlikely among healthy users, the same dose can have stronger
effects on some users than on others.
In rat experiments comparing the strength of MDMA to MDEA, about twice
as much MDEA is needed to induce excessive body temperature and about
four times as much to cause one kind of organic brain damage. The experimenters
note, however, that these findings do not extrapolate well to humans
because people might take greater doses of MDEA than MDMA to get the
desired psychological effects, so any net difference in harm to abusers may be
nil despite difference in drug potency.
Abuse factors. Not enough scientific information to report about tolerance,
dependence, withdrawal, or addiction.
Drug interactions. Medical investigators suspect that heroin and MDEA
counteract each other’s effects in humans.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Not enough scientific information to report.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Gouzoulis, E., et al. “Neuroendocrine and Cardiovascular Effects of MDE in Healthy
Volunteers.” Neuropsychopharmacology 8 (1993): 187–93.
Gouzoulis-Mayfrank, E., et al. “Psychopathological, Neuroendocrine and Autonomic
Effects of 3,4-Methylenedioxyethylamphetamine (MDE), Psilocybin and DMethamphetamine
in Healthy Volunteers. Results of an Experimental Double-
Blind Placebo-Controlled Study.” Psychopharmacology 142 (1999): 41–50.
Hegadoren, K.M., G.B. Baker, and M. Bourin. “3,4-Methylenedioxy Analogues of Amphetamine:
Defining the Risks to Humans.” Neuroscience and Biobehavioral Reviews
23 (1999): 539–53.
Hermle, L., et al. “Psychological Effects of MDE in Normal Subjects. Are Entactogens
a New Class of Psychoactive Agents?” Neuropsychopharmacology 8 (1993):
171–76.
MDMA
Pronunciation: em-dee-em-a¯
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 42542-10-9
Formal Names: Methylenedioxymethamphetamine, 3,4-Methylenedioxymethamphetamine
Informal Names: A, Adam, Baby Slits, B-Bomb, Bens, Benzedrine, Biphetamine,
Blue Kisses, Blue Lips, California Sunrise, Chrystal Methadrine, Clarity, Cristal,
Debs, Decadence, Dex, Dexedrine, Diamonds, Disco Biscuit, Doctor, Dolls,
Domex, Draf, Drivers, E, E-Ball, E-Bomb, Ecstasy, Ekies, Elaine, Essence, Euphoria
(combined with mescaline and methamphetamine), Everclear, Fastin,
Gaggler, Go, Greenies, Hamburger, H-Bomb (with heroin), Honey Flip (with
2C-B), Hug Drug, Hydro, Iboga, Ice, Khat, Kleenex, Love Doctor, Love Drug,
Love Potion Number 9, Lovers’ Speed, Love Doves, Love Trip (with mescaline),
Lucky Charmz, M&M, MAO, MDM, Methedrine, Mini Beans, Mitsubishi, Molly,
Monoamine Oxidase, Morning Shot, M25, New Yorkers, 19, Number 9, Orbit,
Pikachu (mixed with PCP), Pink Studs, Pollutants, Rave, Road Runner, Rolling,
Running, Scooby Snacks, Shabu, Slamming, Spivias, Strawberry Shortcake,
Sweeties, 10, USP, Venus, Vitamin E, West Coast Turnarounds, Wheels, Whiffledust,
White Dove, Whiz Bombs, Wigits, X, XTC, Yuppie Drug, Zen
Type: Hallucinogen. See page 25
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule I (DEA no. 7405)
USA Availability: Illegal to possess
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. MDMA was discovered and patented in Europe as World War I began,
intended to make soldiers feel less hungry. In civilian usage the drug
was supposed to help people lose weight, but other effects portended the
product’s commercial failure, and it never went on the market. Those other
effects attracted attention in the 1960s and 1970s among therapists and recreational
drug users alike.
MDMA intensifies sensory sensations (taste, touch, etc.), alters old understandings
of what people observe, and allows people to feel distant from
themselves. Some users experience self-insights and closer emotional attachment
to other persons. Generally the drug does not appear to act as an aphrodisiac,
but users report enhanced sexual experiences while under the
influence. In therapeutic doses, which may be lighter than those taken by
MDMA 255
recreational abusers, effects occur without hallucinations and without causing
apparent mental cloudiness while intoxicated. Before being banned by the U.S.
Drug Enforcement Administration (DEA), doses were given to encourage patients
to participate more freely in psychotherapy discussions—a usefulness
that still found advocates in the 1990s—and to facilitate understandings
among patients, understandings that helped reduce their problems. Underground
knowledge of psychiatric usage persists despite an absolute legal prohibition
against using the compound: Medical literature reports someone
illegally taking the drug for self-medication of posttraumatic stress disorder.
In the history of abused drugs, psychological benefits claimed by proponents
have often been deflated by scientific investigation. MDMA is no exception.
Psychological tests have compared polydrug users who have or have not
taken MDMA and also persons who have abstained from any illicit drug.
These tests find no difference among these groups in anger, anxiety, or mood.
Whatever feelings of peacefulness that recreational MDMA users experience
while intoxicated, those results do not seem to persist afterward. Indeed, experimenters
who gave these tests found the MDMA group to have more psychological
trouble than the nondrug group. In such findings a key question is
whether the drug caused psychic problems or whether problems caused the
drug use. Staff members at a Spanish hospital’s psychiatric service reviewed
a substantial amount of medical literature about MDMA users and observed
that the case reports did not sustain a conclusion that MDMA was the primary
cause of users’ psychiatric problems.
One significant exception exists in findings about MDMA’s limited value in
promoting personal insight and healthy integration with the world. That exception
comes with persons using the drug for spiritual purposes rather than
recreationally. Here the all-important influence of set and setting are demonstrated.
Spiritual users tune in to certain kinds of psychic effect promoted
by the drug and apparently are able to focus their attention so intensely that
they can disregard and be unaffected by psychological effects that trouble
recreational abusers. This situation appears to demonstrate a principle familiar
to historians of drug use, who find that a substance can be beneficial in a
particular cultural context and yet have catastrophic consequences when used
by someone who disregards that context. Any spiritual purpose for which
MDMA may be used will, of course, have no impact on the drug’s physical
actions, although persons who seldom use it may be spared various hazards
documented by scientists.
MDMA is legally classified as a hallucinogen, but it is pharmacologically
classified as an entactogen—a type of drug with both stimulant and hallucinogenic
qualities. MDMA is recreationally used more for its hallucinogenic actions
than for stimulant actions. It is an analog to MDA and related to MDEA,
amphetamine, methamphetamine, and mescaline. MDMA is described as
mellower than MDA, and some users experience MDMA as less potent than
mescaline. MDMA can alter perceptions of time and space and induce feelings
of peacefulness. Users typically understand that MDMA hallucinations (such
as floating in midair or seeing geometrical designs) are unreal; users normally
do not undergo a temporary psychosis in which the sensations are misperceived
as objective reality.
256 MDMA
After recreational use became publicized, MDMA was made a Schedule I
controlled substance. Despite that ban, during the 1990s MDMA was popular
at high-energy all-night rave dance parties, not only for psychic actions but
for enabling people to go without sleep, food, and drink while physically
exerting themselves. A person using MDMA in that way will likely feel complete
exhaustion when the drug experience ends. The compound reduces pain
and promotes talkativeness, factors that might be appealing at raves.
The Drug Abuse Warning Network (DAWN) tracks “mentions” of illicit
drugs in hospital emergency room cases. A “mention” means that examination
of a patient showed traces of a drug, not that the drug caused injury. DAWN
thereby helps track a drug’s popularity. In 1993 MDMA had 196 DAWN mentions;
in 1998 the total was 143,600. As the twenty-first century began, the
DEA reported 750,000 doses being consumed each week in just the New Jersey
and New York City areas.
Drawbacks. Scientific literature portrays MDMA as a drug of extremes, producing
pleasures and afflictions that either enrapture or kill users. Compared
to many other drugs, much more is known about MDMA’s hazards simply
because so many persons have used it and received medical aid when things
went badly. The volume of medical emergencies, however, is more than just
a statistical phenomenon caused by sheer numbers of users. Some drugs used
even more widely do not generate nearly as many medical complaints.
MDMA really is more dangerous than many other substances.
One problem in evaluating MDMA dangers, a problem openly acknowledged
by some scientists, is the challenge of confirming that a sick person
indeed ingested MDMA a month ago rather than a fake substitute. All sorts
of substances can produce effects similar to those of MDMA, which is why
illicit dealers can so easily sell fake merchandise. Nonetheless, researchers investigating
drug actions can often enough verify that MDMA is the actual
substance. The following information reflects the scientific consensus about
MDMA.
It has the physical and mental actions typical of amphetamine. A group of
persons who at one time or another used amphetamine, LSD, and MDMA
said they felt most pepped-up with amphetamine, least so with LSD, but had
the greatest euphoria and contentedness with MDMA. Another group comparing
amphetamine and MDMA reported MDMA to have fewer drawbacks.
The DEA considers the drug less addictive than cocaine or heroin.
The substance degrades thinking processes. In tests of alertness, memory,
learning, and intelligence a group of marijuana users performed as well as
nonusers of marijuana, while a group that had used both marijuana and
MDMA did worse. MDMA causes persistent and even permanent organic
changes in the brain. Grand mal brain seizures have been attributed to the
substance. Brain damage observed in MDMA users is consistent and is related
to how much drug has been used (size of dose and frequency with which the
drug is taken). Psychological tests verify that persons with such damage have
trouble remembering things that are seen and heard, although the brain damage
has not been proven to cause the memory difficulty. Whatever the precise
cause, in memory tests polydrug users who have taken MDMA do worse than
those who have never taken the compound. Evidence exists that MDMA reMDMA
257
duces attention span and interferes with reasoning. The drug produces brain
injury suspected of increasing someone’s impulsiveness. In tests comparing
polydrug users who have used MDMA with those who have not, MDMA
users show increased impulsiveness correlating with how much they have
used the drug. Interviews comparing polydrug users find the MDMA group
more prone to paranoia, to physical complaints lacking any apparent bodily
cause, to nervousness and unfriendliness, to phobias, and to obsessing on
various things. Panic disorder with agoraphobia (fear of open spaces) can
occur.
MDMA has various influences on blood. The drug is suspected of causing
anemia. Under the influence of MDMA, blood components may block vessels,
having the effect of tiny clots that can cause internal bleeding, evidenced by
purple spots on the skin. Blood clots in the brain and death of cerebral tissue
have been credited to MDMA. Autopsies have shown massive blood clotting
throughout organs, accompanied by skeletal muscle deterioration.
Many other hazards exist. MDMA increases body temperature, sometimes
enough to mimic heat stroke, and animal experiments indicate that temperatures
in surroundings or inside the body can affect the amount of brain damage
caused by MDMA. The drug boosts pulse rate. Initially a dose increases
blood pressure (sometimes enough to burst vessels in the brain), but later, as
the effects of a dose proceed, blood pressure falls below the user’s original
reading (a decline that can promote fainting). MDMA can create heart malfunction,
kidney failure, and liver disease. Liver cirrhosis and failure can result—
sometimes treatable, sometimes fatal. Cramps and muscle tics have been
observed, even including one case where Parkinson’s disease developed.
Cases are reported of MDMA causing pneumomediastinum, an ailment involving
severe breathing difficulty. The drug promotes nausea. Hazy eyesight
and a case of temporary double vision caused by MDMA have been reported.
Jaw clenching and grinding after taking the drug result in excessive tooth
wear; one study of teeth in MDMA users found enamel completely worn away
from some areas, an affliction seen far less often in people who did not use
the drug. MDMA can cause skin rash and pimples.
Gender difference in drug effect is possible. One survey of case reports
noted that men tended to use more MDMA than women did, and an experiment
found that at any given dose the drug seemed to harm verbal memory
more in men than in women. Another experiment showed male users having
more change in two measures of brain chemistry function than females did.
An experiment with rats showed males maintaining higher blood levels of the
drug than females did, while females experienced more increase in body temperature
than male rats did.
Abuse factors. In a survey of 100 American university students, two thirds
said that desirable actions declined and undesirable ones increased as MDMA
use continued; similar results came from a survey of 100 users in Australia,
and scientists studying the drug concur with those survey findings. As with
other potent stimulants, abusers are known to use MDMA in binges, taking
one dose after another before the previous ones wear off. Heavy MDMA users
have scored low in measures of harm avoidance, and MDMA use correlates
with unprotected male homosexual conduct. Such findings raise the question
258 MDMA
of cause and effect: Does MDMA promote reckless behavior, or are selfdestructive
users simply indifferent about all sorts of life hazards, of which
MDMA is only one?
Flashbacks are reported, with case reports mentioning time lengths ranging
from less than one minute to two hours.
Drug interactions. Taking MDMA together with the drug saquinavir (used
against human immunodeficiency virus [HIV] in AIDS [acquired immunodeficiency
syndrome]) may be dangerous; usage with the HIV/AIDS drug
ritonavir can be fatal. Untoward reaction with the antidepressant fluoxetine
(Prozac) is suspected, and reaction with the antidepressant phenelzine sulfate
(a monoamine oxidase inhibitor—MAOI) can produce excessive blood pressure,
heavy sweating, muscle tics, and rigidity. Such perils are quite possible
with any other MAOI. Keeping in mind the need to be cautious about extrapolating
animal experiments to humans, we can note that taking MDMA with
LSD (candyflipping) produces a multiplier effect intensifying MDMA actions
in rats. Chloral hydrate permits some MDMA action in rats while reducing
subsequent organic brain change. Also in rats MDMA boosts pain relief provided
by morphine. In male rats the malaria and heart drug quinidine can
increase MDMA’s tendency to raise body temperature. Alcohol allegedly reduces
some effects sought by MDMA users, but that belief has not received
general scientific sanction. Scientists have confirmed that alcohol increases
MDMA’s reduction of immune system function, which may increase risk of
infections. Physicians treating MDMA overdose find that water can worsen
dangerous effects, and these doctors have concluded that people should not
drink much liquid of any sort while using the drug (hard advice for sweaty
and overheated dancers).
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Scientists who studied what happened with 49 women who
used MDMA while pregnant were unable to reach any conclusions about influence
on fetal development. The researchers did conclude that the women’s
lifestyles routinely included assorted factors perilous to achieving healthy offspring—
tobacco smoking, consuming alcohol to excess, unwanted pregnancy.
A study of 136 women who used MDMA while pregnant noted an incidence
of birth defects much higher than normal (15.4% versus normal 2% or 3%),
but the usual confounding factors, such as polydrug abuse and unwanted
pregnancy, hindered conclusions about effect on fetal development. Rat experiments
confirm maternal brain damage but have not found brain damage
in offspring even though their behavior differs in some respects from rats
whose mothers receive no MDMA during pregnancy. An experiment with
chickens found no MDMA effect on measured aspects of embryo development.
Additional information. “Benzedrine,” “biphetamine,” “dexedrine,”
“iboga” (ibogaine), and “khat” are nicknames for MDMA, but none of those
substances is MDMA.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Downing, Joseph. “The Psychological and Physiological Effects of MDMA on Normal
Volunteers.” Journal of Psychoactive Drugs 18 (1986): 335–39.
MDMA 259
Gouzoulis-Mayfrank, E., et al. “Impaired Cognitive Performance in Drug Free Users
of Recreational Ecstasy (MDMA).” Journal of Neurology, Neurosurgery, and Psychiatry
68 (2000): 719–25.
Greer, G., and R. Tolbert. “Subjective Reports of the Effects of MDMA in a Clinical
Setting.” Journal of Psychoactive Drugs 18 (1986): 319–27.
McGuire, P. “Long Term Psychiatric and Cognitive Effects of MDMA Use.” Toxicology
Letters 112–13 (2000): 153–56.
Rochester, J.A., and J.T. Kirchner. “Ecstasy (3,4-Methylenedioxymethamphetamine):
History, Neurochemistry, and Toxicology.” Journal of the American Board of Family
Practice 12 (1999): 137–42.
Shulgin, A.T. “The Background and Chemistry of MDMA.” Journal of Psychoactive
Drugs 18 (1986): 291–304.
Vollenweider, F.X., et al. “Psychological and Cardiovascular Effects and Short-term
Sequelae of MDMA (“Ecstasy”) in MDMA-Naive Healthy Volunteers.” Neuropsychopharmacology
19 (1998): 241–51.
Meperidine
Pronunciation: me-PER-i-deen
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 57-42-1. (Hydrochloride form 50-
13-5)
Formal Names: Centralgin, Demer-Idine, Demerol, Dolantin, Dolosal, Mepergan,
Pethidine, Pethoid
Informal Names: Demmies
Type: Depressant (opioid class). See page 24
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule II (DEA no. 9230)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: B
Uses. This drug has been used since the 1930s for easing pain in many
conditions, including migraine headaches, surgery, gallbladder attack, sickle
cell anemia crisis, childbirth, and emergency treatment of injury on mountaineering
expeditions. The drug is also used to manage porphyria, a body
chemistry disorder that can make a person extremely sensitive to light and
that can include violent outbursts. The substance is used to bring persons out
of a PCP psychosis. Experimental usage of meperidine and dextroamphetamine
together has reduced symptoms of mental depression, but the test was
too brief to measure how long benefits might continue. Oral meperidine dosage
can partly numb a person’s mucous membranes, and the drug is used as
one element of general and local anesthesia. The substance has a calming
action but is not considered to be a sleep inducer at medical dosage levels.
Upon prolonged usage the calming action can be replaced by depression and
uneasiness. Depending on specifics of use, morphine is 6 to 10 times stronger
than meperidine.
Drawbacks. Meperidine can reduce blood pressure and can make a person
feel faint upon suddenly standing up. Itching, perspiration, muscle tremors,
nausea, and vomiting are other unwanted effects. Although constipation is a
classic unwanted action of opiates/opioids, meperidine may produce less than
morphine does. Meperidine can cause cardiac and breathing difficulty and has
been known to cause seizures, delirium, and hallucinations. The drug may
promote convulsions in persons who are already susceptible to such affliction.
Some tests show the drug to have slight influence on eye-hand coordination
and no effect on other voluntary physical movement. Tests oriented specifiMeperidine
261
cally toward driving skills, however, led researchers to conclude that people
should not operate a motor vehicle for 24 hours after an intramuscular injection
of meperidine. Anyone with enlarged prostate, urinary difficulty, Addison’s
disease, or underactive thyroid should be wary about using the drug.
An unusual case report tells of a patient developing Parkinson’s disease symptoms
from meperidine; more commonly such reports arise from contaminated
illicit substances related to meperidine. Another illicit peril occurs when persons
grind up and inject oral meperidine tablets; the talc in those tablets can
block tiny blood vessels throughout the body and also cause those vessels to
bleed—serious business in the eyes or brain. Illicit intramuscular injection of
the drug over a period of years can cause muscle damage. Injecting into an
artery can lead to gangrene.
Abuse factors. Meperidine tolerance occurs. Dependence may develop faster
than with morphine, but meperidine’s withdrawal syndrome may be briefer;
symptoms also tend to be more limited than with morphine, perhaps just
muscle spasms and unrest. When medical personnel are withdrawing addicts
from heroin, meperidine has enough cross-tolerance to control withdrawal
symptoms.
Drug interactions. Meperidine should be avoided by persons taking monoamine
oxidase inhibitors (MAOIs, found in some antidepressants). That combination
can be dangerous or even fatal. Alcohol and other depressants should
be used carefully with meperidine in order to avoid cumulative overdose.
Amphetamines boost pain relief provided by meperidine. The HIV/AIDS (human
immunodeficiency virus/acquired immunodeficiency syndrome) drug ritonavir
is believed to lengthen a meperidine dose, meaning that too much of
the opioid could build up in a person who is on a normal meperidine medication
schedule. Experiments with the ritonavir-meperidine combination,
however, have shown the risk to be less than expected. Air pressure affects a
meperidine dose; the higher the altitude, the longer a dose lasts. Phenobarbital,
the antipsychotic drug chlorpromazine (Thorazine), and the heartburnulcer
medicine cimetidine interfere with meperidine. Brewer’s yeast is said to
produce a bad reaction with meperidine, such as raising blood pressure so
high that a medical emergency occurs.
Cancer. One analysis of medical records in Great Britain found a statistical
association between receiving meperidine at birth and subsequent development
of childhood cancer. A statistical association, however, simply provides
guidance for future research and does not demonstrate cause and effect. Analysis
of a different and smaller set of records found no association.
Pregnancy. An experiment on pregnant mice produced no birth defects definitely
attributable to the drug, but meperidine has caused congenital malformations
in hamsters. Medical records from a few dozen women who used
meperidine during pregnancy revealed no congenital malformations attributable
to the substance. If a pregnant woman takes the drug, it will pass into
the fetus, where the substance tends to build up. Difficulties have not been
seen in infants from such women unless the drug has been administered during
childbirth. In those latter cases a respiratory emergency can occur in infants
who acquired the drug during birth, and less serious newborn behavioral
abnormalities are common. Rhesus monkeys who received fetal exposure at
262 Meperidine
time of birth were tested for perception and thinking ability. On one test they
did worse than monkeys who had no meperidine exposure, and on another
test they did better. In humans, meperidine enters the milk of nursing mothers,
but the level is low enough to be considered safe for the infant.
Additional information. An injectable format of the drug called Mepergan
is intended for deep intramuscular administration. Intravenous injection can
diminish breathing and stop the heart. Subcutaneous administration can cause
sores at the injection site and even kill patches of skin. The product ingredients
include sodium metabisulfite, to which some persons have a dangerous allergy.
Mepergan is to be used cautiously by asthmatics.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Clark, R.F., E.M. Wei, and P.O. Anderson. “Meperidine: Therapeutic Use and Toxicity.”
The Journal of Emergency Medicine 13 (1995): 797–802.
Henderson, M.E. “Central Nervous System Effects of Meperidine.” Hospital Pharmacy
20 (1985): 934.
Korttila, K., and M. Linnoila. “Psychomotor Skills Related to Driving after Intramuscular
Administration of Diazepam and Meperidine.” Anesthesiology 42 (1975):
685–91.
Miller, R.R., and H. Jick. “Clinical Effects of Meperidine in Hospitalized Medical Patients.”
Journal of Clinical Pharmacology 18 (1978): 180–89.
Zacny, J.P., et al. “Subjective, Behavioral and Physiological Responses to Intravenous
Meperidine in Healthy Volunteers.” Psychopharmacology 111 (1993): 306–14.
Mephobarbital
Pronunciation: mef-oh-BAR-bi-tal
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 115-38-8
Formal Names: Mebaral, Methylphenobarbital, Methylphenobarbitone
Type: Depressant (barbiturate class). See page 20
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule IV (DEA no. 2250)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: D
Uses. Mephobarbital has both sedative and anticonvulsant effects. Anticonvulsant
properties make the drug a standard treatment for epilepsy. When
used for that condition, stoppage of the drug must be handled carefully lest
a person start having a streak of seizures one after another (a potentially fatal
condition called status epilepticus). Sedative qualities make mephobarbital an
effective tranquilizer, with users feeling lighthearted and mellow without getting
very sleepy. Men metabolize the drug faster than women do, meaning a
dose will last longer in women. After ingestion the drug metabolizes into
phenobarbital, which seems to be a more potent sedative. Health care practitioners
sometimes administer those two drugs together.
Drawbacks. In an experiment comparing mephobarbital to phenobarbital in
epileptic children, parents reported fewer unwanted behavioral effects with
mephobarbital, and some pediatricians agree with that observation. The most
typical behavior problem in such children is hyperactivity. A formal test comparing
the two drugs, however, found no difference in either unwanted conduct
or therapeutic power.
Mephobarbital is to be avoided if a person has porphyria, a disease reflecting
a body chemistry disorder and in which a person may be harmed by
exposure to light. The drug should also be avoided if a person has a muscleweakening
disease called myasthenia gravis, or a thyroid deficiency causing
an affliction called myxedema.
Persons using this drug may need extra vitamin D, due to possible deficiency
that might be caused by faster metabolism of the vitamin.
Abuse factors. Not enough scientific information to report on tolerance, dependence,
withdrawal, and addiction.
Drug interactions. Taking mephobarbital with acetaminophen (Tylenol and
similar products) may promote liver injury. Mephobarbital can interfere with
264 Mephobarbital
effectiveness of birth control pills and with actions of medicines used to control
epilepsy and blood clotting. Drugs used to treat asthma, blood pressure,
and heart ailment may not work as well if a person also takes mephobarbital.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Additional vitamin K is recommended for pregnant women using
mephobarbital as childbirth approaches, in order to reduce bleeding in
the women and offspring. Mephobarbital can help reduce fetal pulse rate irregularity
but has been found to cause birth defects, with the risk malformations
increasing if other antiepileptic drugs are also used. The drug is found
in breast milk of nursing mothers who use the substance.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
De Haan, J., and L. Stolte. “Drugs and the Fetal Heart Rate.” British Medical Journal 4
(October 16, 1971): 171.
Willis, J., et al. “Barbiturate Anticonvulsants: A Neuropsychological and Quantitative
Electroencephalographic Study.” Journal of Child Neurology 12 (1997): 169–71.
Young, R.S., et al. “A Randomized, Double-Blind, Crossover Study of Phenobarbital
and Mephobarbital.” Journal of Child Neurology 1 (1986): 361–63.
Meprobamate
Pronunciation: meh-proh-BA-mait
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 57-53-4
Formal Names: Deprol, Equagesic, Equanil, Micrainin, Miltown, Stopayne, Tenavoid
Informal Names: Mother’s Little Helper
Type: Depressant. See page 19
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule IV (DEA no. 2820)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: D
Uses. This drug became available in the 1950s as an alternative to barbiturates.
It works as a sleep aid and muscle relaxant, the latter property perhaps
a result of the drug’s antianxiety property rather than a direct effect. Meprobamate’s
muscle relaxant action improved breathing in experimental treatment
of tetanus. A person’s appetite may get better with the drug, but again
as a result of anxiety reduction rather than direct appetite stimulation—an
agricultural experiment using meprobamate to encourage weight gain in
chickens was unsuccessful. The drug may lessen petit mal epilepsy seizures
but worsen grand mal seizures. Meprobamate has also been used against neuroses
and attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD), against a type of
muscular discomfort called myofascial pain, and as part of therapy treating
skin lesions brought on by worry. Meprobamate has helped improve stubborn
cases of gastrointestinal afflictions, which may have a component of stress.
An experiment showed that persons using the drug can fool a lie detector test.
Meprobamate became perhaps the most highly regarded tranquilizer in the
United States. In some research during that era of meprobamate’s popularity
the question was no longer whether the drug worked but how much better it
worked for some groups of people (married, widowed, overweight) than for
others. Nonetheless, meprobamate’s medical uses declined after benzodiazepine
class depressants became available. In retrospect skepticism arose about
whether meprobamate had ever been as beneficial as its reputation indicated.
Some experts decided that its muscle relaxant and antianxiety actions were
no stronger than those inherent to any sedative. One team of scientific investigators
concluded that in some circumstances patients’ therapeutic reactions
to meprobamate were “no worse than to placebo”—faint praise indeed. Trans266
Meprobamate
formation of the medical establishment’s attitude toward meprobamate is,
however, a social history study beyond the scope of this book.
Drawbacks. Meprobamate can cause euphoria and, even though it is a depressant,
can have stimulant actions in some circumstances—indeed, mania
has been known to occur after a dose. Unwanted actions include headache,
vision trouble, nausea, diarrhea, dizziness, slurred speech, burning or prickling
sensations, rashes or other skin outbreaks, severely reduced body temperature,
low blood pressure, accelerated heartbeat, fainting, and difficulty in
moving around. Users should avoid operating dangerous devices such as automobiles.
Tests have measured worsened learning ability, physical coordination,
and reaction time while a person is under meprobamate’s influence—
although such problems are not found with all tests designed to detect them.
During meprobamate’s medical popularity in the 1960s military tests explored
the drug’s influence on performance under stress. One test series simulated
aircraft pilot situations involving simultaneous tracking of locations in
two dimensions, monitoring changes in audio signals, and decoding messages—
while exposed to reduced oxygen levels simulating altitudes up to
17,000 feet. In another test series civilian experimenters adapted techniques
used by the Swedish air force in a task where persons had to push buttons,
pull levers, and press pedals in response to lights and sounds. Investigators
basically found that the drug acted as a distraction; people could perform
adequately when low levels of skill were required, but as more and more tasks
had to be accomplished at higher speeds, the drug interfered with performance.
Such a result was hardly surprising, although details may have been
relevant to military decision makers.
In mice the drug promotes amnesia. Experimenters gave the drug to rats
for 12 weeks and found it reduced the amount of DNA in brain cells. Meprobamate
may aggravate porphyria, a blood chemistry disorder that can make
people violent and sensitive to light. Although some persons use the drug for
years without untoward effect, case reports note uncommon instances where
the drug may have caused serious and sometimes fatal blood diseases such
as agranulocytosis and aplastic anemia.
One disquieting effect of meprobamate is its ability to produce flat brainwave
readings, which could cause medical personnel to cease vital treatment
in a mistaken belief that the patient has died.
Abuse factors. Meprobamate’s abuse potential has been described as similar
to benzodiazepine depressants. Dependence on meprobamate can develop if
excessive amounts are routinely used. Abuse of this drug is considered a particular
risk with addicts to alcohol or other drugs. Symptoms of withdrawal
from meprobamate have been likened to delirium tremens of alcohol withdrawal
and can include tremors and twitches, trouble in controlling movement,
insomnia, headache, vomiting, anxiety, confusion, and hallucinations.
Convulsions are possible but uncommon. On rare occasion death has been
attributed to withdrawal, but not all authorities agree that meprobamate is
the sole cause. For sure, however, dogs that are dependent on the substance
can go into convulsions and die if their supply is suddenly cut off.
Drug interactions. In mice nicotine reduces the time they are physically
uncoordinated after a meprobamate dose, just as we might expect when a
Meprobamate 267
stimulant (nicotine) is taken after a depressant. In contrast, injection of marijuana’s
main active component THC increases the power of a meprobamate
dose in animals. Meprobamate has been used in combination with dextroamphetamine
for human weight loss, a combination that had uncertain
effectiveness but that produced fewer unwanted actions than dextroamphetamine
alone. Alcohol and meprobamate each have similar unwanted effects,
and in that regard using both together can be the equivalent of taking extra
doses of one or the other. Among steady drinkers, however, blood levels of
meprobamate decline faster than in nondrinkers, meaning a meprobamate
dose lasts a shorter time in the drinkers. A mice study indicated that poisonous
effects of meprobamate worsen if either alcohol or phenobarbital is also
used. Phenobarbital and other barbiturates have cross-tolerance with meprobamate,
meaning that the barbiturates can substitute for meprobamate in at
least some respects.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Meprobamate administered into chicken eggs results in embryo
malformations, and skeletal deformity has been observed with fetal development
in rats exposed to the compound. The drug passes into a human fetus.
A study of over 50,000 pregnancies, including many women who used meprobamate,
found no evidence of birth defects linked to the drug, findings duplicated
by another analysis of outcomes in more than 6,000 pregnancies.
Nonetheless, meprobamate is suspected of causing birth defects. Indeed, in a
study of almost 20,000 pregnancies, birth defects were over twice as common
among women using meprobamate during early pregnancy than among
women who used other antianxiety drugs and more than four times as common
compared to women who took no drug at all in early pregnancy. One
study found that congenital heart lesions occurred more often if meprobamate
was used during pregnancy. Rats with fetal exposure to meprobamate show
learning difficulties, and tests of five-year-old children who had prenatal exposure
to the substance reveal impaired reasoning ability. The meprobamate
level in milk of nursing mothers has been measured as up to four times higher
than the level in their blood.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Carson, J. “Meprobamate Revisited.” New York State Journal of Pharmacy 2 (1989):
45–46.
Gomolin, I. “Meprobamate.” Clinical Toxicology 18 (1981): 757–60.
Greenblatt, D.J., and R.I. Shader. “Meprobamate: A Study of Irrational Drug Use.”
American Journal of Psychiatry 127 (1971): 1297–1303.
Logan, B.K., G.A. Case, and A.M. Gordon. “Carisoprodol, Meprobamate, and Driving
Impairment.” Journal of Forensic Sciences 45 (2000): 619–23.
McNair, D.M. “Antianxiety Drugs and Human Performance.” Archives of General Psychiatry
29 (1973): 611–17.
“Meprobamate.” Medical Letter on Drugs and Therapeutics 7 (1965): 36.
Mescaline
Pronunciation: MES-kuh-lin (also pronounced MES-kuh-leen)
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 54-04-6
Formal Names: 3, 4, 5-Trimethoxyphenethylamine
Informal Names: Beans, Big Chief, Blue Caps, Button, Cactus, Cactus Buttons,
Cactus Head, Chief, Love Trip (combination with MDMA), Mesc, Mescal, Mescalito,
Mescap, Mese, Mezc, Moon, Musk, Peyote, Topi
Type: Hallucinogen. See page 25
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule I (DEA no. 7381)
USA Availability: Illegal to possess
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. This is the main active drug in the peyote cactus. In addition to being
found in that natural product, mescaline can also be manufactured in a laboratory.
Researchers have noted that mescaline, LSD, and psilocybin have
similar actions even though the substances have significant chemical dissimilarities.
Effects are so alike that volunteers who took the drugs in experiments
could not tell which of the three they received. Studies indicate cross-tolerance
exists among the three. Mescaline is related to amphetamine.
Mescaline has been used to study mechanisms of schizophrenia, and at one
time the substance was used in experimental psychotherapy. The drug encouraged
self-examination in patients and helped them to see significance in
ordinary things they had barely noticed before. Such effects have also been
described by persons who took the drug simply to find out what it is like.
When mescaline was used as an experimental drug in psychotherapy, therapists
reported that the substance helped people recall repressed memories.
Debate existed, however, about whether the apparent memories were real and
whether the recollection experience turned out to have therapeutic benefit.
One experiment found that mescaline could help persons achieve creative answers
to work-related problems that had resisted resolution for months. Research
designed to measure whether the drug promotes creativity has found
that volunteers’ feelings of increased creativity were supported in general and
as a group by higher test scores on elements of creativity. “In general” and
“as a group” may be important qualifiers about the results, however.
Users have reported expansion of color perception, but a test designed to
detect such a phenomenon produced mixed results. A rabbit study found that
Mescaline 269
mescaline could relieve pain. In a human experiment mescaline promoted
growth hormone levels. In rats appetite may increase.
Drawbacks. Individuals with a personal or family history of serious mental
illness may be particularly vulnerable to lengthy psychosis from mescaline,
although a study of former and current users of mescaline, LSD, or psilocybin
found that they scored normally on psychological tests—with the exception
that persons who engaged in current hallucinogen use were more depressed
and nervous and prone to risk-taking.
Visual hallucinations during a mescaline dose are common; auditory ones
less so. Aside from visual hallucinations, users not only may have trouble
recognizing faces but may see startling transformations of their own faces in
a mirror, viewing the image as not only something apart from themselves but
as something ominous. People may feel like their bodies are changing in shape
and be unable to detect portions of their bodies. Perceptions of time and space
may also change. The drug intoxication typically begins with euphoria, but in
a laboratory setting, the euphoria often converts to nervousness and suspicion,
possibly ending in depression. Subjects have been known to say and do things
they did not want to but were unable to stop themselves. Persons under the
drug’s influence may be very open to suggestions, a state that could be exploited
by unscrupulous persons.
Research shows that the drug can cause headache, perspiration, hot or cold
sensations, feelings of prickling or burning, dizziness, cramps, nausea, and
vomiting accompanied by small increases in pulse rate and blood pressure. In
a sufficient dose mescaline can impair breathing, increase body temperature,
and lower pulse rate and blood pressure. Hearing may become so sensitive
that ordinary noises are painful. Other senses may have abnormal reactions
also.
Tests of reasoning and mental focus produce low scores while people use
the drug. Mescaline-related deaths are usually not caused by the chemical
itself but by things people did while their judgment was impaired. After rats
receive mescaline they appear to forget how to navigate a maze and also take
longer to solve problems (figuring out how to get past obstacles). The drug
promotes fighting among rats; one group of researchers described the aggression
as “robust.” Debate exists about whether the drug makes rats fiercer or
simply reduces inhibitions in stressful situations. Aggression and wild behavior
are not seen as consequences of the drug among human users, and in some
circumstances mescaline makes rats lethargic.
Dogs assume odd body stances after receiving the drug and act so lethargic
as to be almost insensible. Monkeys seem fascinated as they look at ordinary
objects, a reaction that may indicate visual hallucinations. Monkeys first act
excitable after dosage, then lethargic. Rats, dogs, and monkeys all exhibit repetitive
convulsivelike movements at high doses. In monkeys a fatal dose may
not kill them until three or four days have passed.
Abuse factors. A rat experiment found evidence of tolerance, but investigators
surmised that the rats might simply have been learning how to compensate
for drug effects on performance as the experiment continued. Rather
than dosage effectiveness declining, the effects may have been unchanging as
rats pushed through them by strength of will. Investigators running a rabbit
270 Mescaline
experiment reported tolerance. Evidence exists for tolerance in animals and
humans who receive the drug daily, but such tolerance dissipates quickly once
the drug is stopped; two or three days later a dose can produce the same level
of effects as before. Dependence does not seem to occur.
Drug interactions. Not enough scientific information to report.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. The drug will pass into the fetus of a pregnant monkey. In hamsters
mescaline has caused birth defects and delayed development of bone
structures, along with reducing the number of offspring in litters. Human birth
defects are suspected.
Additional information. “Mescal” is both a nickname for mescaline and the
name of an alcoholic beverage; they are different substances.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Adlaf, E.M., et al. “Nonmedical Drug Use among Adolescent Students: Highlights from
the 1999 Ontario Student Drug Use Survey.” CMAJ: Canadian Medical Association
Journal 162 (2000): 1677–80.
Hermle, L., et al. “Mescaline-Induced Psychopathological, Neuropsychological, and
Neurometabolic Effects in Normal Subjects: Experimental Psychosis as a Tool
for Psychiatric Research.” Biological Psychiatry 32 (1992): 976–91.
Hoch, P.H., J.P. Cattel, and H.H. Pennes. “Effects of Mescaline and Lysergic Acid (DLSD-
25).” American Journal of Psychiatry 108 (1952): 579–84.
Hollister, L.E., and A.M. Hartman. “Mescaline, Lysergic Acid Diethylamide and Psilocybin:
Comparison of Clinical Syndromes, Effects on Color Perception and
Biochemical Measures.” Comprehensive Psychiatry 3 (1962): 235–42.
Huxley, A. The Doors of Perception, and Heaven and Hell. New York: Harper and Row,
1963.
Kapadia, G.J., and M.B.E. Fayez. “Peyote Constituents: Chemistry, Biogenesis, and Biological
Effects.” Journal of Pharmaceutical Sciences 59 (1970): 1699–1727.
Unger, S.M. “Mescaline, LSD, Psilocybin and Personality Change.” Psychiatry: Journal
for the Study of Interpersonal Processes 26 (May 1963): 111–25.
Methadone
Pronunciation: METH-a-dohn (also pronounced METH-a-don)
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 76-99-3. (Hydrochloride form
1095-90-5)
Formal Names: Amidone, Dolophine, Eptadone, Heptanal, Ketalgin, Mephanon,
Methadose, Physeptone, Symoron, Tussol
Informal Names: Balloons, Breeze, Burdock, Buzz Bomb, Cartridges, Dollies,
Dolls, Done, Fixer, Fizzies, Juice, Juicer, Jungle Juice, Medecina, Meth-A-Done,
Mud, Phyamps, Pixie, Red Rock, Tootsie Roll, Wafers
Type: Depressant (opioid class). See page 24
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule II (DEA no. 9250)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: B
Uses. This drug was invented by Germany’s Nazi regime in 1941 as a substitute
for inadequate morphine supplies. Today methadone is best known as
a legal substitute for heroin. In addition to that use in addiction treatment
programs, methadone is given to adults and children as a pain reliever for
surgery, cancer, burns, and other conditions. The substance is used as a cough
suppressant and also has calming qualities. In racehorses the drug can promote
running ability and is banned from the sport. A human dose can last
for 24 hours, rather long for a drug of this type and class. For pain relief a
dose of methadone may be roughly 2.5 to 14.3 times stronger than morphine,
depending on how and why the drug is administered.
Drawbacks. Some persons experience euphoria from methadone. Unwanted
effects can include vitamin deficiency, constipation, sleepiness, breathing difficulty,
and low blood pressure. People may feel faint if they suddenly stand
up from a sitting or prone position. Nausea, vomiting, constipation, urinary
difficulty, sweating, lowered sex drive, and impaired sexual performance are
other well-known problems. Liver disease may allow dangerous buildup of
methadone levels from normal doses.
Abilities to operate dangerous machinery such as automobiles may be reduced.
Tests of persons undergoing methadone maintenance therapy indicate
they may be able to drive satisfactorily if they use no other drugs, but most
methadone maintenance patients also use other drugs that worsen driving
272 Methadone
performance and exhibit assorted types of personality problems that leak over
into driving habits.
In the 1970s methadone was suspected of causing memory trouble, but a
group of researchers who investigated the question found no such difficulties.
In 2000 a study reported significant memory problems in a group of methadone
maintenance recipients, but the same group also had confounding conditions
such as head injury and alcoholism that may have affected memory
test performance. Another 2000 study comparing methadone users to nonusers
concluded that life factors other than methadone were the best explanation
for differences in scores on thinking tests.
Abuse factors. Although methadone is sometimes described as blocking heroin’s
effects, the two drugs simply have cross-tolerance, meaning one of them
can substitute for the other in some ways. In addition, persons who find one
of the drugs pleasant will probably find the other one just as appealing. For
those reasons, heroin addicts can often be switched to methadone in order to
maintain their drug habit legally, but the switch does not cure their drug
addiction. Some heroin users even like methadone better; some methadone
recipients continue using heroin on the side. On the basis of death statistics,
some authorities feel methadone is more dangerous than heroin.
Addicts in methadone maintenance programs have chaotic lives. One study
of program participants found 7% were likely to be pathological gamblers;
another study of methadone program participants found 16% to be pathological
gamblers and an additional 15% to have a gambling problem. Researchers
have noted that violent traumas are more frequent among methadone program
participants than among the average population. In one survey 34% of
patients said they received treatment for mental disorder, 64% of the women
said they used psychoactive drugs during pregnancy, 80% of parents said they
were arrested while their children were growing up, and parents reported
that 30% of their children were suspended from school and 41% failed at least
one grade in school and had to take that year of education again. For methadone
maintenance patients and their families, drug abuse is simply one element
in multiproblem lifestyles.
A rhesus monkey experiment showed the animals having no preference
between water and a methadone solution. Such lack of interest is consistent
with human experience. Some persons find opiates or opioids attractive, but
most do not. Personality and life circumstances have much to do with such
choices.
Methadone’s calming qualities dissipate if tolerance occurs, so some other
antianxiety medicine must then be used. Methadone’s abstinence syndrome is
reminiscent of morphine’s but is generally described as more gradual in development
and disappearance, longer lasting but with symptoms of lesser
severity. Some research, however, has found no difference in morphine and
methadone withdrawal, and some addicts say withdrawal from methadone is
more difficult than withdrawal from heroin. Evidence suggests that methadone
withdrawal symptoms are harsher in nonblack infants than in blacks.
Drug interactions. Using other depressants (including alcohol) or tricyclic
antidepressants with methadone can increase the risk of a cumulative overdose—
each individual dose may be safe, but all together may be dangerous.
Methadone 273
Methadone should be used cautiously if a person is also taking monoamine
oxidase inhibitors (MAOIs, found in some antidepressants and other medicine).
Blood levels of methadone can be drastically altered by phenobarbital,
by the epilepsy medicines phenytoin and carbamazepine, and by the tuberculosis
medication rifampin. A case report notes that the HIV/AIDS (human
immunodeficiency virus/acquired immunodeficiency syndrome) drug ritonavir
reduces methadone blood levels, and methadone interacts with other
HIV/AIDS drugs as well. Taking doses of methadone along with the
psychiatric medicine fluvoxamine (Luvox) can be fatal. Depending on how a
person uses alcohol, that drug can raise or lower blood levels of methadone.
Data from one study showed that methadone did not decrease likelihood for
alcohol abuse and that persons already abusing alcohol drank even more
while on methadone. Other drug combinations common among illicit users
can be hazardous with methadone, and methadone alone can be dangerous if
a person who once had tolerance resumes usage at the old high-dose level.
Experiments have found that consumption and enjoyment of tobacco cigarettes
increase after volunteers use methadone, and another experiment found
that methadone consumption increases after volunteers use nicotine (in gum
or cigarettes).
Cancer. Chromosome damage is one measure of a drug’s potential for causing
cancer. A study of persons receiving methadone for 40 weeks found no
more chromosome damage than a nondrug population would have.
Pregnancy. Safety for use during pregnancy is unknown. Researchers who
gave various opioids to pregnant hamsters described methadone as one of the
most powerful inducers of birth defects. Mice research shows that offspring
are smaller than normal but have ordinary brain development. Compared to
morphine, much more of a maternal methadone dose reaches a fetus. One
group of investigators developed findings implying that methadone may
harm human fetal central nervous system development. Those discoveries are
consistent with research demonstrating abnormal development of neurons in
rats that had prenatal methadone exposure; researchers speculate that such
abnormalities may explain various behaviors in human infants who had prenatal
methadone exposure. Use of methadone for easing pain of childbirth is
not recommended because newborns can suffer breathing difficulty after picking
up the drug from the maternal blood supply. Infants from women who
use methadone chronically can be born with dependence to the drug.
A study compared pregnant women on methadone maintenance to a pregnant
group on morphine maintenance and discovered that the morphine
group used fewer benzodiazepine class drugs and fewer opiates than the
methadone program participants. Another study noted that pregnant addicts
in a methadone program received better prenatal care than addicts who were
not in such programs, but program participants typically continued illicit drug
use, their infants weighed no more than infants from pregnant addicts not in
a methadone program, and infants from both those drug groups (program
and nonprogram) weighed less than those of women who were not drug abusers.
Such results have led more than one group of researchers to ask whether
methadone maintenance helps pregnancy outcomes, but those researchers do
274 Methadone
not offer an answer. Nonetheless, some authorities report that pregnancy outcomes
are substantially better for addicts in methadone programs.
A group of clinical observations found that infants from mothers addicted
to heroin had better sucking ability than infants from methadone addicts (including
those in methadone maintenance programs). Research finds that
breast-feeding by methadone-using mothers does no harm to infants, and one
investigator concluded that methadone in the milk helps ease a dependent
child’s withdrawal symptoms. Investigators have found that infants with fetal
exposure to methadone eat more than normal but do not gain more weight
than normal, a finding that suggests defective ability to use nutrition from
food. A study of two-year-old children found that fetal exposure to methadone
had no influence on ability to focus attention. Examination of school-age children
who had fetal exposure to methadone found them to have normal scores
in thinking tests and somewhat lower IQs than normal and to be more nervous
and aggressive than typical children. How much of this is related to the drug
and how much is related to tumultuous family life is uncertain. Another
follow-up study found that girls had normal gender behavior, but boys had
more female characteristics in their conduct.
A study found pregnancy outcomes to be much the same among methadone
and cocaine users.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Darke, S., et al. “Cognitive Impairment among Methadone Maintenance Patients.” Addiction
95 (2000): 687–95.
De Cubas, M.M., and T. Field. “Children of Methadone-Dependent Women: Developmental
Outcomes.” American Journal of Orthopsychiatry 63 (1993): 266–76.
Fainsinger, R., T. Schoeller, and E. Bruera. “Methadone in the Management of Cancer
Pain: A Review.” Pain 52 (1993): 137–47.
Jarvis, M.A., and S.H. Schnoll. “Methadone Treatment during Pregnancy.” Journal of
Psychoactive Drugs 26 (1994): 155–61.
Martin, W.R., et al. “Methadone—A Reevaluation.” Archives of General Psychiatry 28
(1973): 286–95.
Rossler, H., et al. “Methadone-Substitution and Driving Ability.” Forensic Science International
62 (1993): 63–66.
Schneider, J.W., and S.L. Hans. “Effects of Prenatal Exposure to Opioids on Focused
Attention in Toddlers during Free Play.” Journal of Developmental and Behavioral
Pediatrics 17 (1996): 240–47.
Specka, M., et al. “Cognitive-Motor Performance of Methadone-Maintained Patients.”
European Addiction Research 6 (2000): 8–19.
Methamphetamine
Pronunciation: meth-am-FET-uh-meen
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 537-46-2
Formal Names: Anadrex, Desoxyn, Norodin, Pervertin, Stimulex
Informal Names: Bambita, Bathtub Crank, Batu, Blue Meth, Boo, Bump, Chalk,
Chicken Feed, Crank, Crink, Cris, Cristina, Cristy, Croak, Crossles, Crypto, Crystal,
Crystal Meth, Desocsins, Desogtion, Geep, Glass, Go-Fast, Granulated Orange,
Hanyak, Hironpon, Hiropon, Hot Ice, Ice, Jet Fuel, Kaksonjae, L.A. Glass,
L.A. Ice, Lemon Drop, Load of Laundry, Maui-Wowie, Meth, Methlies Quik,
Mexican Crack, Motorcycle Crack, Nazi Vitamins, Peanut Butter, Quartz Smokable,
Quill Cocaine, Red Devils, Redneck Cocaine, Schmiz, Scootie, Shabu Ice,
Sketch, Smoke, Soap Dope, Sparkle, Speed, Spoosh, Stove Top, Super Ice, Tick
Tick, Trash, Twisters, Water, Wet, White Cross, Working Man’s Cocaine, Yellow
Bam, Yellow Powder
Type: Stimulant (amphetamine class). See page 12
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule II (DEA no. 1105)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. Methamphetamine was first manufactured in 1919. This stimulant of
the central and sympathetic nervous systems is comparable to dextroamphetamine.
Psychic effects are the same as for any amphetamine class drug.
Methamphetamine is used to treat narcolepsy, attention deficit hyperactivity
disorder (ADHD), and adult obesity. Typically the drug is not recommended
for juvenile obesity. Although patients lose more weight than if they use a
placebo, the difference is only a few ounces per week. Researchers do not
know how the drug promotes weight loss. Scientists are even unsure if the
drug is responsible or if diet, coaching, attitude, and other factors explain the
difference. In general, the longer patients take the drug, the lower their rate
of weight loss. Standard practice is to stop the drug when weight benefits
decline, rather than increase dosage.
To achieve top performance during World War II, pilots of the German
Luftwaffe and the British Royal Air Force used methamphetamine. In 1953
Hermann Buhl was the first person to climb the mountain Nanga Parbat in
the Himalayas, and during that feat he used methamphetamine tablets. Some
observers wonder if that pharmaceutical aid was crucial. A person who
276 Methamphetamine
climbed Mt. Everest without using supplementary oxygen noted, “Because
mountaineering is, thank God, not an organized Olympic sport, there are no
regulations about the use of drugs, so the choice is up to the individual.”
When methamphetamine was tested on champion cyclist athletes, they could
not achieve a higher level of performance than normal, but they could extend
top performance far longer than normal, a feat made possible in part by the
drug’s apparent ability to mask the body’s normal signals of exhaustion. Researchers
speculate that the drug could cause athletes to overextend themselves,
collapse, and die. Another experiment found that the drug could
improve work performance, but performing a few tasks under controlled conditions
cannot be extrapolated to the whole world of real-life work.
The human body metabolizes assorted medical drugs into dextroamphetamine
and methamphetamine, so if a body fluid test is used to accuse someone
of unauthorized use, a blameless person should check whether any over-thecounter
or prescribed drugs might be the explanation.
Drawbacks. Measurements have found damage to brain neurons correlated
with amount of methamphetamine abuse, damage that does not seem to recover
upon cessation of drug dosage. Some of that damage may promote
Parkinson’s disease. Tests show normal scores for methamphetamine abusers
on some psychological perception tests, below normal scores on others. Animal
experiments confirm that methamphetamine can alter DNA molecules,
and some researchers ask whether these changes may invalidate DNA identifications
made by law enforcement authorities.
Methamphetamine raises blood pressure; the most catastrophic consequence
can be rupture of the aorta. The compound raises body temperature. Euphoria
and overdose symptoms are similar to those of cocaine but last longer. Methamphetamine
overdose can cause convulsions, heart attack, kidney failure,
and stroke. Stroke can occur days after overdosage. Temporary blindness has
developed. The drug can severely and permanently impair vision, apparently
by temporarily cutting blood flow to the optic nerve. Serious ulcers may develop
in the cornea. Although methamphetamine can slightly stimulate
breathing and help open lung airways, the substance can also produce temporary
emphysema. Animal experiments and human experience indicate that
concealed heart damage caused by the drug can repair itself if methamphetamine
administration ceases.
Methamphetamine’s smokable format is considered twice as strong as dextroamphetamine,
can produce pulmonary edema, and has been identified as
causing skin affliction. Smoking methamphetamine can narrow blood vessels,
which will increase blood pressure. Another suspected consequence of the
narrowing is acidosis found among methamphetamine users, a condition in
which levels of acid in blood rise high enough to make a person sick. Studies
of patients suffering from harm to bones and to skeletal muscles have found
possible association with methamphetamine. Ischemic colitis, a bowel problem
normally associated with old age, has been seen among young methamphetamine
users. The substance is also associated with duodenal ulcers and
malignant giant gastric ulcers. Inhaling the drug (as opposed to smoking, injecting,
or swallowing) promotes excessive wear on teeth.
Methamphetamine affects insulin needs of diabetics. Persons with the same
Methamphetamine 277
physical afflictions that make dextroamphetamine inadvisable should also
avoid methamphetamine.
Abuse factors. Experiments with intravenous injection of pure pharmaceutical
methamphetamine found that recipients did not experience the almost
instantaneous rush of effect that would normally be expected from such a
path of administration. Recipients instead began experiencing significant effects
hours later. A study of Japanese abusers receiving treatment for their
drug habit compared injectors to smokers. Injectors had less schooling and
more criminality and were more likely to have alcoholic parents. Such background
is typical in persons having a bad relationship with drugs. Contented
people rarely fall victim to drug abuse.
Methamphetamine flashbacks are possible. Someone who experienced a
threatening situation while undergoing frightening psychosis brought on by
methamphetamine can have a flashback when later confronted with a mildly
stressful situation. In one study of abusers methamphetamine was blamed for
long-term psychosis, in one case lasting 38 years after abuse stopped, but most
of those patients also had other troubles (broken homes, criminality) promoting
maladjustment.
Persons who abuse methamphetamine are typically disappointed with their
lives. The drug is sometimes blamed for causing “amotivational syndrome”
in which abusers lack much interest in life, but abusers typically have much
to be discouraged about regardless of drug use. One study of Japanese alcoholics
compared those who had also abused methamphetamine to those who
had not. The abusers were more afflicted with alcohol hallucinations, were
much less likely to live together with someone, and were twice as likely to
collect welfare and three times as likely to live in slums. (And about one fourth
of the abusers had tattoos versus none of the nonabusers—the researchers
called the variation “significant,” but that term was surely meant in its statistical
sense.) Another study of Japanese abusers found that only 5% came from
an upper income background, in contrast to 71% of marijuana users. Still another
study of Japanese abusers found that they ended their schooling early,
hung out with gangs or other groups, and experienced effects typical of amphetamine
class drugs (restlessness, irritability, low appetite, suspicion of
other persons). Some negative aspects seemed to depend on how much the
drug users perceived themselves as victims of society. Pepped-up feelings and
drug-induced happiness declined as methamphetamine abuse continued over
the years. One authority has noted that persons who get drunk on alcohol
every day are five times more prone to smoke methamphetamine than persons
who consume alcohol either moderately or not at all. This does not mean that
alcohol itself promotes methamphetamine use, but a person who is so miserable
as to get drunk daily will also be likely to seek additional ways to
obliterate perception of problems. One of those choices may be methamphetamine.
Compared to persons who don’t abuse methamphetamine, abusers are
known for more frequently engaging in risky sexual practices (no condoms,
partners with sexually transmitted diseases, multiple casual partners). Less is
known about whether such conduct is promoted by the drug or whether the
drug is simply one component of a life filled with risk-taking.
278 Methamphetamine
Methamphetamine abusers tend to get injured more often in accidents than
nonusers. That correlation, however, does not tell us whether the cause is the
drug or a reckless lifestyle that happens to include drug abuse—one study of
methamphetamine user deaths found that over 25% were murders. Types of
accidents experienced by methamphetamine users are similar to those suffered
by alcohol abusers, with road mishaps being most common. A study of violent
emergency room patients requiring “chemical restraint” (that is, involuntary
administration of a sedating drug) found that 72% were intoxicated with
methamphetamine, and many were also drunk on alcohol. Violent patients
requiring restraint are, of course, a small minority; those figures do not mean
that 72% of all patients were using methamphetamine. The figures do, however,
indicate that persons who lose control of themselves cannot handle methamphetamine
well, or alcohol either.
As for the drug’s popularity, a 1999 analysis found that deaths related to
methamphetamine in San Francisco had not particularly risen over a 13-year
period. In contrast, toxicology tests at a California hospital (not involving all
patients) showed 3% positive for either dextroamphetamine or methamphetamine
or both in 1978, 10% in 1986 and 1987. Another California hospital
found that 7.4% of trauma patients had been using the drug in 1989, 13.4% in
1994. As the drug promotes medical problems, we can expect evidence of
methamphetamine abuse to be higher in a hospital patient population (composed
of people seeking medical help) than in the general population. When
the twenty-first century began, about 2% of the general American population
was estimated to have used methamphetamine one or more times in their
lives, and the percentage of regular users would be lower than that. Patients
in medical cases examined in California, Taiwan, and Japan tend to be male,
perhaps indicating a gender preference in use of this drug. Evidence exists for
a gender difference in psychic reaction to the drug, with males feeling pepped
up and happy while under the influence and postmenopausal women feeling
tired and sad. The substance causes more brain changes in male mice than in
female.
Drug interactions. Methamphetamine can have serious interactions with anesthesia
and opioid drugs given in dentistry. Animal research indicates that
smoking tobacco cigarettes can create a multiplier effect in which the nicotine
and methamphetamine interact, boosting each other’s potency. Opiate addicts
receiving oral methadone report that injecting themselves with methamphetamine
produces a heroin-type high lasting a full 24 hours.
A hospital emergency room study found that persons admitted for the same
cause of injury had lower alcohol level in their blood if they had also been
taking methamphetamine. Combining the two drugs allows mice to tolerate
a higher methamphetamine dose than normal, but research on humans finds
just the opposite, that alcohol can transform a normal dose of methamphetamine
into a fatal one. Laboratory research on humans shows that using the
two drugs together adds strain on the heart, while reducing pleasure gained
from the alcohol and maintaining mental satisfaction from the methamphetamine.
An unusual report tells of that drug combination rupturing a bladder,
the alcohol helping to fill it up as the methamphetamine narrowed the bladder
Methamphetamine 279
neck while taking away the normal sensation of pain that would warn a person
to seek medical help.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Pregnant methamphetamine abusers tend to produce full-term
babies having characteristics of premature infants. While such a problem merits
attention, a California study of 563,573 women who gave birth in 1992
helped put a perspective on the situation: Only 774 used methamphetamine
during their pregnancies. Pooling results from seven California hospitals provided
still another perspective. Among one group of mothers in 1996 and
1997, 0.5% had positive drug tests for methamphetamine during pregnancy,
and those women typically used other drugs as well. And that percentage is
not from the total population of pregnant women but only from those whose
infants required assistance in breathing, a group where drug abuse was more
prevalent.
Animal studies involving many times the normal human medical dose have
produced birth defects. Confirming fetal harm from methamphetamine in humans
is difficult because of other drugs the women use (particularly alcohol),
nutrition, amount of prenatal care, and other factors that simultaneously affect
fetal development. Methamphetamine accumulates in the fetus where blood
level can be two and even six times higher than elsewhere in the woman’s
body. One study measuring pregnancy outcome where umbilical blood
showed misuse only of methamphetamine found the infants to be normal.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Anglin, M.D., et al. “History of the Methamphetamine Problem.” Journal of Psychoactive
Drugs 32 (2000): 137–41.
Beebe, D.K., and E. Walley. “Smokable Methamphetamine (‘Ice’): An Old Drug in a
Different Form.” American Family Physician 51 (1995): 449–53.
Boe, N.M., et al. “Methamphetamine Use during Pregnancy Increases the Risk of Adverse
Maternal and Neonatal Outcomes.” American Journal of Obstetrics and Gynecology
180 (January 1999, pt. 2): S71.
Lan, K.C., et al. “Clinical Manifestations and Prognostic Features of Acute Methamphetamine
Intoxication.” Journal of the Formosan Medical Association 97 (1998):
528–33.
Logan, B.K. “Methamphetamine and Driving Impairment.” Journal of Forensic Sciences
41 (1996): 457–64.
Mayfield, D.G. “Effects of Intravenous Methamphetamine.” International Journal of the
Addictions 8 (1973): 565–68.
Mendelson, J., et al. “Methamphetamine and Ethanol Interactions in Humans.” Clinical
Pharmacology and Therapeutics 57 (1995): 559–68.
Simon, S.L., et al. “Cognitive Impairment in Individuals Currently Using Methamphetamine.”
American Journal on Addictions 9 (2000): 222–31.
Methandriol
Pronunciation: meth-AN-dree-ol
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 521-10-8
Formal Names: Andris, Arbolic, Crestabolic, Drive, Durandrol, Filibol Forte, Geldabol,
Hybolin, Methylandrostendiol, Methylandrostenediol, Novandrol, Spectriol
Type: Anabolic steroid. See page 24
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule III (DEA no. 4000)
USA Availability: Prescription
Uses. Although the substance is banned from sports, some bodybuilders
and other athletes use it. A rat study found augmented muscle protein among
animals receiving the drug. Researchers have noted that chickens gain more
weight when getting methandriol. Other researchers, however, found no
weight alteration after giving the drug to mares daily for 18 months. The
compound has been tested as a treatment for excessive menstrual bleeding,
but results left investigators rather unimpressed.
Drawbacks. Methandriol can masculinize women’s body signs and behavior,
though to a lesser degree than many drugs of this type. Indeed, when
tested on horses, no change was seen in mares’ conduct. Nonetheless,
women’s voices can deepen, and facial hair can appear—effects that may be
permanent. Among bodybuilders there is a claim that the drug feminizes
men’s body signs and behavior. Boys and girls receiving the drug may undergo
premature sexual maturity and stop growing in height. Reduced fertility
may occur in men. Unwanted effects can include acne, hair loss, and tissue
swelling due to fluid retention. Researchers noted development of high blood
pressure in rats that steadily dosed on methandriol for several weeks. The
drug is not recommended for persons with high blood pressure, heart trouble,
or prostate disorder. Methandriol is suspected of causing liver damage.
Abuse factors. Not enough scientific information to report on tolerance, dependence,
withdrawal, or addiction.
Drug interactions. Not enough scientific information to report.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Pregnant women are supposed to avoid methandriol. Bisexual
fetal development in rats has been attributed to the drug. Other research has
Methandriol 281
noted that genetic females can have outward male appearance after fetal exposure.
The drug may interfere with milk production.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Rendina, G.M., and D. Patrono. “The Use of a Biological Preparation in the Treatment
of Some Gynaecological Diseases.” Current Medical Research and Opinion 4 (1976):
151–57.
Rogozkin, V. “Metabolic Effects of Anabolic Steroid on Skeletal Muscle.” Medicine and
Science in Sports 11 (1979): 160–63.
Turner, J.E., and C.H. Irvine. “Effect of Prolonged Administration of Anabolic and
Androgenic Steroids on Reproductive Function in the Mare.” Journal of Reproduction
and Fertility, no. 1 (1982, Suppl.): 213–18.
Methandrostenolone
Pronunciation: meth-an-droh-STEN-oh-lohn
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 72-63-9
Formal Names: Anabolin, Dianabol, Methandienone, Nerobol
Type: Anabolic steroid. See page 24
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule III (DEA no. 4000)
USA Availability: Prescription
Uses. Medical uses of methandrostenolone include promoting growth in
small boys, although with the risk of accelerating increase in height for awhile
and then stopping further increase permanently. The drug has also been used
to bring on male puberty when that development is delayed. A research study
found that the substance increases sexual desire in men while simultaneously
reducing their fertility. The drug has been given to control hereditary angioedema,
a disease producing giant hives on the skin. A lung disease called
silicosis has been treated with the drug, and so have burns, cancer, and a type
of anemia. Using the substance against a brittle bone condition called osteoporosis
has been tried, with mixed results. Protection against lead poisoning
was noted in a rat experiment. Levels of triglycerides, which are associated
with heart attack and stroke, declined in diabetic humans who received the
drug.
The substance is forbidden in sports competitions, but some athletes continue
to use it, either because they will not be tested for it or because they
hope to evade tests. Experiments have compared athletes using methandrostenolone
to others not receiving the drug (either two different groups of athletes
were compared, or the same volunteers were tested under both drug and
nondrug conditions). In one study the drug group showed higher increase in
weight and strength. In another experiment the drug group gained more
weight than the drug-free group, but the scientists noted that water retention
could have been the reason. Blood pressure also increased in the drug group.
In still another comparison experiment the methandrostenolone users gained
more weight and achieved more muscle development, but despite additional
muscle mass their strength and performance did not differ from the drug-free
group—scientists running those tests were unsure that anabolic steroid actions
explained physical development in the drug group; as with an experiment
mentioned above, a plausible alternative explanation was that methandrostenMethandrostenolone
283
olone simply caused fluid swelling in tissues. Yet one more experiment measured
increase in muscle mass among athletes using the substance but
detected no increase in strength.
Stock raisers administer methandrostenolone to promote sheep and cattle
growth.
Drawbacks. A case report warns that using the substance on girls can produce
male qualities in voice while reducing female sexual characteristics; these
changes can be long-lasting and perhaps permanent. Although a skin cream
containing nandrolone is used to combat eczema, the same use of a cream
containing methandrostenolone has had serious consequences when applied
to girls, causing some female physical characteristics to diminish while masculine
ones appeared.
A case report attributed a 28-year-old bodybuilder’s heart disease and hardening
of the arteries to a dozen years of using methandrostenolone and other
steroids. Another case report blamed methandrostenolone alone for blockage
of blood vessels between heart and lungs in a 26-year-old bodybuilder. Attempts
to treat the condition with the anti–blood clot drug warfarin became
complicated when the steroid boosted that drug’s actions.
When taking methandrostenolone daily, a person experienced delusions
and paranoia. Excessive self-confidence created by the drug inspired one user
to buy a $17,000 automobile on credit despite his inability to make payments.
After going off methandrostenolone the person sold the car, but upon resuming
the drug, he purchased a $20,000 vehicle. Medical literature also records
that a 22-year-old athlete using methandrostenolone and stanozolol developed
feelings of powerfulness and aggression, accompanied by impatience.
Methandrostenolone apparently causes acne and is suspected of worsening
tics in Tourette’s syndrome. Men may experience urinary difficulty and lowered
testosterone levels. The substance can bring on an attack of porphyria in
persons who suffer from that body chemistry disease, an affliction that sometimes
involves violence and sensitivity to light.
Abuse factors. An opiatelike dependence was reported in a 23-year-old
bodybuilder who had been on a steady regimen including methandrostenolone,
oxymetholone, and oxandrolone. When given a drug that counteracts
opiate actions he quickly exhibited nausea, chills, dizziness, and headache—
classic flulike opiate withdrawal symptoms. When his supply of steroids
ceased he craved them and felt weary and depressed. Another case report
notes a bodybuilder who dosed extensively on methandrostenolone and other
steroids and experienced severe depression when he stopped.
Drug interactions. Not enough scientific information to report.
Cancer. Researchers examining reported deaths from a type of liver cancer
called hepatic angiosarcoma found a total of 168 throughout the United States
from 1964 to 1974, of which the investigators associated 1 with methandrostenolone
(this individual was also a former alcohol abuser, conduct that is notoriously
hard on the liver). Methandrostenolone and other steroids are
suspected of causing kidney cancer in a 38-year-old bodybuilder.
Pregnancy. Mice studies indicate that the drug can produce lethal mutations
in sperm, causing pregnancy failure.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
284 Methandrostenolone
Freed, D.L.J., et al. “Anabolic Steriods in Athletics: Crossover Double-Blind Trial on
Weightlifters.” British Medical Journal 2 (1975): 47–73.
Hervey, G.R., et al. “Anabolic Effects of Methandienone in Men Undergoing Athletic
Training.” Lancet 2 (1976): 699–702.
Holma, P.K. “Effects of an Anabolic Steroid (Metandienone) on Spermatogenesis.” Contraception
15 (1977): 151–62.
Johnson, L.C., and J.P. O’Shea. “Anabolic Steroid: Effects on Strength Development.”
Science 164 (1969): 957–59.
Kilshaw, B.H., et al. “Effects of Large Doses of the Anabolic Steroid, Methandrostenolone,
on an Athlete.” Clinical Endocrinology 4 (1975): 537–41.
Madea, B., and W. Grellner. “Long Term Cardiovascular Effects of Anabolic Steroids.”
Lancet 352 (1998): 33.
Robinson, R.J., and S. White. “Misuse of Anabolic Drugs.” British Medical Journal 306
(1993): 61.
Methaqualone
Pronunciation: meth-a-KWAY-lohn
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 72-44-6
Formal Names: Dormutil, Hyminal, Mandrax, Melsed, Melsedin, Mequelone, Mequin,
Methadorm, Mozambin, Optimil, Parest, Quaalude, Revonal, Somnafac,
Sopor, Toquilone Compositum, Triador, Tuazole
Informal Names: Bandits, Beiruts, Blou Bulle, Blue Bulls, Drunken Monkey, Ewings,
Flamingos, Flowers, Four Strokes, Genuines, Germans, Golfsticks, Humbles,
Knoppies, Lizards, Loss of Memory, Love Drug, Ludes, Luds, Lula,
Magwheels, Mandies, Mind Benders (with heroin), Pressouts, Pupumala, Q,
Randy Mandies, 714, Shiny Tops, Sopes, Sporos, Strawberries, Wagon Wheels,
White Pipe (Mandrax and marijuana)
Type: Depressant. See page 19
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule I (DEA no. 2565)
USA Availability: Illegal to possess
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. Methaqualone was invented in India during the 1950s as part of a
program seeking substances for treating malaria. Experiments suggest methaqualone
has anticonvulsant properties. Although the substance does little to
relieve pain, experimentation indicates it might boost pain relief provided by
codeine. Methaqualone may have cough suppression qualities but has not
received general medical usage for that purpose. When introduced into American
medicine in the 1960s, the compound was used to calm people and help
them sleep and was welcomed as an alternative to barbiturates. The drug’s
actions have been likened to those of pentobarbital.
A clinical experiment found that a bedtime dose of the drug did not affect
users’ ability to move around after awakening the next morning, which is not
always the case with insomnia medicine. Those results were supported by
another experiment where volunteers did so well on tests the next day and
the following day that the researchers optimistically speculated that job performance
might improve among people using the drug against insomnia. Britain’s
Royal Air Force even thought the drug had potential to help pilots get
proper rest on long missions.
Drawbacks. Unwanted actions of methaqualone may include tingling sensations
in hands and feet, weariness, sweating, rashes, dry mouth, nausea,
286 Methaqualone
vomiting, and diarrhea. Instances are known of methaqualone causing people
to act as if injury has occurred to nerves affecting the arms and legs. Poisoning
by methaqualone is associated with bleeding, and a case report revealed that
an overdose can even cause bleeding inside the eye. Research with rats
showed the drug impeded learning ability.
Although fatal overdose with methaqualone or any other drug is possible,
a 1983 study found that methaqualone users in that era were primarily dying
from accidents involving poor decisions while under the drug’s influence
rather than from the poisonous effects of the drug itself. Also, if someone is
intoxicated with the compound, driving skills are known to be impaired, an
effect that does not involve poisoning but can have serious consequences. A
study of emergency room admissions found that methaqualone poisoning
cases typically involved some other substance as well, a finding indicating a
certain recklessness among abusers. The same polydrug habit was observed
among methaqualone abusers in the U.S. Army during the 1970s. That finding
is unsurprising; most drug abusers use more than one substance.
The drug is fast acting, and persons unprepared for the speed with which
methaqualone takes effect have been injured while engaged in ordinary activity
that becomes dangerous if a person passes out, such as taking a bath or
being near a fire. Methaqualone has the disturbing capability of causing flat
brainwave readings, a standard sign that medical caregivers rely upon to verify
a person’s death and that could therefore cause them to stop efforts that
are keeping the methaqualone patient alive.
Abuse factors. In Europe methaqualone was initially a nonprescription item.
In the United States the drug was first put in Schedule V, but as methaqualone
became popular among illicit users seeking euphoria and relaxation, more
restrictions were placed on its legal accessibility. The drug became a Schedule
II substance in 1973. When President Jimmy Carter’s drug policy adviser Dr.
Peter Bourne wrote a methaqualone prescription that violated regulations, that
incident started a series of events that hounded Bourne out of office. Eventually
concern about the drug grew so high that it was reclassified in 1984 as
a Schedule I substance having no recognized medical function.
One study found that patients using methaqualone against insomnia readily
changed to some other drug on advice from a medical practitioner; apparently
they did not find methaqualone particularly attractive. Tolerance and dependence
can develop, although one study was able to confirm tolerance only
among heavy abusers. Withdrawal symptoms are similar to those with barbiturates
and can include weakness, nausea, vomiting, heartbeat abnormality,
tremors, seizures, and delirium tremens.
In the 1970s researchers surveyed college students who were using methaqualone,
a broader population group than persons who have so much trouble
with the drug that they seek medical treatment. Survey answers showed drug
use to be the main difference between students who used methaqualone and
those who did not; as a whole the methaqualone users were ordinary people.
Investigators found that a cross section of Midwestern users had positive attitudes
about themselves.
An exception to such a self-portrait emerged when someone interviewed
users who claimed to be using methaqualone as an aphrodisiac. They turned
Methaqualone 287
out to be loners with a cold family background: Fully 10% said their closest
family relationship was with the dog; 30% said they weren’t close to any
family member at all. Almost all the persons using methaqualone as an “aphrodisiac”
had previously been using other drugs for the same purpose. None
of the persons seemed capable of intimacy while sober, and all used methaqualone
and other substances simply to get intoxicated enough to permit some
form of temporary superficial imitation of intimacy. Such drug use has an air
of desperation and sadness inconsistent with the normal understanding of
what an aphrodisiac does.
One study found that emergency psychiatric hospital patients who abused
methaqualone (definitely not a population of ordinary individuals) tended to
menace other persons.
Drug interactions. Animal research shows that injection of THC, the main
active component of marijuana, reduces the amount of methaqualone that is
normally needed to get the drug’s effects, which can make an overdose more
likely. Animal and human studies using alcohol have had the same effect on
a methaqualone dose—such findings are supported by examination of hospital
emergency room cases, where analysis showed that methaqualone emergencies
typically involved simultaneous ingestion of alcohol. Using alcohol and
methaqualone simultaneously is a practice called “luding out.” Indulgers in
that technique say it makes them feel relaxed, interferes with their ability to
move, makes them more tolerant of pain, and produces tingling in their fingers,
lips, and tongue.
Tests can detect methaqualone in the body days after a dose, and alcohol
lengthens the time that a methaqualone dose lasts. That combination can influence
performance on various behavior and performance tests even three
days after methaqualone is taken.
A woman’s menstrual cycle can affect her body’s ability to metabolize methaqualone;
a dose can last a much shorter time when she is ovulating, but oral
contraceptives can eliminate that effect.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. The drug has produced birth defects in rats, and offspring had
a death rate four times higher than that of a matched group receiving no drug.
Researchers doing that work cautioned that the results do not necessarily carry
over to humans. In rabbit studies the rate of birth defects from pregnant females
receiving methaqualone did not significantly differ from drug-free females,
but there was a big difference in death rates of offspring. Rabbits with
fetal exposure to methaqualone died three times as often as those without
exposure, a 6% death rate for those with exposure and 2% for those without.
Analysts of such experiments note that in order to harm a fetus the methaqualone
dose has to be high enough to poison the pregnant female, so the
practical meaning of such results may be that normal doses of the drug are
safe during pregnancy. Effects on human fetal development are unclear. Human
reports tend to involve combinations with other drugs, making it hard
to determine methaqualone’s role. Given the uncertainties, pregnant women
are advised to avoid the drug.
Combination products. Mandrax and Toquilone Compositum contain both
methaqualone and the antihistamine diphenhydramine. Some research indi288
Methaqualone
cates that diphenhydramine boosts the actions of methaqualone; some research
indicates that the antihistamine lengthens the time that a methaqualone
dose lasts. Adverse reactions have occurred when persons take the combination
along with tricyclic antidepressants.
Additional information. Methaqualone and diazepam each have the nickname
“Ludes,” but the drugs are different substances.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Bailey, D.N. “Methaqualone Ingestion: Evaluation of Present Status.” Journal of Analytical
Toxicology 5 (1981): 279–82.
Brown, S.S., and S. Goenechea. “Methaqualone: Metabolic Kinetic and Clinical Pharmacologic
Observations.” Clinical Pharmacology and Therapeutics 14 (1973):
314–24.
“Evaluation of a Sedative-Hypnotic Agent; Methaqualone (Quaalude).” Journal of the
American Medical Association 199 (1967): 749.
Falco, M. “Methaqualone Misuse: Foreign Experience and United States Drug Control
Policy.” International Journal of the Addictions 11 (1976): 597–610.
Gerald, M.C., and P.M. Schwirian. “Nonmedical Use of Methaqualone.” Archives of
General Psychiatry 28 (1973): 627–31.
Ostrenga, J.A. “Methaqualone—A Dr. Jekyll and Mr. Hyde?” Clinical Toxicology 6
(1973): 607–9.
Perry, C.D., et al. “The South African Community Epidemiology Network on Drug
Use (SACENDU): Description, Findings (1997–99) and Policy Implications.” Addiction
97 (2002): 969–76.
Roden, S., P. Harvey, and M. Mitchard. “Influence of Alcohol on the Persistent Effects
on Human Performance of the Hypnotics Mandrax and Nitrazepam.” International
Journal of Clinical Pharmacology, Therapy and Toxicology 15 (1977): 350–55.
Wetli, C.V. “Changing Patterns of Methaqualone Abuse. A Survey of 246 Fatalities.”
Journal of the American Medical Association 249 (1983): 621–26.
Methcathinone
Pronunciation: meth-KATH-i-nun
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 5650-44-2
Formal Names: Ephedrone, Methylcathinone
Informal Names: Bathtub Speed, C, Cadillac Express, Cat, Crank, Gager, Gagger,
Go Fast, Goob, Jeff, Khat, Qat, Quicksilver, Slick Superspeed, Somali Tea, Star,
Stat, Tweak, Tweek, Tweeker, Wild Cat (with cocaine), Wonder Star
Type: Stimulant (amphetamine class). See page 12
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule I (DEA no. 1237)
USA Availability: Illegal to possess
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. The substance is derived from cathinone (the most potent drug ingredient
in khat) and is related to methamphetamine. A U.S. patent was
granted for methcathinone in 1957, but because of adverse actions described
below the drug never went into commercial medical production.
Despite methcathinone’s many drawbacks noted below, some drug abusers
have found appealing aspects in the compound. These users experience euphoria
accompanied by strong and prolonged feelings of sexual pleasure,
along with an ability to use more alcohol than normal. Such characteristics
can transform an otherwise unappealing substance into a party drug. Apparently
these characteristics were discovered in the Soviet Union; at least that is
where the drug first surfaced as a popular item, accounting for perhaps one
fifth of illicit drug use in that territory during the late 1980s and early 1990s.
In the 1990s the drug took hold in Michigan and spread elsewhere in America.
Drawbacks. At high doses the drug exhibits classic amphetamine effects:
appetite loss, insomnia, hallucinations, paranoia, restlessness, and impaired
ability to focus attention and to get along with people. Users have said methcathinone
is more prone to produce paranoia than methamphetamine. In
animal experiments methcathinone interferes with breathing, promotes trembling
and epilepticlike seizures, and impedes limb control. In humans a dose
may increase body temperature, cause irregular heart rate, excessively reduce
blood pressure, bring on nosebleeds, produce red and blue spots in extremities
accompanied by cold sweating, promote tics and cramps along with nausea
and headaches, generate evidence of liver and kidney damage, and cause in290
Methcathinone
fected facial cysts that can leave scars. Heart impairment has been discovered
among current users. Examination of former users reveals brain damage that
may lead to Parkinson’s disease. Autopsies find widespread blood vessel damage
throughout the body, from skin to vital organs.
Abuse factors. When effects from a dose ebb, the drug’s initial elevation of
mood converts into the opposite, and abusers lacking in self-confidence may
rely more and more on additional doses of the drug to restore a positive mood
instead of seeking to build and rely upon inner resources. As mental spirits
level off or decline, abusers respond with binge behavior—rather than gradually
increasing their dosage, they alternate between heavy use and no use.
They may take the drug every hour or so for days even though users report
that effects of a dose can last for almost a week.
A group of 19 users compared methcathinone with other drugs. Those persons
described methcathinone’s stimulation as more of a physical jolt and
cocaine’s as more of a mental jolt. None of cocaine’s physical numbing was
noticed with methcathinone. The latter drug was described as stronger,
cheaper (at least in the 1990s), and having better duration than cocaine. The
19 persons all misused methcathinone in ways that added turmoil to their
lives and said their need for the drug was psychological, not physical. The
users mostly said the drug had ruined their lives. Those lives seemed troubled
before methcathinone entered, however. Only 4 of the persons were employed
when they started using the substance. Relationships with family and friends
declined, but that decline was accelerated by explosive anger and by deliberately
avoiding friends and relatives. The employed persons got into conflicts
with coworkers or stayed away from the workplace. All lost their jobs. No
doubt the drug made things worse, but abusers seemed to be struggling with
sad lives before adding methcathinone to other drugs they abused.
Drug interactions. Users claim that eating sugar can worsen methcathinone’s
undesirable psychological effects.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Not enough scientific information to report.
Additional information. “Qat” and “Somali tea” are nicknames for both
methcathinone and khat, but those are different substances.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Calkins, R.F., G.B. Aktan, and K.L. Hussain. “Methcathinone: The Next Illicit Stimulant
Epidemic?” Journal of Psychoactive Drugs 27 (1995): 277–85.
Emerson, T.S., and J.E. Cisek. “Methcathinone: A Russian Designer Amphetamine Infiltrates
the Rural Midwest.” Annals of Emergency Medicine 22 (1993): 1897–903.
Goldstone, M.S. “ ‘Cat’: Methcathinone—A New Drug of Abuse.” Journal of the American
Medical Association 269 (1993): 2508.
Zhingel, K.Y., et al. “Ephedrone: 2-Methylamino-1-Phenylpropan-1-One (Jeff).” Journal
of Forensic Sciences 36 (1991): 915–20.
Methylphenidate
Pronunciation: meth-ill-FEN-i-dait
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 113-45-1. (Hydrochloride form
298-59-9)
Formal Names: Concerta, Metadate CD, Metadate ER, Methylin, Ritalin
Informal Names: Pellets, Rities, West Coast. Combination with pentazocine:
Crackers, 1s & 1s, Poor Man’s Heroin, Ritz & Ts, Sets, Ts & Rits, Ts & Rs.
Combination with heroin: Speedball
Type: Stimulant (amphetamine class). See page 12
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule II (DEA no. 1724)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. Methylphenidate became available in the 1940s. The drug is fast acting
and long lasting. Although not a true amphetamine, methylphenidate has
properties similar to dextroamphetamine (including appetite suppression and
sleep disruption) but is less potent.
Methylphenidate’s prime medical use is for managing attention deficit hyperactivity
disorder (ADHD), a condition in which people are so excitable that
they have severe problems with social interactions. The affliction is more common
in children than adults, and methylphenidate seems more effective
against ADHD in children, though one study finds the drug to have little
influence on long-term outcome. Limited success is seen in experimental usage
of the drug to help autistic children. A case report says a regimen of that drug
and the antidepressant sertraline (Zoloft) cured a young kleptomaniac. Among
adults methylphenidate is typically prescribed for narcolepsy and has also
been used successfully against apathy and depression. Despite the drug’s occasional
tendency to increase blood pressure, studies find the substance promising
for rehabilitation of persons recovering from stroke and other brain
injuries, not only improving mood but also helping ability to move.
In volume of use, methylphenidate has been called the predominant medically
prescribed psychoactive drug among American juveniles. A survey of
approximately 200,000 prescription records of preschool children found about
1% of them to be receiving stimulants in the 1990s, and almost all those prescriptions
were for methylphenidate. By the decade’s end, two medical authorities
put the school-age population’s stimulant prescription figure as high
292 Methylphenidate
as 6%. In the mid-1990s approximately 1.5 million American school-age children
were taking stimulant medications just for ADHD, compared to 50 children
receiving methylphenidate for any purpose in Great Britain in 1991.
Another comparison: A 1999 report said 1.65% of students in one South African
urban area were receiving methylphenidate, but none of these children
were Afrikaans. Such dramatic differences in prescribing practices suggest
strong cultural influence on what is considered acceptable medical treatment.
During the mid-1980s great debate arose in the United States about the custom
of routinely prescribing methylphenidate to juveniles. The debate was based
on ethical values rather than strictly medical concerns, with some persons
arguing that the drug was being used as an agent of social control instead of
treating disease. After a flurry of lawsuits, the controversy eased.
A review of 23 studies evaluating ADHD drug effectiveness found little
distinction among methylphenidate, dextroamphetamine, and pemoline.
Drawbacks. Children with ADHD may also experience muscle tics, which
methylphenidate and other stimulants can worsen. Such a dual condition is
challenging, but in short-term usage, methylphenidate has been found effective
for lessening ADHD without increasing tics, even though one study found
that almost 10% of ADHD children may develop temporary tics when taking
methylphenidate. A case report notes that a child began stuttering when dosage
started, with the stutter ceasing when dosage ceased.
Amphetamine class drugs can promote psychosis and other psychiatric disability,
and such unwanted results have been observed with methylphenidate,
including paranoia and hallucinations. In youngsters methylphenidate has
been known to bring on obsessive-compulsive behavior.
Among juveniles the compound has caused skin rash, stomach distress,
mild headaches, and sleep difficulties. In juveniles the compound can at least
temporarily reduce appetite, although in elderly users the drug has been observed
to increase appetite. Controversy exists about whether the drug affects
growth. The substance is associated with stroke suffered by two boys.
Methylphenidate is not recommended for persons suffering from seizures.
The drug has been reported to cause anemia and is suspected of worsening
allergies. The substance has been known to impair vision and is not recommended
for persons with glaucoma. Methylphenidate tends to increase immune
system activity; in theory that might affect vaccinations and also harm
HIV (human immunodeficiency virus)-positive persons. In some humans abnormal
liver activity has been seen, but whether the drug caused or revealed
the problem is uncertain. The drug appears to cause heart damage in rats and
mice, and a human case has been reported.
Despite potential drawbacks, however, with proper precautions the drug is
considered generally safe for medical utilization.
Abuse factors. In primates cocaine and methylphenidate seem to work in
similar ways; indeed, some illicit substance users have been unable to tell
whether they received a dose of cocaine or methylphenidate. Although methylphenidate
is a Schedule II substance, abuse of the drug is uncommon. Demand
is small enough that the U.S. Drug Enforcement Administration reports
no illicit manufacturing. A large review of scientific literature covering the
years 1966 to 1998 was unable to substantiate news media claims about wide
Methylphenidate 293
abuse. A survey of 161 children receiving the medication found none who
believed they were at risk of becoming abusers (a belief sustained by general
experience nationwide), although about 25 had encountered situations where
someone wanted access to their drug supply. The oral format has little ability
to produce euphoria. The drug has been called a more potent hallucinogen
than LSD, but support for that claim seems nonexistent in scientific journals.
Adults suffering from ADHD are routinely found to be cocaine abusers. An
experiment showed methylphenidate effective for improving both problems,
but the treatment was also accompanied by several weeks of individual counseling,
which in itself might have been a major factor in any improvement.
Some drug abuse treatments seek to switch abusers from one drug to another.
Results of an experiment were unencouraging for shifting cocaine abusers to
methylphenidate but had intriguing findings nonetheless. For example, cocaine
addicts are generally considered particularly susceptible to addictive
properties in other drugs, but methylphenidate had little appeal to subjects in
this experiment. The experiment also found mental effects of methylphenidate
to include irritability, worry, sadness, and a general mood of dissatisfaction.
Physical effects included quivering and accelerated pulse rate. Still, even
though these cocaine users found methylphenidate unappealing, methylphenidate
is not recommended for any medical treatment in persons with a history
of substance abuse.
Experimenters using methylphenidate to help smokers give up tobacco
found the results encouraging.
Methylphenidate abusers sometimes grind up oral tablets and inject the
material. A preparation designed to go through the digestive system can have
untoward consequences in the circulatory system. The talc in oral methylphenidate
can lodge in small blood vessels, cutting off blood flow to portions
of the lungs, eyes, or brain. Respiratory difficulty, vision damage, and crippling
paralysis can result. Studies of such injuries sometimes refer to autopsy
results; such reference implies that this type of drug abuse is dangerous indeed.
Tolerance has been noted from illicit usage. Intense depression can emerge
when an abuser stops using the drug.
Drug interactions. Apparently methylphenidate interacts with valproic acid,
a substance used to treat epilepsy in ADHD children; the interaction can cause
teeth grinding and interfere with body movement. Interaction with serotonin
reuptake inhibitors found in some antidepressants is suspected of causing
heartbeat irregularity in a teenager, and methylphenidate is not recommended
for persons taking monoamine oxidase inhibitors (MAOIs, found in some
antidepressants). High blood pressure can occur if tricyclic antidepressants are
used with methylphenidate, and methylphenidate also seems to reduce time
needed for tricyclic antidepressants to show results; lower doses of those
drugs are advised when a person is taking methylphenidate. Interactions with
phenobarbital have been observed. Methylphenidate has allowed terminal
cancer patients to tolerate higher doses of opiates, thereby improving pain
management.
Cancer. Scientists looking for evidence that methylphenidate causes cancer
in rats and humans have instead found lower-than-normal incidence of the
294 Methylphenidate
disease. In one experiment mice developed liver tumors after receiving many
times the therapeutic dose, but the strain of mice used is prone to such tumors,
so scientists are uncertain about what the experiment means.
Pregnancy. An experiment using mice found the drug to have no effect on
reproduction. Studies of pregnant women abusing methylphenidate find no
birth defects associated with the drug, but babies tend to be small and premature.
A one-year follow-up found the infants to be in the normal range of
development, although some were at the low end of normal. In one study all
the pregnant women abusing methylphenidate were cigarette smokers; some
were alcoholics; some had sexually transmitted disease; few received much
prenatal care. In another study the methylphenidate-abusing mothers’ situations
were so grim that over half the infants were put into immediate foster
care after delivery and did not go home with their mothers. Such confounding
factors cloud any conclusions about the drug’s effect on fetal development.
Whether levels in breast milk are safe for infants is unconfirmed.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Cox, D.J., et al. “Effect of Stimulant Medication on Driving Performance of Young
Adults with Attention-Deficit Hyperactivity Disorder: A Preliminary Double-
Blind Placebo Controlled Trial.” Journal of Nervous and Mental Disease 188 (2000):
230–34.
Crutchley, A., and J.A. Temlett. “Methylphenidate (Ritalin) Use and Abuse.” South
African Medical Journal 89 (1999): 1076–79.
Debooy, V.D., et al. “Intravenous Pentazocine and Methylphenidate Abuse during
Pregnancy. Maternal Lifestyle and Infant Outcome.” American Journal of Diseases
of Children 147 (1993): 1062–65.
Efron, D., F.C. Jarman, and M.J. Barker. “Child and Parent Perceptions of Stimulant
Medication Treatment in Attention Deficit Hyperactivity Disorder.” Journal of
Paediatrics and Child Health 34 (1998): 288–92.
Jadad, A.R., et al. “Treatment of Attention-Deficit/Hyperactivity Disorder.” Evidence
Report/Technology Assessment, no. 11 (1999): 1–341. Issue no. 11 is available online
at: http://hstat.nlm.nih.gov/ftrs/dbaccess/adhd
Llana, M.E., and M.L. Crismon. “Methylphenidate: Increased Abuse or Appropriate
Use?” Journal of the American Pharmaceutical Association 39 (1999): 526–30.
Parran, T.V., Jr., and D.R. Jasinski. “Intravenous Methylphenidate Abuse. Prototype
for Prescription Drug Abuse.” Archives of Internal Medicine 151 (1991): 781–83.
Scarnati, R. “An Outline of Hazardous Side Effects of Ritalin (Methylphenidate).” International
Journal of the Addictions 21 (1986): 837–41.
Methyltestosterone
Pronunciation: meth-ill-tess-TOSS-ter-ohn
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 58-18-4
Formal Names: Android, Estratest, Methitest, Testred, Virilon
Type: Anabolic steroid. See page 24
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule III (DEA no. 4000)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: X
Uses. Methyltestosterone is a synthetic drug manufactured from testosterone.
Methyltestosterone’s medical uses include supplementation of testosterone
in males with low levels of that hormone and treatment of female breast
cancer. Scientists report unsatisfactory results from a test of whether the compound
might work as a male contraceptive and mixed results when the substance
was used to treat male impotence. Impotence improvement was better
when methyltestosterone was taken in combination with a yohimbe preparation.
Methyltestosterone has provided pain relief and occasionally fertility
enhancement to women suffering from a reproductive disorder called endometriosis
externa. Therapeutic regimens to build up bone strength in older
women may include methyltestosterone, as may therapies designed to compensate
for hormonal changes caused by menopause. In research projects
height increase occurred when the drug was administered to boys of short
stature. Experimenters describe the drug as effective treatment for hereditary
angioedema, an affliction involving tissue swelling. The drug also has agricultural
uses such as illegally promoting pig and cattle growth.
Drawbacks. Volunteers who took methyltestosterone in an experiment
showed slight changes in thinking ability, and 2 of the 20 subjects had maniclike
episodes that might be attributable to the drug. A report noted that
someone receiving the drug experienced visual and auditory hallucinations,
and a case report indicated that methyltestosterone and methandrostenolone
were likely causes of psychotic incidents experienced by two bodybuilders. A
human experiment attempted to document the drug’s psychological effects
but was unable to correlate behavioral changes with volunteers’ usage of the
substance. The substance is suspected of causing liver damage, sometimes
resulting in jaundice, lesions, tumors, or other conditions. The compound may
cause fluid retention, which can be risky for persons with kidney, liver, or
296 Methyltestosterone
heart malfunction. Like many drugs of this type, methyltestosterone can cause
females to develop masculine characteristics such as facial hair or coarser
voice. Such effects can become permanent if dosage is not swiftly stopped
upon first appearance of the changes. Other unwanted actions of the drug can
include acne, headache, uneasiness, burning or prickling sensations, menstrual
disturbances, nausea, and high blood levels of calcium and cholesterol. In rats
high blood pressure has been traced to methyltestosterone.
Abuse factors. Methyltestosterone is banned from athletic competitions, but
some athletes are tempted to use it, nonetheless. Claims that the compound
produces gains in weight and muscle strength have been difficult to document
in humans, partly because experimenters cannot subject humans to experimental
conditions that are as brutal as can be used with laboratory animals.
A robust experiment on rats demonstrated increased strength and stamina
from methyltestosterone.
Drug interactions. A case report mentions that a person using the hormone
along with the anticholesterol medicine clofibrate developed extremely low
levels of high-density lipoprotein (the so-called good cholesterol), a development
attributed to methyltestosterone. A similar result occurred in an experiment
tracking women using this anabolic steroid along with female hormones
called esterified estrogens. Methyltestosterone interferes with blood clotting,
which can be a serious problem for persons taking anticlotting medicine. A
case report indicates that the substance interacts badly with cyclosporine, an
immunosuppressive agent used to fight rejection of organ transplants. A small
experiment using methyltestosterone to increase benefits from the tricyclic antidepressant
imipramine went awry when almost all patients became paranoid,
a condition that rapidly disappeared when methyltestosterone dosage
stopped.
Cancer. Researchers have noted liver cancer in mice that received methyltestosterone.
Other case reports indicate strong suspicion that the drug causes
human liver cancer. The substance has been associated with a person’s development
of prostate cancer, but “association” is not the same as cause.
Pregnancy. Women are advised to avoid the drug during pregnancy because
the substance may masculinize a female fetus, a discovery made in the
1950s when methyltestosterone was a standard medication for reducing the
likelihood of miscarriage. Nursing mothers are advised to avoid the drug because
it might pass into milk and masculinize a female infant. These effects
of the drug are powerful enough that methyltestosterone is used in tilapia
farming to change females of this fish into males. The drug has also been used
to change female flounder into male fish. Research on rats has demonstrated
that masculinizing effects on females can persist into a subsequent generation
that did not receive the drug. Human males who use the substance may produce
more male offspring than usual.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Black, J.A., and J.F. Bentley. “Effect on the Fetus of Androgens Given During Pregnancy.”
Lancet 1 (1959): 21–24.
Greene, R., and L.S. Carstairs. “Effect of Anabolic Hormones on the Growth of Undersized
Boys.” British Journal of Clinical Practice 27 (1973): 3–7.
Methyltestosterone 297
Regestein, Q.R., et al. “Neuropsychological Effects of Methyltestosterone in Women
Using Menopausal Hormone Replacement.” Journal of Women’s Health & Gender-
Based Medicine 10 (2001): 671–76.
Richardson, J.H., and S. Smith. “A Comparison of the Effects of Dianabol and Methyltestosterone
on Muscle Contraction and Fatigue.” Journal of Sports Medicine and
Physical Fitness 21 (1981): 279–81.
Simon, J.A. “Safety of Estrogen/Androgen Regimens.” Journal of Reproductive Medicine
46 (2001 Supp. 3): 281–90.
Su, T.P., et al. “Neuropsychiatric Effects of Anabolic Steroids in Male Normal Volunteers.”
Journal of the American Medical Association 269 (1993): 2760–64.
Westaby, D., et al. “Liver Damage from Long Term Methyltestosterone.” Lancet 2
(1977): 261–63.
Wilson, I.C., A.J. Prange, and P.P. Lara. “Methyltestosterone with Imipramine in Men:
Conversion of Depression to Paranoid Reaction.” American Journal of Psychiatry
131 (1974): 21–24.
Midazolam
Pronunciation: mid-AZ-ah-lam
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 59467-70-8. (Hydrochloride form
59467-96-8; maleate form 59467-94-6)
Formal Names: Dormicum, Hypnovel, Versed
Type: Depressant (benzodiazepine class). See page 21
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule IV (DEA no. 2884)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: D
Uses. This quick-acting drug’s common medical uses are to reduce anxiety,
calm people, and help them sleep. Naturalists use the substance to knock out
wildlife ranging from foxes to aardvarks. Effects do not last a long time, typically
making the substance a good choice for weakened persons or animals
who would be strained by a longer-acting drug. For example, weary mountaineers
climbing Mt. Everest have used the drug to improve quality of sleep.
One study found the drug could help workers who must alter their sleep
schedules for reporting to different work shifts. Experiments show the drug
having potential for treating muscle spasms. Midazolam has been used successfully
to alleviate status epilepticus, in which people have continual seizures,
and to control seizures caused by high fevers in children. The U.S.
Army has tested midazolam experimentally, but with limited success, to counteract
seizures and other poisonous effects from the chemical warfare substance
soman. A case report about treating a cobra snake bite victim notes
that midazolam worked when another drug faltered. Midazolam reduces
blood pressure. The compound is routinely given to people before surgical,
dental, or uncomfortable medical procedures and is used to relieve pain in
afflictions and after surgery. Midazolam can produce amnesia about events
that occurred while under the drug’s influence and may be able to interfere
with remembering things that occurred shortly before the drug was received.
That amnesia action can be beneficial in reducing stress from medical treatments
but might also be used by unscrupulous persons wanting to exploit
someone.
Drawbacks. When injected intravenously the drug can be so hazardous that
in some instances a resuscitation specialist must be on hand with the exclusive
duty of monitoring the patient’s condition at all times. Without that precaution
Midazolam 299
people have suffered crippling brain damage or death from respiratory arrest
caused by the drug while a medical procedure was being performed. Respiratory
emergencies have also occurred from oral dosage. Midazolam is not
recommended for persons suffering from breathing trouble. Nonetheless, despite
the drug’s potential hazards, examination of 5,439 records of patients
receiving the drug at one hospital revealed only 3 instances of respiratory
arrest. Examination of 9,842 medical records of persons who received midazolam
in 14 hospitals did not reveal serious respiratory events caused by the
drug; indeed, the study concluded that people were more likely to die from
diazepam. That conclusion, of course, was based on administration of the
drugs in a medical setting, not misuse on the street.
A rat study found the drug to have “minimal” ability to cause brain damage,
and then only in older rats, even after four months of daily dosing. In a
subsequent and related report investigators stated flatly that the drug does
not cause brain damage, although once again slight differences were observed
when older rats were compared to others.
Researchers have noted that midazolam harms white blood cells. Other unwanted
effects include headache, coughing and hiccups, nausea, and vomiting.
Less commonly, the drug can prompt euphoria, hallucinations, tremor,
rapid heartbeat, discomposure, and aggression. Two researchers tracking violent
deaths in Finland concluded that the drug was found in victims more
often than would be expected through chance occurrence. Hallucinations by
surgical patients have occurred often enough and can be realistic enough (such
as patients perceiving imaginary sexual assault by medical personnel) that
medical staff have been advised to have someone witness all contact with
patients receiving the drug.
Midazolam lengthens reaction times, although two experiments found that
users performed normally 4 hours after a dose such as a patient would receive
for outpatient surgery. Those findings are supported by other studies as well,
including one using test equipment to measure performance of commercial
airline pilots. Nonetheless, persons are supposed to avoid activity requiring
careful vigilance (such as driving) for at least 24 hours after taking midazolam.
A small study found that a dose of midazolam produces higher blood levels
of the drug and lasts longer in ethnic Mexicans than in ethnic whites.
Abuse factors. Among monkeys dependence has been established with the
drug after 5 to 10 weeks of steady dosage. Sudden cessation of dosage can
provoke a withdrawal syndrome: perspiration, tremors and cramps, vomiting,
convulsions, and hallucinations. The syndrome can be avoided by gradually
reducing drug use instead of stopping all at once. Some researchers believe
tolerance has been demonstrated. The substance is considered to have at least
the same addiction potential as diazepam, which is three or four times weaker
than midazolam.
Drug interactions. In some circumstances midazolam can lower blood pressure
drastically and cause seizures; administering the drug with fentanyl or
other opiates can increase the likelihood of such severe actions. Rat experiments
unexpectedly found that the stimulant caffeine boosts difficulties in
movement caused by midazolam, and cocaine also worsened that performance.
Opiates or alcohol can deepen some midazolam effects in humans,
300 Midazolam
and rat experiments find that midazolam makes alcohol more appealing. The
HIV/AIDS (human immunodeficiency virus/acquired immunodeficiency syndrome)
drug saquinavir and the antibiotic erythromycin increase midazolam
levels in the body and make effects last longer. The antacid and ulcer medication
cimetidine (such as Tagamet) can lengthen sedation from a midazolam
dose. Some research indicates that drinking grapefruit juice increases midazolam’s
ability to act upon a person, but other research does not support that
finding. The tuberculosis medicine rifampin and the epilepsy drugs phenytoin
and carbamazepine diminish midazolam’s effectiveness.
Cancer. Rat and mice experiments have produced no cancer even when
midazolam was given daily for two years at 25 times the recommended human
dose. The same usage of the drug at about 225 times the recommended
human dose, however, produced liver and thyroid tumors. Relevance of the
latter outcome to human medical use, involving normal dosage and typically
using the drug for one day, is unclear. Gene mutations are considered an
element in causing cancer, and midazolam did not produce mutations in assorted
standard tests, nor were they observed in a study of patients receiving
the drug.
Pregnancy. The drug has been given to mice, rats, and rabbits at 5 to 32
times the normal human dose without producing birth defects. Researchers
conducting one experiment concluded, however, that the drug altered behavior
of mice after fetal exposure (making males more uneasy and females less
uneasy) while slowing their development. Tests indicate that the drug will
pass from a pregnant woman into the fetus. The substance has been successfully
used to treat eclampsia, a serious disease of late pregnancy involving
convulsions, but midazolam is generally not desirable for pregnant women.
The drug passes into the milk supply of nursing mothers, and caution is recommended
about breast-feeding in such circumstances.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Curran, H.V., and B. Birch. “Differentiating the Sedative, Psychomotor and Amnesic
Effects of Benzodiazepines: A Study with Midazolam and the Benzodiazepine
Antagonist, Flumazenil.” Psychopharmacology 103 (1991): 519–23.
Dundee, J.W. “Fantasies during Sedation with Intravenous Midazolam or Diazepam.”
Medico-Legal Journal 58 (1990, pt. 1): 29–34.
Gupta, A., et al. “The Effects of Midazolam and Flumazenil on Psychomotor Function.”
Journal of Clinical Anesthesia 9 (1997): 21–25.
Kelly, D.J., et al. “The Effects of Midazolam on Pure Tone Audiometry, Speech Audiometry,
and Audiological Reaction Times in Human Volunteers.” Anesthesia and
Analgesia 88 (1999):1064–68.
Langlois, S., et al. “Midazolam: Kinetics and Effects on Memory, Sensorium, and Hemodynamics.”
British Journal of Clinical Pharmacology 23 (1987): 273–78.
“Midazolam.” Medical Letter on Drugs and Therapeutics 28 (1986): 73–74.
Nordt, S.P., and R.F. Clark. “Midazolam: A Review of Therapeutic Uses and Toxicity.”
Journal of Emergency Medicine 15 (1997): 357–65.
Modafinil
Pronunciation: moh-DA-fih-nill
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 68693-11-8
Formal Names: Alertec, Modiodal, Provigil
Type: Stimulant. See page 11
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule IV (DEA no. 1680)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. This drug is a medical treatment for narcolepsy and other conditions
involving difficulty in staying awake. The substance also improves vigilance.
In the 1990s U.S. Air Force researchers called for exploration of the drug’s
potential in assisting military missions. Investigators have found that the compound
may assist aircraft pilots in maintaining a better performance level
when deprived of sleep for extended periods. An experiment indicated that
the drug can help military personnel engage in sustained operations for 64
hours without sleep, with fewer unwanted effects than amphetamine has. A
French military experiment showed the drug could be used along with short
naps to permit extended operations without normal sleep periods. Additional
study has shown, however, that people using the compound are less aware
of reduced quality of performance; in comparison, sleep-deprived individuals
who use dextroamphetamine or a placebo have a more accurate assessment
of their capabilities. Thus, from a practical standpoint, sleep-deprived persons
using modafinil may be overconfident and try to do things that should not
be attempted.
Modafinil is used against obstructive sleep apnea, in which people have
temporary breathing stoppages while asleep and which can make them sleepy
the next day. Experiments find that although modafinil helps people stay
awake, it does not interfere with the quality of their sleep, as dextroamphetamine
does. Modafinil has helped patients respond better to antidepressant
therapy while also reducing their feelings of weariness. Favorable results have
been seen in experiments using the drug against attention deficit hyperactivity
disorder (ADHD) and against organic brain problems caused by alcoholism.
An animal study indicates the substance may have potential for treating Parkinson’s
disease. Some authorities speculate that the compound may reduce
brain problems caused by aging. Modafinil makes animals more active.
302 Modafinil
Drawbacks. Modafinil can produce euphoria in humans. Headache, dry
mouth, sore throat, appetite loss, nausea, diarrhea, uneasiness, depression,
insomnia, fever, infection, and weakness have been reported by modafinil
users. Among cardiac patients, unwanted actions may include heart palpitations,
chest pain, and breathing difficulty. High doses have caused tremors,
faster pulse rate, high blood pressure, peevishness, confusion, and aggression.
Although the compound is a stimulant, it has a risk of adversely affecting
skills needed for operating dangerous machinery such as automobiles.
A modafinil dose lasts a shorter time in young females than in young males.
Abuse factors. Modafinil’s chemical properties reduce or even eliminate its
effects if injected or smoked, reducing its convenience for abuse. Studies indicate
the drug has less abuse potential than many other stimulants, but monkeys
will self-administer modafinil, a traditional sign of addictive potential in
a substance. Scientists running one monkey experiment noted, however, that
only massive doses would interest the animals; even an amount of modafinil
200 times the size of a dextroamphetamine dose was not enough to get them
to self-administer the two drugs at the same rate. In a rat test the rodents
acted like modafinil has some effects reminiscent of cocaine. In one scientific
study persons with a history of drug abuse found modafinil’s actions pleasurable
and similar to those of methylphenidate. People using modafinil daily
for 9 weeks showed no dependence; and a study of 140 patients who used
the drug for varying amounts of time, ranging from 1 month to almost 10
years, revealed no dependence. Tests of humans taking modafinil daily for 40
weeks indicated no development of tolerance.
Drug interactions. Modafinil can make birth control pills and implants less
effective. A laboratory test indicated that the drug may reduce blood levels of
cyclosporine, an immunosuppressant used to help organ transplant patients.
Modafinil may raise blood levels of diazepam, tricyclic antidepressants, the
anti–blood clot medicine warfarin, and the epilepsy medicine phenytoin.
Cancer. Laboratory tests have not found indications that modafinil causes
cancer.
Pregnancy. Fetal injury emerged in pregnant rats receiving 10 times the
normal maximum human dose of modafinil, but pregnant rabbits receiving
the same dosage did not show fetal damage attributable to the substance. At
lower doses rat offspring appeared normal, and milk from nursing rats receiving
the drug did not seem to harm the pups. Effects on human pregnancy
and milk are uncertain.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Akerstedt, T., and G. Ficca. “Alertness-Enhancing Drugs as a Countermeasure to Fatigue
in Irregular Work Hours.” Chronobiology International 14 (1997): 145–58.
Baranski, J.V., and R.A. Pigeau. “Self-Monitoring Cognitive Performance during Sleep
Deprivation: Effects of Modafinil, D-Amphetamine and Placebo.” Journal of Sleep
Research 6 (1997): 84–91.
Lyons, T.J., and J. French. “Modafinil: The Unique Properties of a New Stimulant.”
Aviation, Space, and Environmental Medicine 62 (1991): 432–35.
“Modafinil for Narcolepsy.” Medical Letter on Drugs and Therapeutics 41 (1999): 30–31.
Rugino, T.A., and T.C. Copley. “Effects of Modafinil in Children with Attention-
Deficit/Hyperactivity Disorder: An Open-Label Study.” Journal of the American
Academy of Child and Adolescent Psychiatry 40 (2001): 230–35.
Morning Glory
Pronunciation: MOR-neen GLOH-ree
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: None
Formal Names: Ipomoea hederacea, Ipomoea purpurea, Ipomoea sidaefolia,
Ipomoea tricolor, Ipomoea violacea
Informal Names: Flying Saucers, Heavenly Blue, Pearly Gates, Tlitliltzin, Yaxce’lil
Type: Hallucinogen. See page 25
Federal Schedule Listing: Unlisted
USA Availability: Nonprescription natural product
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. Morning glory is a familiar flower. Many varieties exist, and some
have drug properties. Although morning glory is an uncontrolled substance,
the hallucinogenic varieties contain lysergic acid amide, a Schedule III depressant.
Seeds and roots of the Ipomoea hederacea morning glory are used medicinally.
The natural product works as a laxative and as a treatment against intestinal
worms. Traditional applications include combating flatulence, easing excessive
feelings of fullness after a meal, and treating scabies (a skin disease caused by
a parasite).
Albert Hofmann, the discoverer of LSD, became intrigued by accounts of
seed called ololiuqui by the Aztecs. Folk medicine used its ointments or potions
to treat flatulence, tumors, and venereal disease. Ingesting the seeds allowed
Aztecs to commune with their gods, and native peoples still used ololiuqui for
that purpose during the twentieth century. Hofmann found that the ololiuqui
seeds of Mexico came from two kinds of morning glory: from Ipomoea sidaefolia
(also called Rivea corymbosa) and from Ipomoea violacea (also called Ipomoea
tricolor, whose seeds are also known as badoh negro). Seeds from both plants
contained ergot chemicals resembling LSD.
Although Ipomoea violacea is often viewed in a drug context, the plant has
agricultural usage as a natural means of weed control. Ipomoea purpurea is
sensitive enough to airborne chemicals that researchers use it to measure air
pollution.
Drawbacks. Morning glory seeds have been publicized as a substitute for
LSD, but no less an authority than Hofmann himself found LSD and morning
glory to have different effects. In particular he noted that morning glory emp304
Morning Glory
tied thoughts from the mind and made the world seem meaningless, while
promoting unease, depression, and a weariness that transformed into sleep.
In addition to being a hallucinogen, LSD has powerful stimulant actions, but
when morning glory seed was tested on rats, they became less active than
normal and, contrary to what would be expected with a hallucinogen, they
showed no change in perceptual abilities. A team of researchers who studied
reactions of volunteers described morning glory’s active chemicals as unlike
LSD. Those volunteers nonetheless felt some euphoria; they also had a distorted
sense of time and a crossover of senses (in which colors might be
smelled or sounds might be seen), but hallucinations or alteration of consciousness
did not seem to develop. The research team likened morning glory
to the drug ibogalin (which lacks significant psychological effect despite its
close relation to ibogaine) and to the drug scopolamine found in belladonna.
A case report about a person being treated for morning glory seed overdose
said no hallucinations were present.
Those kinds of observations seem to differ from the effects experienced by
the Aztecs and modern native peoples. Indeed, some recreational users (and
their medical caregivers) report morning glory experiences quite similar to
those of LSD, from hallucinations to philosophical insights—although one
short series of case reports about such reactions argued that every instance
involved a psychologically abnormal person. Some users describe cold extremities,
a possible sign of ergot poisoning. A case report noted other physical
reactions: red face and abdominal discomfort eased by “explosive diarrheic
bowel movements.” The patient also had lowered blood pressure and heart
rate, opposite to accounts about LSD.
Morning glory seeds purchased from garden stores are not intended for
human consumption and may contain fungicides that could harm a person
who ingests them, although one investigator doubts a human stomach can
hold enough morning glory seeds to cause fatal poisoning from the fungicide
coating. Experimenters have fed uncontaminated seed to rats as various percentages
of their diet, from less than 1% up to 8%. After 90 days animals
receiving the greatest amount showed a higher death rate than normal, with
males more affected than females. Although the animals had less weight gain
than would be expected on an ordinary diet, various internal organs enlarged.
In addition, liver damage occurred, and blood abnormalities appeared.
Abuse factors. In the 1960s the British government concluded that morning
glory seeds were harmless, but American researchers did not reach a consensus
about whether danger existed. Some authorities state that Ipomoea purpurea
morning glory seeds lack psychedelic properties, but other authorities say
otherwise.
Drug interactions. Not enough scientific information to report.
Cancer. The Ames test, a laboratory screen used to test substances for
cancer-causing potential, reveals that morning glory seeds have that potential.
Pregnancy. Lysergic acid amide has damaged embryo development in mice.
Pregnant women are advised to avoid Ipomoea hederacea because it is suspected
of causing birth defects.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Morning Glory 305
Blum, O., et al. “Ambient Tropospheric Ozone in the Ukrainian Carpathian Mountains
and Kiev Region: Detection with Passive Samplers and Bioindicator Plants.”
Environmental Pollution 98 (1997): 299–304.
Dungan, G.M., and M.R. Gumbmann. “Toxicological Evaluation of Morning Glory
Seed: Subchronic 90-Day Feeding Study.” Food and Chemical Toxicology 28 (1990):
553–60.
Fink, P.J., M.J. Goldman, and I. Lyons. “Morning Glory Seed Psychosis.” Archives of
General Psychiatry 15 (1966): 209–13.
Heim, E., H. Heimann, and G. Lukacs. “Psychotomimetic Effects of the Mexican Drug
‘Ololiuqui.’ ” Psychopharmacologia 13 (1968): 35–48.
Hofmann, A. “Teonanacatl and Ololiuqui, Two Ancient Magic Drugs of Mexico.” Bulletin
on Narcotics 23, no. 1 (1971): 3–14.
Ingram, A.L., Jr. “Morning Glory Seed Reaction.” Journal of the American Medical Association
190 (1964): 1133–34.
“Morning Glory and Hallucinosis.” South African Medical Journal 40 (1966): 1015–16.
Morphine
Pronunciation: MOR-feen
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 57-27-2
Formal Names: Astramorph, Duramorph, Infumorph, Kadian, Kapanol Sevredol,
Morphine Sulfate, MS Contin, MSIR, MST Continus, MXL, Oramorph, Roxanol
Informal Names: Cube Juice, Dope, Dreamer, Emsel, First Line, God’s Drug, Hard
Stuff, Hocus, Hows, Lydia, Lydic, M, Miss Emma, Mister Blue, Monkey, Morf,
Morph, Morphide, Morphie, Morpho, Mother, MS, Ms. Emma, Mud, New Jack
Swing (with heroin), Sister, Tab, Unkie, Unkie White, Stuff
Type: Depressant (opiate class). See page 22
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule II (DEA no. 9300)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. Morphine was identified as opium’s main active ingredient in the
early 1800s. The body transforms a heroin dose into morphine. If stored too
long in a water solution, morphine will eventually transform into other chemicals
including morphine-N-oxide, a Schedule I controlled substance. Although
pharmaceutical supplies of morphine come from opium harvests,
mammals produce small amounts of morphine in their bodies. Thus the substance
is a natural product in both the plant and animal kingdoms. The drug
can also be created entirely in a laboratory.
Morphine’s role in medicine did not become prominent until the hypodermic
needle was introduced in the 1850s. Injection was long the main means
of administration, but other delivery systems (such as absorption by the nasal
lining and through rectal suppositories) have since been developed. Oral dosage
formats are also available.
Morphine is widely used to sedate people and to ease anxiety. The drug is
commonly given to treat acute pain from injury or surgery and chronic pain
from assorted afflictions. The hurting does not actually go away, but people
become less aware of it. In addition to pain control, morphine also has antiinflammatory
actions and can suppress coughing.
The drug tends to produce better pain relief in women than in men. A small
study examined whether Chinese men respond to morphine differently than
white men do: Doses lasted longer in the whites, interfered more with their
breathing, and produced greater reduction in their blood pressure.
Morphine 307
Drawbacks. When used to reduce continual pain in serious disease, too
much morphine can increase discomfort rather than relieve it and cause a
condition in which a patient experiences pain from activity that should not be
uncomfortable.
Morphine can make people drowsy, so they should avoid operating an automobile
or other hazardous machinery until they know how the drug affects
them. Despite morphine’s safety in a medical context, it can be hazardous
when injected into fluid circulating through the spinal cord and brain, and if
hospital staffs use this technique, they are advised to have resuscitation equipment
on hand.
Nausea and vomiting are common unwanted effects from morphine. It promotes
constipation and urine retention. Itching and hives can occur. The drug
interferes with sexual activity by male rats and lowers testosterone levels in
human males. Morphine can impede breathing and often is avoided if a person
suffers from asthma. Rats dosed with morphine for six weeks developed
a weakened immune system. People can experience seizures and accelerated
heart activity from a strong dose.
Abuse factors. After several weeks of medical dosage a person can experience
noticeable dependence with morphine. Such development should take
longer with adulterated street supplies. Medical patients who were surveyed
about their experience with morphine claimed to have experienced no difficulty
in stopping the drug. Addiction from medical use is almost unheard of.
Normally withdrawal symptoms are a mild version of the opiate withdrawal
syndrome. Tolerance is normally described as evidence of drug abuse, but
morphine tolerance can develop in persons receiving the drug medically for
pain relief. Symptoms of such tolerance include a need to take doses more
often and at a higher strength in order to produce the same amount of pain
relief. This is notable because tolerance to medical effects of a drug tends to
be unusual; perhaps the development indicates a substantial psychological
component in morphine’s pain management. Tolerance is commonly observed
among addicts, but they do not continually increase their dosage. At some
point they generally reach a level adequate to maintain the sensations they
seek. In the 1980s a mice experiment indicated that vitamin C may prevent
morphine tolerance and dependence, but judging from subsequent absence of
this technique in treating humans, apparently initial hopes for the therapy
have not been fulfilled.
One of the main appeals in illicit use of morphine is the drug’s ability to
induce calmness. People making unauthorized use of the drug for this purpose
are not so much using the drug for recreation as for relieving mental suffering.
In some people the drug can cause euphoria, a characteristic that can have
appeal strictly for recreation but also for self-medication. In these and other
respects, morphine and heroin will appeal to the same sorts of people for the
same sorts of reasons.
For decades morphine addiction was portrayed as the classic kind of drug
abuse. Although the substance was unwelcome in the workplace as the
twenty-first century began, a century earlier some workers used the drug to
increase productivity in both manual and intellectual tasks by relieving tension
that otherwise diminished performance. Other pharmaceuticals later su308
Morphine
perseded that antianxiety function of morphine. Somewhat surprisingly, given
morphine’s depressant actions, researchers have found the drug can improve
performance on a test of response time in decision making. Other researchers
have found no effect on performance in tests of memory, reasoning, muscular
coordination, and various additional skills basic to everyday living. Few ill
effects seem to come from chronic use of pure morphine (as opposed to adulterated
street supplies). Addicts with access to the pure product have lived
healthy and productive lives into old age. As drug laws tightened over the
past century, use of morphine by ordinary middle-class people declined, shifting
the prevalence of nonmedical morphine usage from law-abiding persons
into populations with more social deviance. Consequently, illicit use of morphine
became more associated with society’s outcasts. That association, however,
was caused by changes in laws and social attitudes (changes in setting),
not by any chemical effect of the drug.
Drug interactions. Animal and human experiments show that more pain
relief can come from morphine if ephedrine is taken at the same time. Dextroamphetamine
can improve pain relief provided by morphine. Alcohol, tricyclic
antidepressants, and monoamine oxidase inhibitors (MAOIs, found in
some antidepressants and other medicine) can boost morphine effects. Rat
experiments indicate that benzodiazepine class depressants lengthen the effect
from a morphine dose. Researchers find that morphine and nicotine have
cross-tolerance in mice.
Cancer. Morphine is not known to cause cancer. Some laboratory tests and
some studies of human users, however, detect cell damage that could lead to
cancer. Some people smoke morphine, and the smoke is suspected of causing
esophageal cancer. Evidence exists that naturally occurring morphine in lung
tissue may constrain development of lung cancer, that nicotine counteracts
such protection, and that tobacco smokers have more naturally occurring morphine
in their lung tissue than nonsmokers (perhaps because the body increases
morphine production when challenged by nicotine). All this evidence,
however, involves minute levels of naturally occurring morphine in the body
and does not support taking the drug in hopes of avoiding lung cancer.
Pregnancy. When given in amounts exceeding normal human medical doses
by hundreds of times, morphine has caused animal birth defects. Malformations
involving bones and soft tissues have been observed in animals. Pregnant
rats and hamsters dosed on morphine produce male offspring that exhibit
feminized behavior. When morphine was routinely given to male adolescent
rats, the drug seemed to interfere with sexual maturation. As their offspring
reached adulthood, they appeared normal but had hormone abnormalities.
In humans no increase in birth defects has been observed in offspring of
women who used morphine during pregnancy. A morphine dose quickly
passes from the woman into the fetus, however, and reaches a blood level
similar to the woman’s. A dose lasts longer in the fetus than elsewhere in a
woman’s body. The drug reduces fetal motions. A baby born to a chronic
morphine user can have dependence on the drug and exhibit withdrawal
symptoms after birth. One study found that infants receiving morphine for
medical purposes soon after birth show no ill effects five years later in conduct,
muscular coordination, or intelligence.
Morphine 309
Morphine apparently passes into a mother’s milk. One case report described
the amount as minimal and found no effect on the nursing infant, but another
report tells of an infant receiving so much morphine from milk that dependence
developed.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Hamilton, G.R., and T.F. Baskett. “In the Arms of Morpheus, the Development of Morphine
for Postoperative Pain Relief.” Canadian Journal of Anaesthesia 47 (2000):
367–74.
Hill, J.L., and J.P. Zacny. “Comparing the Subjective, Psychomotor, and Physiological
Effects of Intravenous Hydromorphone and Morphine in Healthy Volunteers.”
Psychopharmacology 152 (2000): 31–39.
O’Neill, W.M., et al. “The Cognitive and Psychomotor Effects of Morphine in Healthy
Subjects: A Randomized Controlled Trial of Repeated (Four) Oral Doses of Dextropropoxyphene,
Morphine, Lorazepam and Placebo.” Pain 85 (2000): 209–15.
Walker, D.J., and J.P. Zacny. “Subjective, Psychomotor, and Analgesic Effects of Oral
Codeine and Morphine in Healthy Volunteers.” Psychopharmacology 140 (1998):
191–201.
Zacny, J.P., et al. “Comparing the Subjective, Psychomotor and Physiological Effects of
Intravenous Pentazocine and Morphine in Normal Volunteers.” Journal of Pharmacology
and Experimental Therapeutics 286 (1998): 1197–207.
Mothballs
Pronunciation: MOTH-ballz
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: None
Formal Names: Naphthalene, Paradichlorobenzene
Type: Inhalant. See page 26
Federal Schedule Listing: Unlisted
USA Availability: Generally available nonprescription product
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. Mothballs typically contain naphthalene or paradichlorobenzene. Neither
persons who use mothballs recreationally nor their medical caregivers are
always aware of which kind of mothballs have been used. Diaper pail and
toilet deodorizers may contain one or the other of those chemicals. Naphthalene
varieties look dry, and paradichlorobenzene products appear oily. Normally
people inhale fumes, but cases of oral ingestion are known. Naphthalene
can also be absorbed through the skin; an infant died from using diapers and
blankets contaminated with the substance. Some glues contain naphthalene,
but sensations from glue sniffing are normally considered a result of toluene.
Drawbacks. Naphthalene may create agitation and tiredness, fever, skin
paleness, headache, appetite loss, abdominal discomfort, nausea and vomiting,
diarrhea, cataracts, and kidney failure. Blood disorders serious enough to prevent
the body from utilizing enough oxygen from the lungs may arise. The
kidney failure can create excessive blood potassium levels, which in turn can
cause heart failure. Seizures and coma may also occur. Jaundice is a known
affliction from naphthalene, and a case report notes fatal liver damage.
A case report tells about difficulty with control of fingers due to inhaling
mothball fumes. Paradichlorobenzene is not associated with such an affliction,
so the problem is assumed to have come from naphthalene mothballs. Compared
to naphthalene, harm from paradichlorobenzene normally takes longer
to appear but may include liver and kidney malfunction. A case of anemia is
known from eating two paradichlorobenzene toilet freshener blocks per week.
Abuse factors. One person experienced tremors and weariness upon stopping
daily oral ingestion of paradichlorobenzene mothballs (which suggests
dependence may have developed).
Drug interactions: Not enough scientific information to report.
Cancer. Naphthalene has not been found to cause cancer. ParadichlorobenMothballs
311
zene fumes failed to produce cancer in a short animal test. The disease did
develop in mice and rats that received oral dosage, and paradichlorobenzene
caused cell mutations (a possible indication of cancer-causing potential) in
fungi but not in bacteria. Human risk is unknown.
Pregnancy. A normal infant was born to a woman who ate one or two
paradichlorobenzene toilet fresheners a week during her pregnancy. A pregnant
woman who sniffed naphthalene, however, produced a child with skin
color typical of naphthalene poisoning and an enlarged liver and spleen. The
organs became normal after treatment.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Athanasiou, M., et al. “Hemolytic Anemia in a Female Newborn Infant Whose Mother
Inhaled Naphthalene Before Delivery.” Journal of Pediatrics 130 (1997): 680–81.
Santucci, K., and B. Shah. “Association of Naphthalene with Acute Hemolytic Anemia.”
Academic Emergency Medicine 7 (2000): 42–47.
Siegel, E., and S. Wason. “Mothball Toxicity.” Pediatric Clinics of North America 33
(1986): 369–74.
Weintraub, E., D. Gandhi, and C. Robinson. “Medical Complications Due to Mothball
Abuse.” Southern Medical Journal 93 (2000): 427–29.
Nalbuphine
Pronunciation: nal-BYOO-feen
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 20594-83-6. (Hydrochloride form
23277-43-2)
Formal Names: Nubain
Type: Depressant (opioid class). See page 24
Federal Schedule Listing: Unlisted
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: B
Uses. This opioid is considered about as effective as morphine at pain relief
and is also used in anesthesia and for sedation. Nalbuphine is used to control
substantial pain in conditions ranging from surgery and broken bones to heart
attack and sickle cell anemia crisis. Women seem to get more pain relief from
the drug than men do. The compound’s anesthetic capabilities have been used
in military medicine; one scientific report1 blandly describes nalbuphine usage
in cases of “large, multiple gunshot wounds of the trunk and extremities, as
well as injuries caused by fragments of projectiles and explosive devices.” The
drug is also used in dentistry.
Nalbuphine is a narcotic agonist-antagonist, meaning it has opiate properties
itself but can counteract other opiates/opioids, a counteraction sometimes
strong enough to cause a withdrawal syndrome if someone has dependence
on the other opiate/opioid.
The drug’s safety for administration to children is considered unproven in
the United States, but nalbuphine is given to youngsters in America and elsewhere.
Drawbacks. Unwanted effects include dizziness, perspiration, itching, constipation,
nausea, vomiting, and breathing impairment. Hallucinations and
euphoria are reported. The drug may interfere with physical and mental abilities
needed to operate automobiles or other dangerous devices; tests have
demonstrated slower reaction times and impaired decision making among
users. The drug can make a person act drunk.
Abuse factors. Research indicates that nalbuphine injections briefly increase
blood levels of growth hormone, an increase that may lead some people to
think the drug promotes muscle mass. Reports circulating in bodybuilder circles
claim the drug can promote muscle mass in another way also, by reducing
Nalbuphine 313
blood levels of a hormone called cortisol. In the 1990s nalbuphine was popular
among bodybuilders using anabolic steroids. These individuals mainly used
nalbuphine to reduce pain caused by exercise regimens. Interviews with such
users revealed that many were suffering unwanted physical and mental effects
from nalbuphine and that many of these persons were abusing other drugs
as well. A case report tells of illicit nalbuphine injection causing muscle damage—
the opposite of what bodybuilders seek.
In low amounts nalbuphine can produce morphine effects. High doses tend
to make users feel nervous and uncomfortable, however, reducing nalbuphine’s
attractiveness for illicit recreational use. At those higher dosage levels
people can experience vision trouble, sleep disturbance, weird dreams, and
thoughts running out of control. The drug is generally considered to have a
low potential for abuse, lower than propoxyphene or codeine. Some researchers,
however, describe the abuse liability as about equivalent to pentazocine,
a drug with a notorious reputation for illicit misuse and that has effects similar
to those of nalbuphine. Tolerance and dependence may develop if a person
uses nalbuphine in amounts higher than normal medical doses. Withdrawal
symptoms are described as those of mild opiate withdrawal.
Drug interactions. Not enough scientific information to report.
Cancer. Standard laboratory tests do not indicate the drug has potential for
causing cancer. Long-term experiments with rats and mice have failed to produce
cancer.
Pregnancy. Animal research using nalbuphine at high doses has not produced
birth defects attributable to the drug. It passes from a pregnant woman
into the fetus and can build up there; one study found that newborn levels
could be six times higher than maternal levels. Due to effects on the newborn’s
heartbeat and breathing, controversy exists about the drug’s appropriateness
for easing pain of childbirth. Some researchers believe the substance is risky
during childbirth; some believe nalbuphine is safer than combinations of other
drugs. Nalbuphine passes into milk of nursing mothers but is not believed to
harm breast-feeding infants.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Jasinski, D.R., and P.A. Mansky. “Evaluation of Nalbuphine for Abuse Potential.” Clinical
Pharmacology and Therapeutics 13 (January–February 1972): 78–90.
Miller, R.R. “Evaluation of Nalbuphine Hydrochloride.” American Journal of Hospital
Pharmacy 37 (1980): 942–49.
Saarialho-Kere, U. “Psychomotor, Respiratory and Neuroendocrinological Effects of
Nalbuphine and Haloperidol, Alone and in Combination, in Healthy Subjects.”
British Journal of Clinical Pharmacology 26 (1988): 79–87.
Schmidt, W.K., et al. “Nalbuphine.” Drug and Alcohol Dependence 14 (1985): 339–62.
Stambaugh, J.E. “Evaluation of Nalbuphine: Efficacy and Safety in the Management of
Chronic Pain Associated with Advanced Malignancy.” Current Therapeutic Research:
Clinical and Experimental 31 (1982): 393–401.
Wines, J.D., et al. “Nalbuphine Hydrochloride Dependence in Anabolic Steroid Users.”
American Journal on Addictions 8 (1999): 161–64.
Zacny, J.P., K. Conley, and S. Marks. “Comparing the Subjective, Psychomotor and
Physiological Effects of Intravenous Nalbuphine and Morphine in Healthy
314 Nalbuphine
Volunteers.” Journal of Pharmacology and Experimental Therapeutics 280 (1997):
1159–69.
Note
1. Rakaric-Poznanovic, M., Z. Boljevic, and D. Marcec. “Anestezija Nalbufin/Propofol
u Kirurskom Zbrinjavanju Ratnih Ozljeda [Nalbuphine/Propofol Anesthesia in
the Surgical Treatment of War Injuries].” Lijecnicki Vjesnik 115 (1993): 303–305. Abstract
in English.
Nandrolone
Pronunciation: NAN-droh-lohn
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 434-22-0. (Decanoate form 360-
70-3; furylpropionate form 7642-64-0; phenpropionate form 62-90-8)
Formal Names: Anabolin LA-100, Androlone D, Deca-Durabolin, Demalon, Dexatopic,
Durabolin, Hybolin Decanoate, Nandrolin, Nortestosterone
Type: Anabolic steroid. See page 24
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule III (DEA no. 4000)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: X
Uses. Nandrolone is used to treat breast cancer and anemia, and the drug
has improved asthma and Sjo¨gren’s syndrome, a disease that destroys salivary,
sweat, and tear glands. Healing action on cornea afflictions has been
observed, and rat experiments have explored nandrolone’s potential for
speeding recovery from tooth extractions. A skin cream containing nandrolone
is used against eczema. Human research indicates that the drug can improve
osteoporosis, a disease causing brittle bones, although results conflict on how
long the improvement lasts. Among some diabetics with a kidney condition
called Kimmelstiel-Wilson syndrome, nandrolone has helped both renal and
eyesight difficulties. In kidney dialysis, patients’ experimental use of nandrolone
was able to improve weariness, increase muscle mass, and fight malnutrition.
The compound has helped AIDS (acquired immunodeficiency
syndrome) patients build up weight, muscles, and strength. The substance has
also been given in hopes of stimulating appetite in malnourished cancer patients,
although animal cancer research indicates that any weight gain may
simply be due to water retention rather than improved nutrition (in contrast
to research with healthy animals that produced weight increase associated
with protein gain—some livestock raisers illegally dose animals with nandrolone
to promote growth). After administration of the drug, improvement occurred
in a case of anorexia nervosa, a psychological condition in which
people with normal or low weight misperceive themselves as fat.
Drawbacks. Typically, but not always, studies of humans who use nandrolone
have measured declines in cholesterol levels (including HDL, the socalled
good cholesterol) and elevation of triglycerides (associated with body
processes leading to heart attack and stroke). In monkeys, coronary artery
316 Nandrolone
damage appeared after long-term administration of nandrolone. After the
drug was given for a year or more to female monkeys they showed abnormalities
in the uterus. Female reproductive behavior was disrupted in a rat
experiment using doses comparable to what humans take. In humans the substance
can promote male characteristics in females (such as facial hair and
deeper voice), and in men it can enlarge breasts while diminishing sexual
organs. Other unwanted effects may include acne, aggressive conduct, urinary
difficulty, and fluid retention causing tissues to swell. Nandrolone is supposed
to be avoided by males suffering from breast or prostate cancer and by anyone
with porphyria, liver disease, heart failure, or kidney failure. The drug may
interfere with children’s growth and their gender differentiation.
Taking nandrolone without watchful medical supervision can be hazardous.
A bodybuilder’s use of nandrolone and other steroids is suspected of transforming
a routine case of chickenpox into a nearly fatal experience, requiring
over a month of hospitalization in an intensive care unit. Daily nandrolone is
suspected of leading to kidney and bone marrow disease that paralyzed a 29-
year-old bodybuilder, although eventually he recovered enough to walk without
help.
Abuse factors. Nandrolone can improve muscle mass, and some athletes
use it for that purpose even though sports regulatory agencies forbid use of
the compound by competitors. Among athletes tested by the International
Olympic Committee in the 1980s nandrolone was the most frequently found
illicit anabolic steroid. The sports ban extends beyond human competitions
and includes horse racing; however, an experiment testing thoroughbred racing
performance found no effect from the drug.
Research demonstrates that consuming boar meat or taking the nonprescription
steroid androstenedione can produce false-positive tests for nandrolone.
In theory consumption of horse meat might also produce a false positive,
as natural body processes in a horse may produce enough nandrolone to be
measurable.
Drug interactions. The substance can alter the amount of insulin needed by
diabetics. Some experimentation on rats found that nandrolone can boost heart
rate acceleration caused by cocaine; in other rat work the combination apparently
lowered pulse rate. Nandrolone boosts actions of anti–blood clot medicines,
putting patients at risk of excessive bleeding.
Cancer. Judging from decades of medical experience, the compound does
not seem to cause cancer.
Pregnancy. Due to danger of masculinization of offspring, nandrolone is
supposed to be avoided by women who are pregnant or nursing.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Gerritsma, E.J., et al. “Virilization of the Voice in Post-Menopausal Women Due to the
Anabolic Steroid Nandrolone Decanoate (Decadurabolin). The Effects of Medication
for One Year.” Clinical Otolaryngology and Allied Sciences 19 (1994): 79–84.
Gold, J., et al. “Safety and Efficacy of Nandrolone Decanoate for Treatment of Wasting
in Patients with HIV Infection.” AIDS 10 (1996): 745–52.
Johansen, K.L., K. Mulligan, and M. Schambelan. “Anabolic Effects of Nandrolone DeNandrolone
317
canoate in Patients Receiving Dialysis: A Randomized Controlled Trial.” Journal
of the American Medical Association 281 (1999): 1275–81.
“Nandrolone Decanoate.” In Therapeutic Drugs, ed. C. Dollery. 2d ed. New York: Churchill
Livingstone, 1999. N28–N30.
Radis, C.D., and K.P. Callis. “Systemic Lupus Erythematosus with Membranous Glomerulonephritis
and Transverse Myelitis Associated with Anabolic Steroid Use.”
Arthritis and Rheumatism 40 (1997): 1899–1902.
Nicotine
Pronunciation: NIK-uh-teen (also pronounced NIK-uh-tin)
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 54-11-5
Formal Names: Habitrol, Nicoderm, Niconil, Nicorette, Nicotiana rustica, Nicotiana
tabacum, Nicotrol, Prostrop, Tobacco
Informal Names: Chip (cigarette mixed with PCP), Fry Daddy (cigarette mixed
with crack cocaine)
Type: Stimulant (pyridine alkaloids class). See page 18
Federal Schedule Listing: Unlisted
USA Availability: Generally available to adults as a component of tobacco products;
nonprescription and prescription in pharmaceutical format
Pregnancy Category: C or D (depending on pharmaceutical format)
Uses. Tobacco’s history is mentioned on page 18. Nicotine is the addictive
drug component of tobacco and is found in other plants as well. Nicotine is
one of the more hazardous drugs, and dosage via tobacco smoke adds still
more peril. Although nicotine has medical uses, characteristics of the natural
product tobacco fall within the criteria of a Schedule I controlled substance.
Nonetheless, federal law explicitly excludes tobacco from such control, making
the tobacco industry legal. At the time this book was written debate was under
way about limiting adult access to nicotine products, a restrictive effort requiring
changes in law.
Traditional medical uses of the drug include treatment of insect bites, skin
and intestinal parasites, vomiting, earache, toothache, runny nose, hernia, and
heart pain. Although tobacco smoking worsens a gastrointestinal inflammation
called Crohn’s disease, medical practice uses nicotine skin patches, oral
capsules, or suppositories to treat inflammation of the colon and rectum
caused by ulcerative colitis. Nicotine chewing gum has been used successfully
to treat finger or toe sores deriving from Buerger’s disease, an affliction in
which blood vessels get blocked off (and which, despite the usefulness of
pharmaceutical nicotine, seems to be worsened by smoking). Pharmaceutical
nicotine helps some persons suffering from the tics of Tourette’s syndrome.
Researchers have found cigarette smoking to reduce the likelihood of getting
preeclampsia, a potentially serious disease of late pregnancy in which women
suffer fluid retention, high blood pressure, and too-high urine protein levels.
Cigarette smoking is also associated with a lower probability of getting ParNicotine
319
kinson’s or Alzheimer’s disease. Even though “association” does not demonstrate
cause and effect, some experiments using pharmaceutical nicotine to
treat those afflictions show positive results. Such results, however, have not
yet given nicotine a generally accepted role in treating those diseases. Nicotine
reduces hunger pains and raises blood sugar, effects that help users eat less
(Native Americans have traditionally chewed tobacco to better endure circumstances
involving little food, water, or rest). Nicotine initially raises blood
pressure, but continued dosage will lower it.
Drawbacks. Tobacco smoking can lead to lung cancer and heart disease.
Many other afflictions are attributed to tobacco smoking: bronchitis, emphysema,
cataracts, mouth cancer, pancreas cancer, bone density loss (making
broken bones more likely), abdominal aortic aneurysm (a sac ballooning out
from the blood vessel wall), brain aneurysm, and gastroesophageal reflux (recurrent
backward flow of acid and partially digested food from the stomach
to the esophagus, making esophageal cancer more likely). One study noted
that smoking tends to produce changes causing women to go through menopause
at a younger age than nonsmokers. Laboratory tests imply that smokeless
tobacco promotes tooth decay. Still more unwanted actions are known,
partly because tobacco has simply been studied so intensively that more is
known about it than is known about many other substances. Whether nicotine
itself causes afflictions produced by tobacco is uncertain. For example, some
investigators suspect that heart disease in smokers comes from carbon monoxide
and tar constituents of smoke rather than the nicotine.
In adults 40 mg to 100 mg of pharmaceutical nicotine can produce fatal
poisoning; an equivalent dose through cigarettes would require a person to
quickly smoke several packs. Smaller dosages can be dangerous for children
who play with nicotine patches or gum or who consume tobacco.
Abuse factors. As with many drugs, persons often find nicotine unpleasant
at first but learn to ignore bad sensations and focus upon effects that are
enjoyed. Experiments examining differences that users perceive in various
drugs find that some sensations from nicotine, amphetamine, and cocaine are
similar, so similar that in one experiment persons receiving injections of nicotine
typically identified it as cocaine. A user can establish a physical dependence
with nicotine, causing withdrawal symptoms if dosage stops:
nervousness, tenseness, crankiness, lightheadedness, broken sleep, weariness,
distractedness, tremors. These symptoms often last a few days, sometimes
longer, and can relate to a person’s expectations (a psychosomatic component).
Debate exists about how addictive nicotine is. A study published in 1994
noted that about 33% of tobacco smokers become addicted. A study published
in 2000 found that 20% to 60% of adolescent smokers are addicted. Many
smokers with no interest in quitting can nonetheless substantially reduce their
cigarette consumption with little difficulty. In contrast, many smokers wanting
to stop find themselves unable to cease, and for them even pharmaceutical
nicotine can be an insufficient replacement for tobacco. Among such persons
the persistence of a smoking habit suggests that something more than the drug
nicotine is involved. Tobacco smoke contains thousands of chemical ingredients
besides nicotine; perhaps some of the less-studied ones are important. In
addition, the paraphernalia and mechanics of cigarette smoking provide a
320 Nicotine
psychological buffer to users, allowing continual brief respites in interactions
with other persons (such as breaking eye contact during a puff). Nicotine itself
is a mild stimulant able to release adrenaline and increase pulse rate and blood
pressure, with the physiological arousal produced by the drug masking physical
arousal provoked by life’s tensions, thereby making smokers feel less nervous
despite the stimulant effects. Smokers tend to have lower levels of body
chemicals that are supplemented by antianxiety and antidepressant drugs.
Such pharmaceuticals, unfortunately, seemingly have little ability to help
smokers quit their tobacco addiction.
As with any addiction, the power of nicotine and tobacco depends upon
needs met by those substances. People do not smoke simply to avoid temporary
withdrawal symptoms. If a person’s life is filled with situations that
smoking eases like nothing else can, breaking the addiction is hard. If a person
finds other ways of dealing adequately with those situations, desire for cigarettes
can go away and never be bothersome again. Contrary to expectations
of researchers, a laboratory test found nicotine to be no more appealing to exsmokers
than to persons who have never smoked—a finding implying that
life circumstances, and not just chemistry, determine this drug’s appeal.
Alcohol and illicit drug abusers reliably tend to be tobacco cigarette smokers,
so reliably that the amount of tobacco use can be used to estimate the
amount of cocaine and opiate usage by persons in drug abuse treatment programs.
An experiment found that persons smoked less tobacco when they had
access to marijuana, suggesting that those persons used the two substances
for similar purposes. Nonsmokers tend to avoid drug abuse, implying that
smokers and nonsmokers use different strategies to cope with life’s challenges.
Cigarette smoking is more prevalent among schizophrenics, seriously depressed
persons, and persons with low-grade psychiatric disturbance that may
lack outward symptoms. Almost two thirds of smokers in one research project
turned out to have a history of present or past psychiatric abnormality.
Among such individuals smoking may be a strategy of self-medication. One
study found that withdrawal symptoms can depend on the extent to which
the drug is used for self-medication.
Improvement has been measured in alertness, energy, and happiness as
cigarette smokers start their day’s consumption in the morning. Conversely,
cutting off a smoker’s supply of cigarettes produces measurable increases in
fatigue, irritation, sadness, stress, and disorientation. New users do not get
favorable effects sought by experienced users but instead have measurable
nausea and general uneasiness. Among new users nicotine reduces job performance
skills such as physical coordination and accuracy in memory tasks—
the opposite of what happens with experienced users.
Although pharmaceutical nicotine has various medical applications, its
main use is for treatment of addiction to tobacco smoking. One authority aptly
described nicotine chewing gum as the methadone of cigarettes, meaning that
such a treatment strategy is intended to switch addicts from tobacco to pharmaceutical
nicotine, just as treatment personnel seek to switch heroin addicts
to methadone. Although such programs may have an official goal of eliminating
a person’s addiction, in practice simply switching a person from a more
harmful drug to a less harmful drug is often considered a success.
Nicotine 321
Drug interactions. Nicotine interacts with commonly used medical drugs.
Antipsychotic drugs and the anti–blood clot medicine heparin flush from the
body faster if a person uses nicotine. Nicotine also reduces the sedative effect
of benzodiazepines and reduces pain relief from various opioids. Cigarette
smoke acts as a monoamine oxidase inhibitor (MAOI), a type of chemical
found in some antidepressants and that can have serious adverse effects when
used simultaneously with some medicines (though acute danger from cigarette
interactions may be small). Caffeine seems to make nicotine more pleasurable.
Rat studies show that nicotine increases alcohol’s appeal and worsens
pancreas inflammation caused by both drugs. Birth control pills increase the
boost that nicotine gives to pulse rate, and some researchers speculate that
such increase is related to the elevated risk of heart disease found among
smokers who use birth control pills.
Cancer. Tests indicate that pure nicotine (as opposed to smoke containing
nicotine) does not cause cancer.
Pregnancy. Smoking reduces female fertility according to most studies of
the topic, and studies of Canadian farm couples and of men in the Netherlands
found an apparent reduction in male fertility as well. Pregnant women who
smoke tobacco increase the chance of miscarriage, premature birth, smaller
full-term infants, and sudden infant death syndrome (SIDS or “crib death”).
The children are more likely to have muscle tone abnormalities. Smoking
harms male and female gametes, damages chromosomes, and can change
DNA in ways linked with childhood cancer. Nicotine usage by a pregnant
woman changes movements and heart action of a fetus. One researcher warns
that nicotine patches or chewing gum may deliver even more nicotine to a
fetus than smoking would. Nicotine enters the milk of nursing mothers. Rat
experiments indicate that fetal exposure to nicotine combined with newborn
exposure to nicotine in milk increases the risk of offspring developing lung
trouble similar to emphysema. Human birth defects have been attributed to
tobacco smoking. Although a study of teenage tobacco smokers did not see
any increased incidence of birth defects in their infants, research based on
animal experimentation and published in 1998 declared that nicotine causes
defects in fetal brain development leading to problems in thinking and learning
that may not become apparent until years after birth. The children tend
to have lower scores on psychological measurements, somewhat reminiscent
of “cocaine babies,” deficits that continue for years. Some investigators see a
link between pregnant smokers and offspring with psychological problems.
Investigators tracking mothers and daughters for three decades found that
daughters were more likely to take up smoking if their mothers smoked during
pregnancy.
Additional information. Scientific studies find that “passive smoking”
threatens health of bystanders who inhale smoke from tobacco products and
exhalations of smokers. A study of spontaneous abortions found them more
likely in pregnant nonsmoking women who inhale environmental smoke and
use a lot of caffeine or a moderate amount of alcohol. Infants from nonsmoker
women who were exposed to tobacco smoke during pregnancy are more likely
to have lower birth weight and persistent pulmonary hypertension. Offspring
also exhibit the same kinds of lower psychological test scores that are seen in
322 Nicotine
children of active smokers. Inhalation of smoke by infants is suspected of
contributing to SIDS. For sure, compared to children in nonsmoking households,
infants of smokers are hospitalized more often for pneumonia and bronchitis.
The level of environmental smoke necessary for ill effects is often
unclear in scientific studies; a person working in a poorly ventilated smokey
bar for eight hours a day will have a considerably different exposure than
someone in a nonsmoking household who sits outside once a week with a
friend who smokes a couple of cigarettes.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Brown, C. “The Association between Depressive Symptoms and Cigarette Smoking in
an Urban Primary Care Sample.” International Journal of Psychiatry in Medicine
30 (2000): 15–26.
Brown, K.G. “Lung Cancer and Environmental Tobacco Smoke: Occupational Risk to
Nonsmokers.” Environmental Health Perspectives 107 (1999, Suppl. 6): 885–90.
Colby, S.M., et al. “Are Adolescent Smokers Dependent on Nicotine? A Review of the
Evidence.” Drug and Alcohol Dependence 59 (2000, Suppl. 1): S83–S95.
Dursun, S.M., and S. Kutcher. “Smoking, Nicotine and Psychiatric Disorders: Evidence
for Therapeutic Role, Controversies and Implications for Future Research.” Medical
Hypotheses 52 (1999): 101–9.
Haustein, K.O. “Cigarette Smoking, Nicotine and Pregnancy.” International Journal of
Clinical Pharmacology and Therapeutics 37 (1999): 417–27.
Parrott, A.C., and F.J. Kaye. “Daily Uplifts, Hassles, Stresses and Cognitive Failures:
In Cigarette Smokers, Abstaining Smokers, and Non-smokers.” Behavioural Pharmacology
10 (1999): 639–46.
Robinson, J.H., and W.S. Pritchard. “The Role of Nicotine in Tobacco Use.” Psychopharmacology
108 (1992): 397–407.
Stolerman, I.P., and M.J. Jarvis. “The Scientific Case That Nicotine Is Addictive.” Psychopharmacology
117 (1995): 2–10.
Van Gilder, T.J., P.L. Remington, and M.C. Fiore. “The Direct Effects of Nicotine Use
on Human Health.” Wisconsin Medical Journal 96 (1997): 43–48.
Nitrite
Pronunciation: NIGH-tright
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 8017-89-8 (amyl nitrite); 542-56-3
(isobutyl nitrite)
Formal Names: Amyl Nitrite, Butyl Nitrite, Cyclohexyl Nitrite, Isoamyl Nitrite,
Isobutyl Nitrite, Nitrous Acid
Informal Names: Aimes, Aimies, Ames, Amys, Army, Aroma of Men, Blackjack,
Blue Heaven, Bolt, Boppers, Buds, Bullet, Buzz Bomb, Climax, Dixcorama,
Hardware, Heart-On, High Ball, Liquid Gold, Liquid Incense, Locker Room,
Man Aroma, Oz, Ozone, Pearls, Poppers, Quicksilver, Ram, Rush, Snappers,
Thrust, Whiteout
Type: Inhalant. See page 26
Federal Schedule Listing: Unlisted, but may be in state schedules
USA Availability: Prescription for some formats; nonprescription for others
Pregnancy Category: X (amyl nitrite, also called isoamyl nitrite)
Uses. Various chemical subvarieties of nitrite inhalants exist. Isobutyl nitrite
is popular in some teenager circles and has been called “the cocaine of poor
people.” Although anyone is physically free to use any drug, authorities find
that nitrite sniffing has particular appeal to male homosexuals, especially during
sexual activity. Aphrodisiac qualities are claimed for the substance. Amyl
nitrite sniffers report euphoria and muscle relaxation. Isobutyl nitrite users
report losing their sense of who they are and also becoming calm or, in contrast,
becoming prone to wild conduct—differences that may illustrate the
impact that someone’s personality and surroundings have on drug experiences.
Regardless of exact content of a nitrite experience, sensations are brief.
Some persons have confused nitrites with nitrates; they have a similar spelling
but are different substances.
Drawbacks. Nitrite inhalants have brief action but may incapacitate a person
during that time and thus should not be used while engaged in dangerous
activity such as driving a car. Unwanted actions of nitrites include feelings of
falling and spinning, headache, facial flushing, rapid heartbeat, generalized
throbbing feelings, and low blood pressure (low enough to make a person
faint). Less common are nausea, vomiting, agitation, sweating, loss of energy
and strength, and loss of bladder and rectal control. In mice experiments involving
single and multiple exposures, inhaling isobutyl nitrite can cause ane324
Nitrite
mia, harm the immune system, create nose and lung abnormalities, and
disturb the spleen. Similar results are seen with rats. Blood and spleen abnormalities
developed in a mice experiment using cyclohexyl nitrite. In a human
patient, sniffing isobutyl nitrite caused bronchitis severe enough to affect
the trachea. Amyl nitrite (which has a long medical history as a heart medicine)
and isobutyl nitrite may each cause methemoglobinemia, a sometimes
fatal blood disease interfering with the body’s use of oxygen; this affliction is
particularly likely if a person drinks isobutyl nitrite instead of inhaling the
vapor. Isobutyl nitrite interference with the body’s ability to use oxygen may
be perilous for persons with inadequate oxygen supply to the heart.
In the early days of AIDS (acquired immunodeficiency syndrome) research,
scientists noticed that many victims were nitrite sniffers. Because of this association,
at one time nitrite sniffing was suspected to be the cause of AIDS,
an excellent example of why association of a chemical with a disease cannot
be assumed to demonstrate a cause-effect relationship. The substance is still,
however, suspected of worsening the progression of AIDS once the disease
strikes. In addition, damage to the immune system caused by nitrite inhalation
is suspected of making a user more susceptible to AIDS and to a type of cancer
called Kaposi’s sarcoma.
Abuse factors. Tolerance to amyl nitrite can develop.
Drug interactions. Although amyl nitrite is used as an antidote for cyanide
poisoning, isobutyl nitrite can interact with coffee in a way that produces
enough cyanide to poison someone who drinks the combination beverage.
Using amyl nitrite with alcohol can cause heart failure. Nitrites are flammable,
making them hazardous around flames or lit cigarettes. Persons with glaucoma
are supposed to avoid amyl nitrite. People report burns caused by isobutyl
nitrite splashing on skin.
Cancer. Laboratory tests and animal experiments (the latter involving longterm
exposure) indicate that isobutyl nitrite liquid and vapor each cause
cancer.
Pregnancy. In the body nitrite breaks down into chemicals that may promote
birth defects. The lower blood pressure produced by amyl nitrite is believed
harmful to a fetus. Whether amyl nitrite passes into the milk of nursing
mothers is unknown.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Bradberry, S.M., et al. “Fatal Methemoglobinemia Due to Inhalation of Isobutyl Nitrite.”
Journal of Toxicology: Clinical Toxicology 32 (1994): 179–84.
Covalla, J.R., C.V. Strimlan, and J.G. Lech. “Severe Tracheobronchitis from Inhalation
of an Isobutyl Nitrite Preparation.” Drug Intelligence and Clinical Pharmacy 15
(1981): 51–52.
Haverkos, H.W., and J. Dougherty. “Health Hazards of Nitrite Inhalants.” American
Journal of Medicine 84 (1988): 479–82.
Haverkos, H.W., et al. “Nitrite Inhalants: History, Epidemiology, and Possible Links
to AIDS.” Environmental Health Perspectives 102 (1994): 858–61.
Israelstam, S., S. Lambert, and G. Oki. “Use of Isobutyl Nitrite as a Recreational Drug.”
British Journal of Addiction to Alcohol and Other Drugs 73 (1978): 319–20.
Nitrite 325
Lange, W.R., and J. Fralich. “Nitrite Inhalants: Promising and Discouraging News.”
British Journal of Addiction 84 (1989): 121–23.
Soderberg, L.S. “Immunomodulation by Nitrite Inhalants May Predispose Abusers to
AIDS and Kaposi’s Sarcoma.” Journal of Neuroimmunology 83 (1998): 157–61.
Nitrous Oxide
Pronunciation: NIGH-truhs OX-eyed
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 10024-97-2
Formal Names: Dinitrogen Monoxide, Dinitrogen Oxide, Entonox
Informal Names: Fall Down, Gas, Hippie Crack, Hysteria, Laughing Gas, Nitro,
Nitrous, Nitrous Acid, Noss, Pan, Shoot the Breeze, Tanks, Thrust, Whippets
Type: Inhalant. See page 26
Federal Schedule Listing: Unlisted
USA Availability: Nonprescription, but sales and usage are controlled in some
jurisdictions
Uses. This drug has been known since the 1720s. Some authorities describe
nitrous oxide as an opioid; some persons even use the gas to counteract effects
from stimulants. Nitrous oxide actions and its recreational use are similar to
those of other inhalants. Recreational use is illegal in some jurisdictions but
has a venerable history. The writer Samuel Taylor Coleridge, thesaurus compiler
Peter Mark Roget, and potter Josiah Wedgwood were all eighteenthcentury
notables who relaxed with nitrous oxide.
Although this substance is a pharmaceutical product, it also occurs naturally.
For instance, eating lettuce generates enough nitrous oxide that scientists
can measure it in a person’s breath. Large quantities are produced by wild
prairie grass. Humans do not receive enough nitrous oxide from such natural
sources to be affected, however. The substance is also produced by the human
body. One study found the amount to increase as oral hygiene declined. As
with the amounts produced by grass and lettuce, the level created by the body
is too small to have any known effect on a person. From a global environmental
perspective, however, nitrous oxide is a gas that promotes the greenhouse
effect and ozone layer destruction, and concern exists about medical
usage affecting the world’s climate. Medical sources are estimated to create
2% of the atmosphere’s supply. Such usage may seem insignificant in that
regard, but the gas is so durable in the atmosphere that any artificial source
has been described as an environmental hazard.
Medically this drug is used as an anesthetic and to relieve pain ranging
from dental work to migraine headache and cancer. In a medical context
nitrous oxide is considered a reliable sedative. Experimental usage to treat
anxiety has been successful, and one authority has noted a therapeutic antiNitrous
Oxide 327
depressant action. The substance has been used to help persons break pentazocine
addiction. Researchers report success in using the gas to ease alcohol,
nicotine, and opioid withdrawal and to reduce craving for alcohol, tobacco,
and marijuana among addicts. The latter three substances are so different
from one another that nitrous oxide’s ability to reduce craving for all of them
is remarkable. Some medical practitioners claim that a single dose of the gas
actually eliminates craving for those substances, but that claim sounds much
like those made for other “miracle cure” addiction treatments over the years
but that turned out to be overly optimistic.
In former times, nitrous oxide was used to fight ear afflictions. For many
years the substance was believed to make hearing more acute, but tests of
hearing ability while using the compound show no improvement—and volunteers
in those tests even felt they had lesser ability to detect soft sounds.
Nitrous oxide can increase pressure in the middle ear, and a case report tells
of treatable hearing loss caused by the drug. Hearing defect has been reported
from recreational use as well.
Typical nitrous oxide actions are tingling, numbness, dreaminess, euphoria,
dysphoria (the opposite of euphoria), altered sensory perceptions, changed
awareness of the body, and different experience of time flow. Although nitrous
oxide is not classified as a hallucinogen, some descriptions of experiences
are indistinguishable from hallucinations, particularly if a user is talented at
creating internal imagery. Some persons claim to achieve mystical insight
while under the drug’s influence. Intoxication from a dose lasts only a few
minutes.
Drawbacks. The substance disrupts learning ability. That action has been
exploited medically to promote amnesia of unpleasant procedures. In a typical
experiment volunteers who inhaled a low dose of the drug showed worsened
reaction time, worsened ability to do arithmetic, and general sedation accompanied
by nervous system depression (as opposed to stimulation). Interference
with driving ability has been noted one-half hour after a dose. In another
experiment volunteers felt stimulated; in still another experiment some individuals
were sedated, and others became stimulated. One group became
weary, uneasy, and confused. Short-term exposure can cause dizziness, nausea,
vomiting, and breathing difficulty. Some recreational users quickly inhale
as much nitrous oxide as possible and hold their breath. This technique causes
a sudden change of pressure inside the lungs and can rupture small interior
structures needed for breathing. Blood pressure can go up or down, depending
on dosage. Users can lose consciousness, which may be hazardous in a
recreational context due to falls or inability to shut off the gas source. The
substance deactivates vitamin B12, an effect that can cause numbness and difficulty
in moving arms and legs. Other results can be impotence and involuntary
discharge of urine and feces. Nitrous oxide interferes with blood
clotting, and long-term exposure has caused blood abnormalities. Persons with
chronic industrial exposure have more kidney and liver disease than usual.
Nitrous oxide can become very cold when released as a gas from a pressurized
container, cold enough to cause frostbite upon meeting skin or throat.
Breathing nitrous oxide without an adequate supply of oxygen can be fatal; a
little in a closed space or a lot from a face mask can suffocate a user. Although
328 Nitrous Oxide
nitrous oxide is called nonflammable, when inhaled it can seep into the abdominal
cavity and bowels, mixing with body gases to create a flammable
combination. If ignited the result would be like setting off an explosive inside
the body; the danger is real enough that surgical personnel administering
nitrous oxide as an anesthetic have been warned about it.
As with many other drugs, effects of nitrous oxide can be influenced by
changes in setting. For example, volunteers who knew what to expect performed
better on tests than persons who had no information about what nitrous
oxide would do to them.
Abuse factors. In tests of the drug’s appeal, people in general chose nitrous
oxide no more often than placebo; such lack of preference is a classic sign of
low addictive potential. One experiment revealed a catch to such findings,
however: Volunteers who enjoyed nitrous oxide effects chose it more often
than placebo, and volunteers who disliked the drug actions chose it less often
than placebo. Thus, overall in the general population the drug might be no
more attractive than placebo, but nonetheless some persons may find it captivating.
Such a finding is consistent with drugs having high abuse potential,
such as heroin; so the fact that persons typically find no attraction in nitrous
oxide does not prove low abuse potential for nitrous oxide. Its nickname “hippie
crack” suggests that users have recognized an abuse potential. Nonetheless,
a medical practitioner who administered the gas as a drug addiction
treatment said that in 15,000 cases not a single addict indicated subsequent
craving for nitrous oxide; such a patient population would be expected to
show particular susceptibility if given a substance with abuse potential. The
same practitioner notes that regardless of theoretical possibilities, 200 years of
experience demonstrate that nitrous oxide is among the least abused drugs.
Tolerance develops in rats. Human experimentation documents tolerance
developing to some effects (such as euphoria and pain relief) but not necessarily
to all.
Drug interactions. In an experiment comparing light drinkers of alcohol to
moderate drinkers, the moderate drinkers found nitrous oxide more appealing.
One group of researchers found that alcohol boosts nitrous oxide effects
and that the drug combination creates effects produced by neither substance
alone. Those researchers concluded, however, that the combination was not
potent enough to have more appeal than nitrous oxide alone. That conclusion
assumes, of course, that drug abusers base their conduct on rational analysis
of scientific findings. In a similar experiment comparing users and nonusers
of marijuana, when given a choice neither group preferred nitrous oxide more
than a placebo, but nitrous oxide effects felt stronger to marijuana users. In
rats ketamine boosts effects from nitrous oxide. In a human medical context
that combination is routine and appears safe, but the combination causes brain
damage in rats. Persons using morphine or other opiates can experience muscle
rigidity when inhaling nitrous oxide, a situation that can interfere with
breathing.
Cancer. Studies do not indicate that nitrous oxide causes cancer in animals.
Whether the drug causes cancer in humans is unknown. Genetic damage similar
to the amount from daily smoking 10 to 20 cigarettes has been found in
Nitrous Oxide 329
health care workers routinely exposed to minuscule amounts of nitrous oxide;
such damage might have a potential for causing cancer.
Pregnancy. Fertility is lower in female rats exposed to nitrous oxide than in
rats having no exposure. Lower fertility has also been observed among female
health care workers with occupational exposure to the gas, and reduced fertility
is also reported for males. Offspring of male mice exposed to nitrous
oxide have weighed less than normal and have not matured as fast as normal.
Birth defects resulted from an experiment exposing pregnant rats to the gas
for 24 hours. When given to pregnant women during childbirth the drug
builds up in the fetal blood and brain; one authority recommends administering
oxygen to any newborn whose mother received nitrous oxide while
giving birth. As the twenty-first century began researchers reported that the
gas might cause permanent fetal and newborn brain damage, a finding in
contrast to previous understanding of the drug. Occupational exposure to nitrous
oxide is associated with smaller infants and lower birth weight and may
increase likelihood of spontaneous abortion. Pregnant and breast-feeding
health workers are advised to avoid rooms where nitrous oxide residues may
contaminate the air. Sperm abnormalities and lower fertility have been noted
in male rats exposed to nitrous oxide. Wives of men exposed to the gas have
shown a higher spontaneous abortion rate, compared to wives of men with
no exposure. The compound is not detected in milk of nursing mothers.
Additional information. “Nitrous acid” is an unstable nitrite substance. The
nickname “nitrous acid” is sometimes used for nitrous oxide, but they are
different substances.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Block, R.I., et al. “Psychedelic Effects of a Subanesthetic Concentration of Nitrous Oxide.”
Anesthesia Progress 37 (1990): 271–76.
Danto, B.L. “A Bag Full of Laughs.” American Journal of Psychiatry 121 (1964): 612–13.
Dohrn, C.S., et al. “Subjective and Psychomotor Effects of Nitrous Oxide in Healthy
Volunteers.” Behavioural Pharmacology 3 (1992): 19–30.
Linden, C.H. “Volatile Substances of Abuse.” Emergency Medicine Clinics of North America
8 (1990): 559–78.
Temple, W.A., D.M. Beasley, and D.J. Baker. “Nitrous Oxide Abuse from Whipped
Cream Dispenser Chargers.” New Zealand Medical Journal 110 (1997): 322–23.
Yagiela, J.A. “Health Hazards and Nitrous Oxide: A Time for Reappraisal.” Anesthesia
Progress 38 (1991): 1–11.
Zacny, J.P., et al. “Examining the Subjective, Psychomotor and Reinforcing Effects of
Nitrous Oxide in Healthy Volunteers: A Dose-Response Analysis.” Behavioural
Pharmacology 7 (1996): 194–99.
Nutmeg
Pronunciation: NUT-mehg
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 84082-68-8
Formal Names: Mace, Myristica fragrans
Type: Hallucinogen. See page 25
Federal Schedule Listing: Unlisted
USA Availability: Nonprescription (food)
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. Nutmeg is a familiar spice, but when used in larger amounts, it can
act as a drug. Nutmeg originated in the Spice Islands of Indonesia. It is a seed
coming from an evergreen tree that can reach 45 feet in height. Folk medicine
uses nutmeg for treating insomnia, mouth sores, stomach inflammation, gas,
diarrhea, and vomiting. Animal research verifies the antiinsomnia and antidiarrhea
properties; they have been observed among humans undergoing formal
medical care, and recreational users mention sleep-inducing action. The
substance is also used as an aphrodisiac, and laboratory tests show that it kills
headlice. Nutmeg may be able to help improve dysentery, infections, and
rheumatism. In rabbit experiments, nutmeg lowered cholesterol levels and
aided in coughing up mucus. Nutmeg, like many other spices, has antimicrobial
actions that appear to retard spoilage of unrefrigerated food.
Nutmeg can produce false positives for marijuana in a field test that law
enforcement officers have used to identify an unknown substance, but of
course more sophisticated laboratory examination can correct such an error.
Drawbacks. A nutmeg dose sufficient to produce hallucinations is also sufficient
to produce headache, thirst, nausea, constipation, rapid heartbeat, dizziness,
and a miserable hangover. Muscular discoordination can be severe
enough to mimic multiple sclerosis. Research on cats produced liver destruction.
All these results are from dosage quantities much higher than the small
amounts used for spicing foods.
Abuse factors. Nutmeg is not considered addictive, although a case report
notes a patient hospitalized for nutmeg poisoning, who craved the substance
so much that he had a supply smuggled to him during his hospital stay. The
report said he was never able to go beyond two weeks without nutmeg.
Some researchers are skeptical that nutmeg possesses hallucinogenic qualities,
but for centuries numerous users have said otherwise. Betel chewers
Nutmeg 331
sometimes add nutmeg to a quid for extra sensations, and mixing tobacco
with nutmeg is a practice reported in Asia. Research indicates that human
body chemistry converts part of a nutmeg dose into substances related to
amphetamine, affecting mood and sometimes causing hallucinations. The effects
from a dose can last three days. Overdose requiring medical intervention
is possible, although only one fatality is recorded. Nutmeg has received mixed
reviews as a recreational drug. Some people call it incomparable; others resort
to it only as an act of desperation when nothing else is available. A favorable
description says nutmeg is “capable of removing one completely from the
world of reality in a hypnotic trance accompanied by golden dreams and
euphoric bliss.”1 In contrast, someone who used nutmeg together with marijuana
received emergency hospital treatment for gagging, hot and cold flashes,
numbness, blurred vision, double vision, triple vision, and difficulty in controlling
movements—among other complaints. Persons who use nutmeg by
itself have also reported bad experiences.
Drug interactions. In a mice experiment nutmeg boosted actions of alcohol
and reduced those of dextroamphetamine. One authority describes nutmeg
as a weak monoamine oxidase inhibitor (MAOI), and MAOIs interact badly
with many drugs described in this book.
Cancer. A laboratory test using a nutmeg extract found evidence that it
might cause cancer, and a nutmeg experiment with mice produced DNA
changes that might be related to eventual cancer.
Pregnancy. Male mice that received nutmeg in an experiment did not show
chromosome damage. A case report notes a normal full-term infant born to a
woman who had experienced nutmeg poisoning during pregnancy, but pregnant
women are advised to avoid using nutmeg as a drug.
Additional information. As with many other natural products, nutmeg’s
effects may be produced by the combination of hundreds of chemicals found
in the substance. Researchers have identified several chemicals as likely causes
of nutmeg’s effects: elemicin, eugenol, myristicin, and safrole. Under laboratory
conditions myristicin can be chemically converted to MDMA and safrole
to MDA, but this conversion has never been detected in animals or humans.
Body chemistry does convert myristicin into substances resembling amphetamine.
Myristicin is found not only in nutmeg but in plants related to carrots.
An experiment testing myristicin on rats found no poisonous result. Researchers
found no evidence of cancer after dosing mice with the substance, but the
study did not last long enough to reveal whether cancer would eventually
develop. Myristicin’s potential for causing birth defects is unknown. Safrole
has a faint ability to promote cancer; pregnant women are advised to avoid
using it as a drug.
Mace comes from the same seed as nutmeg does, but is a different spice.
Folk medicine uses mace to reduce inflammation and pain; research indicates
it can protect against some chemically caused cancers. Mace is routinely added
to areca nut quids.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Fras, I., and J.J. Friedman. “Hallucinogenic Effects of Nutmeg in Adolescent.” New York
State Journal of Medicine 69 (1969): 463–65.
332 Nutmeg
Lewis, P.W., and D.W. Patterson. “Acute and Chronic Effects of the Voluntary Inhalation
of Certain Commercial Volatile Solvents by Juveniles.” Journal of Drug
Issues 4 (1974): 172.
Lewis, W.H., and M.P.F. Elvin-Lewis. Medical Botany: Plants Affecting Man’s Health. New
York: John Wiley & Sons, 1977. 408–10.
Panayotopoulos, D.J., and D.D. Chisholm. “Hallucinogenic Effect of Nutmeg.” British
Medical Journal 1 (1970): 754.
Sjoholm, A., A. Lindberg, and M. Personne. “Acute Nutmeg Intoxication.” Journal of
Internal Medicine 243 (1998): 329–31.
Van Gils, C., and P.A. Cox. “Ethnobotany of Nutmeg in the Spice Islands.” Journal of
Ethnopharmacology 42 (1994): 117–24.
Weiss, G. “Hallucinogenic and Narcotic-Like Effects of Nutmeg.” Psychiatric Quarterly
34 (1960): 346–56.
Note
1. W.H. Lewis and M.P.F. Elvin-Lewis, Medical Botany: Plants Affecting Man’s Health
(New York: John Wiley & Sons, 1977), 408.
Opium
Pronunciation: OH-pi-uhm
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 8008-60-4
Formal Names: Papaver album, Papaver somniferum, Poppy
Informal Names: Ah-pen-yen, Aunti, Aunti Emma, Big O, Black, Blackjack, Black
Pill, Black Stuff, Chandoo, Chandu, Chinese, Chinese Molasses, Chinese Tobacco,
Chocolate, Cruz, Dopium, Dover, Dover’s Deck, Dover’s Powder,
Dreamer, Dream Gun, Dreams, Dream Stick, Easing Powder, Emma, Fi-Do-Nie,
Garden-Poppy, Gee, God’s Medicine, Goma, Gondola, Gong, Goric, Great Tobacco,
Gum, Guma, Hard Stuff, Hocus, Hop, Indonesian Bud, Joy, Joy Plant,
Mawseed, Midnight Oil, Mira, Mud, O, Oil, OJ, OP, Ope, Pen Yan, Pen Yen,
PG, Pin Gon, Pin Yen, Plant, PO, Pox, Skee, Tar, Tongs, Tox, Toxy, Toys, When-
Shee, Winshee, Yen Shee Suey, Ze, Zero
Type: Depressant (opiate class). See page 22
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule II (DEA no. 9600)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. Many opium products are discussed elsewhere in this book, but here
we are dealing with the substance from which all those products originate.
Opium has long been used to relieve pain, fight coughs, cure diarrhea, and
control spasms. Traditionally, opium is dried sap harvested from the seedproducing
portion of opium poppy plants. At harvest time fields of poppies
can have a strong smell, and children in the fields can be overcome by those
airborne chemicals. A modern opium variety is “poppy straw,” composed of
dry or liquid extracts from the plant. The natural product can be used by itself
or can be refined to produce various drugs known as “opiates,” valued for
their medicinal effects.
Archaeologists have found evidence of opium poppy cultivation dating
from 15,000 years ago, but examination of historical records has not proven
that ancient peoples understood opium’s medicinal benefits; the product may
have been used traditionally but without understanding how or even whether
it worked. Opium may have been used in Roman Empire religious ceremonies,
perhaps exploiting the drug’s effects to symbolize a process of death and reincarnation,
and even older records imply that ancients may have believed
334 Opium
that opium could produce happiness, although evidence of ancient recreational
use is nonexistent.
The Opium War from 1840 to 1842 was the first drug war, followed by the
second Opium War of 1856 to 1860. These military conflicts were fought
against China by England and other European powers in order to force the
Chinese government to legalize the opium trade (certainly a goal different
from that of the “drug war” familiar to Americans as the twenty-first century
began).
Opium and its morphine component were widely used to treat wounded
soldiers in the American Civil War, and later historians have routinely said
that addiction became so common that it was called “the soldier’s disease.”
Such illness may have existed, but an investigator who diligently examined
medical writings from that time found none that attributed postwar addictions
to war-related medical use. In that era the opium trade was legal, and someone
who analyzed opium import statistics found no evidence that consumption
rose due to Civil War addictions; a distinguished authority has noted that
people of that era called dysentery “the soldier’s disease.”
Just before World War I an article in the Journal of the American Medical
Association declared, “If the entire materia medica at our disposal were limited
to the choice and use of only one drug, I am sure that a great many, if not
the majority, of us would choose opium; and I am convinced that if we were
to select, say half a dozen of the most important drugs in the Pharmacopeia,
we should all place opium in the first rank.”1 Although many useful drugs
have been discovered since then, opium is still the basis for many standard
medications. Because opium is a natural product, its morphine content can
vary greatly from batch to batch. Opium commercially processed for medical
use is adjusted so that 10% of any given amount of medical opium is composed
of morphine.
Although medical opinion about opium has changed little, public opinion
has changed a lot. Reasons for that shift go beyond the scope of this book,
but in the nineteenth century, use of opium and its derivatives had wide social
approval in America. Alcohol was considered more hazardous to health and
home. One of the most telling measures of approval came from the life insurance
industry in India, which freely granted policies to known opium
users, as mortality statistics showed opium having no effect on life span. A
life insurance official reported similar experience in China, although older
users in China had higher mortality than older nonusers (probably many users
took the drug for diseases that nonusers did not have, with the death rate
related more to those diseases than to opium). Some of those statistics would
change as the twentieth century progressed because drug laws would change
the kinds of people who used opium, thereby associating opium with populations
having higher mortality for reasons unrelated to opium’s drug properties.
Although identified with China, opium has been grown in the United States.
In the late eighteenth century Benjamin Franklin used laudanum (typically
wine laced with opium) to treat himself for kidney stones. During the nineteenth
century Americans used opium mainly as an ingredient in laudanum
and paregoric. Paregoric is a liquid including anise, camphor, and opium.
Opium 335
Paregoric was first produced in the eighteenth century as an asthma medicine.
The compound is no longer used for that purpose but can reduce lung congestion
by helping people to cough up mucus. Paregoric is a standard diarrhea
remedy and is used to help infants suffering from drug withdrawal syndromes.
In the 1960s the compound had a flurry of popularity among opiate
addicts who would process the product in hopes of isolating the opium, then
inject the substance they produced. The outcomes were typical of what happens
when oral medications are injected, resulting in lung damage and disfiguring
injuries to injection sites.
Less familiar modern opium preparations include home remedy mixtures
of the substance with caffeine, aspirin, and acetaminophen (Tylenol or other
brands). In America opium preparations were once a standard method of quieting
noisy infants and children, and that practice is still followed in some
parts of the world. One hazard in that custom is the possibility of fatal overdose,
as people administering such concoctions do not always understand
pediatric dosage.
Drawbacks. Although some opium users have generally unhealthy lifestyles,
few ailments have been attributed solely to the drug. Those ailments
tend to be in the gastrointestinal tract, such as problems with the small intestine’s
bile duct. “Cauliflower ear,” in which an ear thickens and becomes misshapen,
was once associated with opium smoking. The affliction, however,
apparently came not from the drug but rather from the habit of lying down
for hours in a comatose condition with an ear pressing against a hard surface.
Abuse factors. Recreational use of opium is harder to define than we might
think, because even if persons take the drug in a social setting, they can be
seeking to reduce mental anxiety or physical pain, which is not the same as
using a drug for fun. Some people swallow dry opium or drink tea made with
seed or with dried heads of poppy flowers. In the nineteenth century poppy
tea was a common medicinal drink, but in the early twenty-first century the
habit tends to be limited to opiate addicts. The traditional recreational way to
use opium is to inhale its smoke. Heating opium enough to make it smoke
can reduce the drug content, and opium is already far weaker than substances
refined from it (such as morphine and heroin). One authority estimates that
the amount of active drug inhaled by someone who smokes a given weight
of opium will typically be 300 to 400 times less than the drug content in the
same weight of injected heroin. Moreover, while an entire dose of heroin
might be ingested in a few seconds, a pipeful of opium is smoked over a
much longer period to slowly savor its effects, further reducing the opium’s
impact. The English poet Samuel Taylor Coleridge started out using opium
for medical purposes, as did Thomas De Quincey, and both men produced
classic accounts of hallucinations and creative inspiration occurring under
opium’s influence. Those accounts and later ones may well be true, but for
such results people need to be particularly sensitive to the drug and also be
prone to such experiences regardless of pharmaceutical encouragement. Arsenic
is sometimes added to opium to increase smokers’ interest in sexual
activity, a practice generating reports of arsenic poisoning among users.
Drug interactions. Not enough scientific information to report about the
336 Opium
natural product, although many studies have examined drug interactions with
opiates and opioids.
Cancer. Laboratory tests find that opium smoke may cause cancer, as may
opium dross (waste products, such as scrapings from the inside of an opium
pipe, which some persons chew or suck). Opium is suspected of causing
esophageal and bladder cancer.
Pregnancy. A pregnant woman using paregoric can give birth to an infant
having dependence with opium.
Additional information. Seed from opium poppies is a food product commonly
used in breads, cakes, and candies. Consumption of amounts found in
a normal meal can cause a false opiate positive in drug screens; controversy
exists about whether further analysis of results from such testing can show
that poppy seed was the cause. Poppy seed oil is a comparatively unfamiliar
product, but animal tests indicate it has good potential for human nutrition.
In some parts of the world iodized poppy seed oil has been used instead of
iodized salt to treat goiter and has been suggested as a means of preventing
nervous endemic cretinism caused by iodine deficiency in the diet of pregnant
women. Iodized poppy seed oil is taken up by cancerous portions of a liver,
giving the substance clinical usefulness if anticancer drugs are blended into
it, as the drugs then concentrate exactly where they are needed in the liver.
Results from animal research have led investigators to speculate that consuming
normal poppy seed oil may help prevent cancer.
Opium lettuce is not related to opium but can produce mild sensations
similar to opium. Sedative and pain relief qualities of opium lettuce have been
used for centuries. Lung and urinary tract afflictions have been treated with
it. Opium lettuce is smoked for recreational purposes, but results have not
caused the practice to gain popularity. A case report tells of individuals who
received medical care after injecting a preparation made from the plant. It has
other names including Acrid Lettuce, Bitter Lettuce, Compass Plant, Great
Lettuce, Green Endive, Lactucarium, Lactuca virosa, Poison Lettuce, Prickly
Lettuce, Strong-Scented Lettuce, and Wild Lettuce.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Aurin, M. “Chasing the Dragon: The Cultural Metamorphosis of Opium in the United
States, 1825–1935.” Medical Anthropology Quarterly 14 (2000): 414–41.
Gharagozlou, H., and M.T. Behin. “Frequency of Psychiatric Symptoms among 150
Opium Addicts in Shiraz, Iran.” International Journal of the Addictions 14 (1979):
1145–49.
Goodhand, J. “From Holy War to Opium War? A Case Study of the Opium Economy
in North-Eastern Afghanistan.” Disasters 24 (2000): 87–102.
Haller, J.S. “Opium Usage in Nineteenth Century Therapeutics.” Bulletin of the New
York Academy of Medicine 65 (1989): 591–607.
Kalant, H. “Opium Revisited: A Brief Review of Its Nature, Composition, Non-Medical
Use and Relative Risks.” Addiction 92 (1997): 267–77.
Lerner, A.M., and F.J. Oerther. “Characteristics and Sequelae of Paregoric Abuse.” Annals
of Internal Medicine 65 (1966): 1019–30.
Quinones, M.A. “Drug Abuse during the Civil War (1861–1865).” International Journal
of the Addictions 10 (1975): 1007–20.
Opium 337
Strang, J. “Lessons from an English Opium Eater: Thomas De Quincey Reconsidered.”
International Journal of the Addictions 25 (1990): 1455–65.
Note
1. 64 (February 6, 1915): 477.
Oxandrolone
Pronunciation: ok-SAN-droh-lohn
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 53-39-4
Formal Names: Anatrophill, Anavar, Lipidex, Lonavar, Oxandrin, Provitar, Vasorome
Type: Anabolic steroid. See page 24
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule III (DEA no. 4000)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: X
Uses. This drug is used to encourage return of adequate heaviness in persons
who have lost too much weight from illness, injury, or medical therapy.
Experiments with AIDS (acquired immunodeficiency syndrome) patients measured
substantial improvement in weight and strength. Oxandrolone may diminish
pain from a bone disease called osteoporosis, although the drug has
potential for worsening the underlying bone affliction. In rats and in humans
the drug has hastened healing of wounds. Experimental therapy using oxandrolone
against Duchenne muscular dystrophy has been successful.
Drawbacks. Nausea and diarrhea are among the less serious reports of unwanted
effects. The substance can masculinize female users and interfere with
menstrual periods. In immature rats oxandrolone has drastically interfered
with the male reproductive system, a finding that may be relevant to young
athletes using the compound without medical supervision. In humans the substance
can promote prostate disease and should be avoided by men with
breast cancer and generally by anyone with kidney disease (although doctors
sometimes give oxandrolone to dialysis patients). The drug has been used to
treat hepatitis in alcoholics despite its ability to interfere with bile flow and
to cause jaundice or liver malfunction. Fluid retention can occur and be a
serious problem for heart patients. Other unwanted effects may include overall
higher cholesterol levels (accompanied by reduction of the HDL “good
cholesterol”), although unlike some other drugs of this type, oxandrolone has
been seen to reduce levels of triglycerides (which are associated with increased
risk of heart attack and stroke), and in some cases oxandrolone reduced overall
cholesterol as well. Such effects may, however, depend upon what causes
the original levels. Oxandrolone can bring about premature bone maturation
in children, preventing attainment of normal adult height. Nonetheless, the
Oxandrolone 339
compound is used to treat delayed puberty in boys, increasing their height
and weight. Turner’s syndrome interferes with height and sexual maturation
in girls, deficits that have improved with oxandrolone therapy.
Abuse factors. Sports competitors are forbidden to use the substance. Violation
of the ban may risk punishment for nothing: Even though oxandrolone
can promote muscle mass, a study examining users and nonusers of oxandrolone
found no difference between the two groups in muscle mass, strength,
and general fitness. Athletes who abuse oxandrolone may suffer bad psychological
effects. In one case a person became hyperactive and had racing
thoughts. In another case someone abusing this and other steroids became
suspicious of other people, rageful, and occasionally suicidal.
An addiction case report mentioned not only psychological craving for oxandrolone
and other anabolic steroids but physical dependence as well. When
the bodybuilder in question received a dose of a substance that provokes
withdrawal symptoms in opiate addiction, he responded with classic opiate
withdrawal signs.
Drug interactions. Oxandrolone can alter insulin needs of diabetics and
boost actions of anti–blood clot medicines. The steroid can help rats survive
an overdose of meprobamate or nicotine.
Cancer. Potential for causing cancer is unknown. A case report associates
oxandrolone with development of colon cancer in a 27-year-old bodybuilder.
Pregnancy. Potential for causing birth defects is unknown. In animal studies
testing oxandrolone at nine times the normal human dose, fetal injury has
occurred, including introduction of male characteristics into a female fetus.
Pregnant women are advised to avoid the drug. Oxandrolone’s ability to pass
into milk of nursing mothers is unknown.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Frasier, S.D. “Androgens and Athletes.” American Journal of Diseases of Children 125
(1973): 479–80.
Freinhar, J.P., and W. Alvarez. “Androgen-Induced Hypomania.” Journal of Clinical
Psychiatry 46 (1985): 354–55.
Levien, T.L., and D.E. Baker. “Reviews of Trimetrexate and Oxandrolone.” Hospital
Pharmacy 29 (1994): 696–702.
Mendenhall, C.L., et al. “Short-Term and Long-Term Survival in Patients with Alcoholic
Hepatitis Treated with Oxandrolone and Prednisolone.” New England Journal
of Medicine 311 (1984): 1464–70.
Rosenfeld, R.G., et al. “Six-Year Results of a Randomized, Prospective Trial of Human
Growth Hormone and Oxandrolone in Turner Syndrome.” Journal of Pediatrics
121 (1992): 49–55.
Taiwo, B.O. “HIV-Associated Wasting: Brief Review and Discussion of the Impact of
Oxandrolone.” AIDS Patient Care and STDs 14 (2000): 421–25.
Wilson, D.M., et al. “Oxandrolone Therapy in Constitutionally Delayed Growth and
Puberty.” Pediatrics 96 (1995): 1095–1100.
Oxazepam
Pronunciation: ox-A-zeh-pam (also pronounced ox-AZ-eh-pam)
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 604-75-1
Formal Names: Anxiolit, Serax, Serenid D
Type: Depressant (benzodiazepine class). See page 21
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule IV (DEA no. 2835)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. This substance is a metabolite of diazepam, temazepam, chlordiazepoxide,
and clorazepate dipotassium. Oxazepam’s primary medical usage is
to fight insomnia, hostility, and anxiety. Some researchers have found the drug
also works against depression. Studies show oxazepam, diazepam, and flunitrazepam
to have about the same therapeutic effects, though not the same
strengths (oxazepam being the weakest). In the 1990s a survey of pharmacies
in Cracow, Poland, illustrated oxazepam’s worldwide popularity; around 14%
of benzodiazepine prescriptions were for oxazepam, predominantly to
women. One advantage of the drug is its safe “therapeutic ratio,” meaning
that the amount needed to produce a desired medical effect is far below the
amount needed to produce a poisonous effect. Thus medical practitioners have
considerable flexibility in adjusting dosage to an exact amount needed by a
patient.
Experimental use against tinnitus (ringing in the ears) has been promising.
Sometimes oxazepam is the preferred antianxiety medicine for alcoholics suffering
from cirrhosis, because a fully functioning liver is unnecessary to flush
the substance from the body. Oxazepam is used to alleviate alcohol withdrawal
syndrome and has been used to treat neuroses and schizophrenia.
Oxazepam is considered appropriate for short-term treatment of agitation in
elderly persons suffering from dementia. Tests indicate the drug can reduce
hostility as well as anxiety, an ability that would set oxazepam apart from
other benzodiazepines. In a cat experiment, however, the drug increased predator
behavior. The drug makes mice more combative. Rats kill more mice
when dosed with oxazepam, but researchers interpret that result as illustrating
potency of the drug rather than indicating it would promote aggression in
humans. Human oxazepam reactions that increase hostility and combativeness
are unusual and unexplained, although factors may include size and freOxazepam
341
quency of dose along with inherent personalities of users. Hostile human reactions
are “paradoxical” effects, meaning they are the opposite of what
normally happens after taking an oxazepam dose.
Drawbacks. While under the drug’s influence people exhibit memory trouble.
Oxazepam lowers body temperature in mice and rats. Case reports tell of
oxazepam causing blisters or other skin eruptions on people. In mice the substance
boosts the poisonous action of the cancer medicine ifosfamide. Some
experiments using oxazepam to induce sleep find no hangover effect on persons’
performance the next day, but that result is not invariable; size of dose
appears relevant. An experiment testing the drug’s effect on vigilance (an
important ability when driving a car) found normal ability while persons were
under the influence of a low dose. Another experiment using a dose four times
greater did find vigilance impairment. Still another experiment showed slower
movements.
Abuse factors. One reviewer of the drug’s characteristics reported that it
may have less addictiveness than diazepam. In one study opiate addicts found
oxazepam no more attractive than a placebo. In another study sedative abusers
judged the drug less attractive than diazepam and indeed mistakenly identified
oxazepam as a placebo one third of the time (a mistake they almost
never made with diazepam) and even considered a placebo more appealing
than oxazepam about one fifth of the time (a preference never occurring with
diazepam). A similar experiment in which drug abusers compared oxazepam,
diazepam, and placebo produced comparable results.
An animal research study found no tolerance produced by the drug. Monkeys,
however, exhibit signs of tolerance, dependence, and withdrawal after
taking the drug for a week or two. One human study found tolerance but no
withdrawal symptoms. Nonetheless, melancholy, mood swings, confusion,
anxiousness, panic, and seizures have been observed when doses of the drug
stopped abruptly. Some of those “withdrawal symptoms,” however, are also
conditions for which the drug is prescribed; so emergence of those conditions
upon stopping the drug may simply mean the underlying conditions were not
cured. A case report recounts a rare instance of someone having visual hallucinations
while undergoing oxazepam withdrawal. Tapering oxazepam does
not necessarily prevent abstinence symptoms, but symptoms have been controlled
by substituting another drug. One authority warns that stopping oxazepam
can be as touchy as stopping barbiturates. In the 1980s a health official
in Australia portrayed oxazepam dependence as a growing problem. In contrast,
another authority reviewing oxazepam’s history for a medical journal
found only four accounts of human dependence on the drug and declared
withdrawal symptoms to be unusual upon sudden stoppage. This reviewer
speculated that oxazepam’s slow delivery of drug effects and its tendency to
make people dizzy if a lot is consumed help discourage abuse.
Drug interactions. A driving skills test showed that oxazepam worsens impairment
induced by alcohol. Cigarette smoking shortens the time span that
an oxazepam dose stays in the body. A mouse study found that animals could
withstand higher doses of morphine and methadone if oxazepam was also
used.
Cancer. Findings about oxazepam’s potential for causing human cancer
342 Oxazepam
have been inconclusive. Gene mutations would be a possible sign that cancer
might eventually emerge; some laboratory tests show that the drug does not
cause gene mutations, but genetic mutations were apparent after a six-month
administration of the drug to mice. Oxazepam is described as causing liver
cancer in mice. Researchers testing the drug on rats concluded that an unclear
potential for causing cancer exists, but their uncertain conclusion was partly
based on some dosages so high that apparently they were fatal to various
individual animals.
Pregnancy. Experiments have exposed mice to oxazepam during fetal development,
and assorted differences in their behavior (compared to mice with
no exposure) have been documented, including decreased sociability and decreased
interaction with surroundings. What those differences might mean in
a human context is unclear. Experimental evidence indicates that prenatal exposure
to oxazepam may harm a mouse’s learning ability and temporarily
slow growth. In humans the drug passes from a pregnant woman into the
fetus. A survey of 4,014 instances of birth defects in the Netherlands from
1981 to 1994 found an association between oxazepam and cleft lip. The same
association was found in Finland a few years earlier. Mice experiments have
also produced head and mouth malformations, but the doses involved were
far higher than humans would be expected to take.
Oxazepam is considered to have less impact than other benzodiazepines on
a nursing mother’s milk supply. Two nursing mothers who had measurable
levels of oxazepam in their blood had no evidence of the substance in their
milk. A case report tells of a nursing mother whose milk contained about 4.7%
of her oxazepam dosage, with no apparent effect on the infant. In other cases,
not even 0.001% of the oxazepam dose taken by a mother passed into her
milk.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Ayd, F.J., Jr. “Oxazepam: Update 1989.” International Clinical Psychopharmacology 5
(1990): 1–15.
Bliding, A. “The Abuse Potential of Benzodiazepines with Special Reference to Oxazepam.”
Acta Psychiatrica Scandinavica. Supplementum, no. 274 (1978): 111–16.
Bucher, J.R., et al. “Toxicity and Carcinogenicity Studies of Oxazepam in the Fischer
344 Rat.” Toxicological Sciences 42 (1998): 1–12.
Fouks, L., et al. “The Clinical Activity of Oxazepam.” Acta Psychiatrica Scandinavica.
Supplementum, no. 274 (1978): 99–103.
Griffiths, R.R., et al. “Comparison of Diazepam and Oxazepam: Preference, Liking and
Extent of Abuse.” Journal of Pharmacology and Experimental Therapeutics 229
(1984): 501–8.
Mewaldt, S.P., M.M. Ghoneim, and J.V. Hinrichs. “The Behavioral Actions of Diazepam
and Oxazepam Are Similar.” Psychopharmacology 88 (1986): 165–71.
Vaisanen, E., and E. Jalkanen. “A Double-Blind Study of Alprazolam and Oxazepam
in the Treatment of Anxiety.” Acta Psychiatrica Scandinavica 75 (1987): 536–41.
Oxycodone
Pronunciation: ox-i-KOH-dun
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 76-42-6 (Hydrochloride form 124-
90-3)
Formal Names: Endocet, Endocodone, Endodan, M-Oxy, Oxycet, Oxycocet,
OxyContin, OxyFast, OxyIR, Percocet, Percodan, Percodan-Demi, Percolone,
Roxicet, Roxicodone, Roxilox, Roxiprin, Supeudol, Tylox
Informal Names: Oxicotten, Oxy, Oxycotton, Oxy 80s, Percs
Type: Depressant (opiate class). See page 19
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule II (DEA no. 9143)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: B
Uses. This drug is considered more addictive than codeine, from which
oxycodone is derived. Some authorities say oxycodone comes from thebaine,
which is correct also, because thebaine is the parent chemical that yields codeine.
Oxycodone is anywhere from 7 to 12 times stronger than codeine and
about 0.3 to 2.2 times the strength of morphine, depending on the way the
drugs are used. Body chemistry transforms part of an oxycodone dose into
oxymorphone. Patients have found pain relief from oxycodone to be as satisfactory
as relief from ketamine and morphine. Oxycodone has been used
successfully to reduce pain from dentistry, surgery, cancer, and osteoarthritis
(a painful disease of a person’s joints). The drug is also used as a sedative
and as a cough suppressant. It is sometimes prescribed for “restless leg syndrome,”
an affliction in which persons keep moving their arms and legs
around. The drug has also reduced tics associated with Tourette’s syndrome.
Oxycodone can relax people and at times even create euphoria. Some researchers
speculate that oxycodone’s euphoric effects may improve patients’
sensation of pain relief, making the substance more effective for that purpose
than a drug that lacks euphoric effects. The drug works an antidepressant for
some persons.
Blood levels from a given dose of oxycodone tend to be about 25% higher
in females than in males. The cause is unknown, but the difference apparently
has no impact on medical usage.
Drawbacks. Unwanted effects include nausea, vomiting, constipation, itching,
sweating, sleepiness, reduced sex drive, general weakness, impairment of
344 Oxycodone
breathing, and momentary low blood pressure when a person stands up. One
study found the drug to impair breathing more than various other opiates do,
and in another study, doses of oxycodone had to be stopped lest the volunteers
be harmed by further breathing difficulty. Normally the drug should be
avoided if a person suffers from pancreatitis, enlarged prostate, difficulty with
urination, or poorly functioning thyroid or adrenal glands. Experimenters
have demonstrated that the drug reduces physical and mental abilities needed
for driving automobiles.
Abuse factors. The drug’s potential for abuse is considered the same as
morphine’s, and oxycodone is a sought-after product among opiate abusers.
A study that reviewed medical records found no evidence of tolerance developing
in a medical context. Regardless of whether people use the drug
medically or recreationally, dependence can develop, followed by withdrawal
symptoms if dosage stops suddenly. Withdrawal symptoms are described as
minor and can be avoided by gradually discontinuing the drug instead of
suddenly stopping it or by administering clonidine, a substance normally used
to control high blood pressure.
Drug interactions. People should use oxycodone cautiously if they are also
taking antihistamines, various antidepressants, or a monoamine oxidase inhibitor
(MAOI, found in some antidepressants and other medicine). Combining
those sorts of drugs with oxycodone can produce excessive effects. The
same is true of alcohol. Oxycodone also seems to interact with cyclosporine,
a substance used to suppress an individual’s immune system (an effect useful
in preventing rejection of organs in transplant patients).
Cancer. Oxycodone’s potential for causing cancer is unknown.
Pregnancy. Oxycodone is believed to pose a small risk of causing birth defects,
but safety for administration during pregnancy has not been determined.
An examination of medical records found a slightly higher likelihood of birth
defects if pregnant women use oxycodone, but, unlike most drugs associated
with malformations, no particular type of birth defect appeared after using
oxycodone. That suggests the drug might not be responsible for the observed
abnormalities.
Newborns may have dependence on the drug if their mothers have been
taking it during pregnancy. Enough of the drug can pass into a woman’s milk
to cause dependence in a breast-feeding infant.
Combination products. Tylox contains sodium metabisulfite, to which asthmatics
and other persons may have a serious allergic reaction, and should be
used cautiously if the user is sensitive to sulfites.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Kalso, E., and A. Vainio. “Morphine and Oxycodone Hydrochloride in the Management
of Cancer Pain.” Clinical Pharmacology and Therapeutics 47 (1990): 639–46.
Saarialho-Kere, U., M.J. Mattila, and T. Seppala. “Psychomotor, Respiratory and Neuroendocrinological
Effects of a Mu-Opioid Receptor Agonist (Oxycodone) in
Healthy Volunteers.” Pharmacology and Toxicology 65 (1989): 252–57.
Schick, B., et al. “Preliminary Analysis of First Trimester Exposure to Oxycodone and
Hydrocodone.” Reproductive Toxicology 10 (1996): 162.
Oxycodone 345
Stoll, A.L., and S. Rueter. “Treatment Augmentation with Opiates in Severe and Refractory
Major Depression.” American Journal of Psychiatry 156 (1999): 2017.
Walters, A.S., et al. “Successful Treatment of the Idiopathic Restless Legs Syndrome in
a Randomized Double-Blind Trial of Oxycodone versus Placebo.” Sleep 16 (1993):
327–32.
Ytterberg, S.R., M.L. Mahowald, and S.R. Woods. “Codeine and Oxycodone Use in
Patients with Chronic Rheumatic Disease Pain.” Arthritis and Rheumatism 41
(1998): 1603–12.
Oxymetholone
Pronunciation: ok-see-METH-ah-lohn
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 434-07-1
Formal Names: Adroyd, Anadrol, Anapolon, Anasteron, Oxymethalone
Type: Anabolic steroid. See page 24
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule III (DEA no. 4000)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: X
Uses. This drug’s main medical usage is for treatment of anemia and other
blood disorders. The compound has also seen success against hereditary angioedema,
a condition involving painful swelling of body tissues. Discouragement
of blood clots and encouragement of weight gain are other medical
applications. Particular success has been noted in weight gain with HIV/AIDS
(human immunodeficiency virus/acquired immunodeficiency syndrome) patients,
accompanied by general improvement in quality of life. Cancer patients
have also benefitted from the drug’s weight-gain property. An experiment
indicated that short-term dosage can help persons suffering from heart failure.
In another experiment the drug improved bone density in bedridden people.
Still another experiment showed that oxymetholone can boost height and
weight in boys and girls who are small for their age; such usage requires
careful monitoring, as the substance has potential for stopping bone growth
and thereby preventing attainment of normal adult height.
Drawbacks. Oxymetholone can produce masculine physical characteristics
in women (facial hair, deeper voice) and disrupt the menstrual cycle; some
authorities indicate that such masculinization is uncommon. Experimentation
with male rats lowered their blood levels of testosterone and halted sexual
activity. In human males oxymetholone may promote enlargement of the prostate
gland. Men with prostate or breast cancer should avoid the drug, as
should women who have both breast cancer and signs of a bone-weakening
disease called osteoporosis. Oxymetholone can damage the liver and, in unusual
circumstances, is associated with fatal harm to the spleen. Cholesterol
levels can rise, increasing the risk of conditions leading to heart attack and
stroke; kidney dialysis patients are considered to be at special risk for such
outcomes. Case reports attribute stroke to oxymetholone. The drug may cause
fluid retention, a possible hazard for persons with heart, liver, or kidney disOxymetholone
347
ease. Other unwanted effects have included nausea, vomiting, chills, acne, and
painful testicles. Case reports have noted severe changes in several persons’
ability to handle blood sugar levels. Another case report noted mental confusion
that developed in a patient receiving oxymetholone and that continued
for weeks after the therapy stopped.
Abuse factors. Some athletes use the compound with the hope it will improve
their sports performance. A case report attributed rupture of the triceps
tendon to a regimen of oxymetholone, nandrolone, and testosterone, although
analysts have noted that a nonanabolic steroid called cortisone may have promoted
the injury. Another case report told of a 20-year-old athlete developing
persistent balance problems after taking oxymetholone and two other steroids;
investigators of that case felt that steroids were a likely cause, given their
ability to promote brain damage (stroke) and mental difficulties (mood and
thinking). A case report notes manic activity in a person using oxymetholone.
Another case report notes an even-tempered person who became rageful and
violent after beginning a regimen of oxymetholone. Researchers tested one
group of athletes who were using that compound and other steroids, a second
group composed of former users, and a third group that had never used these
drugs. Compared to the other groups, current users perceived themselves as
more antagonistic, but investigators found only slight psychological differences
among the groups. Chickenpox is a childhood disease that adults can
suffer, and a bodybuilder who used oxymetholone and other anabolic steroids
came down with a severe case requiring extended hospitalization; the case
report did not blame the steroids but considered his drug use important
enough to emphasize.
A case report speaks of oxymetholone “dependency” but in the context of
persons needing the drug to maintain good health, not dependency in the
traditional terminology of drug abuse. Another case report, however, does
describe dependence in a bodybuilder who was taking oxymetholone and
other anabolic steroids. A noteworthy aspect of this case was the person’s
sudden development of opiate withdrawal symptoms when he received a
drug that provokes opiate withdrawal.
Drug interactions. Not enough scientific information to report, although
anabolic steroids as a drug class tend to boost effects from medicines intended
to reduce blood clotting.
Cancer. Oxymetholone gives negative results in assorted laboratory tests
designed to detect cell mutations that may lead to cancer and gives mixed
results in tests involving animals dosed on the substance. Oxymetholone is
suspected of causing human cancer, with liver cancer a particular risk. Scientists
have been unsure about any connection between the substance and
human cancer, but the high level of suspicion is illustrated by numerous published
case reports noting development of cancer by patients using oxymetholone.
Pregnancy. The drug may reduce fertility. In rat experiments the substance
masculinized female fetuses even more than methyltestosterone. Whether oxymetholone
passes into human milk is uncertain, but nursing mothers are
advised to avoid the substance.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
348 Oxymetholone
Alexanian, R., and J. Nadell. “Oxymetholone Treatment for Sickle Cell Anemia.” Blood
45 (1975): 769–77.
Barker, S. “Oxymethalone and Aggression.” British Journal of Psychiatry 151 (1987): 564.
Bond, A.J., P.Y. Choi, and H.G. Pope, Jr. “Assessment of Attentional Bias and Mood
in Users and Non-Users of Anabolic-Androgenic Steroids.” Drug and Alcohol
Dependence 37 (1995): 241–45.
Hengge, U.R., et al. “Oxymetholone Promotes Weight Gain in Patients with Advanced
Human Immunodeficiency Virus (HIV-1) Infection.” British Journal of Nutrition
75 (1996): 129–38.
Keele, D.K., and J.W. Worley. “Study of an Anabolic Steroid: Certain Effects of Oxymetholone
on Small Children.” American Journal of Diseases of Children 113 (1967):
422–30.
Murchison, L. “Uses and Abuses of Anabolic Steroids.” Prescribers’ Journal 26 (1986):
129–35.
“Oxymetholone.” IARC Monographs on the Evaluation of the Carcinogenic Risk of Chemicals
to Man: Some Miscellaneous Pharmaceutical Substances 13 (1977): 131–39.
Oxymorphone
Pronunciation: ox-i-MOR-fohn
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 76-41-5. (Hydrochloride form 357-
07-3)
Formal Names: Numorphan
Type: Depressant (opioid class). See page 24
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule II (DEA no. 9652)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. Medically this drug is used to ease pain and assist in anesthesia. It is
about 9 to 13 times stronger than morphine, with similar actions. Oxymorphone
has been likened to heroin. Because body chemistry transforms part of
an oxycodone dose into oxymorphone, scientists wondered if oxycodone’s
therapeutic actions actually came from oxymorphone; upon investigation, experimenters
concluded that oxycodone does produce effects apart from those
of oxymorphone. Allowing hospitalized patients to control their own oxymorphone
dosage for pain relief has caused no problems. Hydromorphone
can sometimes be used as a substitute. A case report indicates oxymorphone
can have antidepressant actions.
Drawbacks. Unwanted effects of oxymorphone can include nausea, vomiting,
and breathing difficulty. Euphoria has been noted in horses that receive
the drug.
Abuse factors. Not enough scientific information to report, but the drug is
legally classified as highly addictive.
Drug interactions. Other depressants should generally be avoided, and
monoamine oxidase inhibitors (MAOIs, found in some antidepressants and
other medicine) should also be avoided.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Birth defects appeared after experimenters gave pregnant hamsters
1,500 times the recommended human dose. Effects on human pregnancy
are unknown. The drug can influence fetal heartbeat if used in childbirth.
Oxymorphone has been found effective for easing pain after caesarean section.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
350 Oxymorphone
Heiskanen, T.E., et al. “Morphine or Oxycodone in Cancer Pain?” Acta Oncologica
(Stockholm, Sweden) 39 (2000): 941–47.
Johnstone, R.E., et al. “Combination of Delta-9-Tetrahydrocannabinol with Oxymorphone
or Pentobarbital: Effects on Ventilatory Control and Cardiovascular Dynamics.”
Anesthesiology 42 (1975): 674–84.
Sinatra, R.S., and D.M. Harrison. “Oxymorphone in Patient-Controlled Analgesia.”
Clinical Pharmacy 8 (1989): 541, 544.
Sinatra, R.S., et al. “A Comparison of Morphine, Meperidine, and Oxymorphone as
Utilized in Patient-Controlled Analgesia Following Cesarean Delivery.” Anesthesiology
70 (1989): 585–90.
Stoll, A.L., and S. Rueter. “Treatment Augmentation with Opiates in Severe and Refractory
Major Depression.” American Journal of Psychiatry 156 (1999): 2017.
PCP
Pronunciation: pee-see-pee
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 77-10-1. (Hydrochloride form 956-
90-1)
Formal Names: Phencyclidine
Informal Names: Ace, Ad, Alien Sex Fiend (with heroin), Amoeba, Angel, Angel
Dust, Angel Hair, Angel Mist, Angel Poke, Animal Trank, Animal Tranq, Animal
Tranquilizer, Aurora Borealis, Belladonna, Black Dust, Black Whack, Blotter
Acid, Blue Madman, Boat, Bohd, Bush, Busy Bee, Butt Naked, Cadillac, Cannabinol,
Cigarrode Cristal, CJ, Clicker, Clickum, Cliffhanger, Columbo,
Cozmo’s, Crazy Coke, Crazy Eddie, Crystal, Crystal Joint, Crystal T, Cycline,
Cyclone, D, Detroit Pink, Devil’s Dust, Dipper, DMT, DOA, Do It Jack, Domex,
Drink, Dummy Dust, Dust, Dusted Parsley, Elephant, Elephant Trank, Elephant
Tranquilizer, Elysion, Embalming Fluid, Energizer, Erth, Fake STP, Flake, Flying
Saucer, Fresh, Fuel, Good, Goon, Goon Dust, Gorilla Biscuit, Gorilla Tab,
Green, Green Leaves, Green Tea, Happy Sticks, HCP, Heaven & Hell, He-Man,
Herms, Hinkley, Hog, Hog Dust, Horse Tracks, Horse Tranquilizer, Ice, Ill, Illy
Momo, Jet Fuel, Juice, K, Kap, Kay Jay, K-Blast, Killer, KJ, Kool, Koolly High,
Krystal, KW, LBJ, Leaky Bolla, Leaky Leak, Lemon Drop, Lemon 714, Lenos,
Lethal Weapon, Little One, Live One, Log, Loveboat, Lovely, Mad Dog, Madman,
Magic, Magic Dust, Magic Mist, Mean Green, Mint Dew, Mint Leaf, Mint
Weed, Missile, Mist, Monkey Dust, Monkey Tranquilizer, More, New Acid,
New Magic, Niebla, Octane (mixed with gasoline), Oil, Omen, OPP, Orange
Crystal, Ozone, P, Parsley, Paz, PCPA, Peace, PeaCe Pill, Peace Weed, Peep,
Peter Pan, Pig Killer, Pikachu (mixed with MDMA), Pit, Polvo, Polvo de Angel,
Polvo de Estrellas, Puffy, Purple Rain, Red Devil, Rocket Fuel, Scaffle, Scuffle,
Selma, Sernyl, Sernylan, Sheets, Sherm, Sherman, Sherm Stick, Skuffle, Smoking,
Snort, Soma, Space Base (mixed with crack cocaine), Space Cadet (with
crack), Space Dust (with crack), Speedboat (with crack and marijuana), Spore,
Squirrel (with crack and marijuana), Stardust, Stick, STP, Super, Super Grass
(with marijuana), Super Joint, Super Kool, Super Weed, Surfer, Synthetic Cocaine,
Synthetic THT, TAC, T-Buzz, Tea, Tic, Tic Tac, Tish, Titch, Trank, Wac,
Wack, Water, Weed, Wet (alone or with marijuana), Wet Daddy, Whack (with
crack or heroin), Whacky Weed, White Devil, White Horizon, White Powder,
Wicky Stick (with crack and marijuana), Wobble Weed, Wolf, Wooly (with
marijuana), Worm, Yellow Fever, Zimbie, Zombie Dust, Zombie Weed, Zoom
Type: Depressant. See page 19
352 PCP
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule II (DEA no. 7471)
USA Availability: Prescription
Uses. This substance was invented in the 1920s, but not until the 1950s was
it introduced as a drug, intended as a human and veterinary anesthetic. Human
medical use soon ended because of psychological effects discovered during
tests on patients. PCP is related to ketamine and, like that substance, has
hallucinogenic qualities. Depending on how PCP is used, it can have stimulant,
depressant, or hallucinogenic actions. In monkeys PCP is about 10 times
stronger than ketamine.
Drawbacks. PCP can make people feel aloof from the world around them,
cause numbness, interfere with movement, and distort perception of time.
Hallucinations, floating sensations, euphoria, and mania can occur. People
may forget what they did while under the drug’s influence; such amnesia can
last for 24 hours after a dose. Although euphoric effects are well documented,
one group of researchers noted bouts of depression brought on by chronic use
of the substance, though not by intermittent use. Yet the same researchers also
found people successfully using the drug as an antidepressant, and animal
studies suggest PCP may have antianxiety properties. The substance reduces
appetite in dogs. Rats lost weight when they chronically received PCP.
Law enforcement authorities say the drug can make people hostile and give
them extra physical strength, and the same has been experienced by medical
personnel dealing with overdose emergencies. Researchers, however, have
generally not observed such results from PCP (although one of the very first
studies in the 1950s noted violent reactions from about 5% of surgery patients
who received the drug as an anesthetic). A study examining PCP cases at a
Los Angeles psychiatric hospital emergency room explicitly noted that wild
conduct among PCP patients was uncommon. Perhaps police simply have
more dealings with hostile individuals; for example, alcohol can embolden
belligerent persons, but violence is not considered an inherent effect of alcohol.
Persons who become violent after taking PCP already have such a history
without the substance, and during a police encounter they may well be under
the influence of alcohol or other drugs as well. Military research found that
PCP hostility did not occur unless persons were under stress, and not all
stressed individuals reacted that way. The military study also found that psychotic
episodes did not occur with normal persons; someone had to be prone
to psychosis in order for such behavior to occur while using the drug (a finding
supported by other studies as well). In mice research PCP reduces violent
behavior. Most species, including monkeys, act more docile after taking the
drug. Some violent human episodes are described as coming not from aggression
but from a PCP user’s panic when police or medical personnel try to
restrain the person. One group of addicts spoke of the substance lowering
inhibitions, which is not the same as causing violence, although an already
enraged person who loses inhibitions may engage in stormy behavior. In addition,
users who attract attention from police or emergency medical personnel
are not necessarily representative of recreational users in general, either in
personality or size of dose or reaction to the dose.
PCP 353
PCP’s physical effects include increased salivation, body temperature, pulse
rate, and blood pressure. Case reports about humans indicate that PCP can
raise blood pressure so high that a medical emergency occurs. The drug can
bring on dizziness and double vision, create seizures, and cause muscle discoordination
and damage. Numbness caused by PCP can promote injury due
to lack of pain signals that ordinarily warn a person to stop doing something.
Cases of kidney failure and liver destruction have been associated with the
substance.
The higher one rises in the traditional evolutionary scale (for example, from
mice to rats to humans), the lower the dose necessary for PCP to create anesthesia.
Two observers who noted that trend concluded that human brains
are exquisitely sensitive to PCP. Animal experiments reveal brain damage
when the substance is used chronically for as little as five days. PCP addicts
have complained of memory trouble. A small human study found impaired
ability for abstract thinking and for physical movement in response to signals,
impairment measured years after the persons said they had stopped using
PCP. Moreover, users of the drug may have normal scores on intelligence tests
but have emotional disabilities and be crippled in their ability to cope with
problems. Those latter defects may be caused by the drug or may instead be
reasons why people resort to the drug.
Abuse factors. Initially PCP was a Schedule III drug, but in 1978 government
authorities shifted it to Schedule II because of recreational use. At about that
time a Los Angeles psychiatric hospital emergency room tested 145 consecutive
patients for PCP; 63 were positive (over 40%).
A study of 200 recreational users found differences in effects reported by
persons who took a little of the drug once a month and by persons who took
a lot every day for years. Heavy users felt more pepped-up, violent, and suicidal.
Regular users of PCP are known for self-destruction; one study found
that 24% of regular users had tried to commit suicide, and 36% had overdosed
on other drugs. A study of PCP users who were treated at a charity hospital
found no behavioral difference between black or white males, but black females
acted much stranger and more aggressively than white females. The
meaning of that finding is unclear—it could be racial, could be cultural, could
be a statistical oddity that would disappear after more research.
When monkeys were given a choice between water or PCP, the animals
showed no preference; such indifference is a sign of low addictive potential.
An experiment measuring rats with prenatal exposure to PCP found the animals
were more sensitive to the drug than were rats lacking prenatal exposure—
the opposite of tolerance. Dependence has been reported in monkeys
that receive PCP. Pigeons that received the drug every day for 215 days did
not develop dependence. Human research has found tolerance but not dependence
among users, although dependence is suspected.
Various cold remedies contain doxylamine succinate, which can cause a
false-positive drug test for PCP.
Drug interactions. In a rat experiment neither alcohol nor PCP affected
blood pressure, but blood pressure rose when they were used simultaneously.
They also speeded up the heart. One human study found that PCP may be
more likely to induce excitability in alcoholics than in nonalcoholics, possibly
354 PCP
meaning that alcohol increases the likelihood of a manic reaction. In mice
marijuana has reduced hyperactivity caused by PCP.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Two studies published only a few months apart in the 1980s
gave different impressions about the prevalence of PCP use among pregnant
women. In one study a group of 2,327 pregnant women were tested for PCP
use; 19 were taking the drug. Those 19 were typically polydrug abusers. A
different study of 200 pregnant women found 24 using PCP, a rate 15 times
higher than in the other group.
If a pregnant woman uses PCP, it passes into the fetus. Reports exist of PCP
being detected in newborns three months after the mothers claimed to have
stopped using the drug during pregnancy, which would mean that the drug
remains in a fetus months after a pregnant woman stops taking PCP. Whether
the women’s claims of abstinence were confirmed by laboratory testing during
those months of pregnancy is unclear, however. In mice and pigs PCP builds
up in the fetus, reaching levels 7 to 10 times higher than in the female’s bloodstream.
The drug is suspected of causing birth defects. At dosage levels high enough
to poison the pregnant female, birth defects have been produced in rats and
mice. Rats with prenatal exposure to PCP show defective memory and learning
ability. The substance is suspected of harming fetal brain development in
humans. Pregnant women who use the drug tend to produce infants who are
smaller than normal. In a group of 83 infants with prenatal PCP exposure,
almost half had a head circumference below the 25th percentile (meaning that
75% of infants in the general population have bigger heads and, by implication,
larger brains). Some were below the 10th percentile. Smaller-than-normal
infant skulls may interfere with physical growth of the brain. People who
abuse one drug tend to abuse others as well; one study of 41 women who
used PCP during pregnancy found that most had also been using cocaine.
Two studies of women who used PCP during pregnancy found that all were
poor; most were unmarried, were in an ethnic minority, and had received
inadequate prenatal care. Such factors confound efforts to confirm what effect
PCP alone has on pregnancy.
Offspring of mothers who have been using PCP can exhibit symptoms similar
to those seen in infants undergoing opiate withdrawal—even though the
drug is not an opiate, and research has yet to demonstrate that PCP dependence
occurs. Infant distress may be real, but the newborn may be responding
to the unpleasant effects of the drug itself rather than responding to sudden
absence of the drug.
A year after birth, a group of 57 babies with prenatal PCP exposure showed
normal development in mental ability and physical coordination, although
almost half were ill-tempered. About 15% had trouble sleeping, and the same
percentage lacked normal emotional attachment. Those findings are consistent
with other studies. Home environment, of course, may influence behavior as
much or more than prenatal drug exposure. Factors noted above (lack of
money, absent father, being in a disadvantaged ethnic minority) can weaken
home life. Still, the kinds of brain function damage seen in animal studies are
the kinds of damage that should interfere with children’s abilities to socialize
PCP 355
normally—exactly the kind of deficit seen in children who have prenatal exposure
to PCP.
In mice PCP not only passes into maternal milk, but milk levels are 10 times
higher than maternal blood levels.
Additional information. PCP is related to the Schedule I hallucinogens PCE
(CAS RN 2201-15-2), PCPy (2201-39-0), TCP (21500-98-1), and TCPy (22912-
13-6). Rat experimentation measured PCPy as about the same strength as PCP.
Other laboratory measurement shows TCP as stronger than PCP, and PCE as
stronger than TCP. French military experiments found that TCP could protect
rats and guinea pigs from the chemical warfare agent soman.
“Cannabinol” is a nickname for PCP and refers to THC, which is the active
chemical in marijuana and dronabinol, but PCP is not THC. Likewise “DMT”
and “STP” (DOM) are nicknames for PCP, but they are all different drugs.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Baldridge, E.B., and H.A. Bessen. “Phencyclidine.” Emergency Medicine Clinics of North
America 8 (1990): 541–50.
Brecher, M., et al. “Phencyclidine and Violence: Clinical and Legal Issues.” Journal of
Clinical Psychopharmacology 8 (1988): 397–401.
Giannini, A.J., R.K. Bowman, and J.D. Giannini. “Perception of Nonverbal Facial Cues
in Chronic Phencyclidine Abusers.” Perceptual and Motor Skills 89 (1999): 72–78.
Graeven, D.B., J.G. Sharp, and S. Glatt. “Acute Effects of Phencyclidine (PCP) on
Chronic and Recreational Users.” American Journal of Drug and Alcohol Abuse 8
(1981): 39–50.
Harry, G.J., and J. Howard. “Phencyclidine: Experimental Studies in Animals and
Long-term Developmental Effects on Humans.” In Perinatal Substance Abuse: Research
Findings and Clinical Implications, ed. T.B. Sonderegger. Baltimore, MD:
Johns Hopkins University Press, 1992. 254–78.
Khajawall, A.M., T.B. Erickson, and G.M. Simpson. “Chronic Phencyclidine Abuse and
Physical Assault.” American Journal of Psychiatry 139 (1982): 1604–6.
Pradhan, S.N. “Phencyclidine (PCP): Some Human Studies.” Neuroscience and Biobehavioral
Reviews 8 (1984): 493–501.
Schuckit, M.A., and E.R. Morrissey. “Propoxyphene and Phencyclidine (PCP) Use in
Adolescents.” Journal of Clinical Psychiatry 39 (1978): 7–13.
Sioris, L.J., and E.P. Krenzelok. “Phencyclidine Intoxication: Literature Review.” American
Journal of Hospital Pharmacy 35 (1978): 1362–67.
Pemoline
Pronunciation: PEM-oh-leen
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 2152-34-3
Formal Names: Cylert
Informal Names: Popcorn Coke
Type: Stimulant. See page 11
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule IV (DEA no. 1530)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: B
Uses. In the United States pemoline became available for medical purposes
during the 1970s. It is used to treat depression, weariness, and attention deficit
hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). The drug’s stimulant effects are described as
greater than caffeine but less than amphetamine. Unlike many scheduled
stimulants, pemoline is unrelated to amphetamine.
Studies find pemoline useful in reducing symptoms of depression, and experimental
usage of pemoline with monoamine oxidase inhibitor (MAOI) antidepressants
has helped depressed persons who obtain insufficient relief with
other drugs.
Pemoline has eliminated drowsiness felt by persons taking antihistamines.
The drug has been proposed for workplace usage to reduce fatigue but has
not been tested extensively for that purpose. Tests have found that the drug
improves ability to perform arithmetic when users are tired. In a different but
more robust experiment, members of the U.S. Navy Special Warfare group
stayed awake 64 hours around the clock while using pemoline. Though their
performance appeared to decline as the experiment continued, they not only
did better than participants who used placebos, but they also did better than
persons using methylphenidate. In England, Royal Air Force experimenters
concluded that pemoline can help keenness and capabilities during long shifts
of duty. A Russian report endorses the drug’s usefulness for “urgent increase”
of functioning but notes that persons using pemoline cannot maintain initial
ability if body temperature rises and oxygen supply declines, nor does the
drug help persons push past emotional strain or fulfill complicated task requirements.
During the 1980s and 1990s sports officials in Belgium found the
drug was frequently used by cyclists seeking a competitive edge. Multiple
sclerosis patients using pemoline sometimes report less exhaustion than those
Pemoline 357
using a placebo, but investigators who rigorously reviewed studies about multiple
sclerosis fatigue found no evidence of pemoline improving weariness.
An instance is known of an elderly man taking pemoline to help him stay
awake during lectures, but the regimen seemed to promote prostate trouble.
Pemoline has been successfully used against narcolepsy.
Studies find pemoline about as effective as either dextroamphetamine or
methylphenidate in helping children with ADHD. Pemoline has been used
successfully against ADHD in teenagers and adults as well. Growth rates are
below normal in some youngsters with ADHD, and pemoline itself can temporarily
hold back such development but without long-term harm—youngsters
develop normal adult weight and height. Those deficient growth rates
may be treated with growth hormone. One study found, however, that pemoline
seems to make the hormone treatment less effective in some patients. As
the age of ADHD patients grows, so can unwanted effects that they experience
from pemoline.
Animal experiments in the 1960s indicated that pemoline boosts learning
ability. The lure of a “smart pill” had understandable appeal to suffering students
and teachers, but when the drug was tested on college students, no
improvement in learning ability occurred. The same dismal outcome occurred
when elderly persons received the drug; indeed, some performed worse than
elderly persons receiving a placebo. Group results in still another experiment
showed either no improvement or worsening of learning scores when people
used the drug. In contrast, long-term daily administration of the drug seemed
to improve memory in some persons entering senility.
A review covering 10 years of pemoline reports found none attributing euphoria
to the drug, a lack that sets it apart from other scheduled stimulants.
Unlike some other stimulants, pemoline also seems to have little effect on
pulse rate or blood pressure.
Drawbacks. The drug can bring on tics and partial muscle movements, in
a particularly severe way if an overdose occurs. An instance is known of
muscle damage in an adult misusing pemoline. Pemoline is also known to
reduce appetite and salivation, increase crankiness, bring on headaches and
stomachaches, cause skin rash, and interfere with sleep. Hallucinations from
pemoline have been reported.
In rats and mice pemoline can cause self-harm behavior, and the amount
needed to induce such behavior declines when a certain kind of brain damage
is present, damage that is often seen in mentally retarded humans. Those
findings suggest that such persons receiving pemoline may need monitoring
to guard against self-injury. Long-term excessive usage may generate temporary
psychotic behavior, but such an outcome appears untypical.
Probably the most serious unwanted results of taking pemoline can be hepatitis
and other liver injury, injury so severe as to require a transplant. Damage
can continue to worsen after the drug is stopped, and people have died from
liver failure induced by pemoline. Victims tend to be children. Such an adverse
effect is particularly disquieting because it occurs at therapeutic dosage,
rather then being created by reckless abuse. A child can take pemoline for
months before harm is apparent, or alarming symptoms can arise after just a
week of use. Methylphenidate is suspected of contributing to liver trouble in
358 Pemoline
persons who are also taking pemoline. Debate exists about how dangerous
pemoline is to liver function when no other drugs are being taken, but the
debate has limited practical significance because many patients taking pemoline
receive other drugs as well. Because of concern about liver damage, parents
are supposed to sign a written consent form before their children begin
pemoline therapy.
Abuse factors. Although pemoline is a scheduled substance, a review of
reports covering the first 10 years of its medical availability in the United
States found little evidence of addiction or abuse. A Norwegian review of
pemoline use boldly described it as “a stimulant which cannot be abused.”1
When given a choice of drugs, animals show no particular interest in pemoline,
a sign of low abuse potential. Nonetheless, a case report does exist of a
pemoline addict who developed a paranoid psychosis that went away after
stopping the drug. A British medical practitioner reported that drug misusers
were supplementing their amphetamine habit with pemoline.
An experiment tested pemoline’s ability to help reduce cocaine usage
among persons receiving methadone treatment (meaning the persons were
addicted to cocaine and heroin both). Results were unencouraging. In contrast,
favorable response in an ADHD alcoholic caused researchers to predict that
pemoline may be useful for treating alcohol addiction. Mice experimentation
shows that pemoline reduces effects produced by THC, considered the primary
drug in marijuana.
Drug interactions. Pemoline is suspected of interfering with epilepsy medicines.
It can boost mono amine oxidase inhibitor (MAOI) antidepressants and
urinary acidifers (the latter action interfering with pemoline’s psychostimulant
effects).
Cancer. Rat experiments do not indicate any cancer risk from pemoline.
Pregnancy. Experiments with rabbits and rats reveal no harm to fetal development,
but influence on human fetal development is unknown.
Additional information. When tested on mentally handicapped workers,
magnesium pemoline (CAS RN 18968-99-5) brought on the kinds of temperament
modification associated with caffeine but failed to increase either productivity
or time worked. Two cocaine addicts who appeared to have mild
ADHD were able to reduce their intake of cocaine while receiving magnesium
pemoline, a result leading the scientific investigators to wonder if magnesium
pemoline might have potential for helping to break cocaine addiction. Animal
experiments have shown that both pemoline and magnesium pemoline can
provide protection against atomic radiation.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Bostic, J.Q., et al. “Pemoline Treatment of Adolescents with Attention Deficit Hyperactivity
Disorder: A Short-Term Controlled Trial.” Journal of Child and Adolescent
Psychopharmacology 10 (2000): 205–16.
Elizur, A., I. Wintner, and S. Davidson. “The Clinical and Psychological Effects of
Pemoline in Depressed Patients—A Controlled Study.” International Pharmacopsychiatry
14 (1979): 127–34.
Honda, Y., and Y. Hishikawa. “Long Term Treatment of Narcolepsy and Excessive
Pemoline 359
Daytime Sleepiness with Pemoline (Betanamin).” Current Therapeutic Research:
Clinical and Experimental 27 (1980): 429–41.
Langer, D.H., et al. “Evidence of Lack of Abuse or Dependence Following Pemoline
Treatment: Results of a Retrospective Survey.” Drug and Alcohol Dependence 17
(1986): 213–27.
Newlands, W.J. “The Effect of Pemoline on Antihistamine-Induced Drowsiness.” The
Practitioner 224 (1980): 1199–1201.
Shevell, M., and R. Schreiber. “Pemoline-Associated Hepatic Failure: A Critical Analysis
of the Literature.” Pediatric Neurology 16 (1997): 14–16.
Sternbach, H. “Pemoline-Induced Mania.” Biological Psychiatry 16 (1981): 987–89.
Valle-Jones, J.C. “Pemoline in the Treatment of Psychogenic Fatigue in General Practice.”
The Practitioner 221 (1978): 425–27.
Note
1. N. Lie, “Sentralstimuleren Midler ved AD/HD Hos Voksne. Kan De Misbrukes?
[Central Stimulants in Adults with AD/HD. Can They Be Abused?],” Tidsskrift for den
Norske Laegeforening 119 (1999): 82–83. Abstract in English.
Pentazocine
Pronunciation: pen-TAZ-oh-seen
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 359-83-1. (Hydrochloride form
64024-15-3)
Formal Names: Fortral, Fortralgesic, Fortralin, Fortwin, Liticon, Pentgin, Sosegon,
Sosenyl, Talacen, Talwin, Talwin Nx
Informal Names: 4 _ 4s, Teacher, Ts, Yellow Footballs. Combination with methylphenidate:
Crackers, 1s & 1s, Poor Man’s Heroin, Ritz & Ts, Ts & Rits, Ts &
Rs, Sets. Combination with tripelennamine: Ts & Blues, Ts & Bs
Type: Depressant. See page 19
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule IV (DEA no. 9709)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. Pentazocine became available in the 1960s. Some authorities classify
the drug as an opioid; some do not. Rather than having cross-tolerance with
opiates and opioids, pentazocine can provoke a withdrawal syndrome from
them. Volunteers who receive pentazocine have been uncertain about what
sort of drug it is; some say it is a hallucinogen; some think they are receiving
alcohol.
Pentazocine has about the same pain relief strength as codeine. An experiment
using oral surgery patients found pentazocine’s pain relief to be the
same as aspirin’s. After drug abusers began grinding down Talwin tablets and
injecting the powder to get morphine and heroin sensations, the manufacturer
introduced Talwin Nx tablets, which include a chemical designed to block
those sensations if the substance is injected. Dispute exists about whether the
Nx version of Talwin actually prevents effects sought by illicit users.
Research indicates that women surgical patients tend to get better pain relief
from pentazocine than male patients. Research also indicates that the drug’s
surgical pain control is more effective for older patients and less effective for
neurotics and for individuals with outgoing personalities. The drug has been
routinely used to ease cancer pain and has had success in reducing joint pain
caused by various afflictions, including arthritis. After noting that pentazocine
does not prolong bleeding times, researchers called it suitable to fight pain
from hemophilia, a blood disease that promotes bleeding. The substance has
also been given as a treatment for stubborn cases of hiccups.
Pentazocine 361
Investigators have documented that people can briefly experience euphoria
after taking the drug. Some users feel more amiable and serene after a dose.
Drawbacks. Unwanted pentazocine actions include rapid heartbeat, blood
pressure changes (up or down), fainting, sweating, confusion, sleepiness,
blurred vision, nausea, vomiting, and constipation. Studies have found that
1% to 10% of persons receiving the drug (especially an injectable pharmaceutical
version) have odd psychological reactions such as hallucinations, delusions,
or a sense of unreality about the world. The substance can interfere with
decision making and physical movement. Research has shown that driving
skills decline when a person uses the drug, and users should avoid operating
motor vehicles or other dangerous machinery. Because pentazocine has occasionally
been associated with seizures, it should be used cautiously by persons
prone to that affliction. The substance should also be used cautiously by
people suffering from pancreas malfunction or breathing difficulty. The drug
may be particularly hazardous for asthma sufferers who are overly sensitive
to aspirin. Pentazocine is associated with skin hardening, which can result in
extensive surgical removal of affected areas, to be replaced with skin grafts.
Case reports tell of the drug provoking not only skin lesions but internal
lesions in the digestive tract. Prolonged use of the substance can also cause
muscle destruction that cripples a person’s ability to move arms and legs. The
compound can dangerously reduce white blood cell levels. Rat experiments
indicate the drug may provoke attacks of porphyria, a body chemistry disease
that can make people violent and sensitive to light.
One group of researchers documented that pentazocine increased the heart’s
workload by 22% in cardiac disease patients. Another group found that after
a heart attack the drug increases blood pressure and the heart’s need for oxygen
and concluded that pentazocine is dangerous for heart attack patients.
Not all authorities agree with that conclusion, however; some say that such
adverse cardiac effects can be avoided through careful dosage, and other opinion
says the drug is preferable to morphine for heart attack patients.
Abuse factors. Some abusers inject powder from oral pentazocine tablets.
Oral pentazocine tablets contain ingredients not intended for introduction into
the bloodstream, and injection can be fatal even though the digestive system
can handle the same ingredients without difficulty.
Pentazocine and the antihistamine-anesthetic tripelennamine are a common
illicit drug combination called Ts & Blues, sometimes used as a substitute for
heroin (“T” standing for Talwin and “Blues” for the antihistamine tablets’
color). The combination can create more euphoria than pentazocine alone produces
and reduce the discontent caused by some doses of pentazocine. Users
report development of memory trouble. Lung damage is a classic consequence
of the combination, promoted by injecting oral formats of the drugs. Users
have been hospitalized with chest pain, anxiety, spasms, sweating, nausea,
and lightheadedness. Fainting and seizures are less common problems. Kidney
damage has been noted. Other antihistamines can also be dangerous to use
with pentazocine.
Pentazocine tolerance and dependence can occur. After daily doses were
given to monkeys for six weeks, mild withdrawal symptoms appeared when
the animals received nalorphine, a substance that provokes withdrawal signs
362 Pentazocine
if someone has been using opioids. That result supports classifying pentazocine
as an opioid, but in humans nalorphine does not cause pentazocine withdrawal—
a result consistent with pentazocine not being an opioid. Pentazocine
withdrawal is normally likened to a light version of the opiate withdrawal
syndrome, although case reports tell of some persons suffering intense physical
discomfort for up to two weeks (cramping muscles, painful abdomen and
back, nausea, itching, sweating, and general discomposure). Debate exists
about whether pentazocine addiction should be treated by substituting other
drugs such as methadone or whether treatment should avoid substitution
altogether. Some authorities have wondered if pentazocine addiction occurs
in persons who are not polydrug abusers. Some authorities even question
whether pentazocine addiction exists, noting cases in which body fluid testing
contradicted drug users’ claims to be using the drug (while indicating they
were using other substances). German researchers found that addiction reports
are at least exaggerated; upon investigation, only 8 of 60 reports turned out
to be authentic.
Drug interactions. Persons who smoke or who live in a polluted air environment
may need higher doses of pentazocine than persons who breathe
clean air. Morphine and pentazocine boost each other’s pain-relieving action.
Alcohol and possibly monoamine oxidase inhibitors (found in some antidepressants)
may react badly with pentazocine.
Cancer. Animal research has not shown pentazocine to cause cancer.
Pregnancy. Normal production of litters has occurred when pentazocine
was given to pregnant rats and rabbits, and no birth defects were apparent.
The drug is absorbed by the fetus if a pregnant woman takes a dose. Examination
of one hospital’s records of all pregnant patients who used pentazocine
illicitly in a two-year period showed that their infants tended to be premature
and undersized, but no malformation was attributed to the drug. Newborns
were occasionally dependent. Despite those disadvantages the children
seemed to develop normally in their first year of life. When pentazocine was
given simply as a pain reliever in childbirth, examination of the infants revealed
no difference from children born to women who did not receive a
medical dose of the drug during childbirth.
A study found Ts & Blues mothers to have an increased rate of assorted
diseases that would not promote healthy fetal development: hepatitis, anemia,
gonorrhea, syphilis. Such afflictions indicate a risk-taking lifestyle in which
prenatal care is a small concern. A survey of maternity records at one hospital
showed that pregnant women who used Ts & Blues tended to produce smaller
infants, but no major birth defects were associated with the drug combination.
Another study found behavioral abnormalities in newborns that had fetal exposure
to Ts & Blues, although the conduct may simply have been a temporary
sign of drug withdrawal. Investigators running a rat experiment,
however, noted long-term behavioral differences between a group of rats
having fetal exposure to the drug combination and another group that was
unexposed.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Pentazocine 363
Brogden, R.N., T.M. Speight, and G.S. Avery. “Pentazocine: A Review of Its Pharmacological
Properties, Therapeutic Efficacy and Dependence Liability.” Drugs 5
(1973): 6–91.
Debooy, V.D., et al. “Intravenous Pentazocine and Methylphenidate Abuse during
Pregnancy. Maternal Lifestyle and Infant Outcome.” American Journal of Diseases
of Children 147 (1993): 1062–65.
“Pentazocine.” British Medical Journal 2 (1970):409–10.
Saarialho-Kere, U., M.J. Mattila, and T. Seppala. “Parenteral Pentazocine: Effects on
Psychomotor Skills and Respiration, and Interactions with Amitriptyline.” European
Journal of Clinical Pharmacology 35 (1988): 483–89.
Showalter, C.V. “T’s and Blues: Abuse of Pentazocine and Tripelennamine.” Journal of
the American Medical Association 244 (1980): 1224–25.
Zacny, J.P., et al. “Comparing the Subjective, Psychomotor and Physiological Effects of
Intravenous Pentazocine and Morphine in Normal Volunteers.” Journal of Pharmacology
and Experimental Therapeutics 286 (1998): 1197–207.
Pentobarbital
Pronunciation: pen-toh-BAR-bi-tal
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 76-74-4
Formal Names: Cafergot, Nembutal, Pentobarbitone, Phenobarbitone
Informal Names: Nebbies, Nembies, Nemmies, Nimbies, Yellow Bullets, Yellow
Dolls, Yellow Jackets, Yellows
Type: Depressant (barbiturate class). See page 20
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule II (oral and parentral, DEA no. 2270), Schedule
III for suppositories (DEA no. 2271)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: D
Uses. This short-acting substance has sedative qualities but is considered
ineffective in treating nervous apprehension. Because of the drug’s sleepinducing
characteristics, it is used as a preliminary to administering anesthesia
and as a short-term treatment for insomnia. Pentobarbital has been observed
to lower blood pressure, body temperature, and muscle tone. The compound
can be used as an emergency anticonvulsant when a person has seizures, and
has been used to treat alcohol addicts undergoing withdrawal. Pentobarbital
has been found effective in reducing pressure that fluid creates in the brain
after severe head injury. Pentobarbital reduces a type of nerve cell death called
neuronal apoptosis, and this reduction may help prevent stroke. Animal studies
indicate that pentobarbital can help protect brain tissue against radiation,
which might have practical application during treatment of brain tumors. Veterinarians
use the substance for euthanasia: An unusual demonstration of the
drug’s strength occurred when a lion was poisoned by eating meat from a
horse that had been killed with pentobarbital.
Drawbacks. Although the drug is a sedative, it can cause hyperactivity in
children. Sudden stoppage of combined pentobarbital and benzodiazepine
therapy in an infant caused temporary chorea (involuntary jerking). A feline
experiment showed that tremors reminiscent of Parkinson’s disease can occur
when pentobarbital is administered with chlorpromazine (also called Thorazine,
often used to treat psychotic behavior). Persons with porphyria, a body
chemistry affliction that can provoke violence, are supposed to avoid pentobarbital.
Examination of epileptic children receiving pentobarbital shows elevated
readings for total cholesterol, though levels of high-density lipoprotein
Pentobarbital 365
(so-called good cholesterol) and triglycerides (associated with heart attack and
stroke) seem unaffected.
In a monkey experiment pentobarbital interfered with time perception, ability
to learn, short-term memory, attention span, and interest in tasks. The
substance impeded task performances in a human experiment, with performance
getting worse as the amount of thinking necessary for a chore increased.
Such a drug is unlikely to be welcome in the workplace. Although
children using the substance apparently have trouble with language skills, a
study found language development to be normal two years after the medication
ceased.
Abuse factors. In a test, alcohol drinkers who were not alcoholics found
pentobarbital less appealing than a placebo and experienced no euphoria from
pentobarbital, a finding consistent with other studies of persons who do not
abuse drugs. When given choices of assorted substances, monkeys chose pentobarbital
less often than water, which indicates the compound has low addictive
potential. In contrast, drug abusers participating in an experiment
found effects of pentobarbital and diazepam to be similar. Those two drugs
thus had comparable appeal even though scientists running the experiment
found pentobarbital possessing only 10% of diazepam’s strength. A study testing
various effects on former drug addicts found pentobarbital to be 15 times
stronger than meprobamate, but morphine acted 6 times stronger than pentobarbital.
Cross-tolerance among chlordiazepoxide, pentobarbital, and alcohol
has been observed in rats. A study of sedative drug abusers found alcohol
and pentobarbital to deliver similar effects, with pentobarbital possibly having
more appeal. A monkey experiment indicates that alcohol increases the attractiveness
of pentobarbital. Dependence can develop, and in humans the
pentobarbital withdrawal syndrome can duplicate the delirium tremens of
alcohol withdrawal. A mice study found that tolerance to pentobarbital developed
more rapidly if assorted drugs of abuse were also being administered
(morphine, amphetamine, alcohol, or cocaine).
Drug interactions. A case report notes that pentobarbital can almost double
the speed with which theophylline (commonly used to treat asthma and other
breathing difficulties) disappears from the bloodstream, requiring changes in
normal theophylline dosage. In a mice experiment alcohol boosted pentobarbital’s
potency. A human study found that chronic alcohol ingestion reduces
the effective length of a pentobarbital dose. Grapefruit juice extends the
amount of sleep produced by pentobarbital in rats, and in mice the drug
inhibits caffeine effects. At one time researchers suspected that taking pentobarbital
along with MDMA would reduce organic brain damage caused by
MDMA, but rat experiments indicate that any apparent benefit comes simply
from the lower body temperature produced by pentobarbital. Although cocaine
is a stimulant, in a rat experiment it increased the sleep-inducing quality
of pentobarbital.
Cancer. In animal experimentation pentobarbital has caused cancer. In humans
long-term usage is associated with cancer of the ovaries and bronchi,
but that finding is weakened by the patients also smoking cigarettes.
Pregnancy. A large survey of pregnancy outcomes found that pentobarbital
366 Pentobarbital
does not appear to cause birth defects. Nonetheless pregnant women are supposed
to avoid the drug.
Additional information. Some capsule formats of Nembutal (pentobarbital
sodium CAS RN 57-33-0) contain FD&C Yellow No. 5 (tartrazine), which can
cause asthma attacks or other allergic responses in sensitive persons, particularly
if someone has adverse reactions to aspirin. Cafergot PB is a combination
of bellafoline, caffeine, and ergotamine tartrate. The combination was
tested with and without pentobarbital sodium to determine effect on migraine
headache. Presence of pentobarbital not only enhanced reduction of pain but
also helped treat anxiety, nausea, vomiting, poor appetite, and low tolerance
of light.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Cole-Harding, S., and H. de Wit. “Self-Administration of Pentobarbital in Light and
Moderate Alcohol Drinkers.” Pharmacology, Biochemistry, and Behavior 43 (1992):
563–69.
Hambly, G., C. Frewin, and B. Dodd. “Effect of Anticonvulsant Medication in the Preschool
Years on Later Language Development.” Medical Journal of Australia 148
(1988): 658, 661–62.
Mintzer, M.Z., et al. “Ethanol and Pentobarbital: Comparison of Behavioral and Subjective
Effects in Sedative Drug Abusers.” Experimental and Clinical Psychopharmacology
5 (1997): 203–15.
Pickworth, W.B., M.S. Rohrer, and R.V. Fant. “Effects of Abused Drugs on Psychomotor
Performance.” Experimental and Clinical Psychopharmacology 5 (1997): 235–41.
Pierce, James I. “Drug-Withdrawal Psychoses.” American Journal of Psychiatry 119
(1963): 880–81.
Peyote
Pronunciation: pay-OH-tih (also pronounced peh-YOH-teh)
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 11006-96-5
Formal Names: Lophophora williamsii
Informal Names: Bad Seed, Big Chief, Black Button, Britton, Buttons, Cactus, Cactus
Head, Challote, Devil’s Root, Dry Whiskey, Dumpling Cactus, Half Moon,
Hikori, Hikuli, Hyatari, Mescal, Mescal Beans, Mescal Buttons, Mescalito,
Mescy, Nubs, P, Pellote, Peyotl, Seni, Shaman, Tops
Type: Hallucinogen. See page 25
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule I (DEA no. 7415)
USA Availability: Illegal to possess
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. Peyote is part of a cactus plant. Native American folk medicine has
used peyote cactus root for doctoring scalp afflictions. In folk medicine peyote
has also been used against snake bite, influenza, and arthritis. Scientists have
determined that peyote contains substances that might fight infections. Some
Native Americans are reported to use light doses of peyote as a stimulant to
maintain endurance when engaged in relentless activity permitting little nourishment
or water, a practice sounding much like traditional use of coca. Spaniards
observed such peyote usage in the Aztec empire.
Peyote’s main active component is the hallucinogen mescaline. Some other
varieties of cactus also contain mescaline, although generally in much smaller
amounts. Researchers suspect the peyote cactus may additionally contain
chemicals similar to those appearing in the brain upon use of alcohol.
In addition to causing hallucinations, peyote can change perception of time.
Psychic effects can include feeling more peaceful and connected with life; craziness
of the everyday world can recede. People can use the experience to
work through their concerns and may be more open to suggestions. Physical
senses may seem enhanced, and barriers between them may melt, such as
allowing sounds to be seen.
Normally a Schedule I substance is illegal to possess except under special
permission to do research with it, but for many years members of the Native
American Church were allowed to possess and use peyote (but not the pure
drug mescaline) for religious purposes. During the 1990s their legal situation
368 Peyote
became confused, and the issue was a matter of controversy when this book
was written.
The religion of Peyotism (of which the Native American Church is but one
variety) is a topic beyond the scope of this book, but drug-induced visions
are only one part of the practitioners’ way of life. Observers have noted that
Peyotism can be an effective way of dealing with addiction to alcohol and
opiates. Traditional peyote use occurs in a group context, a social gathering
of persons sharing and furthering the same beliefs and goals. A solitary user
estranged from such a setting is likely to have a far different peyote experience.
For instance, one element of a peyote session can be nervousness and
fear, emotions that may have different impacts depending on whether a user
is alone or is with a group of reassuring and supportive persons. A researcher
with the Indian Health Service of the U.S. Public Health Service estimated that
traditional peyote usage produced bad psychological experiences once in
70,000 doses, a safety record that the researcher attributed to the social context
of traditional use. Physical damage has not been noted from traditional use.
Drawbacks. Chills, muscle tension, nausea, and vomiting are typical unwanted
peyote effects.
Abuse factors. A study published in the 1950s concluded that peyote tolerance,
dependence, and craving did not occur from traditional usage—a finding
supported by other authorities as well. A canine experiment showed that
tolerance to the vomiting effect occurred if dogs received daily peyote for a
year.
Drug interactions. Not enough scientific information to report.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Peyote has caused birth defects in hamsters. A study comparing
peyote users to nonusers from the same Indian group found no increase in
chromosome damage among the users.
Additional information. Peyote is sometimes called “mescal,” which is also
the name of an alcoholic beverage. The two substances are different, and the
beverage has no connection with peyote. Likewise “mescal beans” are an alternative
peyote name and also the name of a nonhallucinogenic food.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Bergman, R.L. “Navajo Peyote Use: Its Apparent Safety.” American Journal of Psychiatry
128 (1971): 695–99.
Boyer, L.B., R.M. Boyer, and H.W. Basehart. “Shamanism and Peyote Use among the
Apaches of the Mescalero Indian Reservation.” In Hallucinogens and Shamanism,
ed. M.J. Harner, 53–66. New York: Oxford University Press, 1973.
Bruhn, J.G. “Mescaline Use for 5700 Years.” Lancet 359 (2002): 1866.
Ellis, H. “Mescal: A New Artificial Paradise.” The Contemporary Review 71 (1897). Reprinted
in Smithsonian Institution’s Annual Report 1897. Washington, DC: Author,
1898. 537–48.
Huttlinger, K.W., and D. Tanner. “The Peyote Way: Implications for Culture Care Theory.”
Journal of Transcultural Nursing 5, no. 2 (1994): 5–11.
Kapadia, G.J., and M.B.E. Fayez. “Peyote Constituents: Chemistry, Biogenesis, and Biological
Effects.” Journal of Pharmaceutical Sciences 59 (1970): 1699–1727.
La Barre, W. “Peyotl and Mescaline.” Journal of Psychedelic Drugs 11 (1979): 33–39.
Phendimetrazine
Pronunciation: fen-di-MEH-tra-zeen (also pronounced fen-dye-MEH-trah-zeen)
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 21784-30-5 (Bontril format); 569-
59-5 (Plegine format); 50-58-8 (Prelu-2 format).
Formal Names: Bontril, Plegine, Prelu-2
Informal Names: Pink Hearts
Type: Stimulant (anorectic class). See page 15
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule III (DEA no. 1615)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. Phendimetrazine is related to phenmetrazine. Indeed, the body converts
part of a phendimetrazine dose into phenmetrazine, a fact to be remembered
if employment drug screening unjustly accuses someone of using
phenmetrazine. Short-term weight control is the main medical use of phendimetrazine;
one experiment found it 20 more times effective than placebo—
an astonishing result for any diet pill. Effectiveness declines as administration
continues, and standard practice is then to stop the drug gradually rather than
increase the dosage. A derivative of the drug has been found useful for treating
pyoderma gangrenosum, a skin affliction involving large sores.
Drawbacks. If dosage suddenly stops, weariness and depression can occur.
A small reduction in blood pressure is observed among some users, but generally
the drug raises blood pressure and is considered inappropriate for persons
with hypertension (high blood pressure). The compound has been linked
with hypertension in blood circulation to lungs, a potentially fatal condition
causing trouble in breathing. Users have experienced edginess, disturbed
sleep, headache, dizziness, lightheadedness, accelerated pulse rate, and feelings
of heart tremors. Other muscle tremors can occur. Phendimetrazine can
interfere with functioning needed to handle a car or dangerous tools. The
compound can dry and even inflame the mouth, upset the stomach, loosen or
tighten the bowels, and make urination frequent and painful. Persons should
avoid the drug if they suffer from restlessness, glaucoma, excessive thyroid
activity, heart disease, hardening of the arteries, or drug abuse. The substance
may affect diabetics’ insulin needs. Overdose symptoms are similar to those
of amphetamine: hyperactivity, fear, aggression, hallucination.
Abuse factors. Phendimetrazine is a chemical relative of amphetamine and
370 Phendimetrazine
is therefore considered addictive. In an experiment using rhesus monkeys to
measure phendimetrazine’s addictive potential, however, the test animals indicated
no interest in it. This same study showed the drug having about 10%
to 20% of dextroamphetamine’s potency.
Drug interactions. Drinking milk can counteract phendimetrazine’s anorectic
quality. The drug can dangerously increase blood pressure by interacting
with monoamine oxidase inhibitors (MAOIs, found in some antidepressants
and other medicine). After highly publicized incidents of adverse effects associated
with combination therapy of phentermine and fenfluramine, medical
practitioners became especially alert to any problems associated with diet
drugs. Someone taking phendimetrazine two times a day developed heart and
lung difficulty that substantially improved when dosage was halted, and a
case of temporary skin rash and kidney inflammation is reported from someone
who was taking phendimetrazine and phentermine. The latter drug combination
is also suspected of responsibility for temporary trouble with blood
circulation in the brain (leading to a stroke in at least one instance). Whether
these isolated cases can be extrapolated into general principle is questionable,
but such reports raise questions worthy of further scientific investigation.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Impact on fetal development is unknown. The drug is not recommended
for pregnant women.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Hadler, A.J. “Sustained-Action Phendimetrazine in Obesity.” Journal of Clinical Pharmacology
8 (1968): 113–17.
Mazansky, H. “A Review of Obesity and Its Management in 263 Cases.” South African
Medical Journal 49 (1975): 1955–62.
Ressler, C., and S.H. Schneider. “Clinical Evaluation of Phendimetrazine Bitartrate.”
Clinical Pharmacology and Therapeutics 2 (1961): 727–32.
Rostagno, C., et al. “Dilated Cardiomyopathy Associated with Chronic Consumption
of Phendimetrazine.” American Heart Journal 131 (1996): 407–409.
Runyan, J.W. “Observations on the Use of Phendimetrazine, a New Anorexigenic
Agent, in Obese Diabetics.” Current Therapeutic Research: Clinical and Experimental
4 (1962): 270–75.
Sash, S.E. “Anorectic Effects of OBEX LA (D-Phendimetrazine Bitartrate) in the Treatment
of Obesity.” Current Therapeutic Research: Clinical and Experimental 31 (1982):
181–84.
Phenmetrazine
Pronunciation: fen-MET-rah-zeen
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 134-49-6
Formal Names: Filon, Preludin
Informal Names: Sweeties
Type: Stimulant (anorectic class). See page 15
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule II (DEA no. 1631)
USA Availability: Prescription
Uses. Immediately upon announcement of the drug’s discovery in 1954 it
was utilized in Germany as an appetite suppressant. A couple years later the
same medical use began in the United States with expansive claims about
patients obtaining substantial weight loss without having to follow a regimen
of dieting, claims that became more modest as experience with the drug
spread. One experiment testing the drug’s influence on appetite yielded a
result relevant to drug experiments in general: The substance worked better
when people knew its intended effect. If people knew they were supposed to
feel less hungry, they noticed less desire for food and then ate less. Early
reports praised phenmetrazine for producing more appetite loss than amphetamine
and with fewer unwanted effects. Since then phenmetrazine has
fallen into disfavor due to concern about addictive potential even though the
drug is described as resembling caffeine more than amphetamine.
In dogs phenmetrazine has only one sixth to one tenth the strength of amphetamine.
One type of canine experiment showed dextroamphetamine to be
250 times stronger than phenmetrazine. In dogs a much higher dose of phenmetrazine
is needed for the same weight loss produced by benzphetamine,
and an experiment with 75 humans had results consistent with that tendency,
finding phenmetrazine to be less effective than benzphetamine in promoting
weight loss. In contrast, another human weight reduction experiment with 81
persons was unable to demonstrate such a difference. That study did show,
however, that users obtain fewer amphetamine effects from phenmetrazine
than from dextroamphetamine.
Phenmetrazine has worked as an antidepressant, and for some overweight
persons that effect may enhance the drug’s appeal (overeating can be a response
to depression). The substance shows effectiveness against motion sickness
and against symptoms of diabetes insipidus. As a possible cure for
372 Phenmetrazine
bedwetting, the drug produced mixed results. The compound has also been
used to treat asthma and Parkinson’s disease.
Drawbacks. Intravenous abuse can harm muscles and kidneys. Phenmetrazine
can produce standard amphetamine effects such as euphoria, restlessness,
jumpiness, insomnia, tics, fatigue reduction, faster breathing, and higher blood
pressure. Studies have found phenmetrazine’s actions on patients with heart
trouble or hypertension (high blood pressure) to be measurable but negligible.
Taking the high blood pressure medicine propranolol along with phenmetrazine
can relieve cardiac effects without diminishing anorectic effects. Studies
with diabetic users find phenmetrazine having little influence on blood sugar
levels or on insulin needs.
Fluctuating emotions and even psychosis have been attributed to phenmetrazine
abuse. Psychosis can include hallucinations and paranoia. That affliction
can stop when drug taking stops, or instead the drug may break down
barriers releasing full-fledged and long-lasting schizophrenia. Phenmetrazine
interferes with dreaming during sleep, which in itself may cause psychological
trouble.
Abuse factors. Tests of drug preference, in which users could choose among
several substances, found benzphetamine and phenmetrazine to have about
the same amount of appeal even though benzphetamine is a Schedule III substance
(a status implying a lower addictive potential than phenmetrazine). In
one such test, volunteers found phenmetrazine to be a satisfying substitute
for dextroamphetamine but preferred the latter. Abusers of amphetamine and
methamphetamine have routinely switched to phenmetrazine when their favored
drug was unavailable.
Drug interactions. An experiment found that chlorpromazine (Thorazine)
interacts with phenmetrazine, hindering phenmetrazine’s normal anorectic
benefit.
Cancer. In pregnant women phenmetrazine may undergo transformations
suspected of promoting childhood tumors.
Pregnancy. Phenmetrazine was formerly prescribed to pregnant women
seeking to lose weight. A study of over 10,000 birth and childhood records
found the drug having no “severe” impact on fetal development. Other studies
have found no birth defects at all, although medical literature from the
early 1960s does contain a handful of reports in which the drug is suspected
of harming fetuses. Those suspicions were never verified but were strong
enough to suspend medical use of the drug in some countries for a while.
Combination products. Filon combines phenmetrazine theoclate (CAS RN
13931-75-4) and phenbutrazate hydrochloride and is promoted as having
phenmetrazine’s weight loss characteristics while lacking hazard of addiction.
Initial clinical trials showed Filon to be an effective anorectic with fewer of
phenmetrazine’s unwanted qualities, but a later study found the two drugs
to have the same unwanted effects. A case of Filon addiction also surfaced,
but that single instance hardly proves Filon to have more addictive potential
than any other drug considered to have low or zero potential.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Gilstrap, L.C. III, and B.B. Little, eds. Drugs and Pregnancy. New York: Elsevier, 1992.
Martin, W.R., et al. “Physiologic, Subjective, and Behavioral Effects of Amphetamine,
Phenmetrazine 373
Methamphetamine, Ephedrine, Phenmetrazine, and Methylphenidate in Man.”
Clinical Pharmacology and Therapeutics 12 (1971): 245–58.
Mellar, J., and L.E. Hollister. “Phenmetrazine: An Obsolete Problem Drug.” Clinical
Pharmacology and Therapeutics 32 (1982): 671–75.
Negulici, E., and D. Christodorescu. “Phenmetrazine Psychosis.” British Medical Journal
3 (1968): 316.
Penick, S.B, and J.R. Hinklele. “The Effect of Expectation on Response to Phenmetrazine.”
Psychosomatic Medicine 26 (1964): 369–73.
Rosen, A., and I.J. Oberman. “Addiction to Phenmetrazine Hydrochloride and Its Psychiatric
Implications.” Journal of the American Osteopathic Association 59 (1960):
722–26.
Spillane, J.P. “The Use of Phenmetrazine.” The Practitioner 185 (1960): 102–6.
Phenobarbital
Pronunciation: feen-oh-BAR-bi-tall
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 50-06-6
Formal Names: Arco-Lase Plus, Donnatal, Gardenal, Luminal, Phenobarb, Phenobarbitone,
Solfoton
Informal Names: Phennies, Phenos
Type: Depressant (barbiturate class). See page 20
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule IV (DEA no. 2285)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: D
Uses. This is one of the more familiar pharmaceuticals. For about a century
it has been used as an anticonvulsant and was prescribed as a tranquilizer
and as a migraine remedy, although all those functions are being superseded
by more modern drugs. Phenobarbital is also given to treat cyclic vomiting in
children and hyperbilirubinemia (a type of jaundice) in infants. The drug is
used against epilepsy and against seizures with other causes, such as fever.
The substance has cross-tolerance with alcohol and is given temporarily to
help relieve withdrawal symptoms from opiates or alcohol. Despite acceptance
of phenobarbital for that purpose, scientific proof is lacking for its usefulness
in alcohol withdrawal.
Phenobarbital played a walk-on role in the history of drug manufacturing
when it was discovered as a contaminant in a batch of the antibiotic sulfathiazole.
After that 1941 discovery the U.S. Food and Drug Administration created
the system of manufacturing controls that has made the terms “purity” and
“American pharmaceuticals” synonymous.
Drawbacks. Experimental use of the drug to treat cerebral malaria in juveniles
was disastrous. The treatment halved the seizure rate but doubled the
death rate, a rate that climbed even higher when diazepam was administered
in combination. Some medical personnel have noted that patients taking phenobarbital
tend to become more bellicose and uncooperative. A medical curiosity
noted as late as the 1960s was that persons could be pronounced dead
from a phenobarbital overdose and later be discovered alive.
In some research children receiving the drug for seizures show long-lasting
reduction in IQ scores and in scores of other cognitive tests, but different
research finds normal results after children have received the drug daily for
Phenobarbital 375
years. Phenobarbital is known to alter adrenal and thyroid mechanisms. Persons
suffering from a body chemistry disorder called porphyria are supposed
to avoid the drug. Skin rashes and sores have been attributed to phenobarbital.
Scientists suspect the drug causes liver damage in dogs, but an experiment
testing a group of dogs for over six months was unable to confirm that suspicion.
Abuse factors. Characteristics are the same as for barbiturate class depressants
in general.
Drug interactions. Birth control pills might not work properly while a
woman is taking phenobarbital. The drug may interfere with medicines designed
to reduce blood clotting. Phenobarbital lowers blood levels of an antischizophrenia
medicine called clozapine and thereby affects proper dosage.
Persons taking phenobarbital in a task performance test typed more slowly
but more accurately, catching and fixing more errors than when a placebo was
used. Taking alcohol at the same time increased both speed and errors, but
typists believed they were working as well as ever and were unaware of their
worsening inaccuracy. From results in variations of the experiment the researchers
concluded that alcohol boosts some effects of phenobarbital.
Cancer. In some mice experiments the drug promotes liver tumors, but complexities
in the results have deterred researchers from making conclusions
about the drug’s ability to do the same in humans. Scientists do find that
persons using the drug have higher rates of liver and lung cancer, but a causeeffect
relationship has not been demonstrated. In contrast, cigarette smokers
who use the drug have lower bladder cancer rates than nonsmokers; as a
partial explanation, researchers suspect the drug may reduce the amount of
chemicals in tobacco smoke that cause bladder cancer.
Pregnancy. In animal experiments birth defects caused by phenobarbital are
described as “profound and prominent.” For example, pregnant mice dosed
with phenobarbital produce offspring with retarded muscle development, and
pregnant rats receiving the drug produce offspring with heart defects.
Debate exists about whether phenobarbital causes human birth defects.
Medical records in 151 human pregnancies from the 1970s into the 1990s gave
no indication that phenobarbital alone causes malformations, a conclusion
supported by another study of 178 pregnancies. In Europe phenobarbital has
been classified as safe for using during pregnancy.
Yet a review of almost 20,000 pregnancies found that 4.6% of children born
to women who used phenobarbital during early pregnancy had birth defects,
almost twice the rate suffered by children from women who used no drugs.
An international examination of almost 1,000 birth outcomes in Asia and Europe
put the rate of all defects (serious or not) associated with phenobarbital
at 5%. Investigations have associated phenobarbital with heart defects, facial
deformities, urinary tract malformations, and incomplete development of fingers
or toes. One study found that about 20% of pregnant epileptic women
taking the drug gave birth to children with serious birth defects, a finding
consistent with still more studies. One study compared pregnant epileptic
women who used phenobarbital with those who did not and revealed that
women using the drug had infants with smaller head size. As children from
376 Phenobarbital
the phenobarbital group grew older, they had shorter attention spans and
more trouble with spelling and math.
Worse deformities have been seen when phenobarbital is used in combination
with some other drugs than when used alone. A review of epilepsy
medicines published in 1997 said malformations from phenobarbital are no
more likely than from carbamazepine, phenytoin, or valproic acid—yet those
latter three substances have been found to cause birth defects. A 1994 analysis
of outcomes in several hundred pregnancies concluded that birth defects were
more likely from phenobarbital than from carbamazepine or phenytoin.
Phenobarbital and other epilepsy drugs may reduce vitamin K levels in a
fetus, a reduction that can promote bleeding and cause disfiguring birth defects.
Some researchers think that pregnant women using such drugs should
ingest extra vitamin K.
Researchers believe that pregnant rats receiving phenobarbital seem to produce
male offspring with “feminized behavior” and female offspring with
masculine behavior. A group of humans who were prenatally exposed to
phenobarbital showed higher rates of homosexual, cross-gender, and transsexual
behavior when compared to a matched group that had no prenatal
exposure to phenobarbital.
After phenobarbital is given to pregnant rats, their mature progeny act more
nervous and uneasy than mature progeny from rats not exposed to the drug
during pregnancy and also exhibit defects in reproductive ability. Mice exposed
to the drug during fetal development and soon after birth show improper
functioning of the hippocampus (a part of the brain affecting memory),
and their brains weigh less than normal. Tests of thinking ability in adult
humans whose mothers used phenobarbital and phenytoin while pregnant
reveal deficiency in perceiving differences among geometrical figures. Other
research has found that such adults generally have normal intelligence but
are far likelier to have learning difficulties than adults who did not have prenatal
exposure to the phenobarbital-phenytoin combination. Two studies have
found verbal intelligence scores to be below expectations in men whose mothers
took phenobarbital while pregnant, and another study found psychological
maturation to be slowed in about 20% of children whose mothers received
phenobarbital while pregnant. The director of a National Institutes of Health
research center reported contrary findings in which offspring performed better
if their mothers had used phenobarbital while pregnant, but analysts have
noted methodological aspects in that study that weaken its findings.
The drug is sometimes given to pregnant women having premature labor,
to reduce the hazard of infants developing bleeding inside the skull. One
follow-through study found that infants born to pregnant women receiving
such therapy had better nervous system development than children from
mothers who did not receive such therapy, measured both in organic and
cognitive factors. Another study measuring two such populations found the
phenobarbital children to have lower mental development.
If a pregnant woman uses phenobarbital her infant can be born dependent
on the drug; neonatal withdrawal is characterized by peevishness, vomiting,
and poor muscle tone. Typically a nursing woman’s milk will contain about
45% of the phenobarbital level found in her blood. Breast-feeding by mothers
Phenobarbital 377
who use phenobarbital is considered marginally acceptable, but infants should
be watched for untoward effects.
Combination products. Arco-Lase Plus combines phenobarbital, hyoscyamine
sulfate, and atropine sulfate. The product is a remedy for digestive complaints
ranging from bloat and cramps to nausea, diarrhea, and ulcers.
Arco-Lase Plus can impair vision and is not recommended for persons with
glaucoma. The substance increases heart rate and reduces saliva production.
The combination product should be avoided by persons suffering from enlarged
prostate.
Donnatal combines phenobarbital, hyoscyamine sulfate, atropine sulfate,
and scopolamine hydrobromide. The combination product is a treatment for
assorted bowel complaints and duodenal ulcers. Normally Donnatal is considered
inappropriate for persons with glaucoma or with gastrointestinal or
urinary obstruction. The substance may decrease alertness, so a person taking
Donnatal should not run dangerous machinery.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Joyce, C.R., et al. “Potentiation by Phenobarbitone of Effects of Ethyl Alcohol on Human
Behaviour.” Journal of Mental Science 105 (1959): 51–60.
Lerman-Sagie, T., and P. Lerman. “Phenobarbital Still Has a Role in Epilepsy Treatment.”
Journal of Child Neurology 14 (1999): 820–21.
“Phenobarbital.” In Therapeutic Drugs, ed. C. Dollery. 2d ed. New York: Churchill Livingstone,
1999. P83–P85.
Poindexter, A.R. “Phenobarbital, Propranolol, and Aggression.” Journal of Neuropsychiatry
and Clinical Neurosciences 12 (2000): 413.
Reinisch, J.M., et al. “In Utero Exposure to Phenobarbital and Intelligence Deficits in
Adult Men.” Journal of the American Medical Association 274 (1995): 1518–25.
Rodgers, J.E., and M.A. Crouch. “Phenobarbital for Alcohol Withdrawal Syndrome.”
American Journal of Health-System Pharmacy 56 (1999): 175–78.
Phenoperidine
Pronunciation: fee-noh-PER-i-deen
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 562-26-5
Formal Names: Operidine
Type: Depressant (opioid class). See page 24
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule I (DEA no. 9641)
USA Availability: Illegal to possess
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. This drug has no officially approved medical use in the United States.
Elsewhere (such as Sweden, France, and Great Britain) the substance is administered
for sedation and pain relief, much like morphine. For example,
phenoperidine is used to calm patients and to cloud unpleasant memory of
procedures such as a cataract operation or sticking tubes down passages in
the throat or lungs. Phenoperidine is also used in major dental work, such as
extraction of wisdom teeth. The substance has been recommended for children
in intensive-care units, partly because it normally has modest impact on heart
and breathing functions when used in a medical context. Medical practitioners
report the drug also has excellent anesthesia results in elderly abdominal surgery
patients. Very young and very old populations can be among the most
challenging for safe drug treatment, so these favorable results are especially
important for evaluating the drug. Phenoperidine takes effect quickly and has
a relatively prolonged time of therapeutic action.
One study found phenoperidine, morphine, and fentanyl to have about
equivalent value for anesthesia, although the drugs are not equivalent in
strength. For example, intravenous doses of fentanyl are 6 times stronger than
phenoperidine, and phenoperidine is 5 to 10 times stronger than morphine.
A study found phenoperidine as effective as heroin in relieving pain from
cesarean section. Body chemistry transforms a portion of a phenoperidine dose
into meperidine.
Drawbacks. Unwanted effects can include itching, nausea, vomiting, and
breathing trouble. Reports exist of heart and brain damage caused by medical
doses.
Abuse factors. Dependence can develop.
Drug interactions. Reports indicate phenoperidine can reduce blood pressure,
and the compound is suspected of interacting with propranolol (a drug
Phenoperidine 379
used to control high blood pressure), thereby producing extremely low blood
pressure. Cases of major circulatory collapse are known.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Experimentation with mice has shown birth defects to be less
likely from phenoperidine than from other drugs with similar medical uses,
but that finding does not mean the substance is safe for use during pregnancy.
Clinical observations have detected no fetal or newborn injury when phenoperidine
was used as an anesthetic in childbirth.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Grummitt, R.M., and V.A. Goat. “Intracranial Pressure after Phenoperidine.” Anaesthesia
39 (1984): 565–67.
Macrae, D.J., et al. “Double-Blind Comparison of the Efficacy of Extradural Diamorphine,
Extradural Phenoperidine and I.m. Diamorphine Following Caesarean
Section.” British Journal of Anaesthesia 59 (1987): 354–59.
“Phenoperidine HCl.” In Therapeutic Drugs, ed. C. Dollery. 2d ed. New York: Churchill
Livingstone, 1999. P89–P90.
Werner, D., et al. “A Comparison of Diazepam and Phenoperidine in Premedication
for Upper Gastrointestinal Endoscopy: A Randomized Double Blind Controlled
Study.” European Journal of Clinical Pharmacology 22 (1982): 143–45.
Whalley, D.G., et al. “A Comparison of the Incidence of Cardiac Arrhythmia during
Two Methods of Anaesthesia for Dental Extractions.” British Journal of Anaesthesia
48 (1976): 1207–10.
Phentermine
Pronunciation: FEN-ter-meen
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 122-09-8. (Hydrochloride form
1197-21-3)
Formal Names: Adipex-P, Duromine, Fastin, Ionamin, Obe-Nix 30, Umine
Informal Names: Robin’s Eggs
Type: Stimulant (anorectic class). See page 15
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule IV (DEA no. 1640)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. Phentermine is primarily used on a short-term basis for weight reduction.
The compound is related to amphetamine. Effects are similar to but
weaker than those of dextroamphetamine. For example, phentermine can
make users more physically energetic. A study found phentermine more effective
than diethylpropion for promoting weight loss, a superiority attributed
to phentermine’s ability to retain therapeutic effectiveness longer before
tolerance sets in. Standard medical practice is to stop taking the drug when
tolerance develops, instead of increasing the dose.
In one study symptoms of depression improved among overweight people
using phentermine. Researchers ascribe that improvement to the drug, but
perhaps users simply felt good about shedding pounds. Some research indicates
that the drug acts as a monoamine oxidase inhibitor (MAOI), which
thereby associates phentermine with a number of antidepressants, but other
research has challenged that finding.
Drawbacks. Phentermine may interfere with sleep, cause dry mouth, make
bowel movements looser or harder, produce impotence, make people edgy
and ill-tempered, or (in contrast) create euphoria. The compound is suspected
of involvement with stroke, but reported cases have confounding factors. In
one instance the patient had a history of headaches before taking phentermine
and a family history of migraine and stroke. In another case the person was
also taking phendimetrazine, had used birth control pills for 14 years, had
smoked cigarettes for two decades, and had a personal history of migraines
and a family history of high cholesterol and high blood pressure. Phentermine
has also been linked to narrowing of abdominal arteries with a possibility of
ruptured aneurysms there. Uncommon accounts exist of phentermine users
Phentermine 381
developing primary pulmonary hypertension, a major and often fatal affliction
involving blood circulation through the lungs. The drug is not recommended
for persons with heart ailment, serious hardening of the arteries, high blood
pressure, glaucoma, or an overactive thyroid gland. The drug may impair
ability to operate tools and machinery, such as automobiles.
Someone taking phentermine came down with a psychosis that cleared up
after stopping the drug. Initially the affliction was blamed on the drug, but
the person later developed paranoid schizophrenia, a development suggesting
that the drug promoted but did not cause the initial psychosis. The incident
did not demonstrate that phentermine will cause psychosis in healthy people.
With someone else, symptoms mimicking schizophrenia appeared when dosage
of phentermine increased and stopped after ingestion of phentermine
stopped. In another case a user began seeing people appear and vanish, heard
things no one else could perceive, and started experiencing paranoia—afflictions
attributed to the drug. Such reports became numerous enough that practitioners
were advised to limit the drug’s use to only a few weeks. Adverse
psychological reactions are a known hazard of overdose. Physicians have publicly
cautioned against exceeding recommended dosage and against prescribing
to persons with personal or family histories of mental illness.
Abuse factors. Research is uncommon on phentermine’s specific tolerance,
dependence, withdrawal, and addiction potentials, but such factors are probably
similar to those of stimulants in general. Animal and human experiments
suggest that phentermine may help cocaine addicts decrease their use of the
latter drug.
Drug interactions. Because of phentermine’s possible MAOI properties it
should normally be avoided if a patient is taking some other MAOI, and it
may have untoward effect if alcohol beverages are consumed.
For years “fen-phen” was a widely prescribed weight reduction combination
of phentermine and fenfluramine. In 1997 controversy arose about
whether the combination caused serious and sometimes fatal heart disease;
for details see this book’s entry about fenfluramine. Heart disease has been
reported following use of phentermine with other drugs as well and, more
rarely, without taking any other drugs. In contrast, one practitioner who
treated hundreds of patients with phentermine found no evidence of cardiac
disease caused by the drug used alone or in combination with the antidepressant
fluoxetine (Prozac). That latter “phen-pro” combination has been reported
as causing adverse reaction similar to amphetamine overdose, but such
reports are uncommon.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Researchers seeking evidence of human birth defects report that
standard medical usage in the first trimester found none attributable to the
drug.
Additional information. Adipex-P and Fastin are the slightly less potent
hydrochloride form of the substance (30 mg of phentermine hydrochloride
roughly equals 24 mg of phentermine). The potential for causing cancer or
birth defects is unestablished. This form may enter human milk if nursing
mothers take the drug.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
382 Phentermine
Alger, S.A., et al. “Beneficial Effects of Pharmacotherapy on Weight Loss, Depressive
Symptoms, and Eating Patterns in Obese Binge Eaters and Non-Binge Eaters.”
Obesity Research 7 (1999): 469–76.
Brauer, L.H., et al. “Evaluation of Phentermine and Fenfluramine, Alone and in Combination,
in Normal, Healthy Volunteers.” Neuropsychopharmacology 14 (1996):
233–41.
Devlin, M.J., et al. “Open Treatment of Overweight Binge Eaters with Phentermine and
Fluoxetine as an Adjunct to Cognitive-Behavioral Therapy.” International Journal
of Eating Disorders 28 (2000): 325–32.
Douglas, A. “Plasma Phentermine Levels, Weight Loss and Side-Effects.” International
Journal of Obesity 7 (1983): 591–95.
Griffen, L., and M. Anchors. “The ‘Phen-Pro’ Diet Drug Combination Is Not Associated
with Valvular Heart Disease.” Archives of Internal Medicine 158 (1998): 1278–79.
Hoffman, B.F. “Diet Pill Psychosis: Follow-up after 6 Years.” Canadian Medical Association
Journal 129 (1983): 1077–78.
Jones, K.L., et al. “Pregnancy Outcomes after First Trimester Exposure to Phentermine/
Fenfluramine.” Teratology 65 (2002): 125–30.
Kokkinos, J., and S.R. Levine. “Possible Association of Ischemic Stroke with Phentermine.”
Stroke 24 (1993): 310–13.
Langlois, K.J., et al. “Double-Blind Clinical Evaluation of the Safety and Efficacy of
Phentermine Hydrochloride (Fastin) in the Treatment of Exogenous Obesity.”
Current Therapeutic Research: Clinical and Experimental 16 (1974): 289–96.
Pholcodine
Pronunciation: FAHL-koh-deen
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 509-67-1
Formal Names: Actuss, Codylin, Dia-Tuss, Duro-Tuss Liquid, Ethnine, Evafol, Galenphol,
Hibernyl, Homocodeine, Memine, Neocodine, Pectolin, Pholtrate, Tixylix
Night-Time, Tussokon
Type: Depressant (opiate class). See page 22
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule I (DEA no. 9314)
USA Availability: Illegal to possess
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. This morphine derivative has no officially recognized medical use in
the United States. Elsewhere, in countries ranging from Germany to Australia,
it is used in dozens of cough remedies and has often been given to children
for that purpose. Pholcodine is also a component of preparations used to fight
colds and influenza, with effects likened to those of dextromethorphan. Various
species of animals tolerate higher doses of pholcodine than codeine, and
pholcodine appears safer than codeine in humans. Animal experiments show
pholcodine to be an anticonvulsant, unlike morphine, which can worsen convulsions.
The drug has been administered to mice and rats in low daily doses for one
to three months without evidence of ill effect. Rats show normal appetite,
weight, red and white blood cell counts, and appearance of other body cells.
Drawbacks. Animal studies show pholcodine to depress breathing and
heart actions more than codeine does, but impact on those functions has not
been noted in humans. Unwanted effects can include sleepiness, nausea, and
constipation, but medical doses normally avoid other typical adverse actions
associated with opiates. In Scotland accidental poisonings of children who
drank a pleasant-tasting cough syrup containing pholcodine became common
enough that a call arose to sell the product in child-resistant packaging.
Abuse factors. Pholcodine is one of the few opiates that athletes are allowed
to use in Olympic and other sports competitions. The general ban exists not
because opiates inherently promote better performance but because their ability
to relieve pain can give an athlete an advantage over competitors who are
hurting; animal studies show pholcodine to have little value in pain relief.
The substance can still be detected in urine seven weeks after a single dose
384 Pholcodine
of cough medicine, a characteristic that can cause positive opiate results for
persons undergoing drug screens from employers. Body chemistry slowly
breaks down pholcodine into several substances. Some studies find tiny
amounts of morphine in breakdown products, but other studies do not. Pholcodine
has been described as unable to cause euphoria, a lack that reduces its
abuse potential. No tolerance has been observed among patients using the
substance every day for months. Experiments looking for dependence find
none. Tests for cross-tolerance with morphine produce negative results in humans.
One scientific review of pholcodine describes it as having no addiction
potential, a view supported by UN drug control authorities. A World Health
Organization committee characterizes the drug as having no more addiction
potential than codeine. U.S. government officials have ruled that pholcodine
is extremely prone to abuse and list the drug as a Schedule I controlled substance.
Drug interactions. Not enough scientific information to report.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Birth defects have not been associated with the substance. A
study of women who used pholcodine during pregnancy found no impact on
infants. In Europe the drug has been classified as safe for use in pregnancy,
but in the United States the drug is not recommended for pregnant women;
safety for use during pregnancy has not been established. The substance
passes into human milk, and nursing infants are supposed to be watched for
signs of drug effects.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Cahen, R. “The Pharmacology of Pholcodine.” Bulletin on Narcotics 13 no. 2 (1961):
19–37.
Findlay, J.W. “Pholcodine.” Journal of Clinical Pharmacy and Therapeutics 13 (1988):
5–17.
“Pholcodine.” In Therapeutic Drugs, ed. C. Dollery. 2d ed. New York: Churchill Livingstone,
1999. P115–P116.
Piritramide
Pronunciation: pih-RIH-trah-mide
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 302-41-0
Formal Names: Dipidolor, Dipiritramide, Piridolan
Type: Depressant (opioid class). See page 24
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule I (DEA no. 9642)
USA Availability: Illegal to possess
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. This drug was developed in the 1960s. It is related to meperidine but
has no recognized medical use in the United States. Elsewhere (Germany,
Belgium, the Netherlands, Eastern Europe) piritramide is used as a longlasting
and powerful pain reliever for adults and children. Its strength is similar
to morphine’s, though a little less potent. After a wide variety of surgeries
(such as facial, heart, urinary system, hip replacement) patients have been
allowed to control their own piritramide dosage with satisfactory results. A
clinical study found that females received better pain relief, and from smaller
amounts of piritramide, than males did. The drug also has a calming action.
The possibility that the drug might protect against ill effects of radiation
has been tested in Russian animal research without success. Judging from
other articles in the journal reporting that research, the study may have been
related to civil defense preparations against nuclear weapons attack during
the 1980s.
Drawbacks. Unwanted effects can include perspiration, blood vessel inflammation,
localized muscle damage, urine retention, nausea, vomiting, dizziness,
and flushing. Breathing difficulty is a possibility but is seldom observed in
medical contexts. Human experience and rat experimentation show that habitual
intramuscular injection of piritramide can destroy muscle tissue.
Abuse factors. Not enough scientific information to report.
Drug interactions. Not enough scientific information to report.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Not enough scientific information to report.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Knoche, E., et al. “Clinical Experimental Studies of Postoperative Infusion Analgesia.”
Clinical Therapeutics 5 (1983): 585–94.
386 Piritramide
Kumar, N., and D.J. Rowbotham. “Piritramide.” British Journal of Anaesthesia 82 (1999):
3–5.
Lehmann, K.A., B. Tenbuhs, and W. Hoeckle. “Patient-Controlled Analgesia with Piritramid
for the Treatment of Postoperative Pain.” Acta Anaesthesiologica Belgica
37 (1986): 247–57.
Mollmann, M., and U. Auf der Landwehr. “Treatment of Pain in Trauma Patients with
Injuries of the Upper Limb.” Injury 31 (2000, Suppl. 1): 3–10.
Petrat, G., U. Klein, and W. Meissner. “On-Demand Analgesia with Piritramide in
Children: A Study on Dosage Specification and Safety.” European Journal of Pediatric
Surgery 7 (1997): 38–41.
Van den Bergh, P.Y., et al. “Focal Myopathy Associated with Chronic Intramuscular
Injection of Piritramide.” Muscle and Nerve 20 (1997): 1598–600.
Prazepam
Pronunciation: PRAY-zee-pam (also pronounced PRAZ-eh-pam)
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 2955-38-6
Formal Names: Centrax, Demetrin, Verstran
Type: Depressant (benzodiazepine class). See page 21
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule IV (DEA no. 2764)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. In the human body this long-acting drug converts into desmethyldiazepam,
which is called a metabolite. Desmethyldiazepam is the major metabolite
of diazepam and also a metabolite of clorazepate dipotassium and
chlordiazepoxide. Some researchers believe this metabolite produces the main
drug effects of prazepam and that prazepam should therefore be considered
a prodrug (meaning the substance itself has little drug value but that within
the body it converts into another substance that is beneficial). Prazepam resembles
oxazepam both in chemistry and in its effects.
Prazepam is used medically to relieve anxiety and is considered as effective
as alprazolam and lorazepam for that purpose even though they are much
stronger drugs than prazepam. One study found prazepam to work better
than diazepam for treating anxiety, although diazepam is about twice as potent.
A comparison with chlordiazepoxide showed mixed results; chlordiazepoxide
produced faster general betterment of anxiety, but prazepam was more
effective at improving particular symptoms. Prazepam has also been used
successfully for treatment of depression and crankiness. One clinical trial produced
weight gain in patients using the drug, but perhaps this was due to
better appetite resulting from better mood, rather than an inherent weightpromoting
quality of the drug. Some scientists have wondered if the drug
improves mood simply by helping patients to get better sleep; researchers
investigating that question concluded that the drug does have antianxiety
qualities causing the improvement. In evaluating results of a rat experiment,
researchers concluded that prazepam may be useful for treating high blood
pressure. Animal studies also find the drug to be a muscle relaxant and to
reduce convulsions.
The drug has been used to help alcoholics withdraw from alcohol. In one
study group several patients had experienced delirium tremens when with388
Prazepam
drawing from alcohol in the past, but no one suffered the affliction while
receiving prazepam. A subsequent study of alcohol withdrawal management
rated prazepam as better than placebo but not as good as chlordiazepoxide.
The latter study also found that benefits declined with time; after 14 days the
placebo, chlordiazepoxide, and prazepam groups of alcoholics were all faring
the same. Also during the latter study, in comparison to placebo, about three
times as many patients receiving prazepam broke sobriety—a curious and
discouraging finding.
Drawbacks. Volunteers taking prazepam showed little sedation and little
difference in mental ability tests when compared to performance before taking
the drug. Prazepam has been praised for having fewer unwanted effects than
diazepam, and for being better absorbed by the body than clorazepate dipotassium.
In one experiment a single large dose at night produced less dizziness
than taking three divided doses during the day, a factor relevant to the potential
of falls (especially among the elderly). Unwanted effects can include
dry mouth, weakness, and sleepiness. Tests comparing equivalent-strength
oral doses of the drug in liquid and solid formats find the liquid version to
be a more potent sedative, a difference ascribed to quicker absorption by the
body. In an experiment testing the drug on people of various ages, a dose
seemed to last longer in older men, but that change was not seen in older
women. An experiment found the drug’s effect on movement was similar to
that of chlordiazepoxide, suggesting that operating an automobile might be
dangerous when using prazepam.
Abuse factors. Not enough scientific information to report about prazepam’s
specific characteristics, but they should be consistent with general characteristics
of the benzodiazepine class of depressants.
Drug interactions. The antacid remedy cimetidine probably slows the
body’s metabolism of prazepam. Scores on tests of reaction time and mental
ability can become worse when alcohol is used along with prazepam.
Cancer. Two experiments, one with rats and one with mice, failed to demonstrate
potential for causing cancer. Potential for causing human cancer is
unknown.
Pregnancy. A small amount of the drug passes from a nursing mother into
her milk.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Daniel, J.T., and W.W.K. Zung. “Double Blind Clinical Comparison of Prazepam, Lorazepam,
Diazepam, and Placebo in the Treatment of Anxiety in a Private Surgical
Outpatient Practice.” Current Therapeutic Research: Clinical and Experimental
30 (1981): 417–26.
Dorman, T. “Multicenter Comparison of Prazepam and Diazepam in the Treatment of
Anxiety.” Pharmatherapeutica 3 (1983): 433–40.
Greenblatt, D.J., and R.I. Shader. “Prazepam and Lorazepam, Two New Benzodiazepines.”
New England Journal of Medicine 299 (1978): 1342–44.
Guelfi, J.D., S. Lancrenon, and V. Millet. “E´ tude Comparative en Double Insu du Bromazepam
versus Prazepam dans l’anxiete Non Psychotique [Comparative
Double-Blind Study of Bromazepam versus Prazepam in Non-Psychotic
Anxiety].” L’Encephale 19 (1993): 547–52. Abstract in English.
Kingstone, E., A. Villeneuve, and I. Kossatz. “Double-Blind Evaluation of Prazepam,
Prazepam 389
Chlordiazepoxide and Placebo in Non-Psychotic Patients with Anxiety and Tension:
Some Methodological Considerations.” Current Therapeutic Research: Clinical
and Experimental 11 (1969): 106–14.
“Prazepam.” IARC Monographs on the Evaluation of the Carcinogenic Risk of Chemicals to
Humans 66 (1996): 143–55.
Shaffer, J.W., et al. “A Comparison of the Effects of Prazepam, Chlordiazepoxide, and
Placebo in the Short-Term Treatment of Convalescing Alcoholics.” Journal of
Clinical Pharmacology and the Journal of New Drugs 8 (1968): 392–99.
Zung, W.W.K., et al. “Comparison of the Incidence of Sedation in Anxious Outpatients
Treated with Diazepam and Prazepam.” Current Therapeutic Research: Clinical and
Experimental 39 (1986): 480–89.
Propoxyphene
Pronunciation: proh-POX-i-feen
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 469-62-5. (Hydrochloride form
1639-60-7)
Formal Names: Algaphan, Algodex, Antalvic, Darvocet, Darvon, Depronal, Develin,
Dexofen, Distalgesic, Dolene, Dolocap, Doloxene, Doraphen, Erantin,
Mardon, Novopropoxyn, Pro-65, Proxagesic, Wygesic
Informal Names: Pink Ladies, Pumpkin Seeds
Type: Depressant (opioid class). See page 24
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule II and Schedule IV controlled substance, depending
on amount (large quantities are Schedule II, DEA no. 9273; individual
doses are Schedule IV, DEA no. 9278)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. Propoxyphene has two isomers that are mentioned in drug control
matters. Isomers are varieties of a chemical having the same components but
different appearances; we might say that a person’s right hand is an isomer
of the left hand. The levopropoxyphene isomer of propoxyphene may work
as a cough suppressant and is not a scheduled substance. The dextropropoxyphene
isomer is the controlled substance and for convenience is simply called
propoxyphene in this book.
Propoxyphene is a relatively mild pain reliever introduced in the 1950s. As
the 1970s began, it was the most commonly prescribed pain reliever in America.
One authority describes codeine as three times stronger than propoxyphene;
another says the two drugs are about equal. Either way, propoxyphene
is one of the less potent opioids. A typical use is for easing chronic moderate
pain, as in osteoarthritis, rheumatoid arthritis, or other afflictions of the joints.
The drug is also given to control early stages discomfort in cancer and has
had experimental success in treating headache. In addition to pain reduction,
propoxyphene has shown occasional usefulness for treating “restless leg syndrome,”
a condition in which people have difficulty sleeping and feel a need
to frequently move their limbs day and night. Little or no improvement was
seen, however, when an experiment used the drug against Tourette’s syndrome,
an affliction involving tics.
The substance has cross-tolerance with other opiates/opioids and can comPropoxyphene
391
bat their withdrawal symptoms. Propoxyphene is related to methadone so
closely that propoxyphene can cause a false positive for methadone in drug
screens.
Drawbacks. Normal medical doses of propoxyphene seldom produce unwanted
effects, but those can include nausea, vomiting, constipation, sleepiness,
and dizziness. Occasional cases of liver damage have been attributed to
the drug. Extended use of propoxyphene suppositories can cause ulcerations.
Injecting the drug can cause muscle damage at the injection site, and injecting
the oral format can cause lung damage. Blood sugar levels can drop when
taking propoxyphene, a condition that is easy to treat but that can become
serious if ignored (as when an abuser is unconscious). A study of medical
records found seizures to be common among abusers who had taken high
doses daily for years, but those records did not demonstrate cause and effect.
Case reports have attributed deafness and blindness to propoxyphene abuse.
Examination of thousands of medical records determined that old people who
use propoxyphene are more likely to become unsteady and break their hips
in a fall, and this risk increases if the old persons are also taking drugs intended
to alter their mental state. Propoxyphene may cause euphoria. That
effect is noted in horses as well; the substance also makes them more physically
active, perhaps tempting unscrupulous individuals to dose horses before
races.
One human experiment found that the substance slowed reaction times and
interfered with recognizing pictures, results that may be relevant to driving
skills. Another study using the same dosage, however, found the drug to have
no significant impact on decision making, picture recognition, or reaction time.
Investigators running still another experiment concluded that the normal
doses of the drug do not impair driving. Nonetheless, people are supposed
to be warned against operating dangerous machinery while using the drug.
Propoxyphene overdose deaths became so common in the 1970s that the
U.S. Food and Drug Administration warned that the dangers of this mild drug
needed more respect from prescribers and users. Similar concerns were expressed
in Great Britain during the 1980s, in Denmark during the 1990s, and
in Sweden as the twenty-first century began.
Abuse factors. Despite propoxyphene’s relative mildness, tolerance and dependence
can occur if a person takes large doses long enough. Case reports
tell of individuals who became so addicted that switching the persons to methadone
became necessary. Other case reports relate instances of propoxyphene
dependence so strong that psychosis developed during withdrawal. Propoxyphene
itself has been used as a maintenance drug for addicts being switched
from some other opiate/opioid. One study found propoxyphene to be about
80 times weaker than methadone when used for this purpose.
A study noted that a group of adolescents being treated for illicit propoxyphene
use had multiproblem lifestyles, and analysis of propoxyphene overdose
deaths in Los Angeles revealed that all the persons had led troubled lives
involving different drug overdoses, arrests, strife with other persons, mental
afflictions, and suicide attempts. That analysis prompted the investigator to
ask whether availability of this drug and other opiates/opioids posed a risk
to normal persons or just to abnormal people. Other research presented find392
Propoxyphene
ings relevant to that question: In a group of 37 rheumatic patients using a
combination pharmaceutical containing propoxyphene, none were abusing the
drug. When a group of 135 hospitalized psychiatric patients received unlimited
access to the drug, the level of use roughly correlated with the level of
personality disturbance, but all used it for proper medical purposes. Compared
to a general population, hospitalized psychiatric patients should be
more prone to drug abuse, so their lack of interest in propoxyphene is noteworthy.
Drug interactions. Propoxyphene’s actions can be impeded if a person
smokes tobacco cigarettes. Propoxyphene can lengthen the time span of effects
produced by alprazolam and diazepam. Studies have found that blood levels
from a dose of the epilepsy medicine carbamazepine will be higher if a person
also takes propoxyphene, possibly high enough to cause harm. Propoxyphene
should be used with particular caution if a person is also using alcohol,
antidepressants, antihistamines, or tranquilizers. Conceivably the alcoholpropoxyphene
combination could seriously impair driving skills, although scientists
testing various mental and physical performance effects of the
combination found that alcohol had more impact than propoxyphene.
Cancer. The drug has been suspected of promoting a form of cancer called
multiple myeloma, but analysis of several hundred sets of medical records
failed to link propoxyphene with the disease.
Pregnancy. Rats with prenatal exposure to propoxyphene have seemed
physically normal but show some abnormal behavior. Studies with hamsters
led an investigator to warn that the drug may cause congenital malformations.
A case report discusses birth defects in a child born to a woman who routinely
used propoxyphene during pregnancy, but we do not know if those malformations
were caused by the drug. Such reports about propoxyphene are rare.
A small survey of medical records found no association between propoxyphene
and birth defects. The drug passes into a human fetus, and infants born
to pregnant women taking propoxyphene can be dependent on the drug. The
drug passes into human milk but apparently causes no harm to nursing infants.
Additional information. Propoxyphene napsylate (CAS RN 17140-78-2 or
monohydrate form 26570-10-5) is another variety of this drug. Differences between
the hydrochloride version and the napsylate version may lead a medical
practitioner to choose one over the other for a particular patient, but they are
used for the same purposes and have about the same actions. Rat studies
found no evidence that the napsylate form caused birth defects.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
“Dangers of Dextropropoxyphene.” British Medical Journal 1 (1977): 668.
Jonasson, U., B. Jonasson, and T. Saldeen. “Middle-Aged Men—A Risk Category Regarding
Fatal Poisoning Due to Dextropropoxyphene and Alcohol in Combination.”
Preventive Medicine 31 (2000): 103–6.
Miller, R.R., A. Feingold, and J. Paxinos. “Propoxyphene Hydrochloride: A Critical
Review.” Journal of the American Medical Association 213 (1970): 996–1006.
Ng, B., and M. Alvear. “Dextropropoxyphene Addiction—A Drug of Primary Abuse.”
American Journal of Drug and Alcohol Abuse 19 (1993): 153–58.
Propoxyphene 393
Rosenberg, W.M., et al. “Dextropropoxyphene Induced Hepatotoxicity: A Report of
Nine Cases.” Journal of Hepatology 19 (1993): 470–74.
Saarialho-Kere, U., et al. “Psychomotor Performance of Patients with Rheumatoid Arthritis:
Cross-Over Comparison of Dextropropoxyphene, Dextropropoxyphene
plus Amitriptyline, Indomethacin, and Placebo.” Pharmacology and Toxicology 63
(1988): 286–92.
Salter, F.J. “Propoxyphene: Dependence, Abuse and Treatment of Overdosage.” American
Journal of Hospital Pharmacy 28 (1971): 208–10.
Psilocybin
Pronunciation: seye-loh-SEYE-bin (also pronounced seye-loh-SIB-in)
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 520-52-5
Formal Names: Psilocibin
Informal Names: Blue Caps, Boomer, Buttons, God’s Flesh, Hombrecitos, Las Mujercitas,
Liberty Caps, Little Smoke, Magic Mushroom, Mexican Mushrooms,
Mushies, Mushrooms, Mushroom Soup, Mushroom Tea, Musk, Pizza Toppings,
Rooms, Sacred Mushroom, Shrooms, Silly Putty, Simple Simon, Teonanacatl
Type: Hallucinogen. See page 25
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule I (DEA no. 7437)
USA Availability: Illegal to possess
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. When people speak of hallucinogenic mushrooms they typically refer
to various species containing psilocybin, a drug that can also be manufactured
in a laboratory and that has some chemical resemblance to DMT. Like peyote
cactus, mushrooms of the Psilocybe variety have been part of Native American
spiritual experiences for perhaps thousands of years. In the 1500s Spaniards
observed use by Aztecs. Such mushrooms grow in North America and elsewhere
in the world as well.
For some persons a psilocybin session is a spiritual encounter. Euphoria,
self-examination, and meditation about the meaning of life can occur after
taking the drug. Along with vivid hallucinations, changes might occur in perception
of time and space, and people may feel detached from their bodies or
imagine that their bodies are changing shape. As with many other drugs of
abuse, scientists find that a user’s personality can make a huge difference in
what happens with psilocybin; some persons can prevent any hallucinogenic
effects at all. Personality may influence physical actions of the drug as well;
in one experiment volunteers with less-stable personalities needed less light
than usual in order to view reproductions of artwork; volunteers who were
more normal needed more light than usual. An experiment found the drug’s
psychic effects to be stronger on schizophrenics. Experiences can be so extraordinary
that some investigators have wondered if the drug can evoke ESP
(extrasensory perception) abilities.
One of the most famous scientific studies with psilocybin was conducted
by Dr. Timothy Leary before he became a counterculture icon. Leary and his
Psilocybin 395
researchers ingested the drug together with state prison inmates to determine
whether the experiences would promote life changes motivating inmates to
stay out of prison upon release. Leary reported outstanding success, with psilocybin
inmates committing far fewer repeat offenses sending them back to
prison. Subsequent investigation, however, revealed serious flaws in Leary’s
research; in reality the percentage of inmates returning to prison for new crime
was the same in the psilocybin group as in those who did not receive the
drug. Leary’s advocacy of widespread hallucinogenic drug use was based
partly upon flawed research.
A case report notes successful use of psilocybin mushrooms to ease, though
not eliminate, compulsions and obsessions.
Drawbacks. Blood pressure rose in volunteers who received psilocybin; reaction
times slowed; hearing became more sensitive; and individuals often felt
cold. Dizziness, nausea, and vomiting can occur. Some persons feel nervous
and even fearful during a psilocybin experience. After a psilocybin session
people may feel worn out for several hours, maybe for more than a day.
Reliable information on mushroom effects is more challenging to obtain
than reliable information about psilocybin because mushrooms contain many
other chemicals, sometimes including illicit substances that have been added
without a user’s knowledge. And mushroom eaters may simultaneously use
other substances deliberately, further clouding knowledge of what the mushroom
itself is doing. With the mushrooms, burning or prickling sensations are
routine, as are perspiration, yawning, fatigue, slowed pulse rate, lowered
blood pressure and body temperature, and uneasiness. An overdose commonly
brings on nausea, vomiting, high blood pressure, and abnormal heartbeat.
Heart attack has been reported but seems uncommon.
Abuse factors. An authority who searched scientific reports about 20 drugs
considered to have potential for dependence (including heroin) found oral
psilocybin to have the least. Psilocybin, LSD, and mescaline all share some
cross-tolerance, meaning that they can be at least partially substituted for one
another.
Drug interactions. Alcohol may cause a flashback of hallucinations up to a
week after using psilocybin.
Cancer. A laboratory test found that psilocybin lacked actions expected from
chemicals that cause cancer.
Pregnancy. Not enough scientific information to report.
Additional information. Some psilocybin mushroom species contain the
Schedule I controlled substance psilocyn (also called psilocin, CAS RN 520-
53-6). Mushrooms are not the only source of psilocyn; laboratories can manufacture
it artificially, and reportedly human body chemistry transforms
psilocybin into psilocyn. A case report notes someone who successfully used
psilocyn to reduce obsessions and compulsions. The chemical can reduce appetite
in dogs. Researchers report that tolerance develops in mice. Experimentation
with mice found no evidence that psilocyn causes birth defects.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Doblin, R. “Dr. Leary’s Concord Prison Experiment: A 34-Year Follow-up Study.” Journal
of Psychoactive Drugs 30 (1998): 419–26.
396 Psilocybin
Hofmann, A. “The Mexican Relatives of LSD.” In LSD, My Problem Child. Trans. J. Ott.
New York: McGraw-Hill, 1980. Ch. 6.
McDonald, A. “Mushrooms and Madness: Hallucinogenic Mushrooms and Some
Psychopharmacological Implications.” Canadian Journal of Psychiatry 25 (1980):
586–94.
Parashos, A.J. “The Psilocybin-Induced ‘State of Drunkenness’ in Normal Volunteers
and Schizophrenics.” Behavioral Neuropsychiatry 8 (1976–1977): 83–86.
Peden, N.R., S.D. Pringle, and J. Crooks. “The Problem of Psilocybin Mushroom
Abuse.” Human Toxicology 1 (1982): 417–24.
Rynearson, R.R., M.R. Wilson, and R.G. Bickford. “Psilocybin-Induced Changes in Psychologic
Function, Electroencephalogram, and Light-Evoked Potentials in Human
Subjects.” Mayo Clinic Proceedings 43 (1968): 191–204.
Stein, S.I., G.L. Closs, and N.W. Gabel. “Observations on Psychoneurophysiologically
Significant Mushrooms. I. Clinical Details Pertaining to the Ingestion of Panaeolus
venenosus and Psilocybe caerulescens Mushrooms.” Mycopathologia et Mycologia
Applicata 11 (1959): 205–16.
Thatcher, K. “Personality Trait Dependent Performance under Psilocybin. II.” Diseases
of the Nervous System 31 (1970): 181–92.
Quazepam
Pronunciation: KWAY-ze-pam (also pronounced KWA-ze-pam)
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 36735-22-5
Formal Names: Doral, Dormalin
Type: Depressant (benzodiazepine class). See page 21
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule IV (DEA no. 2881)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: X
Uses. Insomnia is one of the main medical conditions treated by this drug,
which also has anticonvulsant properties. The compound has been found useful
to counteract insomnia actions of some psychiatric medicines. Although
one insomnia study showed doses losing some effectiveness over time, patients
continued to sleep better for 15 nights after dosage stopped, an improvement
not observed when people stop taking some other antiinsomnia
drugs. Similar findings have come from other experimentation. Antiinsomnia
drugs commonly have “rebound” effects in which insomnia temporarily becomes
worse than ever when dosage stops. Little or no rebound is observed
with quazepam, perhaps because it is eliminated rather slowly from the body.
A study noted that quazepam not only reduced anxiety among insomniacs
but that the decline in anxiety continued for 15 days after dosage stopped.
The drug has been tested against other substances used against insomnia:
triazolam, temazepam, and flurazepam. In some respects triazolam was six
times stronger than quazepam, but researchers judged quazepam as superior
to triazolam and temazepam in aiding sleep. In animals quazepam produced
brainwave measurements that resembled normal sleep more than flurazepam
did. Flurazepam leaves people groggier than quazepam the day after bedtime
use. In contrast to flurazepam, quazepam slows mice without making them
physically discoordinated. Still another advantage of quazepam is its relative
safety; in one experiment a particular dose of flurazepam killed animals, but
four times that amount of quazepam left animals apparently unharmed—and
still larger doses caused sickness but not death. One group of experimenters
was unable to find the LD50 (lethal dose 50) of quazepam. “LD50” is the
amount of drug that will kill half the animals receiving it; the researchers
could not find a dose producing fatal poisoning in more than 10% of the
animals. Other experimenters, however, report success at achieving LD50. An398
Quazepam
imal studies find quazepam to have little influence on blood pressure, heartbeat,
and breathing. A human study found no change in daytime attentiveness
or muscular coordination after awakening from a nighttime dose. In one study
researchers were surprised to discover improvement in ability to move limbs
quickly and precisely the day after taking a normal bedtime dose of quazepam.
Drawbacks. Depending on size of doses, people might feel drowsy and
slow-moving during the daytime after taking quazepam the night before, but
some researchers describe that effect as minor. Various attempts to measure
other adverse effects of the drug have found none, but an experiment using
a dosage six times stronger than a recommended therapeutic dose made people
dizzy and sleepy and lowered their ability to function normally. In humans
an impairment of eye movement and eye-hand coordination can be
measured, but the practical significance of those deficits is unclear. Animal
studies with the drug produce abnormalities in the liver and in male gonads.
Abuse factors. Tolerance and dependence can develop. Sudden stoppage of
quazepam after a full year of dosing produces withdrawal symptoms in animals:
restless moving around, easy agitation, convulsions.
Drug interactions. In mice quazepam boosts alcohol’s effects, but in humans
a test of skill in movement found the combination to have the same effect as
alcohol plus placebo.
Cancer. Oral dosage in mice and hamsters did not produce cancer.
Pregnancy. Research is scanty about quazepam’s potential for causing birth
defects, but the drug is considered a producer of fetal malformations. In mice
a substantial amount of a quazepam dose passes into a fetus. Human testing
has shown that about 0.1% of a quazepam dose (and its metabolites) passes
into the milk of nursing mothers.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Ankier, S.I., and K.L. Goa. “Quazepam: A Preliminary Review of Its Pharmacodynamic
and Pharmacokinetic Properties, and Therapeutic Efficacy in Insomnia.” Drugs
35 (1988): 42–62.
Kales, A. “Quazepam: Hypnotic Efficacy and Side Effects.” Pharmacotherapy 10 (1990):
1–10.
“Quazepam: New Hypnotic.” Medical Letter on Drugs and Therapeutics 32 (1990): 39–40.
Rush, C.R., and J.A. Ali. “A Follow-up Study of the Acute Behavioral Effects of
Benzodiazepine-Receptor Ligands in Humans: Comparison of Quazepam and
Triazolam.” Experimental and Clinical Psychopharmacology 7 (1999): 257–65.
Remifentanil
Pronunciation: rehm-ih-FEHN-tuh-nill
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 132875-61-7. (Hydrochloride form
132539-07-2)
Formal Names: Ultiva
Type: Depressant (opioid class). See page 24
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule II (DEA no. 9739)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. This drug is related to fentanyl and became available for medical
purposes in the United States during the 1990s. Remifentanil is used for pain
relief and to help induce anesthesia. Depending on the type of measurement
used, studies of the drug’s potency find it to be 15 to 70 times stronger than
alfentanil (described in this book’s fentanyl listing), which means remifentanil
is strong indeed. Remifentanil is fast acting but is generally not considered
long lasting. An experiment, however, challenged standard belief that the
drug’s actions last only a few minutes, with investigators finding that the
substance still impeded physical movement an hour after taking a dose (although
volunteers using the drug felt normal at that point). Researchers have
suggested the substance might have a specialized use in treating certain eye
injuries because the drug can reduce pressure that may otherwise build up
inside the eyeball and cause the contents to leak out. Some investigators have
found that women need a larger remifentanil dose than men for an equivalent
relief from pain.
Drawbacks. Unwanted actions from remifentanil can include muscle tenseness
and trouble with breathing and heartbeat. These conditions can become
so dangerous that the drug is not supposed to be used unless emergency
resuscitation equipment is on hand and the medical practitioner administering
the substance is an expert. Less serious unwanted effects can include perspiration,
itching, nausea, vomiting, and lightheadedness.
Abuse factors. An experiment in a medical setting found that remifentanil
appears to create tolerance to other opioids given for pain control, but another
medical study did not find that effect. A group of recreational opioid users
testing remifentanil declared it to have stronger effects than fentanyl, but researchers
running the experiment noted that remifentanil’s brief action meant
400 Remifentanil
that it might appeal only to abusers seeking short spurts of sensation. Although
the researchers implied that limited access to necessary safe dosage
equipment might deter illicit use of remifentanil, safety concerns are not universal
among drug abusers.
Drug interactions. Not enough scientific information to report.
Cancer. The drug’s ability to cause cancer is uncertain. Most laboratory tests
reveal no potential for cancer from remifentanil, although one type of laboratory
test using mouse cells does give positive results.
Pregnancy. Decline in fertility was observed among male rats that received
remifentanil daily for over two months at doses 40 times the recommended
human level. No birth defects were attributed to the drug when pregnant
rabbits received 125 times the recommended human dose. The same negative
result occurred when rats received 400 times the maximum human dose. In
both species the drug passed into the fetus. Those offspring, in turn, developed
and reproduced normally. Effects on human pregnancy are unknown. One
study observed no ill effect in infants when women received remifentanil during
childbirth, but another study found the drug to have such a negative
impact on women giving birth (itching, vomiting, low oxygen level in blood,
and insufficient pain relief) that the experiment was abandoned. The drug
passes into the milk of rats, but whether it passes into human milk is unknown.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Baylon, G.J., et al. “Comparative Abuse Liability of Intravenously Administered Remifentanil
and Fentanyl.” Journal of Clinical Psychopharmacology 20 (2000): 597–
606.
Black, M.L., J.L. Hill, J.P. Zacny. “Behavioral and Physiological Effects of Remifentanil
and Alfentanil in Healthy Volunteers.” Anesthesiology 90 (1999): 718–26.
Ferguson, C.N., and R.M. Jones. “Remifentanil—Introduction and Preclinical Studies.”
Drugs Today 33 (1997): 603–9.
Guignard, B., et al. “Acute Opioid Tolerance: Intraoperative Remifentanil Increases
Postoperative Pain and Morphine Requirement.” Anesthesiology 93 (2000):
409–17.
Patel, S.S., and C.M. Spencer. “Remifentanil.” Drugs 52 (1996): 417–27.
Puckett, S.D., and J.J. Andrews. “AANA Journal Course: Update for Nurse Anesthetists—
A Comprehensive Review of Remifentanil: The Next Generation Opioid.”
AANA Journal 66 (1998): 125–36.
Sibutramine
Pronunciation: sih-BYOO-tra-meen
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 106650-56-0. (Hydrochloride anhydrous
form 84485-00-7; Hydrochloride monohydrate form 125494-59-9)
Formal Names: Meridia, Reductil
Type: Stimulant (anorectic class). See page 15
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule IV (DEA no. 1675)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. This weight control medicine appears to work by making people feel
more full while eating a meal, thereby reducing appetite. People using sibutramine
eat less regardless of whether they are trying to lose weight. In rats
the drug increases the rate at which the body consumes stored energy, burning
off calories. A similar action has been measured in humans. Sibutramine has
also been used for treating nerve pain caused by diabetes. One research study
found that the drug improved attention and muscular coordination.
A given dose of the drug tends to produce higher drug levels in women
than in men, but the difference is not considered significant enough to affect
calculation of dosage. Blood levels from a given dose also tend to be higher
in blacks than in whites, but again the difference is considered insignificant.
Drawbacks. The drug elevates heart rate and blood pressure. Headache,
insomnia, dry mouth, and constipation are typical unwanted effects. The medicine
may promote bleeding. Sibutramine is not recommended for persons
suffering from narrow-angle glaucoma or for persons who have had seizures.
Abuse factors. Although chemical details are highly technical, sibutramine
operates in ways fundamentally different from the weight-loss drugs fenfluramine
and dextroamphetamine, differences that may make abuse of sibutramine
less likely. Volunteers with a history of drug abuse were paid to
participate in a study. They found sibutramine unpleasant (causing confusion,
unease, and loss of energy), so unpleasant that in order to avoid a high dose
they were willing to accept reduction in the fee. In another study, examining
how recreational stimulant users react to sibutramine, researchers concluded
the drug had no more appeal than a placebo.
Drug interactions. Sibutramine should normally be avoided if a person is
taking a monoamine oxidase inhibitor (MAOI—found in some antidepressants
402 Sibutramine
and other medicine). The drug is a “serotonin reuptake inhibitor,” meaning it
can interact with various medicines (including dextromethorphan, fentanyl,
meperidine, and pentazocine) to cause “serotonin syndrome,” a serious condition
that can involve hyperactivity, confusion, and influenzalike symptoms.
Sibutramine should be used cautiously if a person is taking ephedrine, contained
in some cold and allergy remedies.
Cancer. Mice experiments involving blood plasma levels similar to normal
human dosage found no evidence that sibutramine causes cancer. In experimentation
producing levels of sibutramine metabolites (breakdown products)
many times higher than those seen in humans, female rats showed no evidence
of cancer; but male rats developed tumors that are commonly caused
by hormone changes. Typical laboratory tests used to measure a chemical’s
cancer potential show none for sibutramine, though its breakdown products
produced ambiguous results in one test.
Pregnancy. Rat studies involving doses strong enough to produce metabolite
blood levels 43 times higher than normal human levels yielded no observable
birth defects. Some rabbit studies involving doses high enough to be
poisonous have produced birth defects, but other testing at a poisonous dosage
level has not. Sibutramine’s potential for causing human congenital abnormalities
is unknown, and pregnant women are advised to avoid the drug.
Its potential for transfer into milk is unknown, so nursing mothers are advised
to avoid the drug.
Additional information. The hydrochloride anhydrous form of sibutramine
was tested as an antidepressant in the 1980s, but medical literature has reported
little about this form of the drug since then. The hydrochloride monohydrate
form became available in the 1990s to help people lose weight.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Cole, J.O., et al. “Sibutramine: A New Weight Loss Agent without Evidence of the
Abuse Potential Associated with Amphetamines.” Journal of Clinical Psychopharmacology
18 (1998): 231–36.
James, W.P., et al. “Effect of Sibutramine on Weight Maintenance after Weight Loss:
A Randomised Trial.” Lancet 356 (2000): 2119–25.
Lean, M.E. “Sibutramine—A Review of Clinical Efficacy.” International Journal of Obesity
and Related Metabolic Disorders 21 (1997, Suppl. 1): S30–S36.
Luque, C.A., and J.A. Rey. “Sibutramine: A Serotonin-Norepinephrine Reuptake-
Inhibitor for the Treatment of Obesity.” Annals of Pharmacotherapy 33 (1999):
968–78.
Schuh, L.M., et al. “Abuse Liability Assessment of Sibutramine, a Novel Weight Control
Agent.” Psychopharmacology 147 (2000): 339–46.
“Sibutramine for Obesity.” Medical Letter on Drugs and Therapeutics 40 (1998): 32.
Stanozolol
Pronunciation: stan-OH-zoh-lahl (also pronounced stan-OH-zoh-lohl)
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 10418-03-8
Formal Names: Stromba, Strombaject, Stromba Winject, Winstroid, Winstrol
Type: Anabolic steroid. See page 24
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule III (DEA no. 4000)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: X
Uses. This synthetic drug is related to testosterone. Stanozolol is used to
combat hereditary angioedema, a disease causing body tissues to swell. The
substance is also used to reduce weight loss from cancer or AIDS (acquired
immunodeficiency syndrome) and has been used experimentally to improve
physical activity of elderly persons and to enhance nutrition of surgery patients
(a case report warns, however, that the substance may cause iron deficiency).
Raynaud’s disease, in which persons experience painful spasms of
fingers and toes, has been combated with stanozolol, and the drug can improve
a skin affliction called pityriasis rubra pilaris. Other skin conditions
responsive to stanozolol treatment include hives and cryofibrinogenemia (a
blood vessel blockage disorder that can also involve the heart and lungs).
Using the drug to treat a very serious blood disease called aplastic anemia
has yielded uncertain results. Itching from liver cirrhosis has been relieved
with stanozolol. Dentists give the drug to ease tooth-pulling. In a clinical experiment
the drug increased muscle mass. Some cattle raisers have used stanozolol
to boost meat production, but the practice is banned in assorted
jurisdictions.
Drawbacks. Unwanted effects from stanozolol may include weariness,
cramps, fluid retention, and migraine headaches. While taking stanozolol a
person’s high-density lipoproteins (so-called good cholesterol) may decline,
while low-density lipoproteins (bad cholesterol) increase. This effect might
worsen risk of artery blockage leading to heart attack or stroke, but the
changes in lipoprotein levels normally disappear after dosage stops. Uncommon
case reports indicate that stanozolol may increase blood pressure in the
brain and cause a stroke. A case report raises the possibility that the compound
may worsen tics suffered by persons having Tourette’s syndrome. Stanozolol
should be avoided by men with cancer of the breast or prostate and by
404 Stanozolol
women with breast cancer accompanied by high blood levels of calcium—
stanozolol may weaken bones in such women. The drug is not recommended
for persons with serious kidney inflammation. In young persons stanozolol
has the potential for stunting attainment of adult height, a special concern if
the drug is used by growing athletes without medical supervision. Any use
by athletes, however, violates rules governing sports competitions. The drug
can masculinize women (losing hair from the top of the head, gaining hair
elsewhere, coarsened voice). A clinical experiment noted disruption of menstrual
periods among women using stanozolol.
Reports of liver damage among persons using the compound are numerous;
however, most scientists stop short of asserting a cause-and-effect relationship.
Researchers have noted liver damage in rat experiments that point further
suspicion in the drug’s direction.
Stanozolol appears to interfere with blood clotting. In some medical conditions,
however, anticlotting action can be useful; for example, stanozolol has
benefited persons suffering from conditions like thrombophlebitis, a painful
blockage of veins caused by the buildup of clotlike material.
Researchers running a mice experiment looked for evidence that the drug
promoted aggression but found none.
Abuse factors. Not enough scientific information to report about tolerance,
dependence, withdrawal, or addiction.
Drug interactions. Medical observers have noted instances in which the
drug interacts badly with the anti–blood clot medicine warfarin, with patients
experiencing too much anticlotting action.
Cancer. The drug is suspected of causing human liver cancer. Tests of liver
function are recommended for patients receiving this drug, lest they develop
cancer or other serious problems that are difficult to treat after overt symptoms
appear.
Pregnancy. The drug is suspected of reducing fertility. Stanozolol has masculinized
female rat fetuses and is believed to harm human fetal development.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Helfman, T., and V. Falanga. “Stanozolol as a Novel Therapeutic Agent in Dermatology.”
Journal of the American Academy of Dermatology 33 (1995): 254–58.
Hosegood, J.L., and A.J. Franks. “Response of Human Skeletal Muscle to the Anabolic
Steroid Stanozolol.” British Medical Journal 297 (1988): 1028–29.
Lye, M.D., and A.E. Ritch. “A Double-Blind Trial of an Anabolic Steroid (Stanozolol)
in the Disabled Elderly.” Rheumatology and Rehabilitation 16 (1977): 62–69.
“Stanozolol.” In Therapeutic Drugs, ed. C. Dollery. 2d ed. New York: Churchill Livingstone,
1999. S91–S93.
Yoshida, E.M., et al. “At What Price, Glory? Severe Cholestasis and Acute Renal Failure
in an Athlete Abusing Stanozolol.” Canadian Medical Association Journal 151
(1994): 791–93.
TCE
Pronunciation: tee-see-ee
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 71-55-6
Formal Names: Chloroethene, Chlorotene, Chlorothene, Ethane, Methyl Chloroform,
Methylchloroform, Methyltrichloromethane, 1,1,1-Trichloroethane
Type: Inhalant. See page 26
Federal Schedule Listing: Unscheduled
USA Availability: Generally available as a chemical, or as a component in various
products
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. TCE is a solvent with many industrial functions, ranging from manufacturing
of ink and textiles to cleaning wigs and motion picture film. The
substance has been an ingredient in “liquid paper” correction fluids used to
cover blemishes on documents and photocopies. Small amounts of TCE can
be driven into food that is microwaved in paper and plastic containers furnished
for microwave cooking, but this exposure is considered safe. A standard
medical use of the substance is for removing adhesive tape from a
patient’s skin.
In animal experiments TCE has depressant actions similar to those of ether,
such as reducing coordination in movement and lessening muscle strength.
Rats exhibit brain chemistry changes comparable to changes produced by benzodiazepines.
Mice act as if TCE provides some effects similar to those of
pentobarbital, diazepam, ether, and alcohol, but those reactions in highly
technical experiments do not mean that TCE would provide humans with any
therapeutic benefits or recreational sensations produced by those four drugs.
TCE has, however, altered sensory perception and caused hallucinations in
humans.
Drawbacks. Caregivers have been cautioned to take steps to avoid accumulation
of vapor inside incubators if TCE is used to remove adhesive tape
from infants. Nonprescription aerosol cold remedies have contained TCE as a
solvent component, and deaths have been attributed to the TCE in those products.
Recreational usage of TCE is intended to produce euphoria. Depending on
amount of inhalation, TCE can make mice more active or less active. In humans
the substance tends to excite persons at first, then make them lethargic.
406 TCE
Typical instances requiring medical assistance involve patients who were so
stimulated that they began running vigorously until they collapsed. An intoxicating
dose may produce dizziness and difficulty in moving arms and legs.
Inhaling low levels of TCE can irritate a person’s nose, and presumably higher
amounts would be worse. The vapor may cause eyes to water. Although experiments
exposing volunteers to fumes showed little or no adverse effect on
several tests of mental sharpness (and even improvement in some measures,
depending on dosage), persons with industrial exposure to fumes have become
peevish and moody, showed trouble maintaining their balance, and exhibited
problems with concentration and short-term memory. Numbness,
tingling, or other sensory defects can occur, as can headache, nausea, and low
blood pressure. Brain, liver, kidney, lung, and heart disease have been observed.
Respiratory arrest is recorded, as are stroke and coma. Fatal changes
in cardiac rhythm can occur. Heart attack can result from an overdose, but
that is uncommon. A case report tells of chronic exposure causing fatal damage
to blood, skin, and internal organs. Autopsy in another instance revealed
liver, kidney, and lung damage in a teenager who died from a TCE overdose.
In addition to sniffing, the chemical can also be absorbed through the skin,
posing a hazard to persons touched by the liquid.
Because TCE liquid will not burn, the substance is often treated as nonflammable.
The vapor will burn, however. TCE is used to clean the interior of
space shuttle solid fuel booster casings for relaunch, and a worker was killed
at a cleaning facility when the TCE vapor ignited.
Abuse factors. Tolerance is reported. Dependence can develop in mice.
Withdrawal symptoms in mice can be reduced by dosing them with alcohol,
pentobarbital, or midazolam. Such cross-tolerance suggests that TCE operates
as a depressant, and humans have experienced depressant actions from it.
Drug interactions. In animal experiments TCE causes fatal cardiac rhythm
trouble that is worsened by alcohol.
Cancer. Laboratory tests indicate TCE might cause cancer, but the compound’s
ability to produce the disease in animals and humans is unclear.
Pregnancy. Industrial exposure is suspected of causing fetal abnormality
and spontaneous abortion. One group of experimenters found that chronic
fetal exposure caused heart defects in rats, but another group of researchers
found no effect. Other rodent work has produced birth defects involving
bones. In mice, fetal exposure experiments simulating recreational abuse patterns
cause low birth weight along with slower maturation in brains and in
behavior of offspring.
Additional information. Scientific writings occasionally use the abbreviation
“TCE” for trichloroethylene, also called trichlorethylene (CAS RN 79-01-6).
That compound and 1,1,1-trichloroethane are sometimes found in the same
product, but they are different chemicals. Trichloroethylene is not considered
a substance of abuse.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
“Aerosols for Colds.” Medical Letter on Drugs and Therapeutics 15 (1973): 86–88.
D’Costa, D.F., and N.P. Gunasekera. “Fatal Cerebral Oedema Following Trichloroethane
Abuse.” Journal of the Royal Society of Medicine 83 (1990): 533–34.
TCE 407
Kelafant, G.A., R.A. Berg, and R. Schleenbaker. “Toxic Encephalopathy Due to 1,1,1-
Trichloroethane Exposure.” American Journal of Industrial Medicine 25 (1994):
439–46.
King, G.S., J.E. Smialek, and W.G. Troutman. “Sudden Death in Adolescents Resulting
from the Inhalation of Typewriter Correction Fluid.” Journal of the American Medical
Association 253 (1985): 1604–6.
“1,1,1-Trichloroethane.” IARC Monographs on the Evaluation of Carcinogenic Risks to Humans,
pt.2, 71 (1999): 881–903.
Pointer, J. “Typewriter Correction Fluid Inhalation: A New Substance of Abuse.” Journal
of Toxicology: Clinical Toxicology 19 (1982): 493–99.
Temazepam
Pronunciation: teh-MAZ-eh-pam (also pronounced tem-AZ-eh-pam)
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 846-50-4
Formal Names: Euhypnos, Levanxol, Normison, Planum, Restoril, Temazepam
Gelthix
Informal Names: Eggs, Temazies, Temmies
Type: Depressant (benzodiazepine class). See page 21
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule IV (DEA no. 2925)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: X
Uses. This metabolite of diazepam is used to fight anxiety and insomnia.
Those medicinal characteristics give sedative properties to the drug. Temazepam
has had experimental success in treating posttraumatic stress disorder,
a condition that may be aggravated by poor sleep. In one study the substance
reduced depression, although in another study some people said it made them
melancholy. The drug has been used in veterinary large-animal anesthesia.
Laboratory tests indicate the drug can help rotating-shift workers turn their
sleep schedule around and perform better at night work; those tests did not
detect a hangover problem. Researchers report that aspect of the drug may be
particularly useful for emergency changes of sleep schedule imposed upon
combat pilots. The drug’s usefulness for that purpose was studied in Operation
Desert Storm during the Gulf War of 1991; in one unit about half the
pilots using the drug reported it useful for shifting their sleep schedule. The
drug has official U.S. Air Force approval for combat support. The substance
has also been used to treat jet lag, which is fatigue caused when air travelers
cross too many time zones without being able to adjust their sleep schedule.
Military researchers concerned about effects of jet lag and other sleep disturbances
on parachute troops concluded that temazepam could help parachutists
get proper rest before making an assault. Elite athletes have used the drug
to promote proper rest, with no adverse effect noted on performance.
During mountain climbing in the Himalayas at altitudes well over 4,000
meters (13,123 feet) the compound improved quality of sleep, but researchers
were unsure about whether it interfered with breathing at such heights, where
atmospheric oxygen begins to become inadequate. Diminished oxygen pressure
was measured in the blood of mountain climbers who took temazepam
Temazepam 409
at an altitude of 3,000 meters (9,843 feet); the change did not occur at 171
meters (561 feet) with the drug, nor at either altitude with placebo. Judging
from those results, avoiding the drug might be a good idea if a person must
engage in physical exertion at high altitude. A British Mt. Everest expedition,
however, found no change in oxygen saturation when temazepam was used
at 5,300 meters (17,388 feet); the mountaineers reported more restful sleep as
well.
Drawbacks. In a test of driving ability 12 hours after taking a dose, operators
of a test vehicle showed increased carelessness and decreased ability to
avoid colliding with objects. Researchers concluded that temazepam users
would be dangerous if they drove a car. In another experiment, however, little
effect on reaction time was observed in volunteers who received a dose almost
three times stronger than those received by the drivers. In still another test
the day after a nighttime dose, in which temazepam users drove a car on a
test course and in actual traffic, observers thought control of the vehicle was
better than normal. No effect at all was seen in one more test, in which temazepam
users drove a car in traffic for over 50 miles the day after a bedtime
dose.
Various experiments have sought to determine whether the drug affects
thinking and judgment. Unsurprisingly, results generally show the impact to
depend upon size of dose and how much time has elapsed since taking it.
The more important practical results are those from the morning after taking
a normal bedtime dose, a typical situation for persons using the drug medically.
Some of those experiments have documented impaired reaction time
and trouble in observing short events, but other tests have been unable to
measure differences from normal performance. One study indicated that
healthy volunteers do worse than insomniacs who use the drug; perhaps the
latter group is more rested and alert after a good night’s sleep, in contrast to
healthy volunteers who get no extra sleep benefit and are a little groggy from
the drug. An experiment with elderly persons the morning after a dose found
vigilance and speed of movement to be unchanged or sometimes better. That
finding is particularly striking because effects of such drugs are often stronger
on elderly persons than on others. The drug is characterized as short acting,
meaning it should have fewer hangover effects (tiredness, lightheadedness,
impaired eye-hand coordination) than other benzodiazepine class substances,
an expectation supported by some experiments and refuted by others. The
drug tends to build up in the bloodstream after repeated dosing.
In studies involving thousands of patients, about 6% reported unwanted
effects. The most frequent complaint was drug hangover; less common were
headache, nausea, and dizziness. Temazepam can also reduce blood pressure,
accelerate heartbeat, and produce tingling. An unusual case report notes a
person who experienced hallucinations of music while taking the drug along
with lorazepam, but the individual was already hearing things before the drug
regimen began. Temazepam can produce amnesia about things that occur
while a person is under the drug’s influence, more so than flurazepam in one
experiment. Volunteers who took temazepam have reported it causes otherworldly
feelings. Blisters have occurred after overdose. Injecting the drug into
an arm or leg artery can cause dire injury resulting in amputation. Arterial
410 Temazepam
injection can also cause skin rash, swelling from fluid buildup, muscle damage,
and kidney failure. Intravenous injection of oral temazepam can be fatal
due to tablet ingredients not intended to circulate in the bloodstream. Some
abusers inject the oral gel format into the groin; this practice can form leg
blood clots that may dislodge and travel to the lung, where they can halt
breathing.
Abuse factors. Investigators found no “significant” dependence after giving
temazepam to persons for three months. Examination of patients on long-term
temazepam dosage revealed no tolerance, and in one study temazepam retained
its antiinsomnia effectiveness when given to a group of volunteers each
night for over a month; they did not develop tolerance. A study involving a
second group did show tolerance developing, findings supported in still more
experimentation as well. The first group did not experience rebound when
dosage stopped (insomnia did not come back), but experimenters working
with a third group were sometimes able to provoke a rebound, which they
interpreted as evidence that temazepam is addictive—although not everyone
would agree that return of an ailment upon stoppage of medication means
that the medicine is addictive. Nonetheless, a case of addiction is reported in
which someone regularly used temazepam before drinking alcohol and also
to reduce tremors.
A report published in 1990 noted that in northwest England about 25% of
persons engaged in AIDS (acquired immunodeficiency syndrome) risk conduct
were using temazepam. This does not mean the drug promotes such
conduct, but it does mean the drug was popular among reckless persons. Such
popularity may have been due to pharmaceutical effects, or due to availability,
or due simply to fashionability, or perhaps a combination of all. In Scotland
as the twenty-first century began, researchers found temazepam abuse to be
the third-largest cause (after alcohol and heroin) of muscle damage leading
to kidney failure and limb amputation.
Drug interactions. Researchers have seen that a dose of temazepam lasts
longer in women than in men. Birth control pills may reduce the amount of
time that temazepam stays in the body. Disulfiram, a drug used to treat alcoholism,
can turn a medicinal dose of temazepam into a poisonous one.
Cancer. Tests on animals do not reveal potential for causing cancer.
Pregnancy. High-enough dosage during pregnancy has caused rib malformations
in offspring of rats and rabbits. Temazepam is believed to pass from
a pregnant woman into the fetus. Taking the drug together with diphenhydramine
hydrochloride (found in many cold and allergy remedies) is followed
by a stillbirth and newborn death rate of 80% in rabbits, and a human case is
reported. The drug passes into the milk of nursing mothers. A case report
noted no effect on a nursing infant.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Ferrer, C.F., Jr., R.U. Bisson, and J. French. “Circadian Rhythm Desynchronosis in Military
Deployments: A Review of Current Strategies.” Aviation, Space, and Environmental
Medicine 66 (1995): 571–78.
Fox, R., et al. “Misuse of Temazepam: 1.” British Medical Journal 305 (1992): 253.
Fraschini, F., and B. Stankov. “Temazepam: Pharmacological Profile of a BenzodiazeTemazepam
411
pine and New Trends in Its Clinical Application.” Pharmacological Research 27
(1993): 97–113.
Heel, R.C., et al. “Temazepam: A Review of Its Pharmacological Properties and Therapeutic
Efficacy as an Hypnotic.” Drugs 21 (1981): 321–40.
Kunsman, G.W., et al. “The Use of Microcomputer-Based Psychomotor Tests for the
Evaluation of Benzodiazepine Effects on Human Performance: A Review with
Emphasis on Temazepam.” British Journal of Clinical Pharmacology 34 (1992): 289–
301.
McElnay, J.C., M.E. Jones, and B. Alexander. “Temazepam (Restoril, Sandoz Pharmaceuticals).”
Drug Intelligence and Clinical Pharmacy 16 (1982): 650–56.
Testolactone
Pronunciation: tes-toh-LACK-tohn
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 968-93-4
Formal Names: Teslac, Testololactone
Type: Anabolic steroid. See page 24
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule III (DEA no. 4000)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. Experiments have shown that testolactone can produce substantial
reductions in size of tumors, although such results are not invariable. Medical
practitioners mainly use this drug to ease suffering from breast cancer in older
female patients and in younger women who no longer have functioning ovaries.
The drug may permanently reduce the amount of estrogen hormones in
a woman’s body; such hormones affect pregnancy and female physical characteristics.
Unlike other anabolic steroids, testolactone seems to have no masculinizing
effect on women. Clinical experimentation using testolactone as part
of the regimen against a juvenile adrenal gland disorder found no adverse
effect on children’s bone growth, in contrast to most anabolic steroids’ ability
to prematurely halt bone growth in young people. Testolactone has had success
in treating premature male puberty, in restoring normal growth characteristics,
and in improving young men’s mood—all without harming bone
development. The substance has also reduced abnormal enlargement of
breasts that some males experience during adolescence. Although the drug is
not recommended for women who have yet to pass through menopause, testolactone
has seen experimental success in controlling premature puberty
among girls suffering from McCune-Albright syndrome (a disease also involving
bone and skin abnormalities). In rat experiments the drug had no
apparent effect on fertility, but in humans the substance has been used to
improve male fertility with mixed success. Testolactone has also been given
to counteract human male sexual dysfunction caused by some epilepsy therapy.
Experimental use against enlarged prostate has had promising results.
Drawbacks. Unwanted effects are described as uncommon but can include
headache, skin rash, tingling, nausea, constipation or diarrhea, and abdominal
discomfort. By elevating amounts of calcium in the blood, the drug can make
Testolactone 413
a person become confused. Temporary hair loss was reported with two patients
who were also taking a corticosteroid.
Abuse factors. Not enough scientific information to report about tolerance,
dependence, withdrawal, or addiction.
Drug interactions. Testolactone may promote bleeding if a person is also
taking anti–blood clot medicine.
Cancer. Testolactone’s potential for causing cancer is unknown.
Pregnancy. In rat experiments at doses far higher than humans normally
receive, the drug increased the amount of fetal malformations and deaths. No
birth defects were found when pregnant rabbits received over seven times the
normal human dose. The drug is not designed for pregnant women, and impact
on human pregnancy is unknown. Whether the drug passes into human
milk is unknown.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Goldenberg, I.S., et al. “Combined Androgen and Antimetabolite Therapy of Advanced
Female Breast Cancer.” Cancer 36 (1975): 308–10.
Howards, S.S. “Treatment of Male Infertility.” New England Journal of Medicine 332
(1995): 312–17.
Laue, L., et al. “Treatment of Familial Male Precocious Puberty with Spironolactone
and Testolactone.” New England Journal of Medicine 320 (1989): 496–502.
“Testolactone Aqueous Suspension (Teslac).” Clinical Pharmacology and Therapeutics 11
(1970): 302–6.
Testosterone
Pronunciation: tes-TOS-tuh-rohn
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 58-22-0
Formal Names: Androderm, Andronaq, Delatestryl, Depo-Testosterone, Hydrotest,
Malogen, Oreton, Percutacrine Androge´nique Forte, Primoteston, Testoderm,
Testoral Sublings, Testoviron
Type: Anabolic steroid. See page 24
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule III (DEA no. 4000)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: X
Uses. Testosterone was discovered in the 1930s. It is primarily a male hormone
but is found in females as well. Various forms of testosterone exist, and
body chemistry can transform them into still other substances. They play major
roles in maintaining male physical characteristics: genitals and prostate,
beard and other body hair, voice quality, and body build. Testosterone is
suspected of influencing thinking abilities and definitely can influence behavior,
such as encouraging mania and aggression. One study found high testosterone
amounts in criminals with personality disorder, with repeat offenders
having the highest amounts. Experimenters documented that giving high
doses to mares resulted in “markedly vicious stallion-like” conduct. Low testosterone
levels in men can make them tired and depressed, reduce their interest
in sexual activity, and cause male physical characteristics to diminish.
In contrast to high and low amounts, one study found that normal levels of
testosterone in men promoted normal behavior and feelings, such as geniality
and contentment.
Doses of the drug can supplement the body’s natural supply of male hormones
if the supply is abnormally low. Testosterone is a treatment for male
sexual dysfunction. Experimental use of the drug to alleviate depression and
weight loss in HIV/AIDS (human immunodeficiency virus/acquired immunodeficiency
syndrome) patients has been successful. The drug has also improved
liver cirrhosis and a blood disease called aplastic anemia and is used
against a bone affliction called myelosclerosis. In experiments testosterone improved
the condition of heart patients suffering from angina (pain caused by
insufficient cardiac oxygen supply), and an experiment showed benefit for
coronary artery disease patients. A case report tells of success in treating
Testosterone 415
Felty’s syndrome, an affliction involving rheumatoid arthritis accompanied by
abnormalities in the blood and spleen. In men testosterone is used to combat
osteoporosis, a disease causing brittleness in bones. Ordinarily the drug is not
given to women but is sometimes appropriate in cases of hormonal imbalance
or sexual dysfunction.
Examination of fluid circulating in the human brain shows higher-thannormal
levels of testosterone in smokers addicted to nicotine and lower-thannormal
levels in persons suffering from posttraumatic stress disorder. Blood
studies find that female smokers and overweight women have higher testosterone
levels than nonsmokers or lean persons. Such discoveries have led investigators
to speculate that testosterone affects those conditions. Heightened
testosterone levels have also been seen in women experiencing major depression.
Among men with low body levels of testosterone, supplemental doses
may help reduce depression. The drug’s ability to affect depression was under
investigation when this book was written.
Drawbacks. Unwanted effects of testosterone dosage may include acne,
headache, higher blood pressure and cholesterol levels, gastrointestinal bleeding,
promotion of baldness, and enlargement of prostate and male breasts.
The drug should be avoided by men with breast or prostate cancer. Liver
damage is suspected. Breathing interruptions during sleep can occur. The substance
may cause fluid to build up in body tissues, which can be a serious
problem for persons with heart, liver, or kidney disease. A case report associated
a stroke with high levels of testosterone in a 21-year-old man who was
injecting himself. When administered in a skin patch the compound can cause
rashes, burning sensations, and even blisters.
Normally women are supposed to avoid taking the substance. It can cause
their voices to deepen, promote hair growth on various parts of the body,
induce irregular menstrual periods, and bring about genital changes. Sometimes
women inadvertently receive doses from residual amounts on the skin
of men who are using testosterone creams or skin patches. Such inadvertent
dosage can be enough to bring on some male physical characteristics in a
woman (such as development of facial hair). A case study notes premature
puberty that began in a child who received the same type of exposure. Another
inadvertent source of testosterone is meat from livestock that has been
illegally dosed. Agricultural sources of the drug are not necessarily illicit; for
example, chicken litter is used for cattle feed, and chicken manure may contain
testosterone excreted by the birds, thereby dosing the cattle. Even some feeds
used in salmon farming contain testosterone. Human consumption of such
food animals may well be safe, but they are possible dosage routes for the
drug in humans if regulations about agricultural use of the substance are
disregarded.
Abuse factors. If used properly testosterone can stimulate muscle development,
which tempts some athletes to try the drug regardless of whether a
doctor is willing to prescribe it. Such unauthorized use can have bad consequences.
One bodybuilder injected the substance into his right leg, which resulted
in severe muscle damage making the right leg 40% weaker than his left
one. Illicit testosterone use is also suspected of reducing male fertility; indeed,
the drug has been investigated as a possible male contraceptive. Taking the
416 Testosterone
compound without medical supervision can be particularly risky for adolescents,
as testosterone can first make a young person taller but then prematurely
halt further bone growth, thereby preventing attainment of normal
adult height. Still another bad consequence of an athlete’s illicit usage of testosterone
may occur if sports regulatory authorities discover that an athlete is
using it; the drug is banned from competitions.
Drug interactions. An experiment found that eating licorice reduces testosterone
levels in men, enough that the candy may contribute to problems of
male sexual function. Adolescent hamsters that drink alcohol show elevated
testosterone levels, and a human study showed high levels among some alcoholics.
Testosterone impairs blood clotting, which may dangerously boost
actions from medicines given to reduce blood clots.
Cancer. Although testosterone is a naturally occurring substance in mammals,
additional doses of testosterone have caused cancer of the breast, uterus,
and cervix in mice and are suspected of promoting liver cancer in mice and
rats. An experiment using both testosterone and estrogen produced cancer in
hamsters. Testosterone is not proven to produce cancer in humans but is under
suspicion. The drug may help bring about human prostate cancer but is not
necessarily a direct cause. A case of kidney cancer has been ascribed to lengthy
dosage, and in other case reports, testosterone was suspected of causing liver
cancer. Paradoxically the drug has been used to help treat cancer.
Pregnancy. In animal tests the drug has caused pregnancy failure and has
masculinized female offspring. Human fetal harm is a suspected consequence
if pregnant women take doses of testosterone. A case report said that using
the drug during pregnancy caused ambiguous gender appearance in a child,
an appearance so ambiguous that the child was misidentified as male for
several years even though she was female (as demonstrated by assorted medical
tests and by the fact that as an adult she gave birth to a child). Testosterone
has been investigated as a potential drug for stopping a woman’s milk production.
Regarding pregnancy and nursing, one manufacturer of the drug
bluntly states that the product “must not be used in women.”
Additional information. In addition to testosterone itself other pharmaceutical
varieties (called “esters”) are testosterone cypionate, testosterone
decanoate, testosterone enanthate, testosterone isocaproate, testosterone propionate,
and testosterone undecanoate. These are used for the same purposes
that testosterone is used, and they basically have the same effects.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Dabbs, J.M., and M.F. Hargrove. “Age, Testosterone, and Behavior among Female
Prison Inmates.” Psychosomatic Medicine 59 (1997): 477–80.
Freeman, E.R., D.A. Bloom, and E.J. McGuire. “A Brief History of Testosterone.” Journal
of Urology 165 (2001): 371–73.
Gambineri, A., and R. Pasquali. “Testosterone Therapy in Men: Clinical and Pharmacological
Perspectives.” Journal of Endocrinological Investigation 23 (2000): 196–214.
Giorgi, A., R.P. Weatherby, and P.W. Murphy. “Muscular Strength, Body Composition
and Health Responses to the Use of Testosterone Enanthate: A Double Blind
Study.” Journal of Science and Medicine in Sport 2 (1999): 341–55.
Testosterone 417
Hayes, F.J. “Testosterone—Fountain of Youth or Drug of Abuse?” Journal of Clinical
Endocrinology and Metabolism 85 (2000): 3020–23.
Killinger, D.W. “Testosterone.” Canadian Medical Association Journal 103 (1970): 733–35.
Mazur, A., and A. Booth. “Testosterone and Dominance in Men.” Behavioral and Brain
Sciences 21 (1998): 353–63.
Pope, H.G., E.M. Kouri, and J.I. Hudson. “Effects of Supraphysiologic Doses of Testosterone
on Mood and Aggression in Normal Men: A Randomized Controlled
Trial.” Archives of General Psychiatry 57 (2000): 133–40.
Rolf, C., and E. Nieschlag. “Potential Adverse Effects of Long-term Testosterone Therapy.”
Bailliere’s Clinical Endocrinology and Metabolism 12 (1998): 521–34.
Thebaine
Pronunciation: THEE-buh-een (also pronounced thi-BAY-in)
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 115-37-7
Formal Names: Paramorphine
Type: Depressant (opiate class). See page 22
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule II (DEA no. 9333)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. Although thebaine is listed as a depressant in this book because the
substance is an opiate, the substance is an unusual opiate lacking many effects
seen in drugs of that class—and indeed sometimes seems more like a stimulant.
Thebaine is one of the chemicals found in opium and in a poppy plant
called Papaver bracteatum. Trace amounts are manufactured in brains of cows
and presumably in brains of other mammals, and scientists suspect that mammals
transform thebaine into morphine. Animal studies show that thebaine
possesses mild ability to relieve pain and can lower pulse rate and blood
pressure, but the drug has no medical use. Instead, its value is that other drugs
can be produced from it: buprenorphine, codeine, etorphine, hydrocodone,
nalbuphine, oxycodone, and oxymorphone. Opiate manufacturing creates
waste products from which thebaine can be reclaimed, thereby allowing fuller
use of an opium harvest. Thebaine in urine is considered evidence that a
person testing positive for opiates has ingested a poppy seed food instead of
an illicit drug.
Drawbacks. Tests with a variety of animal species, including human beings,
show that thebaine can produce convulsions. That effect is so typical that two
researchers have described thebaine as more a poison than a medicine. Compared
to morphine, a much smaller dose of thebaine can be fatal.
Abuse factors. Experiments with monkeys indicate that thebaine has less
addiction potential than codeine, but results were inconclusive about whether
thebaine produces dependence. A World Health Organization advisory committee
concluded that high doses of thebaine do produce dependence in monkeys,
but the committee doubted that drug abusers could take high-enough
doses to produce dependence. Only faint evidence of dependence developed
in a canine study, and rat research produced no dependence at all. Some
researchers have expressed uncertainty about whether dependence develops
Thebaine 419
with thebaine itself or with breakdown products formed from thebaine
through body chemistry. The same researchers declared that thebaine’s ability
to cause dependence is less than codeine’s. One dog experiment yielded unclear
evidence of tolerance, evidence that has not been supported by other
work. Cross-tolerance with morphine has not been found in monkeys.
Drug interactions. In rats thebaine boosts caffeine’s effects.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. After pregnant hamsters received thebaine their offspring had
more birth defects than normal, and such defects did not appear if the hamsters
first received various drugs known to reduce opiate effects. A thebaine
dose sufficient to cause birth defects in hamsters tended to kill the pregnant
females, so not much has been determined about the drug’s potential to cause
hamster malformations.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Halbach, H., et al. “The Dependence Potential of Thebaine.” Bulletin on Narcotics 32,
no. 1 (1980): 45–54.
Waclawski, E.R., and R. Aldridge. “Occupational Dermatitis from Thebaine and Codeine.”
Contact Dermatitis 33 (1995): 51.
Woods, J.H., C.R. Schuster, and C.R. Hartel. “Behavioral Effects of Thebaine in the
Rhesus Monkey.” Pharmacology, Biochemistry, and Behavior 14 (1981): 805–9.
Yanagita, T., et al. “Dependence Potential of Drotebanol, Codeine and Thebaine Tested
in Rhesus Monkeys.” Bulletin on Narcotics 29, no. 1 (1977): 33–46.
Toluene
Pronunciation: TAHL-yoo-een
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 108-88-3
Formal Names: Methylbenzene
Informal Names: Glue, Tolly
Types: Inhalant. See page 26
Federal Schedule Listing: Unlisted
USA Availability: Found in assorted products; sales of the pure chemical are restricted
because it can be used to manufacture controlled substances
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. Toluene is a common component in gasoline, glues, and paint products
(including nail polish). The chemical is used to manufacture the explosive
TNT and may be found in DDT insecticides. Drinking toluene would be unhealthy,
although experimental animals have survived oral dosage of the pure
chemical. Many recreational users have no access to the pure chemical, and
most (if not all) products containing it are poisonous.
Recreational use is by inhaling vapor from toluene, often in a group setting.
Toluene intoxication lasts longer than intoxication from assorted other inhalants.
Some actions of toluene are comparable to alcohol. Toluene can relax
users, cheer them up, and produce hallucinations. Mood may change and
become unpleasant, however, often in response to content of hallucinations.
People may have delusions of nonexistent abilities to fly or swim or that they
must obey commands from some entity. Real-world scenes may seem more
brightly lit than normal. Time may be perceived as passing faster. People may
feel confused and dizzy and experience difficulty with balance and with controlling
their limbs. Mice react to toluene, pentobarbital, and PCP in some of
the same ways. Rats respond to toluene, pentobarbital, and ether in similar
manners. At a smaller dosage toluene stimulates rats to scurry about, but at
larger doses the animals move around less—reminiscent of alcohol. Although
some persons use toluene recreationally, others may use it to blunt psychological
pain.
Drawbacks. Volunteers who inhaled toluene fumes experienced headache,
eye discomfort, and lower performance on tests of thinking ability. Recreational
users have reported slowness in thinking, and they have scored lower
in intelligence testing than nonusers do. Dementia can be a consequence of
Toluene 421
the habit. Recreational users may have trouble remembering what they did
while intoxicated, and persons with occupational exposure have shown memory
damage. Sniffers may also experience nausea, appetite loss, tremors,
speech difficulty, double vision, and ringing in the ears. Permanent hearing
damage occurs in rats. Industrial exposure may harm a person’s ability to
move around; such problems may be unnoticeable in everyday life but can be
detected with scientific tests. In contrast to such occupational exposure, daily
abuse for several years may cause significant problems in mobility; those
symptoms may mimic beriberi.
Brain, lung, eye, and liver injury can occur in recreational users. Investigators
find that some physical damage may improve if exposure to toluene
stops, although brain damage may be permanent. High blood pressure is reported
in blood circulating through the lungs. Controversy exists about
whether cardiac injury occurs, although a case report notes a heart attack
suffered after a teenager sniffed toluene. Another case report tells about a
previously healthy toluene sniffer, hospitalized with an extremely slow pulse
rate that could result in heart stoppage. Anemia and other changes in blood
composition may develop, changes affecting males and females in different
ways. For example, in one study of persons chronically exposed to the substance,
women had higher blood cholesterol levels than normal, and men had
lower levels than normal. Chronic abuse can deplete a person’s potassium
levels; such depletion can damage muscles and produce irregular heartbeat.
Although researchers concluded from one experiment that moderate exposure
causes no kidney damage, stronger exposure may result in such harm. The
chemical may produce a kidney malfunction called renal tubular acidosis,
which might lead to rickets. Renal tubular acidosis can have fatal complications,
but case reports indicate the condition can clear up if a victim stops
toluene sniffing.
Regular exposure can be dangerous enough, but an overdose can create a
medical emergency. In humans an overdose can dangerously speed up the
heart, cause seizures and convulsions, and produce coma. Fatalities occur. An
unusual hazard comes from the chemical’s ability to increase salivation; in one
case, a semiconscious person nearly drowned in his own saliva as it flowed
into his lungs.
The liquid can be absorbed through skin and may cause skin irritation.
Toluene is flammable, thus hazardous around flames or burning cigarettes.
Abuse factors. Monkeys have exhibited as much interest in toluene as in
opiates and amphetamines. Tolerance has developed in rats and humans. Dependence
is reported in humans, with a withdrawal syndrome including queasiness,
perspiring, facial tics and abdominal cramps, peevishness, and
difficulty with sleep. Symptoms last for several days. One reviewer of scientific
studies, however, has questioned whether either tolerance or dependence has
really been seen. Two experiments with monkeys found that they would selfadminister
toluene, behavior that is a classic indication of addictive potential,
but circumstances in those tests did not simulate conditions of human recreational
use. Animals that are strapped down with tubes shoved into a body
orifice might well find a drug that reduces discomfort to be more attractive
422 Toluene
than a placebo, a choice having little to do with the drug’s appeal in other
circumstances.
Drug interactions. Not enough scientific information to report.
Cancer. Most, but not all, laboratory tests indicate toluene has no potential
for causing cancer. Animal experiments have not produced cancer. Whether
toluene causes cancer in humans is unknown.
Pregnancy. Toluene passes from a pregnant female into the fetus. Animal
experiments designed to duplicate toluene abuse patterns have produced low
birth weight and slow maturation of offspring; intermittent birth defects are
also observed but without enough evidence to be sure they are caused by
toluene, particularly since dosages tend to be so high as to sicken the pregnant
females. Chronic exposure to the substance caused pregnancy failure in rabbits.
In a mice experiment the death rate of offspring with prenatal exposure
was nearly twice the rate of nonexposed offspring. Industrial exposure to toluene
has been associated with human fetal deformity and spontaneous abortion,
but toluene’s exact role is uncertain because the women were exposed
to other chemicals as well. Association has been noted with birth defects of
the heart and of the digestive and urogenital systems. Such association does
not prove cause and effect, but it does indicate areas needing further research.
A study of 18 infants with prenatal exposure to toluene found that 39% were
premature births, with 9% dying soon afterward. Over half were smaller than
normal and had trouble catching up to usual size in ensuing months. Fully
67% had smaller-than-normal heads, implying smaller-than-normal brains. Almost
all had classic head and facial characteristics of fetal alcohol syndrome.
Similar findings came from a study of 30 infants born to 11 toluene abusers
and from a study of another 21 infants. Case reports are consistent with those
findings. Most, if not all, toluene abusers also abuse other drugs, so firm conclusions
about fetal effects of toluene cannot be reached from these studies
and cases. Indeed, one group of researchers concluded that some effects
blamed on toluene were actually caused by alcohol abuse during pregnancy.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Aydin, K., et al. “Cranial MR Findings in Chronic Toluene Abuse by Inhalation.” AJNR.
American Journal of Neuroradiology 23 (2002): 1173–79.
Devathasan, G., et al. “Complications of Chronic Glue (Toluene) Abuse in Adolescents.”
Australian and New Zealand Journal of Medicine 14 (1984): 39–43.
Evans, A.C., and D. Raistrick. “Phenomenology of Intoxication with Toluene-Based
Adhesives and Butane Gas.” British Journal of Psychiatry 150 (1987): 769–73.
Filley, C., R.K. Heaton, and N.L. Rosenberg. “White Matter Dementia in Chronic Toluene
Abuse.” Neurology 40 (1990): 532–34.
Glaser, H.H., and O.N. Massengale. “Glue-Sniffing in Children: Deliberate Inhalation
of Vaporized Plastic Cements.” Journal of the American Medical Association 181
(1962): 300–304.
Goodwin, T.M. “Toluene Abuse and Renal Tubular Acidosis in Pregnancy.” Obstetrics
and Gynecology 71 (1988): 715–18.
Kamiyoshi, S., et al. “[Generalized Muscle Weakness Mimicking Periodic Paralysis in
a Patient with Toluene Abuse.]” No To Shinkei [Brain and Nerve] 54 (2002): 427–30.
Abstract in English.
Toluene 423
King, P.J., J.G. Morris, and J.D. Pollard. “Glue Sniffing Neuropathy.” Australian and
New Zealand Journal of Medicine 15 (1985): 293–99.
Lurie, J.B. “Acute Toluene Poisoning.” South African Medical Journal 23 (1949): 233–36.
Marjot, R., and A.A. McLeod. “Chronic Non-Neurological Toxicity from Volatile Substance
Abuse.” Human Toxicology 8 (1989): 301–6.
Massengale, O.N., et al. “Physical and Psychologic Factors in Glue Sniffing.” New England
Journal of Medicine 269 (1963): 1340–44.
Trenbolone
Pronunciation: TREN-boh-lohn
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 10161-33-8. (Acetate form 10161-
34-9)
Formal Names: Fina, Finaject, Finajet, Finaplix, Parabolan
Informal Names: Tren
Type: Anabolic steroid. See page 24
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule III (DEA no. 4000)
USA Availability: Prescription
Uses. Trenbolone is a familiar agricultural drug used for encouraging
growth in meat animals. Human bodybuilders have used the substance in
hopes of gaining competitive advantage.
Drawbacks. The drug can promote masculine characteristics in females. Research
on the drug’s effects in pigs noted that testes decreased in size; research
on cows noted disruption of ovarian cycles. Reports exist of human users
complaining about headache, high blood pressure, nosebleeds, acne, fever,
loss of appetite, queasy stomach, darkened urine, and aggressive conduct
while taking the substance.
Abuse factors. Muscle mass has increased in steers receiving a growth treatment
that included the drug. Some bodybuilders and weight lifters use various
forms of trenbolone, making little distinction among them. The drug,
however, is banned from sports competitions (including horse racing).
Drug interactions. Not enough scientific information to report.
Cancer. Laboratory tests generally have not revealed trenbolone to have a
cancer-causing potential, but the substance has nonetheless been associated
with cancer in mice and rats. Some researchers believe tumors probably result
from hormonal effects of trenbolone dosage rather than a direct chemical action
(the practical consequence may be the same for an animal either way, but
the difference is important for scientists seeking better understanding of the
drug).
Pregnancy. Animal experiments do not indicate that the drug causes birth
defects, but women are routinely advised to avoid drugs of this type during
pregnancy.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Trenbolone 425
Johnson, B.J., et al. “Effect of a Combined Trenbolone Acetate and Estradiol Implant
on Feedlot Performance, Carcass Characteristics, and Carcass Composition of
Feedlot Steers.” Journal of Animal Science 74 (1996): 363–71.
Peters, A.R. “Effect of Trenbolone Acetate on Ovarian Function in Culled Dairy Cows.”
Veterinary Record 120 (1987): 413–16.
Richold, M. “The Genotoxicity of Trenbolone, a Synthetic Steroid.” Archives of Toxicology
61 (1988): 249–58.
Van Leeuwen, F.X. “The Approach Taken and Conclusions Reached by the Joint FAOWHO
Expert Committee on Food Additives.” Annales de Recherches Veterinaires—
Annals of Veterinary Research 22 (1991): 253–56.
Triazolam
Pronunciation: try-A¯ -zoh-lam
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 28911-01-5
Formal Names: Halcion
Type: Depressant (benzodiazepine class). See page 21
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule IV (DEA no. 2887)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: X
Uses. Triazolam became available for medical use in the United States during
the 1980s. The substance is supposed to be used for treating insomnia on
a short-term basis (typically one or two weeks), but sometimes prescribers tell
patients to take the medicine for months. A brief insomnia rebound can occur
when people stop taking the drug, meaning that for a night or two they have
more trouble sleeping than before they used the drug. Another medical application
of the drug is to make patients less nervous as they await dental
work.
Experiments indicate the substance can help workers change their sleep
schedules. In a simulated transportation of troops into combat, however, triazolam
was unhelpful in shifting the sleep schedule of soldiers; and in a military
exercise flying soldiers from the United States to the Middle East, the
drug failed to produce adequate sleep. In still another experiment, the U.S.
Army noted that the drug can induce sleep under adverse conditions but that
soldiers will not do as well as normal if forced to perform while under triazolam’s
influence. A military experiment tested whether the drug could affect
ability to engage in cold temperature operations, with ambiguous results.
Murders have been committed using triazolam in a beverage to make victims
defenseless against attack. The substance is 4 to 34 times stronger than diazepam,
40 times stronger than zolpidem, and 1,000 times stronger than chloral
hydrate; and it is normally considered about 60 times stronger than flurazepam
and temazepam, but that normal assumption has been questioned by researchers
examining those drugs’ potencies. For some effects, such as memory impairment
and control of body appendages, triazolam is hundreds of times
stronger than pentobarbital. Despite triazolam’s inherent strength, experiments
show its effects as no greater than other benzodiazepine class depressants
if doses are adjusted to compensate for strength differences.
Triazolam 427
Drawbacks. Triazolam has been likened to flunitrazepam in ability to cause
amnesia. Memory trouble has been scientifically demonstrated after triazolam
dosage, and an experiment measured continued memory impairment a week
after taking the compound. Triazolam is associated with “traveler’s amnesia”
when people on the go (such as airline passengers) take the drug for a quick
sleep and rouse themselves for activity before the substance has worn off; they
forget things they did while under the drug’s influence. That condition is
sometimes associated with simultaneously ingesting alcohol, an unwise practice
with any benzodiazepine class substance. The amnesia can be startling.
Physicians have taken triazolam to promote a good night’s sleep, attended to
professional duties the next day (including carrying out medical procedures),
and suddenly realized they have no memory of anything they have done in
that time period. Colleagues and patients observed nothing amiss; by coincidence
one doctor was videotaped during the “blackout” period, and the videotape
showed him acting normally. Such an effect can happen without drugs;
some car drivers suddenly realize they have gone for several blocks or miles
with no recollection of stoplights or turnoffs. Under triazolam amnesia people
function normally and do not do anything they would not ordinarily do but
simply fail to acquire memory of what they did. Flumazenil is a drug that
counteracts benzodiazepine effects, and U.S. Army research has determined
that administering flumazenil with triazolam prevents the memory trouble.
Triazolam may promote extraverted behavior, mania, aggression, hallucinations
(visual, auditory, tactile), confusion, and difficulty in communicating.
These responses are mostly limited to users who are elderly or who have a
prior history of psychiatric difficulties. A study of psychiatric patients receiving
high dosage of triazolam documented that they engaged in alarming conduct
(ranging from self-induced vomiting to panic attacks and suicide
attempts) with no memory of the activity after the drug wore off. Persons who
commit violent acts after taking triazolam seem to be persons who are already
psychologically abnormal. In the general population such effects are unusual:
Examination of results from clinical trials testing the drug on over 5,400 persons
revealed no reports of psychotic reaction. Nonetheless, in the early 1990s
unwanted psychological effects prompted a ban against triazolam by governments
around the world (although not by the United States). After further
consideration, most of those countries restored access to the drug. Two authorities
have suggested that the most sensible approach is simply to avoid
prescribing the drug to persons who are elderly or mentally ill.
A study in Finland concluded that despite occasional bizarre behavior
prompted by the drug, triazolam was not associated with violent death; indeed,
in fatalities the drug was detected less often than would be expected by
chance. A comparison of psychiatric patient records found that triazolam is
no more prone to lower someone’s inhibitions than temazepam, and an experiment
testing adverse effects in normal volunteers found little difference
between those two drugs in comparable dosing.
A reviewer who examined dozens of scientific studies involving thousands
of triazolam users found unwanted sedation to be the only adverse effect
reliably associated with medical doses of the substance, although a reviewer
of studies sponsored by the manufacturer noted occasional complaints of
428 Triazolam
headache, dizziness, incoordination, and nervousness. Hangover from the
drug is common after awakening, although some studies show hangover to
be lighter with triazolam than with flurazepam or barbiturates. Triazolam can
produce double vision, and hours after taking a dose people can still have
difficulty controlling their movements—a particular problem for elderly persons
who already have trouble avoiding falls.
Alarmingly, people are not necessarily aware of how much they are affected
by a triazolam dose. While under the drug’s influence, users should avoid
operating dangerous machinery such as automobiles. A U.S. Army experiment
found that people could perform normally on computerized tests six hours
after taking a triazolam dose, but not everyone is as physically fit as combatready
soldiers (physical condition can make a difference on how fast a drug
is flushed from the body). For example, Swiss military and airline pilots
showed impaired performance when tested seven hours after taking the same
dose used in the U.S. Army study.
An unusual case report tells of vision damage in two persons who looked
at a television camera’s brilliant light while using triazolam. Another case
report notes the drug can interfere with male fertility. Triazolam is not recommended
for use by children, although experiments have revealed no ill
effects in juveniles who receive the drug.
Abuse factors. Experimentation indicates that the greater a person’s history
of sedative abuse, the more appealing triazolam will be. Persons who did not
abuse drugs and who took triazolam in an experiment did not like it, and
compared to other benzodiazepines, the drug is considered to have average
or below-average potential for abuse. A published review of research on triazolam
concluded that its potential for abuse is less than pentobarbital’s. Research
finds little evidence of triazolam tolerance, but cases are reported of
the drug’s sleep-inducing and antianxiety properties declining in some persons,
who respond by taking more and more triazolam. Dependence can develop,
causing a withdrawal syndrome if the drug is cut off. Withdrawal
symptoms may be trivial but can include psychosis, delirium, and seizures.
Indeed, some psychological problems once attributed to the drug have later
been attributed partly to withdrawal. Typically someone experiencing dependence
on triazolam has already had trouble with drug abuse or is suffering
from anxiety or panic attacks.
Drug interactions. Normally people using triazolam should avoid the antidepressant
drug nefazodone due to its tendency to prolong effects of a triazolam
dose. The female hormone supplement progesterone makes the body
more sensitive to triazolam. The blood pressure medicine diltiazem, the human
immunodeficiency virus AIDS (acquired immunodeficiency syndrome)
medicine ritonavir, and the antifungus drugs itraconazole and ketoconazole
not only extend the length of a triazolam dose but increase its effects. The
antacid cimetidine (Tagamet) is suspected of doing the same. Grapefruit juice
may increase the amount of triazolam accessible to the body after a dose, but
results have been inconsistent in experiments testing whether the combination
increases drug actions. Drugs that lessen effects of a triazolam dose include
caffeine, the tuberculosis medicine rifampin, and the anticonvulsant medicines
carbamazepine and phenytoin. The antibiotics roxithromycin and erythTriazolam
429
romycin interfere with the body’s use of triazolam. In rat experiments alcohol
increased triazolam levels in the brain even though blood levels were virtually
unaffected. In human experiments some researchers have concluded that alcohol
boosts some triazolam effects, but other researchers feel that the lengthening
and deepening of triazolam actions after drinking alcohol simply mean
that both substances have similar effects, not that the two drugs are interacting.
Regardless, combining the two can be fatal.
Cancer. A two-year triazolam experiment with mice using up to 4,000 times
the normal human dose yielded no sign that the drug causes cancer.
Pregnancy. Triazolam is not recommended for pregnant women. A case
report tells of a full-term pregnant woman who took 100 times the normal
dose of triazolam plus alcohol, arrived at a hospital unconscious, and delivered
a normal-seeming infant—an exceptional case, however, as lighter triazolam
amounts have proved fatal.
In rat studies triazolam passes into milk of nursing rodents. The drug’s level
in rat milk is about 70% of levels in the maternal rat’s blood.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Ghaeli, P., R.L. Dufresne, and C.A. Stoukides. “Triazolam Treatment Controversy.”
Annals of Pharmacotherapy 28 (1994): 1038–40.
Griffiths, R.R., et al. “Relative Abuse Liability of Triazolam: Experimental Assessment
in Animals and Humans.” Neuroscience and Biobehavioral Reviews 9 (1985):
133–51.
Klett, C.J. “Review of Triazolam Data.” Journal of Clinical Psychiatry 53 (1992, Suppl.):
61–67.
Pakes, G.E., et al. “Triazolam: A Review of Its Pharmacological Properties and Therapeutic
Efficacy in Patients with Insomnia.” Drugs 22 (1981): 81–110.
Perry, P.J., and D.A. Smith. “Triazolam—Never-Ending Story.” DICP: The Annals of
Pharmacotherapy 25 (1991): 1263–64.
Rothschild, A.J. “Disinhibition, Amnestic Reactions, and Other Adverse Reactions Secondary
to Triazolam: A Review of the Literature.” Journal of Clinical Psychiatry
53 (1992, Suppl.): 69–79.
Rush, C.R., et al. “Acute Effects of Triazolam and Lorazepam on Human Learning,
Performance and Subject Ratings.” Journal of Pharmacology and Experimental Therapeutics
264 (1993): 1218–26.
Schneider, P.J., and P.J. Perry. “Triazolam—An ‘Abused Drug’ by the Lay Press?”
DICP: The Annals of Pharmacotherapy 24 (1990): 389–92.
Spinweber, C.L., and L.C. Johnson. “Effects of Triazolam (0.5 Mg) on Sleep, Performance,
Memory, and Arousal Threshold.” Psychopharmacology 76 (1982): 5–12.
Trimeperidine
Pronunciation: treye-meh-PER-i-deen
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 64-39-1
Formal Names: Isopromedol, Promedol
Type: Depressant (opioid class). See page 24
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule I (DEA no. 9646)
USA Availability: Illegal to possess
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. This drug is somewhat like meperidine but has no officially sanctioned
medical use in the United States. Elsewhere it is used as a pain reliever.
Australian work has examined using trimeperidine, meperidine, and methadone
together for pain control. In Russia trimeperidine is given to adults and
children both and has been used to treat shock (low blood pressure and heartbeat
abnormality) as well as pain. A report from a Moscow surgery facility
indicated that trimeperidine is used routinely there and implied that patients
are allowed to select whatever dosage is effective for them. Another report
from Russia judged the substance to be an excellent choice for anesthesia in
abdominal cancer operations, although an additional study described the drug
as less effective than fentanyl in anesthesia. Trimeperidine has been used to
ease childbirth, but a clinical report from Bulgaria says that other drugs work
better. Russian military medicine used trimeperidine for treating combat casualties
evacuated from the Afghanistan and Chechnya wars but found it less
effective than other pharmaceuticals. In the 1980s Russian research studied
possible uses for the drug in treating combined burn and radiation injuries, a
direction of research suggesting preparation for nuclear war.
Drawbacks. The drug has been known to halt breathing.
Abuse factors. A rat study demonstrated that dependence can develop with
trimeperidine.
Drug interactions. Not enough scientific information to report.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Not enough scientific information to report.
Additional information. Trimeperidine and the Schedule I substances alphameprodine
(CAS RN 468-51-9), betameprodine (468-50-8), and proheptaTrimeperidine
431
zine (77-14-5) all have the same molecular formula, but they are different
drugs.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Alderman, C. “Trimeprazine as a Component of Pain Cocktails.” Australian Journal of
Hospital Pharmacy 19 (1989): 205–6.
Bazarevich, G.I., et al. “Sravnitel’naia otsenka protivoshokovogo deistviia nekotorykh
otechestvennykh farmakologicheskikh preparatov” (Comparative evaluation of
antishock activity of various Soviet pharmacological agents) (In Russian). Vestnik
Khirurgii Imeni I. I. Grekova 130, no. 6 (1983): 73–77.
Il’iuchenok, T.Iu., I.A. Matveeva, and R.O. Budagov. “Changes in the Pharmacodynamic
Properties of Promedol, Droperidol and Dimedrol in Burn Shock and
Combined Radiation-Thermal Injury” (in Russian). Farmakologiia i Toksikologiia
50 (1987): 71–74.
Kichin, V.V., and M.Iu. Buldakov. “Anesthesiological Accompaniment for the
Wounded during Transport” (in Russian). Voenno-Meditsinskii Zhurnal 320
(1999): 23–26, 96.
Malinovskii, N.N., R.N. Lebedeva, and V.V. Nikoda. “The Problem of Acute Pain in
Postoperative Period” (in Russian). Khirurgiia (Mosk), no. 5 (1996): 30–35.
Radev, R. “Postoperative Analgesia in Cesarean Section” (in Bulgarian). Khirurgiia (Sofiia)
49 (1996): 33–36.
Shcherbakov, I.V., et al. “The Choice of a Method of General Anesthesia for Patients
with Cancer of the Abdominal Cavity” (in Russian). Anesteziologiia i Reanimatologiia,
nos. 5–6 (1992): 48–50.
Note: English summaries of all the above articles are available through the
PubMed Web site: http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/entrez/query.fcgi
2C-B
Pronunciation: too-see-bee
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 66142-81-2
Formal Names: Alpha-Desmethyl DOB, 4-Bromo-2,5-Dimethoxyphenethylamine,
2-CB
Informal Names: BDMPEA, Bees, Bromo, Bromo-Mescaline, Erox, Eve, Herox,
Honey Flip (with MDMA), Illusion, MFT, Nexus, Performax, Spectrum, Synergy,
Venus, Zenith
Type: Hallucinogen. See page 25
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule I (DEA no. 7392)
USA Availability: Illegal to possess
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. This drug was created in the 1970s and is related to amphetamine,
DOB, and mescaline.
Reports about alleged effects are plentiful, but 2C-B’s Schedule I status
means that most persons who think they are using 2C-B have acquired their
product from an illegal drug dealer. Therefore, they do not really know what
substance they are taking, and their accounts have no value. The drug’s inventor
Alexander Shulgin portrays the chemical as facilitating psychological
insights that improve mental health, a quality that gained 2C-B a role in psychotherapy—
both alone and in combination with MDMA, a combination that
promoted empathy between users and other persons. Reports conflict about
how much empathy is promoted by 2C-B itself. Intense emotions can occur,
ranging from euphoria to fear. Physical senses can become more acute after
the drug is administered. Research reported by a World Health Organization
agency indicates 2C-B can make the senses of smell, taste, and touch more
acute. This and other research describes 2C-B as a possible aphrodisiac. The
substance is also a hallucinogen that can alter visual perceptions. The U.S.
Drug Enforcement Administration made 2C-B a Schedule I substance in 1994.
Drawbacks. The drug is reported to have general stimulant actions that
increase pulse rate and blood pressure and may be hazardous to epileptics
and diabetics. Headache, chills, sweating, nausea, cramps, tremors, and reddened
complexion are reported. Although sense of touch may be enhanced,
sensitivity to pain may paradoxically be reduced, making a person less aware
of injury—thereby increasing risk of harm. One authority warns against using
2C-B 433
the drug along with monoamine oxidase inhibitors (MAOIs), found in some
antidepressants, lest the combination make a 2C-B dose too strong.
Abuse factors. Not enough scientific information to report.
Drug interactions. Not enough scientific information to report.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Not enough scientific information to report.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
De Boer, D., et al. “More Data about the New Psychoactive Drug 2C-B.” Journal of
Analytical Toxicology 23 (1999): 227–28.
Giroud, C., et al. “2C-B: A New Psychoactive Phenylethylamine Recently Discovered
in Ecstasy Tablets Sold on the Swiss Black Market.” Journal of Analytical Toxicology
22 (1998): 345–54.
“Schedules of Controlled Substances; Placement of 4-Bromo-2,5-Dimethoxyphenethylamine
into Schedule I.” Federal Register 55 (1996): 28718–719.
Who Expert Committee on Drug Dependence. “Thirty-Second Report.” WHO Technical
Report Series 903 (2001): 6–8.
Yage
Pronunciation: YAH-hay
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: None
Formal Names: Ayahuasca, Banisteriopsis caapi, Yaje
Informal Names: Caapi, Daime, Huasca, La Purga, Vine, Vine of Death, Vine of
the Soul, Visionary Vine
Type: Hallucinogen. See page 25
Federal Schedule Listing: Unlisted
USA Availability: Nonprescription natural product
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. This powerful plant comes from the Amazon jungle. “Ayahuasca” is
a name both for the plant and for a potion composed of yage and other ingredients
(often including plants containing DMT). Disagreement exists about
whether a particular name is properly applied to the plant, to the potion, or
to both. Small doses of yage produce euphoria; larger ones produce hallucinations
(blue is reportedly a predominant color in the visual images). Sexual
imagery has been noted, but debate exists on whether ayahuasca preparations
are aphrodisiacal. An account from recreational users says yage itself has
barely any hallucinogenic actions but describes yage as enhancing such effects
from DMT. Sedative properties appear as the drug experience proceeds.
Among native peoples of the Amazon, the ayahuasca potion is used in
contexts of healing and religion. Healing may be psychological; in some
regions yage is called “vine of death,” a name that one authority interprets as
referring to liberation from a troubled life and being born again into a better
life after using yage. Evidence exists that the ayahuasca potion may have
antidepressant actions. In its traditional Amazon setting drinkers of the preparation
claim to experience ESP (extrasensory perception) and sensations of
flying.
Drawbacks. Unwanted yage effects include nausea, vomiting, and ringing
or other noise in the ears. Users of ayahuasca drinks report an urgent need
to defecate; other reactions may include tremors, perspiration, and tingling in
hands or feet.
Abuse factors. Not enough scientific information to report about tolerance,
dependence, withdrawal, or addiction.
Drug interactions. Not enough scientific information to report about the
Yage 435
natural product, but see below for information about interactions with chemicals
in yage.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Not enough scientific information to report.
Additional information. Harmine, harmaline, and tetrahydroharmine are
chemicals found in yage. Harmaline users have noted vision distortions when
looking at real objects, accompanied by loss of sensitivity in other physical
senses. Unwanted effects may include dizziness, pressure in chest, nausea,
vomiting, and weariness. Feelings of anxiety may arise. One investigator gave
harmaline to urban residents and was intrigued that they hallucinated jungle
animal imagery; according to some reports, dosage must be almost poisonous
for such effects; otherwise, actions are more sedative than psychedelic. Some
authorities declare that harmaline aids psychotherapy; others dispute that assertion.
Harmine has been tested as a treatment for Parkinson’s disease, with
mixed results. Harmine can slow heartbeat, lower blood pressure, produce
tingling and dizziness, and make hands and feet cold. Hallucinations and a
feeling of floating have been reported.
The harmine, harmaline, and tetrahydroharmine in yage are all monoamine
oxidase inhibitors (MAOIs). Yage might cause overdose effects if a person is
taking other MAOI drugs (found in some antidepressants and other medicine),
and yage could cause problems if a person is also using drugs that interact
badly with an MAOI.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Freedland, C.S., and R.S. Mansbach. “Behavioral Profile of Constituents in Ayahuasca,
an Amazonian Psychoactive Plant Mixture.” Drug and Alcohol Dependence 54
(1999): 183–94.
Grob, C.S., et al. “Human Psychopharmacology of Hoasca: A Plant Hallucinogen Used
in Ritual Context in Brazil.” Journal of Nervous and Mental Disorders 184 (1996):
86–94.
Harner, M.J., ed. Hallucinogens and Shamanism. New York: Oxford University Press,
1973.
Naranjo, C. “Ayahuasca, Caapi, Yage. Psychotropic Properties of the Harmala Alkaloids.”
Psychopharmacology Bulletin 4, no. 3 (1967): 16–17.
Riba, J., and M.J. Barbanoj. “A Pharmacological Study of Ayahuasca in Healthy Volunteers.”
Bulletin of the Multidisciplinary Association for Psychedelic Studies 8 (Autumn
1998): 12–15.
Shulgin, A.T. “Profiles of Psychedelic Drugs: 4. Harmaline.” Journal of Psychedelic Drugs
9 (1977): 79–80.
Yohimbe
Pronunciation: yoh-HIM-bee
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: None
Formal Names: Actibine, Aphrodine, Aphrodyne, Baron-X, Corynanthe yohimbe,
Corynine, Dayto Himbin, Hydroaergotocin, Pausinystalia yohimbe, Procomil,
Prohim, Quebrachine, Thybine, Testomar, Yocon, Yohimar, Yohimex, Yohydrol,
Yoman, Yomax, Yovital
Informal Names: Yo-Yo
Type: Stimulant. See page 11
Federal Schedule Listing: Unlisted
USA Availability: Nonprescription natural product
Pregnancy Category: None
Uses. Yohimbe is an evergreen tree found in African jungles. The bark contains
the prescription drug yohimbine (CAS RN 146-48-5), which is also commercially
produced in a hydrochloride form (CAS RN 65-19-0).
In folk medicine yohimbe bark is a treatment for fever, coughs, weariness,
pain, and leprosy and is considered an aphrodisiac. Preparations including
the natural product have been marketed as a bodybuilding aid, although the
U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) has shown skepticism about that
claim. Theoretical reasons exist to suspect that yohimbine might have antidepressant
capability, but documentation of such benefit has eluded investigators.
Yohimbine has also been marketed as an appetite suppressant, but
scientific research has found it to have no such action. In an experiment using
patients on a controlled diet, however, those who received yohimbine
achieved more weight loss, perhaps through enhancement of energy expenditure.
Human experiments have failed to show that the drug promotes loss
of fat, although that effect has been measured in canines.
Veterinarians have used yohimbine to speed awakening of anesthetized animals
ranging from foxes and finches to buffaloes and budgerigars.
Research indicates the drug can increase male sexual drive and performance;
a case report indicates similar effects in females also, but formal
experimentation has not shown such benefit for females. Experimenters administered
capsules of yohimbine to male crocodiles (by tossing food morsels
in which the capsules had been hidden). The males did not copulate more
Yohimbe 437
frequently, despite showing more sexual desire, but the fertility rate increased
among eggs laid by females that were mated by the treated crocodiles.
Normal sensations returned to legs of diabetics after they received yohimbine
in an experiment. Another experiment showed that yohimbine can help
persons fight the sleepiness of narcolepsy. The substance can be used to improve
salivation in individuals troubled by dry mouth and can dilate the eye’s
pupil. The drug increases blood pressure of normal persons, and in persons
prone to fainting, yohimbine can improve that affliction by increasing blood
pressure. A branch of the FDA, however, has declared yohimbine to be a
substance that lowers blood pressure. Experimental use of yohimbine shows
that it can help bring forth repressed memories and help people deal with
them. Research also reveals that yohimbine can improve performance on some
kinds of reaction-time tests.
Drawbacks. Unwanted effects from yohimbine include headache, tremors,
cramps, mental tenseness, confusion, insomnia, chills, perspiration, dizziness,
indigestion, nausea, vomiting, diarrhea, skin eruptions or flushed appearance,
impaired hearing, accelerated heartbeat, and decreased urine production.
Daily usage may cause breathing difficulty and symptoms reminiscent of lupus.
Persons should avoid operating dangerous machinery if the substance is
making them dizzy. People are advised to avoid yohimbine if they suffer from
diabetes or diseases of the heart, liver, or kidney. Case reports attribute kidney
failure and heart difficulty to yohimbine; an experiment documented that yohimbine
reduces the heart’s efficiency while a person is resting and makes the
heart work harder while a person is exercising. Persons with kidney or liver
malfunction are advised to avoid the natural product yohimbe as well. Claims
exist about the natural product yohimbe causing hallucinations, but scientific
information is nil about that subject. Hallucinations are not included among
unwanted effects listed by the manufacturer of the Aphrodyne brand of yohimbine.
Yohimbine may increase anxiety and panic; research has shown the substance
to worsen symptoms experienced by persons suffering from posttraumatic
stress disorder—experimentation demonstrates that yohimbine facilitates recall
of emotionally charged memories, and such recall is not always a good
thing. Instances of manic behavior following yohimbine administration are
known, as is lesser stimulation involving mere restlessness.
Abuse factors. Not enough scientific information to report about tolerance,
dependence, withdrawal, or addiction.
Drug interactions. Although yohimbine can improve pain relief provided
by morphine, yohimbine can interfere with clonidine, a pain reliever and sedative
that is also used to fight high blood pressure and migraine. Yohimbine
may also interfere with other drugs used against high blood pressure; indeed,
it has worked as an antidote for overdose from clonidine. Yohimbine’s ability
to increase blood pressure can be boosted by tricyclic antidepressants. Phenothiazine
tranquilizers may raise the chance of yohimbine poisoning. In a
dog experiment yohimbine increased cocaine’s adverse actions on the heart.
Yohimbine’s unwanted effects may be promoted by ephedrine and by naltrexone,
a drug given to treat alcohol and heroin addiction. At a high-enough
438 Yohimbe
dose yohimbine acts as a monoamine oxidase inhibitor (MAOI), and various
drugs described in this book react badly with MAOIs.
Cancer. Not enough scientific information to report.
Pregnancy. Women are supposed to avoid yohimbine during pregnancy and
if they are nursing an infant.
Additional information. Although yohimbine may help treat sexual dysfunction,
and sexual dysfunction is a topic of robust interest to sufferers and
caregivers alike, someone who reviewed scientific studies about yohimbine
noted comparatively little investigation of the substance and attributed this
apathy to yohimbine’s status as an “orphan drug.” An orphan drug is one
that is ignored because it has little potential for commercial profitability. Yohimbine
is such an old drug that it can no longer be patented; no pharmaceutical
company can gain a monopoly on it and thereby force patients to pay
a premium price. Consequently, scientists can obtain little financial or institutional
support for exploring yohimbine’s potential.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Albus, M., T.P. Zahn, and A. Breier. “Anxiogenic Properties of Yohimbine. I. Behavioral,
Physiological and Biochemical Measures.” European Archives of Psychiatry
and Clinical Neuroscience 241 (1992): 337–44.
Biaggioni, I., R.M. Robertson, and D. Robertson. “Manipulation of Norepinephrine
Metabolism with Yohimbine in the Treatment of Autonomic Failure.” Journal of
Clinical Pharmacology 34 (1994): 418–23.
De Smet, P.A., and O.S. Smeets. “Potential Risks of Health Food Products Containing
Yohimbe Extracts.” BMJ 309 (1994): 958.
Linden, C.H., W.P. Vellman, and B. Rumack. “Yohimbine: A New Street Drug.” Annals
of Emergency Medicine 14 (1985): 1002–4.
Morpurgo, B., I. Rozenboim, and B. Robinzon. “Effect of Yohimbine on the Reproductive
Behavior of the Male Nile Crocodile Crocodylus niloticus.” Pharmacology, Biochemistry,
and Behavior 43 (1992): 449–52.
Southwick, S.M., et al. “Yohimbine Use in a Natural Setting: Effects on Posttraumatic
Stress Disorder.” Biological Psychiatry 46 (1999): 442–44.
“Yohimbine for Male Sexual Dysfunction.” Medical Letter on Drugs and Therapeutics 36
(1994): 115–16.
Zaleplon
Pronunciation: ZAH-leh-plon
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 151319-34-5
Formal Names: Sonata
Type: Depressant. See page 19
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule IV (DEA no. 2781)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: C
Uses. This substance is a sleep inducer that also has anticonvulsant properties.
Zaleplon is neither an opiate nor a barbiturate nor a benzodiazepine
depressant.
The drug’s sleep-inducing effects wear off so quickly that zaleplon seems
suitable for use in the middle of the night without risk of hangover drowsiness
after waking up. The substance has been approved for NASA (National Aeronautics
and Space Administration) space shuttle crews and has been carried
on flights, an environment where immediate alertness is required upon awakening.
Despite lack of grogginess after people rouse themselves, they should
nonetheless avoid dangerous activity (such as driving a car) right after taking
a drug intended to induce sleep. Researchers testing zaleplon when it was
active, rather than after its effects should have worn off, found that it interfered
with people’s actions to about the same extent as triazolam but less than
lorazepam or zolpidem. Sleep medicines with short action sometimes make
people nervous after extended use, and nervousness has been reported by
some persons using zaleplon, but that unwanted effect was not observed in
formal tests with the drug. Experiments with rats and mice find zaleplon to
have an antianxiety property. Results of human research conflict on whether
zaleplon has a brief rebound insomnia effect, but the trend is to find no rebound.
“Rebound” is when people have trouble sleeping for a night or two
after dosage stops.
One study found doses to be more potent among Japanese than among
Americans. The reason is unclear; it may be related to average body weights
or to some ethnic factor.
Drawbacks. Zaleplon can cause people to forget what happens for a couple
of hours after a dose, and some persons still have amnesia trouble the day
after a dose. One experiment found the intensity of that effect to be compa440
Zaleplon
rable to lorazepam’s but shorter in duration. Because of possible memory difficulty,
an individual using zaleplon may want to avoid situations involving
important decisions. Other unwanted effects may include skin rash, muscle
tightness, pain in chest and back, migraine headache, constipation, difficulty
in concentrating, and emotional depression. Euphoria is a less common effect.
Abuse factors. Studies indicate zaleplon has about the same potential for
abuse as benzodiazepine class depressants do. Researchers using volunteers
who had previously abused drugs concluded that zaleplon and triazolam have
the same abuse potential. No tolerance emerged in studies where people took
zaleplon for weeks and months. No dependence developed either, but that
finding is not considered conclusive. In animal studies dependence has occurred,
severe enough that some animals died when the drug was cut off.
Researchers conducting a baboon experiment found zaleplon to have about
the same dependence potential as triazolam.
Drug interactions. Alcohol should be avoided when taking zaleplon. Tests
have demonstrated that zaleplon boosts the effects of alcohol and also boosts
some action of the psychiatric medication thioridazine.
Cancer. Cancer emerged in some mice that received 6 to 49 times the maximum
human dose of zaleplon for two years, but cancer did not develop in
rats that received 5 to 10 times the maximum human dose. Likewise, laboratory
tests of the drug’s cancer-causing potential have had mixed results.
Pregnancy. The drug has not caused birth defects in rats and rabbits receiving
almost 50 times the maximum human dose. Rat offspring had impaired
growth, however. The drug passes into maternal milk of rats at levels high
enough to affect offspring; keep in mind, however, that these milk levels result
from doses exceeding the maximum recommended for humans. In humans
the drug passes into milk of nursing mothers; impact on the infants is unknown
but is presumed to be harmless. At its peak the amount of zaleplon
in milk is less than 0.02% (two one-hundredths of one percent) of the mother’s
dose, and that amount declines rapidly an hour after a mother takes zaleplon.
Additional information. Sonata tablets contain FD&C Yellow No. 5 (tartrazine),
to which some persons seem allergic, particularly if they have an aspirin
sensitivity.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Chagan, L., and L.A. Cicero. “Zaleplon: Possible Advance in the Treatment of Insomnia.”
P&T: A Peer-Reviewed Journal for Formulary Management 24 (1999): 590.
Heydorn, W.E. “Zaleplon—A Review of a Novel Sedative Hypnotic Used in the Treatment
of Insomnia.” Expert Opinion on Investigational Drugs 9 (2000): 841–58.
Mangano, R.M. “Efficacy and Safety of Zaleplon at Peak Plasma Levels.” International
Journal of Clinical Practice: Supplement 79, no. 116 (2001): 9–13.
Rush, C.R., J.M. Frey, and R.R. Griffiths. “Zaleplon and Triazolam in Humans: Acute
Behavioral Effects and Abuse Potential.” Psychopharmacology 145 (1999): 39–51.
Troy, S., and M. Darwish. “Maximal Effects and Residual Effects: Zaleplon vs. Zolpidem
and Triazolam.” American Society of Hospital Pharmacists Annual Meeting 56
(June 1999): 59.
Troy, S., et al. “Comparison of the Effects of Zaleplon, Zolpidem, and Triazolam on
Memory, Learning, and Psychomotor Performance.” Journal of Clinical Psychopharmacology
20 (2000): 328–37.
“Zaleplon for Insomnia.” Medical Letter on Drugs and Therapeutics 41 (1999): 93–94.
Zolpidem
Pronunciation: zohl-PIH-dem
Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number: 82626-48-0. (Tartrate form 99294-
93-6)
Formal Names: Ambien, Stilnoct, Stilnox
Type: Depressant. See page 19
Federal Schedule Listing: Schedule IV (DEA no. 2783)
USA Availability: Prescription
Pregnancy Category: B
Uses. Zolpidem became available for medical purposes in the United States
during the 1990s, after already being used in Europe. The substance can be
used to relax people shortly before they undergo surgery. Zolpidem promotes
sleep and has both sedative and anticonvulsant properties. Generally insomnia
patients are not supposed to take the drug for much more than a week. They
are also not supposed to take the drug until they are ready for sleep; the
substance is fast acting, and a person could doze off while in the middle of
doing something. Elderly nursing home residents have been known to fall
after taking zolpidem. People may forget things they do while under the
drug’s influence; a U.S. Army test found that the amnesia can be prevented
if the drug flumazenil is taken soon enough after a zolpidem dose (flumazenil
is used to counteract benzodiazepine depressants).
Scientific studies of zolpidem generally find no hangover drug effects, but
people should be careful about what they do after waking up from a dose
until they know they are functioning normally. No problem in that regard
surfaced when the drug was tested on French military pilots and ground
crews to determine if zolpidem could improve rest during prolonged military
activity, nor did Swiss researchers find any reduction in performance if athletes
used zolpidem to get a good night’s sleep before a sporting competition.
Not everyone, of course, has the same vigor as those populations. Experimenters
running the French military test concluded that the drug is suitable
for active military duty, and the substance also has U.S. Air Force approval
for aircrew use.
The drug has been used to counteract jet lag, allowing travelers to compensate
for changes in their sleep/wake cycles and to function effectively while
crossing many time zones. During a simulation of such conditions for long442
Zolpidem
distance troop transport the U.S. Army found that zolpidem worked for promoting
sleep but had no advantage over triazolam. Another U.S. Army
experiment tested human performance during at least 38 hours of continual
wakefulness, with ambiguous results about whether short naps induced by
zolpidem would be useful in combat circumstances. French researchers found
the drug to be useful for improving quality of sleep in low air pressures found
at high altitude (4,000 meters or 13,123 feet) while producing no breathing
difficulty, a finding relevant not only to mountaineers but to aviators and
astronauts.
Many insomnia medicines produce a rebound effect, meaning that the insomnia
comes back worse than ever for a few days after people stop taking
the medication. Rebound is seldom observed with zolpidem, however. An
experiment with the drug produced temporary improvement in Parkinson’s
disease symptoms, and zolpidem has helped clear up catatonia. A case report
tells of the drug being given to treat anorexia nervosa, a condition in which
thin people do not eat much because they imagine they are overweight, but
results were unsatisfactory.
Animal experiments show that various chemicals related to zolpidem relieve
pain, reduce inflammation and body temperature, and protect against
gastric ulcers. Chemically these substances differ from barbiturates and benzodiazepines,
but have effects similar to them and operate in some ways similar
to benzodiazepines. Monkeys responded in ways indicating that zolpidem
shares similarities with benzodiazepines but few or none with barbiturates.
Despite those resemblances to benzodiazepines, rats trained to distinguish differences
in drug effects acted as if zolpidem was unlike the benzodiazepine
chlordiazepoxide. Various other differences have been documented. To take
one example, caffeine typically counteracts some benzodiazepine actions, but
counteraction does not necessarily happen when caffeine is administered with
zolpidem. In animal experimentation chemicals related to zolpidem can produce
sedation at doses low enough to avoid unwanted effects that occur with
benzodiazepine sedation. Substances like zolpidem are generally believed to
accomplish some of the same therapeutic actions as benzodiazepines, with less
abuse potential.
Drawbacks. Caution is recommended if a depressed person takes zolpidem,
as the drug can deepen despondency and even promote suicidal thinking. Less
serious occasional unwanted effects include dry mouth, headache, hiccups,
nausea, and diarrhea. Hallucinations and other psychotic reactions (ranging
from delirium to euphoria) are even less common but documented nonetheless.
Abuse factors. Drug abusers report mental pleasure from zolpidem and say
that higher doses feel similar to diazepam. Human experience indicates that
tolerance does not occur with zolpidem, although two or three disputed case
reports exist. Typically, animals who have been dosed with zolpidem for
months show no tolerance, dependence, or withdrawal symptoms. Diligent
experimenters, however, have been able to produce dependence and withdrawal
in baboons. Those effects have seldom been observed in humans, but
case reports exist. Someone took 30 to 40 times the normal daily medical
dosage on his own accord for months and developed dependence. This perZolpidem
443
son showed enough cross-tolerance with clorazepate dipotassium that this
chemical could help control withdrawal symptoms caused by zolpidem dependence,
indicating that zolpidem shares some characteristics with benzodiazepine
class depressants. Other reports tell of zolpidem dependence
developing in individuals who had a history of drug abuse. Two clinical studies
giving the drug to persons for four weeks also produced dependence.
Normally dependence is light enough to cause only mild discomfort upon
stopping the drug, but withdrawal seizures are known among persons who
have taken huge doses of zolpidem for months. However, zolpidem’s abuse
liability is low enough that the substance is believed to have special potential
for treating ailments in persons prone to drug abuse.
Drug interactions. The antifungus drug ketoconazole lengthens and increases
zolpidem effects. The tuberculosis drug rifampin shortens and decreases
zolpidem effects.
Cancer. Standard laboratory tests have not indicated that zolpidem causes
cancer. In studies using many times the recommended human dose, no evidence
emerged of the drug causing cancer in mice. Rats receiving such high
doses developed tumors with no more frequency than rats receiving no dose
at all.
Pregnancy. Offspring from pregnant rats and rabbits receiving several times
the maximum human therapeutic dosage showed no obvious birth defects,
although there were indications of delayed fetal bone development. Standard
advice for women is to be cautious about using zolpidem during pregnancy.
Although tests have shown only minute quantities of zolpidem to pass into a
mother’s milk (less than 0.02% of a dose taken by a mother), the effect on
infants is unknown.
Additional scientific information may be found in:
Boyle, J.A. “Look Again at Information on Zolpidem Tartrate.” American Journal of
Hospital Pharmacy 51 (1994): 1354, 1356–57.
Fleming, J., et al. “Comparison of the Residual Effects and Efficacy of Short Term
Zolpidem, Flurazepam and Placebo in Patients with Chronic Insomnia.” Clinical
Drug Investigation 9 (1995): 303–13.
Hoehns, J.D., and P.J. Perry. “Zolpidem: Nonbenzodiazepine Hypnotic for Treatment
of Insomnia.” Clinical Pharmacy 12 (1993): 814–28.
Lobo, B.L., and W.L. Greene. “Zolpidem: Distinct from Triazolam?” Annals of Pharmacotherapy
31 (1997): 625–32.
Rush, C.R. “Behavioral Pharmacology of Zolpidem Relative to Benzodiazepines: A Review.”
Pharmacology, Biochemistry, and Behavior 61 (1998): 253–69.
Toner, L.C., et al. “Central Nervous System Side Effects Associated with Zolpidem
Treatment.” Clinical Neuropharmacology 23 (2000): 54–58.
“Zolpidem for Insomnia.” Medical Letter on Drugs and Therapeutics 35 (1993): 35–36.

Sources for More Information
Many sources of drug information are available. Some of the more reliable
ones are listed here. A good strategy is to consult sources that take differing
stands on the subject. In addition to objective scientific authorities noted below,
authorities approaching drug use from different slants are noted. Each
advocacy group noted below offers scientific information, but each tends to
emphasize findings supporting the group’s stance. By consulting groups taking
different stances a more complete picture of a specific topic can emerge.
Unlike books, the content of Internet Web sites may change, as may the
addresses of those sites. Such transformations are inherent to the Internet and
part of its strength, and users of the World Wide Web must deal with those
changes. Many of these print and electronic sources refer users to additional
sources for more information about covered topics, so the references below
are excellent guides that can direct persons to paths of information going as
deeply as anyone would want to go into a particular aspect of a particular
drug.
Internet Web sites listed here can be accessed free of charge. Some sites are
particularly valuable for tracking information published in scientific journals.
Summaries of these articles are often available directly on a site, and if a
person looks up the original article in a library, that article will likely provide
references to still more sources of scientific information about a substance.
Many discoveries are detailed in these journal articles. They are a primary
source of scientific information.
PRINT SOURCES
AHFS Drug Information. Bethesda, MD: American Society of Health-System Pharmacists,
various years. This frequently updated manual of the American Hospital
446 Sources for More Information
Formulary Service is a standard source of information used by heath care professionals
seeking information about therapeutic drugs.
Brecher, E.M., and the Editors of Consumer Reports. Licit and Illicit Drugs: The Consumers
Union Report on Narcotics, Stimulants, Depressants, Inhalants, Hallucinogens, and
Marijuana—Including Caffeine, Nicotine, and Alcohol. Boston: Little, Brown, 1972.
This classic volume remains unsurpassed for frank and accurate information
about drugs of abuse.
Dollery, C., ed. Therapeutic Drugs. 2d ed. New York: Churchill Livingstone, 1999. The
alphabetical format of listings make this source easy to use, and it also contains
references to scientific studies.
Goodman, L.S., and A. Gilman. The Pharmacological Basis of Therapeutics. 10th ed. New
York: McGraw-Hill, 2001. Often referred to as “Goodman & Gilman,” this reference
work has gone through many editions as decades have passed, demonstrating
its continued usefulness for key information about therapeutic drugs.
Earlier editions remain well worth consulting.
Lewis, W.H., and M.P.F. Elvin-Lewis. Medical Botany: Plants Affecting Man’s Health. New
York: John Wiley and Sons, 1977. This is a reputable source of information about
natural products having drug actions.
Martindale: The Extra Pharmacopoeia. 31st ed. London: Pharmaceutical Press, 1996.
Health care givers around the world rely on this standard reference book containing
information about therapeutic drugs. As with many multi-edition reference
works, earlier editions can be useful.
McGuffin, M., ed. American Herbal Products Association’s Botanical Safety Handbook. Boca
Raton, FL: CRC Press, 1997. This book provides cautions about natural products.
Millspaugh, C.F. American Medicinal Plants. Philadelphia: John C. Yorston & Company,
1892. Reprint, New York: Dover Publications, 1974. This classic guide is of historical
interest, showing how natural products were once used.
Morton, J.F. Major Medicinal Plants: Botany, Culture and Uses. Springfield, IL: Charles C.
Thomas, 1977. This volume is a reliable source of information.
Mosby’s GenRx: A Comprehensive Reference for Generic and Brand Prescription Drugs. St.
Louis, MO: Mosby, various years. This reference book is frequently updated. Its
alphabetical format makes it easy to use. The title has slightly changed from
earlier editions.
PDR for Herbal Medicines. 2d ed. Montvale, NJ: Medical Economics Company, 2000.
This authoritative book does for herbal products what the Physicians’ Desk Reference
does for prescription drugs. Hundreds of herbal preparations are described.
Physicians’ Desk Reference. Montvale, NJ: Medical Economics Company. Often called
simply PDR, this reference source describes thousands of legal drugs, with the
descriptions containing information approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration,
making this volume one of the most authoritative and widely used
books on the topic. The printed version is updated annually, and a CD-ROM
version is updated more often.
Weiner, Michael A. Weiner’s Herbal. New York: Stein and Day, 1980. This is a reliable
source of information about natural products that contain drugs.
INTERNET SOURCES
Building Better Health
http://www.buildingbetterhealth.com/drugindex/a
Sources for More Information 447
This excellent source of therapeutic drug information is sponsored by a health services
and products company.
Bureau of Justice Statistics
810 Seventh Street, NW
Washington, DC 20531
(202) 307-0765
http://www.ojp.usdoj.gov/bjs/drugs.htm
This agency of the U.S. Department of Justice provides a wide variety of current and
historical statistics about illegal usage of drugs and about many other crime-related
issues. The Internet Web site includes links to statistical information at other sites.
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention
1600 Clifton Road
Atlanta, GA 30333
(404) 639-3534
(800) 311-3435
http://www.cdc.gov/tobacco/issue.htm
Although this federal agency’s site has relatively little about drugs in general, this
Internet address is useful for data about tobacco.
ChemIDplus
http://chem.sis.nlm.nih.gov/chemidplus
This service of the National Library of Medicine allows persons to obtain brief descriptions
of drugs, including Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Numbers, molecular formulas,
and alternate names for substances. The CAS numbers can be particularly
valuable, not only for confirming identity of a drug but for getting more information
from other databases.
Code of Federal Regulations
http://www.access.gpo.gov/nara/
At this address a person can access the Code of Federal Regulations (CFR), among
other items. The official federal schedules of controlled substances can be found in the
CFR under Title 21, part 1308. A drug’s schedule status can change, and the CFR can
be used to confirm a drug’s current status. Another official source is the United States
Code (see below).
Drug Abuse Warning Network (DAWN)
http://www.samhsa.gov/oas/dawn.htm
DAWN is an important information system supervised by the Office of Applied Studies
in a federal agency called the Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration
(see below). DAWN produces reports concerning statistics it gathers about
drug-related injuries and deaths. Those numbers do not necessarily reveal whether
drug-related incidents are drug caused but are useful for tracking trends in popularity
of various drugs.
Drug Enforcement Administration
Information Services Section (CPI)
2401 Jefferson Davis Highway
Alexandria, VA 22301
http://www.usdoj.gov/dea/
In addition to information about law enforcement efforts, in links to “Drugs of Concern”
and “Drugs of Abuse” the DEA’s Web site provides official information about
individual substances. Another link leads to assorted statistics.
448 Sources for More Information
Drug Enforcement Administration Diversion Control Program
http://www.deadiversion.usdoj.gov/schedules/
This web site has lists of schedules and also statistics on amounts of various drugs
legally manufactured in various years. The home page of Diversion Control Program
has links to the Code of Federal Regulations. The schedules index page has a link to
a list of controlled substances scheduling actions, giving a brief chronology showing
when various drugs were put into various schedules.
Drug Policy Alliance
925 9th Avenue
New York, NY 10019
(212) 548-0695
925 15th Street NW
Washington, DC 20005
(202) 216-0035
http://www.drugpolicy.org
This organization encourages drug control through means other than harsh criminal
sanctions, and the organization questions many standard government policies.
Through this Web site a person can obtain information about specific drugs, submit
questions, and link to other drug information sources. The organization has offices in
more than one city.
Drugs.com
http://www.drugs.com/
This Web site is run by Drugsite Trust, described on the site as “a not for profit trust
dedicated to providing free, unbiased information on over the counter (OTC) and prescription
medicines.” Information includes technical monographs.
E-Doc
http://www.edoc.co.za/medilink/actives/
This index of therapeutic drugs originates in South Africa and includes information
about drug varieties having no medical use in the United States.
Erowid
http://www.erowid.org/index.shtml
This site contains a vast amount of information about drugs of abuse, along with links
to still more sources. Site visitors can submit questions. The sponsoring organization
believes that current government drug control policy is misguided. Although the site
contains comments from persons who advocate recreational drug use, the site also
contains stories from persons who suffered catastrophic consequences from such use.
Used judiciously, the site can produce substantial quantities of solid data.
Food and Drug Administration
5600 Fishers Lane
Rockville, MD 20857-0001
(888) 463-6332
http://www.fda.gov/
The home page of this prestigious and respected source of scientific drug information
gives a visitor various choices for obtaining information, including a search function
that scans enormous numbers of government documents, and offers selections relevant
to a person’s inquiry.
Gateway
http://gateway.nlm.nih.gov/gw/Cmd
Sources for More Information 449
This is one of several Web sites from the National Library of Medicine. Through Gateway
visitors can search various scientific databases for information about drugs.
Google
http://www.google.com/
If any Web site deserves the adjective “awesome,” Google is it. In a few seconds Google
can search hundreds of millions of Web sites to find information about a topic. The
quality of information may vary greatly, as Google will locate not only sites of great
scientific institutions but personal Web sites of persons who are long on ranting and
short on knowledge. If, however, an Internet user is at a loss on where to find information
about a topic or is merely curious about the variety of data available, Google
may well provide a jumpstart.
HerbMed
http://herbmed.org
Many natural product descriptions can be found at this site. The organization is
friendly to using herbs for medical purposes.
Lycaeum
http://leda.lycaeum.org/quickindex.shtml
This address leads a person to an index of information about many drugs of abuse.
The sponsoring organization favors fewer legal restrictions on drug use, but for that
very reason a person can find information about nonmedical substances that are ignored
in sources devoted strictly to describing therapeutic pharmaceuticals.
Multidisciplinary Association for Psychedelic Studies (MAPS)
http://www.maps.org/
This advocacy organization seeks data that will allow various prohibited drugs to
become accepted. Links on the page provide access to such information.
National Institute on Drug Abuse
6001 Executive Boulevard, Room 5213
Bethesda, MD 20892-9651
(301) 443-1124
http://www.drugabuse.gov/
NIDA is a U.S. government agency that sponsors many scientific studies. Much of that
information is accessible through this Web site. Statistics may be found here.
National Library of Medicine
http://www.nlm.nih.gov/
This site can be used to obtain vast amounts of scientific information about drugs.
Novartis
http://www.healthandage.com/Home/gm_3
The drug database page of Novartis Foundation for Gerontology is at this address.
Office of National Drug Control Policy
Drug Policy Information Clearinghouse
P.O. Box 6000
Rockville, MD 20849-6000
(800) 666-3332
http://www.whitehousedrugpolicy.gov/
The so-called Drug Czar heads this agency. Its Web site can lead users to information
about drugs and about many facets of drug control policy.
450 Sources for More Information
Partnership for Responsible Drug Information
14 West 68th Street
New York, NY 10023
(212) 362-1964
http://www.prdi.org/
Partnership for Responsible Drug Information (PRDI) is an organization that strives to
present drug information from experts who disagree with some government drug control
policies. Many links to still more sources can be found at: http://www.prdi.org/
drugindx.html
PubMed
http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/entrez/query.fcgi
PubMed is another service from the National Library of Medicine. PubMed includes
Medline, one of medicine’s first electronic databases, which can direct a person to
science journal articles about many drugs. Typically PubMed allows users to see summaries
of those articles.
RxList
http://www.rxlist.com/
This index of information about therapeutic drugs is sponsored by a company selling
various health-related products.
Schaffer Library of Drug Policy
http://www.druglibrary.org/schaffer/
This information resource includes electronic versions of classic reports about drugs,
along with large quantities of recent information. The home page of DRCNet Online
Library of Drug Policy at http:/www.druglibrary.org/ contains links to still more
sources. “DRC” is the Drug Reform Coordination Network, which is an activist group
opposing government drug policies.
Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration (SAMHSA)
5600 Fishers Lane
Rockville, MD 20857
Office of Communications (OC)
(301) 443-8956
http://www.drugabusestatistics.samhsa.gov/
SAMHSA is a federal government agency. Many statistics and other types of drug
information are available at this site. An important part of this site is the Office of
Applied Studies, which offers many reports. The Drug Abuse Warning Network (see
above) is part of the Office of Applied Studies.
Tobacco BBS (Electronic Bulletin Board System)
P.O. Box 359
Village Station
New York, NY 10014-0359
(212) 982-4645
http://www.tobacco.org/
This massive collection of information specializes in tobacco and is sponsored by an
organization concerned about health problems caused by smoking.
Toxnet
http://toxnet.nlm.nih.gov/
This database is another service of the National Library of Medicine, providing information
from science journals. From this page a person can access Toxline, ChemIDPlus,
PubMed, and other information services.
Sources for More Information 451
United States Code
http://www4.law.cornell.edu/uscode/
The U.S. Code (USC) is an official collection of all federal laws currently in effect. These
include the schedule status of controlled substances found in Title 21, chapter 13, section
812. Like the Code of Federal Regulations (see above), USC is an authoritative
source for substances’ schedule status.

Drug Name Index
Pages in bold indicate the location of the main entry
A: as LSD, 228–32; MDMA, 254–59
A-bomb, 239–46
Abyssinian tea, 216–19
Acapulco gold, 239–46
Acapulco red, 239–46
AC/DC, 100–103
Ace: as marijuana, 239–46; PCP, 351–55
Acetaminophen: and butorphanol, 73;
and mephobarbital, 263
Acetomorphine, 191–98
Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl, 166
Acetylmethadol, 222
Acid, 228–32
Acido, 228–32
Acrid lettuce, 336
Actibine, 436–38
Actiq, 164–66
Actuss, 383–84
Ad, 351–55
Adam, 254–59
Adderall, 106–9
Adipex-P, 380–82
Adiposan, 122–24
Adrenalin, and cocaine, 98
Adroyd, 346–48
AET, 35–36
Afgani indica, 239–46
African black, 239–46
African bush, 239–46
Aga, 46–47
Agua de chango, 191–98
Ah-pen-yen, 333–37
Aimes, 323–25
Aimies, 323–25
AIP, 191–98
Airplane, 239–46
Alamout black hash, 239–46
Al Capone, as heroin, 191–98
Alcohol, 37–41; and alprazolam, 43; and
butalbital, 67; and caffeine, 76; and
chlordiazepoxide, 83; and clonazepam,
86; and clorazepate, 90; and cocaine,
98; and dextroamphetamine, 107–8;
and dextromethorphan, 111; and
dextromoramide, 115; and diazepam,
119; and diethylpropion, 123–24; and
diphenoxylate, 128; and estzolam, 148;
and ethchlorvynol, 150; and fen-phen,
162; and fentanyl, 165; and
flunitrazepam, 167, 169; and
flurazepam, 175; and glutethimide, 187;
and heroin, 194; and LAAM, 221; and
levorphanol, 224; and lorazepam, 227;
and LSD, 231; and mazindol, 248; and
454 Drug Name Index
MDMA, 258; and meperidine, 260; and
meprobamate, 267; and methadone,
272, 273; and methamphetamine, 278;
and methaqualone, 287; and
methcathinone, 289; and midazolam,
299–300; and morphine, 308; and
nicotine, 320; and nitrite, 324; and
nitrous oxide, 328; and nutmeg, 331;
and oxazepam, 341; and oxycodone,
344; and PCP, 253–54; and pemoline,
162; and pentazocine, 362; and
pentobarbital, 365; and phenobarbital,
374, 375; and phentermine, 381; and
prazepam, 388; and propoxyphene,
392; and psilocybin, 395; and
quazepam, 398; and TCE, 406; and
testosterone, 416; and triazolam, 427,
429; and zaleplon, 440
Alcoid, 114–15
Alertec, 301–2
Alfenta, 164–66
Alfentanil, 164–66
Algaphan, 390–93
Algodex, 390–93
Alice B. Toklas, 239–46
Alien sex fiend, 351–55
All-American drug, 95–99
Alphacetylmethadol, 222
Alpha-desmethyl DOB, 432–33
Alpha-ET, 35–36
Alpha-ethyl, 35–36
Alpha-ethyltryptamine, 35–36
Alphameprodine, 430
Alplax, 42–45
Alprazolam, 42–45; and
chlordiazepoxide, 82; and levorphanol,
224; and propoxyphene, 392
Alquitran, 191–98
Alquitranat, 191–98
Alupram, 118–21
Amanita, 46–47; and bufotenine, 60
Amanita muscaria, 46–47
Amanita phalloides, 46
Ambien, 441–43
Ambroxol, and LSD, 231
American mandrake, 237
Ames, 323–25
Amfepramone, 122–24
Amidone, 271–74
Aminophylline, and cocaine, 98
Aminorex, 161
Amitriptyline: and chlordiazepoxide, 84;
and cocaine, 98
Amoeba, 351–55
Amoxycillin, and khat, 218
AMP, 239–46
Amphedoxamine, 250–51
Ampicillin, and khat, 218
Amsterdam marble, 191–98
Amsustain, 106–9
AMT, 132–34
Amyl nitrite, 323–25
Amys, 323–25
Anabolin, 282–84
Anabolin LA-100, 315–17
Anadrex, 275–79
Anadrol, 346–48
Anapolon, 346–48
Anasteron, 346–48
Anatrophill, 338–39
Anavar, 338–39
Andris, 280–81
Androderm, 414–17
Androfluorene, 171–73
Android, 295–97
Android-F, 171–73
Androlone D, 315–17
Andronaq, 414–17
Anesthesia ether, 153–54
Anexsia, 199–200
Anfamon, 122–24
Angel, 351–55
Angel dust, 351–55
Angel hair, 351–55
Angel mist, 351–55
Angel poke, 351–55
Angel tears, 228–32
Angel tulip, 206–9
Angie, 95–99
Angola, 239–46
Animal, 228–32
Animal trank, 351–55
Animal tranq, 351–55
Animal tranquilizer, 351–55
Antalvic, 390–93
Antifreeze, 191–98
Anxiolit, 340–42
Apache, 164–66
Aphrodine, 436–38
Aphrodyne, 436–38
Apisate, 122–24
Apple Jacks, as cocaine, 95–99
Aquachloral, 79–81
Drug Name Index 455
Arabian tea, 216–19
Arbolic, 280–81
Arco-Lase Plus, 374–77
Areca catechu, 48–52
Areca nut, 48–52
Areca II-5–C, 49
Aries, 191–98
Army, 323–25
Aroma of men, 323–25
Arvynol, 150–52
Ashes, 239–46
Aspirin, and ephedrine, 143
Assassin of youth, 239–46
Astramorph, 306–9
Astro turf, 239–46
Atensine, 118–21
Ativan, 225–27
Atomic bomb, 239–46
Atropa belladonna, 53–55
Atropine, and belladonna, 53, 54; and
jimson weed, 206; and mandrake, 236
Atshitshi, 239–46
A29, and ketobemidone, 215
Aunt Hazel, 191–98
Aunti, 333–37
Aunti Emma, 333–37
Aunt Mary, 239–46
Aunt Nora, 95–99
Aurora Borealis, 351–55
Ayahuasca, 434–35
Baby, 239–46
Baby bhang, 239–46
Baby slits, 254–59
Baby T, 95–99
Backbreaker, 228–32
Bad, 95–99
Badoh negro, 303
Badrock, 95–99
Bad seed: as heroin, 191–98; as
marijuana, 239–46; as peyote, 367–68
Ball: as cocaine, 95–99; as heroin, 191–98
Balloons, 271–74
Ballot, 191–98
Bamba, 239–46
Bambalacha, 239–46
Bambita, 275–79
Bammy, 239–46
Banano, 239–46
Bandits, 285–88
Banisteriopsis caapi, 434–35
Bar, 239–46
Barbs, as cocaine, 95–99
Baron-X, 436–38
Barr, 100–103
Barrel, 228–32
Bathtub crank, 275–79
Bart Simpson, as heroin, 191–98
Base, 95–99
Baseball, 95–99
Bash, 239–46
Basuco, 95–99
Bathtub speed, 289–90
Battery acid, 228–32
Batu, 275–79
Bazooka: as cocaine, 95–99; as coca pastemarijuana
combination, 239–46
Bazulco, 95–99
B-bomb, 254–59
BDMPEA, 432–33
Beam, 95–99
Beamer, 95–99
Beans: as cocaine, 95–99; as
dextroamphetamine, 106–9; as
mescaline, 268–70
Bear, 164–66
Beast: as heroin, 191–98; as LSD, 228–32
Beat, 95–99
Beautiful boulders, 95–99
Beavis & Butthead, as LSD, 228–32
Bebe, 95–99
Beemer, 95–99
Bees, 432–33
Beiruts, 285–88
Belladonna, 53–55, 241; as name for PCP,
55, 351–55
Bens, 254–59
Benylin, 110–13
Benzedrine, 12, 13; as name for MDMA,
254–59
Benzphetamine, 56–57; and
phenmetrazine, 371
Bernice, 95–99
Bernie, 95–99
Bernie’s flakes, 95–99
Bernie’s gold dust, 95–99
Betacetylmethadol, 222
Betameprodine, 430
Betel, 51
Betel nut, 48–52
Betel pepper, 51
Belyando spruce, 239–46
B-40, as marijuana, 239–46
Bhang, 239–46
456 Drug Name Index
Big bloke, 95–99
Big C, 95–99
Big chief: as mescaline, 268–70; as
peyote, 367–68
Big D: as hydromorphone, 201–2; as
LSD, 228–32
Big flake, 95–99
Big H, 191–98
Big Harry, 191–98
Big O, 333–37
Big rush, 95–99
Bill blass, 95–99
Billie hoke, 95–99
Bings, 95–99
Biphetamine, 106–9; as name for MDMA,
254–59
Birdhead, 228–32
Birdie powder: as cocaine, 95–99; as
heroin, 191–98
Biscuit, 95–99
Bitter grass, 203–5
Bitter lettuce, 336
B.J., 95–99
Black: as marijuana, 239–46; as opium,
333–37
Black acid, 228–32
Black bart, 239–46
Black beauties, 106–9
Black cherry, 53–55
Black dust, 351–55
Black ganga, 239–46
Black gold, 239–46
Black gunion, 239–46
Blackjack: as nitrite, 323–25; as opium,
333–37
Black mo, 239–46
Black moat, 239–46
Black mote, 239–46
Black pearl, 191–98
Black pill, 333–37
Black rock, 95–99
Black star, 228–32
Black stuff: as heroin, 191–98; as opium,
333–37
Black sunshine, 228–32
Black tab, 228–32
Black tar, 191–98
Black whack, 351–55
Blanca: as cocaine, 95–99; as heroin, 191–
98
Blanco: as cocaine, 95–99; as heroin, 191–
98
Blanket, 239–46
Blast: as cocaine, 95–99; as marijuana,
239–46
Block, 239–46
Blonde, 239–46
Blotter: as cocaine, 95–99; as LSD, 228–32
Blotter acid: as LSD, 228–32; as PCP, 351–
55
Blotter cube, 228–32
Blou bulle, 285–88
Blow, 95–99
Blowcaine, 95–99
Blows, 191–98
Blowout, 95–99
Blue, as cocaine, 95–99
Blue acid, 228–32
Blue bag, 191–98
Blue barrel, 228–32
Blue bulls, 285–88
Black button, 367–68
Blue caps: as mescaline, 268–70; as
psilocybin, 394–96
Blue chair, 228–32
Blue cheer, 228–32
Blue de hue, 239–46
Blue heaven: as LSD, 228–32; as nitrite,
323–25
Blue kisses, 254–59
Blue lips, 254–59
Blue madman, 351–55
Blue meth, 275–79
Blue microdot, 228–32
Blue mist, 228–32
Blue moon, 228–32
Blue nitro vitality, 183
Blues: as diazepam, 118–21; as
diethylpropion, 122–24
Blue sage, 239–46
Blue sky blond, 239–46
Blue verve, 182–85
Blue vial, 228–32
Blunt: as heroin, 191–98; as marijuana,
239–46
Bo, 239–46
Boat, 351–55
Bob, 135–36
Bo-Bo, 239–46
Bobo, 95–99
Bobo bush, 239–46
Bohd: as marijuana, 239–46; as PCP, 351–
55
Drug Name Index 457
Boldenone, 58–59
Bolivian marching powder, 95–99
Bollo, 95–99
Bolo, 95–99
Bolt, 323–25
Bomb: as cocaine, 95–99; as heroin, 191–
98; as marijuana, 239–46
Bomber, 239–46
Bombido, 191–98
Bombita, 191–98
Bombs away, 191–98
Bone: as cocaine, 95–99; as marijuana,
239–46
Bonecrusher, 95–99
Bonita, 191–98
Bontril, 369–70
Bonumin, 122–24
Boo: as marijuana, 239–46; as
methamphetamine, 275–79
Boo boo bama, 239–46
Boom, 239–46
Boomer: LSD, 228–32; psilocybin, 394–96
Boost, 95–99
Boppers, 323–25
Botray, 95–99
Boubou, 95–99
Boulder, 95–99
Boulya, 95–99
Bouncing Powder, 95–99
Boy: as cocaine, 95–99; as heroin, 191–98
Bozo, 191–98
Brain damage, as name for heroin, 191–
98
Brea, 191–98
Breeze, 271–74
Brendalit, 122–24
Brick Gum, 191–98
Britton, 367–68
Broccoli, 239–46
Broja, 191–98
Bromage, 110–13
Brome, 110–13
Bromocriptine, 147
Bromo, 432–33
Bromo-DMA, 135–36
Bromo-Mescaline, 432–33
Bromo-STP, 135–36
BRON, 100–103, 125–26
Broncholate syrup, 141–44
Brown, 191–98
Brown bombers, 228–32
Brown crystal, 191–98
Brown dots, 228–32
Brownies, 106–9
Brown marijuana, 191–98
Brown Rhine, 191–98
Brown sugar, 191–98
Brown tape, 191–98
Bubble gum, 95–99
Bud: as marijuana, 239–46; as nitrite, 323–
25
Buda, 239–46
Buddha, 239–46
Bufotenine, 60–62; and amanita, 46, 60
Bullet, 323–25
Bullia capital, 95–99
Bullyon, 95–99
Bump: as cocaine, 95–99; as ketamine,
210–13; as methamphetamine, 275–79
Bundle, 191–98
Bunk, 95–99
Buprenex, 63–66
Buprenorphine, 63–66; and fentanyl, 165;
and flunitrazepam, 169
Burdock, 271–74
Burese, 95–99
Burnese, 95–99
Burnie, 239–46
Bush: as cocaine, 95–99; as marijuana ,
239–46; as PCP, 351–55
Businessman’s LSD, 132–34
Businessman’s special, 132–34
Businessman’s trip, 132–34
Busy bee, 351–55
Butalbital, 67–68
Butane, 27, 69–71
Butler, 95–99
Butorphanol, 72–73
Butter: as cocaine, 95–99; as marijuana,
239–46
Butter flower, 239–46
Butt naked, 351–55
Button: as mescaline, 268–70; as peyote
367–68; as psilocybin, 394–96
Butu, 191–98
Butyl hydride, 69–71
Butyl nitrite, 323–25
Buzz bomb: as methadone, 271–74; as
nitrite, 323–25
C: as cocaine, 95–99; as codeine, 100–103;
as methcathinone, 289–90
Caapi, 434–35
Caballo, 191–98
458 Drug Name Index
Cabello Cadillac, 95–99
Cabergoline, 147
Caca, 191–98
Cactus: as mescaline, 268–70; as peyote,
367–68
Cactus buttons, 268–70
Cactus head: as mescaline, 268–70; as
peyote, 367–68
Cadillac, 351–55
Cadillac express, 289–90
Cafergot, 364–66
Cafergot PB, 366
Caffeine, 11, 74–78; and cathinone, 218;
and cocaine, 98; and
dextroamphetamine, 107; and
ephedrine, 143, 235; and ergot, 146;
and flurazepam, 175; and ma huang,
235; and midazolam, 299; and nicotine,
321; and pentobarbital, 365; and
thebaine, 419; and triazolam, 428; and
zolpidem, 442
Caine, 95–99
Cakes, 95–99
Calbo, 191–98
California cornflakes, 95–99
California sunrise, 254–59
California sunshine, 228–32
Cambodian red, 239–46
Came, 95–99
Cam red, 239–46
Cam trip, 239–46
Can, 239–46
Canade: as heroin, 191–98; as heroinmarijuana
combination, 239–46
Canadian black, 239–46
Canamo, 95–99
Canappa, 239–46
Cancelled stick, 239–46
Candy: as cocaine, 95–99; as
flunitrazepam, 167–70
Candy blunt, 239–46
Candy C, 95–99
Cannabinol, as PCP, 351–55
Cannabis, 239–46
Cannabis sativa, 239–46
Cap: as cocaine, 95–99; as heroin, 191–98;
as LSD, 228–32
Capital H, 191–98
Capsula, 95–99
Captain Cody, 100–103
Carbamazepine: and alprazolam, 44; and
LAAM, 221; and methadone, 273; and
midazolam, 300; and triazolam, 428
Carga, 191–98
Carmabis, 239–46
Carne, 191–98
Carnie, 95–99
Carrie, 95–99
Carrie Nation, 95–99
Cartridges, 271–74
Casper, 95–99
Casper the Ghost, 95–99
Cat, 289–90
Catha edulis, 216–19
Cathine, 218, 234
Cathinone, 218
Catnip, 239–46
Cat valium, 210–13
Caviar, as marijuana, 239–46
CB, 186–88
CD, 186–88
C-dust, 95–99
Cecil, 95–99
Centralgin, 260–62
Centrax, 387–89
Cetobemidone, 214–15
C-game, 95–99
Chalk: as cocaine, 95–99; as
methamphetamine, 275–79
Challote, 367–68
Chamba, 239–46
Champagne, as marijuana, 239–46
Chandoo, 333–37
Chandu, 333–37
Chan su, 60–62
Chapopote, 191–98
Charas, 239–46
Charge, 239–46
Charley, 191–98
Charlie, 95–99
Chatarra, 191–98
Cheeba, 239–46
Cheeo, 239–46
Cheese, 191–98
Chemical, 95–99
Cherry menth, 182–85
Cherry meth, 182–85
Chewies, 95–99
Chiba chiba, 239–46
Chicago black, 239–46
Chicago green, 239–46
Chicken feed, 275–79
Chicle, 191–98
Drug Name Index 459
Chief: as LSD, 228–32; as mescaline, 268–
70
Chieva, 191–98
China, 164–66
China cat, 191–98
China girl, 164–66
China town, 164–66
China white: as fentanyl, 164–66; as
heroin, 191–98
Chinese, 333–37
Chinese ephedra, 233–35
Chinese jointfir, 233–35
Chinese molasses, 333–37
Chinese red, 191–98
Chinese speed, 141–44
Chinese tobacco, 333–37
Chip, 191–98
Chippy, 95–99
Chips: as marijuana-PCP combination,
239–46; as tobacco-PCP combination,
318–22
Chira, 239–46
Chiva, 191–98
Chloradorm, 79–81
Chloralex, 79–81
Chloral hydrate, 79–81; and MDMA, 258
Chlordiazepoxide, 82–84; and alcohol, 38;
and alprazolam, 44; and oxazepam,
340
Chloroethene, 405–7
Chlorotene, 405–7
Chlorothene, 405–7
Chlorpromazine: and LSD, 231; and
meperidine, 260; and phenmetrazine,
372
Chocolate: as marijuana, 239–46; as
opium, 333–37
Chocolate chips, 228–32
Chocolate ecstasy, 95–99
Chocolate mescaline, 250–51
Choe, 95–99
Cholly, 95–99
Christmas tree: as dextroamphetamine,
106–9; as marijuana, 239–46
Chronic, 239–46
Chrystal methadrine, 254–59
Chunky, 239–46
Churus, 239–46
Ciba, 186–88
Cid, 228–32
Cigarrode cristal, 351–55
Cimetidine: and alprazolam, 43; and
chlordiazepoxide, 83; and diazepam,
119; and flurazepam, 175; and
halazepam, 189; and LAAM, 221; and
midazolam, 300; and prazepam, 388;
and triazolam, 428
Circles, 167–70
Citalopram, and alprazolam, 44
Citrol, 239–46
CJ, 351–55
Clarity, 254–59
Claviceps purpurea, 145–47
Clicker: as marijuana-formaldehyde
combination, 239–46; as PCP, 351–55
Clickum: as marijuana-PCP combination,
239–46; as PCP, 351–55
Cliffhanger, 351–55
Climax: as cocaine, 95–99; as heroin, 191–
98; as nitrite, 323–25
Climb, 239–46
Clofibrate, and methyltestosterone, 296
Clonazepam, 85–87
Clonidine, and yohimbine, 437
Clorazepate, 88–90; and oxazepam, 340
Cloud, 95–99
Cloud 9, 95–99
Clozapine: and clonazepam, 86; and
LSD, 231; and phenobarbital, 375
Coca, 91–94. See also Cocaine
Coca, as cocaine, 95–99
Cocaine, 17–18, 95–99; and alcohol, 38;
and buprenorphine, 64; and caffeine,
76; and dextromethorphan, 112; and
dextrorphan, 116; and diethylpropion,
122–23; and fen-phen, 162; and
hydromorphone, 202; and lorazepam,
227; and mazindol, 248; and
methylphenidate, 293; and midazolam,
299; and nandrolone, 316; and
nicotine, 320; and pemoline, 162; and
pentobarbital, 365; and yohimbine,
437. See also Coca
Cocaine of poor people, 323–25
Cocaine plant, 91–94
Cocaine tree, 91–94
Coca paste, 94
Cochornis, 239–46
Cockspur rye, 145–47
Cocktail, 239–46
Cocofan, 191–98
Coconut, as cocaine, 95–99
Coco rocks, 95–99
Codeine, 100–103; and dronabinol, 140
460 Drug Name Index
Co-dine, 100–103
Cody, 100–103
Codylin, 383–84
Coffee (normal beverage), and nitrite,
324
Coffee: as heroin, 191–98; as LSD, 228–32
Cohoba: as bufotenine, 60–62; as DMT,
132–34
Coke, as cocaine, 95–99
Cola, 95–99
Cola nut, and ma huang, 234–35
Coli, 239–46
Coliflor tostao, 239–46
Colombian, 239–46
Colorado 239–46
Columbo, 351–55
Columbus black, 239–46
Combol, 95–99
Compass plant, 336
Concerta, 291–94
Conductor, 228–32
Contact lens, 228–32
Cookies, 95–99
Coolie, 95–99
Corine, 95–99
Corrine, 95–99
Corrinne, 95–99
Corynanthe yohimbe, 436–38
Corynine, 436–38
Cosa, 239–46
Cosylan, 110–13
Cotics, 191–98
Coties, 100–103
Cough syrup: as codeine 100–103; as
dextromethorphan, 110–13
Courage pills, 191–98
Cozmo’s, 351–55
Crack, 95–99
Crack back, as cocaine-marijuana
combination, 239–46
Crackers: as LSD, 228–32; as
methylphenidate-pentazocine
combination, 291–94, 360–63
Crank: as cocaine, 95–99; as heroin, 191–
98; as methamphetamine, 275–79; as
methcathinone, 289–90
Crap, 191–98
Crazy coke, 351–55
Crazy Eddie, 351–55
Crazy weed, 239–46
Creo-Terpin, 110–13
Crestabolic, 280–81
Crib, 95–99
Crimmie, 95–99
Crink, 275–79
Cripple, 239–46
Cris, 275–79
Cristal, 254–59. See also Crystal
Cristina, 275–79
Cristy, 275–79
Croak: as cocaine, 95–99; as
methamphetamine, 275–79
Crop, 191–98
Crossles, 275–79
Crown crap, 191–98
Crumbs, 95–99
Crunch & munch, 95–99
Cruz, 333–37
Crying weed, 239–46
Cryppie, 239–46
Crypto, 275–79
Cryptonie, 239–46
Crystal: as cocaine, 95–99; as
methamphetamine, 275–79; as PCP,
351–55. See also Cristal
Crystal joint, 351–55
Crystal meth, 275–79
Crystal methadrine. See Chrystal
methadrine
Crystal T, 351–55
Crystal tea, 228–32
CS, 239–46
Cube: as cocaine, 95–99; as LSD, 228–32;
as marijuana tablet, 239–46
Cube juice, 306–9
Cuca, 91–94
Culican, 239–46
Cupcakes, 228–32
Cura, 191–98
Cut-deck, 191–98
Cycline, 351–55
Cyclizine, and dipipanone, 130–31
Cyclohexyl nitrite, 323–25
Cyclone, 351–55
Cyclosporine: and methyltestosterone,
296; and modafinil, 302; and
oxycodone, 344
Cylert, 356–59
D: as glutethimide, 186–88; as
hydromorphone, 201–2; as LSD, 228–
32; as PCP, 351–55
Dagga, 239–46
Daime, 434–35
Drug Name Index 461
Dalmane, 174–76
Dama blanca, 95–99
D-amphetamine, 106–9
Dance fever, 164–66
Darkene, 167–70
Darvocet, 390–93
Darvon, 390–93
Date rape drug, 167–70
Datura, 206–9
Datura stramonium, 206–9
Dauran, 114–15
Dava, 191–98
Dawamesk, 239–46
Dayto 436–38
Dead on arrival, 191–98
Deadly nightshade, 53–55
Death cap, 46
Death cup, 46
Death’s herb, 53–55
Debs, 254–59
Decadence, 254–59
Deca-Durabolin, 315–17
Deck (heroin quantity), 191–98
Deeda, 228–32
Dehydrotestosterone, 58–59
Delantz, 201–2
Delatestryl, 414–17
Delats, 201–2
Delaud, 201–2
Delida, 201–2
Delta-9–tetrahydrocannabinol, 139–40
Delysid, 228–32
Demalon, 315–17
Demer-Idine, 260–62
Demerol, 260–62
Demetrin, 387–89
Demmies, 260–62
Demolish, 95–99
Demorphan hydrobromide, 110–13
Depo-Testosterone, 414–17
Deprol, 265–67
Depronal, 390–93
Desert tea, 233–35
Desmethyldiazepam, 387
Desocsins, 275–79
Desogtion, 275–79
Desoxyn, 275–79
DET, 104–5
Detroit pink, 351–55
Deuce, 191–98
Develin, 390–93
Devil, 95–99
Devil drug, 95–99
Devil’s apple: as American mandrake,
237; as jimson weed, 206–9
Devil’s cherries, 53–55
Devil’s dandruff, 95–99
Devil’s dust, 351–55
Devil’s herb, 53–55
Devilsmoke, 95–99
Devil’s root, 367–68
Devil’s trumpet, 206–9
Dex: as dextromethorphan, 110–13; as
MDMA, 254–59
Dexamphetamine, 106–9
Dexatopic, 315–17
Dexedrine, 106–9; as MDMA, 254–59; as
military usage, 12
Dexfenfluramine, 161, 162
Dexidrine, 106–9
Dexies, 106–9
Dexofen, 390–93
Dextro, 110–13
Dextroamphetamine, 106–9; and
benzphetamine, 56; and meperidine,
260; and meprobamate, 267; and
military usage, 12; and morphine, 308;
and nutmeg, 331
Dextromethorphan, 110–13; and
dextrorphan, 116; and sibutramine, 402
Dextromoramide, 114–15
Dextropropoxyphene, 390
Dextrorphan, 116–17
Dextrostat, 106–9
Dexylets, 110–13
Dew, 239–46
DHC Continus, 125–26
Diablito, 239–46
Diacetylmorphine, 191–98
Diambista, 239–46
Diamonds, 254–59
Diamorphine, 191–98
Dianabol, 282–84
Diarphen, 127–29
Diastat, 118–21
Dia-Tuss, 383–84
Diazemuls, 118–21
Diazepam, 118–21; and alcohol, 38; and
alprazolam, 43; and buprenorphine, 64–
65; and caffeine, 76; and codeine, 102;
and halazepam, 189; and ketamine,
212; and levorphanol, 224; and
modafinil, 302; and oxazepam, 340;
462 Drug Name Index
and phenobarbital, 374; and
propoxyphene, 392
Dice, 95–99
Dicodid, 199–200
Diconal, 130–31
Didrex, 56–57
Diesel, 191–98
Diethyl ether, 153–54
Diethyl oxide, 153–54
Diethylproprion, 122–24
Diethyltryptamine, 104–5
Dietic, 122–24
Dietil-Retard, 122–24
Difenoxin, 128
Dihydrocodeine, 125–26
Dihydrocodeinone, 199–200
Dihydroetorphine, 157–59
Dilaudid, 201–2
Dillies, 201–2
Diltiazem, 428
Dimba, 239–46
Dimethyltryptamine, 132–34
Dimorlin, 114–15
Ding, 239–46
Dinitrogen monoxide, 326–29
Dinitrogen oxide, 326–29
Dinkie, 239–46
Dip, 95–99
DIP, 122–24
Diphenhydramine: and methaqualone,
287–88; and temazepam, 410
Diphenoxylate, 127–29
Dipidolor, 385–86
Dipipanone, 130–31
Dipiritramide, 385–86
Dipper, 351–55
Dirt, 191–98
Dirt grass, 239–46
Dirty joint, 239–46
Disco biscuit, 254–59
Disneyland, 132–34
Disneyworld, 132–34
Distalgesic, 390–93
Disulfiram, 410
Ditch, 239–46
Ditch weed, 239–46
Divale, 53–55
Dixcorama, 323–25
Djamba, 239–46
DM, 110–13
Dmitri, 132–34
DMT, 132–34; as PCP, 351–55
DOA: as cocaine, 95–99; as heroin, 191–
98; as PCP, 351–55
DOB, 135–36
Dobesin, 122–24
Doctor, 254–59
Dr. Feelgood, 191–98
Dog food, 191–98
Dogie, 191–98
Do it Jack, 351–55
Dolantin, 260–62
Dolene, 390–93
Dollies, 271–74
Dolls, as amphetamines, 13; MDMA, 254–
59; methadone, 271–74
Dolocap, 390–93
Dolophine, 271–74
Dolosal, 260–62
Doloxene, 390–93
DOM, 137–38
Domes, 228–32
Domestic, 239–46
Domex: as MDMA, 254–59; as PCP, 351–
55
Dona Juana, 239–46
Dona Juanita, 239–46
Done, 271–74
Don Jem, 239–46
Don Juan, 239–46
Donk, 239–46
Donnatal, 374–77
Doob, 239–46
Doobee, 239–46
Doobie, 239–46
Doogie, 191–98
Dooje, 191–98
Doojee, 191–98
Dooley, 191–98
Doors & 4s, 100–103, 186–88
Dope: as heroin; 191–98; as morphine,
306–9
Dopium, 333–37
Doradilla, 239–46
Doral, 397–98
Doraphen, 390–93
Doriden, 186–88
Dormalin, 397–98
Dormicum, 298–300
Dormutil, 285–88
Dorphanol, 72–73
Dors & 4s, 186–88
Doses, as LSD, 228–32
Dots, 228–32
Drug Name Index 463
Double bubble, 95–99
Double dome, 228–32
Double ups, 95–99
Double yoke, 95–99
Dove, 95–99
Dover, 333–37
Dover’s deck, 333–37
Dover’s powder, 333–37
Dow, 239–46
Down, 100–103
Draf: as marijuana, 239–46; as MDMA,
254–59
Drag weed, 239–46
Dream, 95–99
Dreamer: as morphine, 306–9; as opium,
333–37
Dream gun, 333–37
Dreams, 333–37
Dream stick, 333–37
Dreck, 191–98
Drink, 351–55
Drive, 280–81
Drivers, 254–59
Drix, 110–13
Drixoral, 110–13
Drocode, 125–26
Dronabinol (THC), 139–40; and
chlordiazepoxide, 83; and
ethchlorvynol, 151; and glutethimide,
187; and meprobamate, 267; and
methaqualone, 287. See also Marijuana
Drop drug, 167–70
Drugstore heroin, 201–2
Drunken monkey, 285–88
Drunk pills, 118–21
Dry high, 239–46
Dry whiskey, 367–68
Dube, 239–46
Dubbe, 239–46
Duby, 239–46
Duck’s foot, 237
Duct, 95–99
Dugie, 191–98
Duji, 191–98
Dujie, 191–98
Dulcitas, 167–70
Dummy dust, 351–55
Dumpling cactus, 367–68
Durabolin, 315–17
Duraboral, 155–56
Duragesic, 164–66
Duramorph, 306–9
Durandrol, 280–81
Duratuss HD Elixir, 199–200
Durogesic, 164–66
Duromine, 380–82
Durong, 239–46
Duros, 239–46
Duro-Tuss Liquid, 383–84
Dust: as cocaine, 95–99; as heroin, 191–
98; as marijuana combination, 239–46;
as PCP, 351–55
Dusted parsley, 351–55
Dwale, 53–55
Dwayberry, 53–55
DXM, 110–13
Dyno, 191–98
Dyno-pure, 191–98
E, 254–59
Earth, 239–46
Easing powder, 333–37
Eastside player, 95–99
Easy lay, 182–85
E-ball, 254–59
E-bomb, 254–59
Ecstasy: as MDA, 251; as MDMA, 254–59
ECV, 150–52
Egg: as cocaine, 95–99; as temazepam,
408–11
Eightball, 95–99
Eighth, 191–98
Ekies, 254–59
Elaine, 254–59; Greenies, 254–59
El diablito, 239–46
El diablo, 239–46
Eldox, 127–29
Electric Kool Aid, 228–32
Elemicin, 331
Elephant: as marijuana, 239–46; as PCP,
351–55
Elephant juice, 157–59
Elephant trank, 351–55
Elephant tranquilizer, 351–55
Ellis Day, 228–32
Elrodorm, 186–88
Elsinore, 141–44
Elvis, 228–32
Elysion, 351–55
Embalming fluid, 351–55
Emma, 333–37
Emsel, 306–9
Endabuse, 203–5
Endo, 239–46
464 Drug Name Index
Endocet, 343–45
Endocodone, 343–45
Endodan, 343–45
Energizer, 351–55
Entonox, 326–29
Ephedra sinica, 233–35
Ephedrine, 141–44; and khat, 216; and
morphine, 308; and sibutramine, 402;
and yohimbine, 437. See also Ma
Huang
Ephedrone, 289–90
Eptadone, 271–74
Equagesic, 265–67
Equanil, 265–67
Equipoise, 58–59
Erantin, 390–93
Ergonovine, 145
Ergot, 145–47
Ergotamine, 145, 146–47
Erox, 432–33
Erth, 351–55
Erythromycin: and midazolam, 300; and
triazolam, 428–29
Erythroxylum coca, 91–94
Esgic, 67–68
Esnortiar, 95–99
Essence, 254–59
Estazolam, 148–49
Esra, 239–46
Estratest, 295–97
Estuffa, 191–98
ET, 35–36
Ethane, 405–7
Ethanol, 37–40
Ethchlorvynol, 150–52
Ether, 153–54
Ethnine, 383–84
Ethoxyethane, 153–54
Ethyl alcohol, 37–40
Ethylchlorovinyl, 150–52
Ethylestrenol, 155–56
Ethyl ether, 153–54
Ethyl oxide, 153–54
Etorphine, 157–59
Etryptamine, 35–36
Eugenol, 331
Euhypnos, 408–11
Euphoria, 254–59
European mandrake, 236–38
Evacalm, 118–21
Evafol, 383–84
Eve: as MDEA, 252–53; as 2C-B, 432–33
Everclear: as cocaine, 95–99; as GHB, 182–
85; as MDMA, 254–59
Ewings, 285–88
Eye opener, 95–99
EZ lay, 182–85
Fake STP, 351–55
Fallbrook redhair, 239–46
Fall down, 326–29
Famous dimes, 95–99
Fantasia, 132–34
Fantasy, 182–85
Fastballs, 106–9
Fastin: as MDMA, 254–59; as
phentermine, 380–82
Fatty, 239–46
Feeling, 239–46
Felix the Cat, as LSD, 228–32
Felsules, 79–81
Fen, 164–66
Fenfluramine, 160–63
Fen-phen, 161–62
Fentanyl, 164–66; and midazolam, 299;
and sibutramine, 402
Ferry dust, 191–98
Fi-do-nie, 333–37
Fields, 228–32
51, as name for cocaine, 95–99
Filibol forte, 280–81
Filon, 371–73
Fina, 424–25
Finaject, 424–25
Finajet, 424–25
Finaplix, 424–25
Fine Stuff, 239–46
Finger, 239–46
Finger lid, 239–46
Fioricet, 67–68
Fiorinal, 67–68
Fir, 239–46
Firewater, 183
First line, 306–9
Fish scales, 95–99
5–MeO-DMT, 61
Fixer, 271–74
Fizzies, 271–74
Flake: as cocaine, 95–99; as PCP, 351–55
Flamingos, 285–88
Flash, 228–32
Flat blues, 228–32
Flea powder, 191–98
Florida snow, 95–99
Drug Name Index 465
Flower: as marijuana, 239–46; as
methaqualone, 285–88
Flower of paradise, 216–19
Flower tops, 239–46
Flumazenil, 427, 441
Flunitrazepam, 167–70; and
buprenorphine, 65
Fluvoxamine, and methadone, 273
Fluoxetine: and alprazolam, 43; and
codeine, 102; and ergot, 146; and
MDMA, 258; and phentermine, 381
Fluoxymesterone, 171–73
Flurazepam, 174–76; and levorphanol,
224
Fly agaric, 46–47
Flying saucers, 303–5; PCP, 351–55
Foil, 191–98
Foo foo, 95–99
Foo foo stuff, 191–98
Foolish powder: as cocaine, 95–99; as
heroin, 191–98
Forget me drug, 167–70
Forget pills, 167–70
Fortral, 360–63
Fortralgesic, 360–63
Fortralin, 360–63
Fortuss, 125–26
Fortwin, 360–63
45 minute psychosis, 132–34
45 minute trip, 132–34
4–bromo-2,5–dimethoxyamphetamine,
135–36
4–bromo-2,5–dimethoxyphenethylamine,
432–33
4 doors, 100–103, 186–88
4–hydroxybutanoic acid, 182–85
4–methyl-2,5–dimethoxyamphetamine,
137–38
Four strokes, 285–88
4 X 4s, 360–63
Fraho, 239–46
Frajo, 239–46
Freebase, 98
Freeze, 95–99
Frekentine, 122–24
French fries, 95–99
Freon, 177–78
Fresh, 351–55
Friend, 164–66
Fries, 95–99
Frios, 239–46
Friskie powder, 95–99
Frontal, 42–45
Fry, 239–46
Fry daddy: as cocaine-heroin
combination, 191–98; cocainemarijuana
combination, 239–46;
cocaine-tobacco combination, 318–22
Fry sticks, 239–46
Fu, 239–46
Fuel: as marijuana-insect poison
combination, 239–46; as PCP, 351–55
Furra, 191–98
G, 182–85
Gage, 239–46
Gager, 289–90
Gagger, 289–90
Gaggler, 254–59
Galenphol, 383–84
Galloping horse, 191–98
Gallup, 191–98
Gamma butyrolactone, 183
Gamma hydroxybutyrate, 182–85
Gamma-hydroxybutyric acid, 182–85
Gamma oh, 182–85
Gamot, 191–98
G & C, 186–88
Gange, 239–46
Gangster, 239–46
Ganja, 239–46
Garbage: as heroin, 191–98; as marijuana,
239–46
Garbage rock, 95–99
Gardenal, 374–77
Garden-poppy, 333–37
Gas, 326–29
Gash, 239–46
Gasoline, 27, 179–81
Gasper, 239–46
Gato, 191–98
Gauge, 239–46
GBH, 182–85
GBL, 183
Gee, 333–37
Geek, as cocaine-marijuana combination,
95–99, 239–46
Geep, 275–79
Geldabol, 280–81
Genuines, 285–88
George, 191–98
Georgia home boy, 182–85
Georgia smack, 191–98
Germans, 285–88
466 Drug Name Index
Ghana, 239–46
Ghana marijuana, as GHB, 182–85
GHB, 182–85; and chloral hydrate, 79
Ghost, 228–32
Gib, 182–85
Gift of the sun, 95–99
Gift of the sun god, 95–99
Giggle smoke, 239–46
Giggle weed, 239–46
Gimmie, as cocaine-marijuana
combination, 95–99, 239–46
Gin, as cocaine, 95–99
Girl: as cocaine, 95–99; heroin, 191–98
Girlfriend, 95–99
Glacines, 191–98
Glad stuff, 95–99
Glass: as heroin, 191–98; as
methamphetamine, 275–79
Glo, 95–99
Glue, 420–23; as glutethimide, 186–88
Glutethimide, 186–88
Go, 254–59
Goblet of jam, 239–46
God’s drug, 306–9
God’s flesh: as LSD, 228–32; as
psilocybin, 394–96
God’s medicine, 333–37
Go fast: as methamphetamine, 275–79; as
methcathinone, 289–90
Gold: as cocaine, 95–99; as heroin, 191–
98; as marijuana, 239–46
Gold dust, 95–99
Golden, 239–46
Golden dragon, 228–32
Golden girl, 191–98
Golden leaf, 239–46
Gold star, 239–46
Golf ball, 95–99
Golfsticks, 285–88
Golpe, 191–98
Goma: as heroin, 191–98; as opium, 333–
37
Gondola, 333–37
Gong: as marijuana, 239–46; as opium,
333–37
Gonj, 239–46
Goob: as khat, 216–19; as methcathinone,
289–90
Good: as heroin, 191–98; as PCP, 351–55
Good & Plenty, 191–98
Good butt, 239–46
Goodfellas, 164–66
Good giggles, 239–46
Good H, 191–98
Good horse, 191–98
Goody-goody, 239–46
Goofball: as cocaine-heroin combination,
95–99; 191–98; as glutethimide, 186–88
Goofers, 186–88
Goofy, 228–32
Goofy butt, 239–46
Goon, 351–55
Goon dust, 351–55
Goop, 182–85
Goric, 333–37
Gorilla biscuit, 351–55
Gorilla Tab, 351–55
Granulated orange, 275–79
Grape parfait, 228–32
Grass, 239–46
Grasshopper, 239–46
Grata, 239–46
Gravel, 95–99
Gravy, 191–98
Great bear, 164–66
Great hormones at bedtime, 182–85
Great lettuce, 336
Great morel, 53–55
Great tobacco, 333–37
Green: as ketamine, 210–13; as
marijuana, 239–46; as PCP, 351–55
Green buds, 239–46
Green double domes, 228–32
Green dragon, 206–9
Green endive, 336
Green goddess, 239–46
Green gold, 95–99
Green leaves, 351–55
Green single dome, 228–32
Green tea, as PCP, 351–55
Green wedge, 228–32
Green weenies, 150–52
Greeter, 239–46
Gremmies, as cocaine-marijuana
combination, 95–99, 239–46
Greta, 239–46
Grey shields, 228–32
Griefo, 239–46
Griefs, 239–46
Grievous bodily harm, 182–85
Grifa, 239–46
Griff, 239–46
Griffa, 239–46
G-riffick, 182–85
Drug Name Index 467
Griffo, 239–46
Grit, 95–99
Groceries, 95–99
G-Rock, 95–99
Ground lemon, 237
Growth hormone booster, 182–85
Guarana, and ma huang, 235
Gum, 333–37
Guma, 333–37
Gunga, 239–46
Gungeon, 239–46
Gungun, 239–46
Gunja, 239–46
Gyve, 239–46
H, 191–98
Habitrol, 318–22
Hache, 191–98
Hail, 95–99
Haircut, 239–46
Hairy, 191–98
Halazepam, 189–90
Halcion, 426–29
Half moon, 367–68
Half track, 95–99
Halotestin, 171–73
Hamburger, 254–59
Hamburger helper, 95–99
H & C, 95–99, 191–98
Hanhich, 239–46
Hanyak, 275–79
Happy cigarette, 239–46
Happy dust, 95–99
Happy powder, 95–99
Happy sticks, 351–55
Happy trails, 95–99
Hard, 191–98
Hard ball, 95–99
Hard candy, 191–98
Hard line, 95–99
Hard rock, 95–99
Hard stuff: as heroin; 191–98; as
morphine, 306–9; as opium, 333–37
Hardware, 323–25
Harmaline, 435
Harmine, 435
Harry, 191–98
Harsh, 239–46
Has, 239–46
Hash, 239–46
Hashish, 239–46
Hats, 228–32
Have a dust, 95–99
Haven dust, 95–99
Hawaiian, 239–46
Hawaiian black, 239–46
Hawaiian homegrown 239–46
Hawaiian sunshine, 228–32
Hawk, 228–32
Hay, 239–46
Haze, 228–32
Hazel, 191–98
H-bomb, 191–98, 254–59
H caps, 191–98
HCP, 351–55
Head light, 228–32
Heart-on, 323–25
Heaven: as cocaine, 95–99; as heroin, 191–
98
Heaven & hell, 351–55
Heaven dust: as cocaine, 95–99; as
heroin, 191–98
Heavenly blue: as LSD, 228–32; as
morning glory, 303–5
Helen, 191–98
Hell, 95–99
Hell dust, 191–98
He man: as fentanyl, 164–66; as PCP, 351–
55
Hemp, 239–46
Henry, 191–98
Henry VIII, 95–99
Heparin, and nicotine, 321
Heptanal, 271–74
Her, 95–99
Hera, 191–98
Herb, 239–46
Herba, 239–46
Herbal ecstasy: as ephedrine, 141–44; as
ma huang, 233–35
Herbal XTC, 141–44
Herms, 351–55
Hero, 191–98
Heroin, 191–98; and buprenorphine, 63,
64; and chloral hydrate, 79; and
dronabinol, 140; and MDEA, 253
Heroina, 191–98
Herone, 191–98
Hero of the underworld, 191–98
Herox, 432–33
Hessle, 191–98
Hibernyl, 383–84
High Ball, 323–25
Hikori, 367–68
468 Drug Name Index
Hikuli, 367–68
Him, 191–98
Himbin, 436–38
Hinkley, 351–55
Hippie crack, 326–29
Hironpon, 275–79
Hiropon, 275–79
Histussin D, 199–200
Hit: as cocaine, 95–99; as codeine, 100–
103; ascglutethimide-codeine
combination, 186–88; as marijuana, 239–
46
Hocus: as marijuana, 239–46; as
morphine, 306–9; as opium, 333–37
Hog, 351–55
Hog apple, 237
Hog dust, 351–55
Hombre, 191–98
Hombrecitos, 394–96
Homebake, 100–103
Homegrown, 239–46
Homocodeine, 383–84
Honey flip, as MDMA-2C-B
combination, 254–59, 432–33
Honey oil, 210–13
Hong-Yen, 191–98
Hooch, as marijuana, 239–46
Hooter: as cocaine, 95–99; as marijuana,
239–46
Hop, 333–37
Hornseed, 145–47
Horse, 191–98
Horsebite, 191–98
Horse tracks, 351–55
Horse tranquilizer, 351–55
Hospital heroin, 201–2
Hotcakes, 95–99
Hot dope, 191–98
Hot ice, 275–79
Hot stick, 239–46
Hows, 306–9
HRN, 191–98
Huasca, 434–35
Hubba, 95–99
Hug drug: as MDA, 250–51; as MDMA,
254–59
Humbles, 285–88
Hunter, 95–99
Hyatari, 367–68
Hybolin, 280–81
Hybolin decanoate, 315–17
Hycodan, 199–200
Hycomine, 199–200
Hycotuss, 199–200
Hydro: as marijuana, 239–46; as MDMA,
254–59
Hydroaergotocin, 436–38
Hydrocet, 199–200
Hydrocodone, 199–200
Hydromorphone, 201–2; and dronabinol,
140; and hydrocodone, 199; and
heroin, 199
Hydrostat IR, 201–2
Hydrotest, 414–17
Hydroxy ethane, 37–40
Hyminal, 285–88
Hyoscyamine: and belladonna, 53; and
jimson weed, 206; and mandrake, 236
Hypnovel, 298–300
Hysteria, 326–29
Iboga: as ibogaine, 203–5; as MDMA, 254–
59
Ibogaine, 203–5
Ibogalin, 304
Ibotenic acid, 46, 47
Ibuprofen, and diazepam, 120
Ice: as cocaine, 95–99; as MDMA, 254–59;
as methamphetamine, 275–79; as PCP,
351–55
Ice cube, 95–99
Icing, 95–99
Ifosfamide: and chlordiazepoxide, 83;
and diazepam, 119
Iktorivil, 85–87
Ill, 351–55
Illies, 239–46
Illing, 239–46
Illusion, 432–33
Illy momo, 351–55
Imipramine: and butalbital, 68; and
methyltestosterone, 296
Immobilon, 157–59
Inapetyl, 56–57
Inca message, 95–99
Indian apple, 237
Indian boy, 239–46
Indian hay, 239–46
Indian hemp, 239–46
Indian pink, 191–98
Indo, 239–46
Indonesian bud: as marijuana, 239–46; as
opium, 333–37
Infumorph, 306–9
Drug Name Index 469
Innovar, 164–66
Instaga, 239–46
Instagu, 239–46
Instant psychosis, 132–34
Instant zen, 228–32
Insulin: and coca, 92; and
fluoxymesterone, 172; and
methamphetamine, 276; and
nandrolone, 316; and oxandrolone, 339
Intellect, 252–53
Ionamin, 380–82
Ipomoea hederacea, 303–5
Ipomoea purpurea, 303–5
Ipomoea sidaefolia, 303–5
Ipomoea tricolor, 303–5
Ipomoea violacea, 303–5
Iroini, 191–98
Isda, 191–98
Isoamyl nitrite, 323–25
Isobutyl nitrite, 323–25
Isopromedol, 430–31
Issues, 95–99
Itraconazole: and alprazolam, 43; and
triazolam, 428
J, 239–46
Jaad, 216–19
Jackpot, 164–66
Jam, 95–99
Jamaican gold, 239–46
Jamestown weed, 206–9
Jane, 239–46
Jay, 239–46
Jee gee, 191–98
Jee jee, 191–98
Jeff, 289–90
Jejo, 95–99
Jelly, 95–99
Jelly beans: as chloral hydrate, 79–81; as
cocaine, 95–99
Jerry Springer, as heroin, 191–98
Jet, 210–13
Jet fuel: as methamphetamine, 275–79; as
PCP, 351–55
Jetrium, 114–15
Jib, 182–85
Jib gamma, 182–85
Jim 239–46
Jimson weed, 206–9, 241
Jive, 191–98, 239–46
Jive doo jee, 191–98
Joharito, 191–98
Johnson, 95–99
Joint, 239–46
Jojee, 191–98
Jolly green, 239–46
Jones: as heroin, 191–98; as marijuanacocaine-
PCP combination, 239–46
Joy: as heroin, 191–98; as opium, 333–37
Joy flakes, 191–98
Joy plant, 333–37
Joy powder: as cocaine, 95–99; as heroin,
191–98
Joy smoke, 239–46
Joy stick, 239–46
Juanita, 239–46
Juan Valdez, 239–46
Juice: as methadone, 271–74; as PCP, 351–
55
Juicer, 271–74
Juice joint, 239–46
Juja, 239–46
Ju-Ju, 239–46
Jumbo (with crack), 239–46
Junco, 191–98
Jungle Juice, 271–74
Junk: as cocaine, 95–99; as heroin, 191–98
K: as alcohol-dextromethorphan
combination, 110–13; as ketamine, 210–
13; as PCP, 351–55
Kabayo, 191–98
Kadian, 306–9
Kaksonjae, 275–79
Kalakit, 239–46
Kali, 239–46
Kansas grass, 239–46
Kap, 351–55
Kapanol Sevredol, 306–9
Karachi, 191–98
Karo, 100–103
Kate bush, 239–46
Katha, 48–52
Kava, and alprazolam, 43
Kay, 210–13
Kaya, 239–46
Kay-blast, 210–13
Kay jay, as ketamine, 210–13, 351–55
K-blast, 351–55
Kee, 239–46
Keets, 210–13
Keller, 210–13
Kellys day, 210–13
Kentucky blue, 239–46
470 Drug Name Index
Ket, 210–13
Ketaject, 210–13
Ketalar, 210–13
Ketalgin, 271–74
Ketamine, 210–13; and nitrous oxide, 328
Ketanest, 210–13
Ketavet, 210–13
Ketobemidone, 214–15
Ketoconazole: and alprazolam, 43; and
triazolam, 428; and zolpidem, 443
Ketogan, 214–15
Key, 239–46
KGB, 239–46
Khat, 216–19; as methcathinone, 289–90;
as name for MDMA, 254–59
Ki, 239–46
Kick stick, 239–46
Kief, 239–46
Kie syrup, 141–44
Kiff, 239–46
Killer, 351–55
Killer green bud, 239–46
Killer weed (with PCP), 239–46
Kilter, 239–46
Kind, 239–46
King, 95–99
King bud, 239–46
King ivory, 164–66
King’s habit, 95–99
Kit Kat, as ketamine, 210–13
KJ, 351–55
Kleenex, 254–59
Klonopin, 85–87
Knockout drops, 79–81
Knoppies, 285–88
Kokayeen, 95–99
Kokomo, 95–99
Kompot, 191–98
Kool, 351–55
Koolly high, 351–55
Krystal, 351–55
Kumba, 239–46
KW, 351–55
Kryptonite, 95–99
L, 228–32
LAAM, 220–22
La buena, 191–98
Lace, 239–46
Lactucarium, 336
Lactuca virosa, 336
Lady, 95–99
Lady caine, 95–99
Lady snow, 95–99
L.A. Glass, 275–79
L.A. Ice, 275–79
Lakbay diva, 239–46
Lansden, 85–87
La purga, 434–35
La Rocha, 167–70
La Roche, 167–70
Las mujercitas, 394–96
Lason sa daga, 228–32
Late night, 95–9
Laudanum, 334
Laughing gas, 326–29
Laughing grass, 239–46
Laughing weed, 239–46
LBJ: as heroin, 191–98; as LSD, 228–32;
as PCP, 351–55
Leaf: as cocaine, 95–99; as marijuana, 239–
46
Leaf of god, 203–5
Leak, 239–46
Leaky bolla, 351–55
Leaky leak, 351–55
Lean, 100–103
Lean & Dean, 100–103
Leary’s, 228–32
Lemonade, 191–98
Lemon drop: as methamphetamine, 275–
79; as PCP, 351–55
Lemons, 182–85
Lemon 714, 351–55
Leno: as marijuana, 239–46; as PCP, 351–
55
Lens, 228–32
Lethal weapon, 351–55
Letigen, 141–44
Levanxol, 408–11
Levo-alpha-acetymethadol, 220–22
Levo-alphacetylmethadol, 220–22
Levodopa, and chlordiazepoxide, 83
Levo-Dromoran, 223–24
Levomethadyl acetate, 220–22
Levorphanol, 223–24
Levopropoxyphene, 390
Liberty caps, 394–96
Libritabs, 82–84
Librium, 82–84
Libs, 82–84
Lid, as quantity of marijuana, 239–46
Light stuff, 239–46
Lima, 239–46
Drug Name Index 471
Limbitrol, 82–84
Lime acid, 228–32
Line, 95–99
Lineal-Rivo, 122–24
Linea-Valeas, 122–24
Linfadol, 114–15
Lipidex, 338–39
Lipomin, 122–24
Liposlim, 122–24
Liprimo, 239–46
Liquefied petroleum gas, 69–71
Liquid E, 182–85
Liquid ecstasy, 182–85
Liquid gold, 323–25
Liquid incense, 323–25
Liquid X, 182–85
Liquor, 37–40
Lithium carbonate: and amphetamines,
14; and clonazepam, 86; and
dextroamphetamine, 107; and
mazindol, 248
Liticon, 360–63
Little bomb, 191–98
Little d, 201–2
Little one, 351–55
Little smoke: as LSD, 228–32; as
marijuana, 239–46; as psilocybin, 394–
96
Live one, 351–55
Live spit and die, 228–32
Lizards, 285–88
LL, 239–46
Llesca, 239–46
Load: as codeine-glutethimide
combination, 100–103, 186–88; as
heroin quantity, 191–98
Load of laundry, 275–79
Loaf, 239–46
Lobo, 239–46
Locker room, 323–25
Loco, 239–46
Locoweed: as jimson weed, 206–9; as
name marijuana, 239–46
Log: as marijuana, 239–46; as PCP, 351–
55
Logen, 127–29
Logor, 228–32
Lomotil, 127–29
Lonavar, 338–39
Lonox, 127–29
Loony toons, 228–32
Lophophora williamsii, 367–68
Lorazepam, 225–27; and alcohol, 38; and
ketamine, 212; and levorphanol, 224
Lorcet, 199–200
Lords, 201–2
Lortab, 199–200
Loss of Memory, 285–88
Love: as cocaine, 95–99; as MDA, 250–51
Love affair, 95–99
Love apple, 53–55
Love boat, 239–46
Loveboat, 351–55
Love doctor, 254–59
Love doves, 254–59
Love drug: as MDMA, 254–59; as
methaqualone, 285–88
Love leaf, 239–46
Lovely: as marijuana-PCP combination,
239–46; as PCP, 351–55
Love pearls, 35–36
Love pill: as AET, 35–36; as MDA, 250–
51
Love potion number 9, 254–59
Lovers’ Speed, 254–59
Love trip, as MDMA-mescaline
combination, 254–59, 268–70
Love weed, 239–46
LSD, 228–32; and ethylestrenol, 156
Lubage, 239–46
Lucky Charmz, 254–59
Lucy in the sky with diamonds, 228–32
Ludes: as diazepam, 118–21; as
methaqualone, 285–88
Luds, 285–88
Lula, 285–88
Luminal, 374–77
Lunch money drug, 167–70
Luvox, and methadone, 273
Lydia, 306–9
Lydic, 306–9
Lysergic acid amide, 303, 304
Lysergic acid diethylamide, 228–32
Lyspafen, 128
M: as marijuana, 239–46; as morphine,
306–9
Ma’a, 95–99
Mace, 330–32
Machinery, 239–46
Macon, 239–46
Maconha, 239–46
Mad apple, 206–9
Mad dog, 351–55
472 Drug Name Index
Madman, 351–55
Mafu, 239–46
Magic, 351–55
Magic dust, 351–55
Magic mist, 351–55
Magic mushroom, 394–96
Magic smoke 239–46
Magnesium pemoline, 358
Magrene, 122–24
Magwheels, 285–88
Ma Huang, 233–35. See also Ephedrine
Malaysian Pink, 191–98
Malogen, 414–17
Malpitte, 206–9
Mama coca, 95–99
Man aroma, 323–25
Mandies, 285–88
M & M, 254–59
Mandragora officinarum, 236–38
Mandrake, 236–38
Mandrax, 285–88
Manhattan silver, 239–46
Manteca, 191–98
MAO, 254–59
Mappine, 60–62
Marax, 141–44
Marching dust, 95–99
Marching powder, 95–99
Mardon, 390–93
Mari, 239–46
Marihuana, 239–46
Marimba, 239–46
Marijuana, 239–46; and choral hydrate,
80; and dextroamphetamine, 108; and
ethchlorvynol, 151; and flurazepam,
175; and meprobamate, 267; and
nicotine, 320; and nitrous oxide, 328.
See also Dronabinol
Marinol, 139–40
Mary, 239–46
Mary and Johnny, 239–46
Mary Ann, 239–46
Mary Jane, 239–46
Mary Jonas, 239–46
Mary Warner, 239–46
Mary Weaver, 239–46
Matchbox, as quantity of marijuana, 239–
46
Matsakow, 191–98
Maui Wauie, 239–46
Maui-wowie: as marijuana, 239–46; as
methamphetamine, 275–79
Mauve, 210–13
Mawseed, 333–37
Max, 182–85
Maxibolin, 155–56
May apple, 237
Mayo: as cocaine, 95–99; as heroin, 191–
98
Mazanor, 247–49
Mazindol, 247–49; and cocaine, 98
MDA, 250–51
MDE, 252–53
MDEA, 252–53
MDM, 254–59
MDMA, 254–59; and dextromethorphan,
112; and pentobarbital, 365
Mean green, 351–55
Mebaral, 263–64
Medecina, 271–74
Medicon, 110–13
Mediquell, 110–13
Meg, 239–46
Mega-Perls, 110–13
Megg, 239–46
Meggie, 239–46
Mellow drug of America, 250–51
Mellow yellow, 228–32
Melsed, 285–88
Melsedin, 285–88
Memine, 383–84
Mepergan, 260–62
Meperidine, 260–62; and
chlordiazepoxide, 84; and dronabinol,
140; and sibutramine, 402
Mephanon, 271–74
Mephobarbital, 263–64
Meprobamate, 265–67; and ethylestrenol,
156
Mequelone, 285–88
Mequin, 285–88
Merck, 95–99
Meridia, 401–2
Merk, 95–99
Mesc, 268–70
Mescal: as alcoholic beverage, 270, 368;
as mescaline, 268–70; as peyote, 367–
68
Mescal beans, 367–68; as
nonhallucinogenic food, 368
Mescal buttons, 367–68
Mescaline, 268–70; and benzphetamine,
57
Drug Name Index 473
Mescalito: as mescaline, 268–70; as
peyote, 367–68
Mescap, 268–70
Mescy, 367–68
Mese, 268–70
Messorole, 239–46
Metadate CD, 291–94
Metadate ER, 291–94
Meth, 275–79
Methadone, 271–74; and alcohol, 38; and
buprenorphine, 64; and
dihydrocodeine, 126; and
diphenoxylate, 128; and
methamphetamine, 278; and
oxazepam, 341
Meth-a-done, 271–74
Methadorm, 285–88
Methadose, 271–74
Methadyl acetate, 222
Methamphetamine, 275–79; and
benzphetamine, 57; and ephedrine, 142;
and military usage, 12; and
pseudoephedrine, 143
Methandienone, 282–84
Methandriol, 280–81
Methandrostenolone, 282–84
Methaqualone, 285–88
Methcathinone, 289–90; and dextrorphan,
116; and ephedrine, 141–42; and
pseudoephedrine, 143
Methedrine: as military usage, 12; as
name for MDMA, 254–59
Methitest, 295–97
Methlies Quik, 275–79
Methylandrostendiol, 280–81
Methylandrostenediol, 280–81
Methylbenzene, 420–23
Methylbenzoylecgonine, 95–99
Methyl chloroform, 405–7
Methylchloroform, 405–7
Methylene dianiline, 251
Methylenedioxymethamphetamine, 254–
59
Methylethylmethane, 69–71
Methylin, 291–94
Methylmorphine, 100–103
Methylphenidate, 291–94
Methylphenobarbital, 263–64
Methylphenobarbitone, 263–64
Methyltestosterone, 295–97
Methyltrichloromethane, 405–7
Mexican, 191–98
Mexican brown: as heroin, 191–98; as
marijuana, 239–46
Mexican crack, 275–79
Mexican green, 239–46
Mexican horse, 191–98
Mexican locoweed, 239–46
Mexican mud, 191–98
Mexican mushrooms, 394–96
Mexican red, 239–46
Mexican tea, 233–35
Mexican Valium, 167–70
Mezc, 268–70
MFT, 432–33
Mickey, 228–32
Mickey Finn, 79–81
Mickey Finn special, 182–85
Mickeys, 79–81
Micrainin, 265–67
Microdot, 228–32
Midazolam, 298–300; and fentanyl, 165;
and ketamine, 212
Midnight oil, 333–37
Mighty mezz, 239–46
Mighty Quinn, 228–32
Miltown, 265–67
Mind detergent, 228–32
Mind benders, 285–88
Mind erasers, 167–70
Miner’s tea, 233–35
Mini Beans, 254–59
Miniphage, 160–63
Mint dew, 351–55
Mint leaf, 351–55
Mint weed, 351–55
Mira, 333–37
Miraa, 216–19
Miss Emma, 306–9
Missile, 351–55
Mist, 351–55
Mister Blue, 306–9
Mitsubishi, 254–59
Mixed jive, 95–99
M.J., 239–46
M99, 157–59
M.O., 239–46
Mo, 239–46
Modafinil, 301–2
Modams, 239–46
Moderatan, 122–24
Modiodal, 301–2
Mohasky, 239–46
Mohasty, 239–46
474 Drug Name Index
Mojo: as cocaine, 95–99; as heroin, 191–
98
Molly, 254–59
Monase, 35–36
Monkey: as cocaine, 95–99; as morphine,
306–9
Monkey dust, 351–55
Monkey tranquilizer, 351–55
Monkey water, 191–98
Monoamine oxidase, 254–59
Monster, 95–99
Monte, 239–46
Mooca, 239–46
Moocah, 239–46
Moon, 268–70
Moonrock, 191–98
Mooster, 239–46
Moota, 239–46
Mooter, 239–46
Mootie, 239–46
Mootos, 239–46
Mor a grifa, 239–46
Moramide, 114–15
More, 351–55
M-Orexic, 122–24
Morf, 306–9
Mormon tea, 233–35
Morning glory, 303–5
Morning shot, 254–59
Morotgara, 191–98
Morph, 306–9
Morphide, 306–9
MorphiDex, 110–13
Morphie, 306–9
Morphine, 306–9; and alcohol, 38; and
alprazolam, 44; and chlordiazepoxide,
84; and dextroamphetamine, 107; and
dextromethorphan, 112; and
dronabinol, 140; and etorphine, 159;
and ketamine, 212; and MDMA, 258;
and nitrous oxide, 328; and oxazepam,
341; and pentazocine, 363; and
yohimbine, 437
Morphine sulfate, 306–9
Morpho, 306–9
Mortal combat, 191–98
Mosquitos, 95–99
Mota, 239–46
Mothballs, 310–11
Mother: as marijuana, 239–46; as
morphine, 306–9
Mother of rye, 145–47
Mother’s little helper: as diazepam, 118–
21; as meprobamate, 265–67
Moto, 239–46
Motofen, 128
Motorcycle crack, 275–79
Movie star drug, 95–99
M-Oxy, 343–45
Mozambin, 285–88
MS, 306–9
MS Contin, 306–9
Ms. Emma, 306–9
MSIR, 306–9
MST Continus, 306–9
M25, 254–59
M.U., 239–46
Mu, 239–46
Mud: as heroin, 191–98; as methadone,
271–74; as morphine, 306–9; as opium,
333–37
Muggie, 239–46
Muggle, 239–46
Mujer, 95–99
Murder, 164–66
Murder 8, 164–66
Murderer’s berry, 53–55
Murder 1, 95–99, 191–98
Murotugora, 191–98
Muscarine chloride, 46
Mushies, 394–96
Mushrooms, 394–96
Mushroom soup, 394–96
Mushroom tea, 394–96
Musk: as mescaline, 268–70; as
psilocybin, 394–96
Muscimol, 46, 47
Muta, 239–46
Mutah, 239–46
Mutha, 239–46
Muttercorn, 145–47
Muzzle, 191–98
MXL, 306–9
Myristica fragrans, 330–32
Myristicin, 331
Nail, 239–46
Nalbuphine, 312–14
Naloxone, and cocaine, 98
Naltrexone, and yohimbine, 437
Nandrolin, 315–17
Nandrolone, 25, 283, 315–17
Nanoo, 191–98
Naphthalene, 310–11
Drug Name Index 475
Narcolo, 114–15
Natural sleep-500, 182–85
Nature’s Quaalude, 182–85
Naughty man’s cherries, 53–55
Nazi vitamins, 275–79
Nebbies, 364–66
Nefazodone, 428
Nembies, 364–66
Nembutal, 364–66
Nemmies, 364–66
Neocodine, 383–84
Nerobol, 282–84
New acid, 351–55
New addition, 95–99
New jack swing, as heroin-morphine
combination, 191–98, 306–9
New magic, 351–55
New Yorkers, 254–59
Nexus, 432–33
Nice & Easy, 191–98
Nicoderm, 318–22
Niconil, 318–22
Nicorette, 318–22
Nicotiana rustica, 318–22
Nicotiana tabacum, 318–22
Nicotine, 18–19, 318–22; and alcohol, 38;
and buprenorphine, 65; and caffeine,
76; and chlordiazepoxide, 83–84; and
cocaine, 98; and dextroamphetamine,
108; and diazepam, 120; and estzolam,
148; and ethylestrenol, 156; and
heroin, 194; and meprobamate, 266–67;
and methamphetamine, 278; and
morphine, 308; and oxazepam, 341;
and propoxyphene, 392; and
testosterone, 415; and ulcerative colitis,
49
Nicotrol, 318–22
Niebla, 351–55
Nieve, 95–99
Nightshade, 206–9
Nigra, 239–46
Nimbies, 364–66
19, as name for MDMA, 254–59
Nitrite, 323–25
Nitro, 326–29
Nitrous, 326–29
Nitrous acid, 323–25; as nitrous oxide,
326–29
Nitrous oxide, 326–29; and ketamine, 211
N,N-dimethylserotonin, 60–62
N,N-dimethyltryptamine, 132–34
Nobesine, 122–24
Noctec, 79–81
Nods, 100–103
Noise, 191–98
Norco, 199–200
Nordiazepam, and halazepam, 189
Normison, 408–11
Norodin, 275–79
Nortestosterone, 315–17
Nose: as cocaine, 95–99; as heroin, 191–
98
Nose candy, 95–99
Nose drops, 191–98
Nose powder, 95–99
Nose stuff, 95–99
Noss, 326–29
Novandrol, 280–81
Novopropoxyn, 390–93
Noxyron, 186–88
Nubain, 312–14
Nubs, 367–68
Nuggets, 95–99
Nulobes, 122–24
Number, 239–46
Number 8, 191–98
Number 4, 191–98
Number 9, 254–59
Number 3: as cocaine, 95–99; as heroin,
191–98
Numorphan, 349–50
Nurse, 191–98
Nutmeg, 330–32
O, 333–37
Obe-Nix 30, 380–82
Octane, 351–55
Ogoy, 191–98
O.J.: as marijuana, 239–46; as opium, 333–
37
Oil: as heroin, 191–98; as opium, 333–37;
as PCP, 351–55
Old Steve, 191–98
Ololiuhqui, 303
Omen, 351–55
Omeprazole, and diazepam, 119
151, as name for cocaine, 95–99
1,1,1–Trichloroethane, 405–7
1s & 1s, 291–94, 360–63
One way, 228–32
Onion, 95–99
Oolies, 239–46
OP, 333–37
476 Drug Name Index
Ope, 333–37
Operidine, 378–79
Opium, 333–37
Opium lettuce, 336
OPP, 351–55
Optical illusion, 228–32
Optimil, 285–88
Orabolin, 155–56
Oramorph, 306–9
Orange, 106–9
Orange barrel, 228–32
Orange crystal, 351–55
Orange cube, 228–32
Orange haze, 228–32
Orange hearts, 106–9
Orange line, 191–98
Orange micro, 228–32
Orange wedge, 228–32
Ora-Testryl, 171–73
Orbit, 254–59
Orgabolin, 155–56
Organic Quaalude, 182–85
Orlaam, 220–22
Oreton, 414–17
Owsley, 228–32
Owsley’s acid, 228–32
Oxandrin, 338–39
Oxandrolone, 338–39
Oxazepam, 340–42; and diazepam, 118;
and halazepam, 189
Oxycet, 343–45
Oxycocet, 343–45
Oxycodone, 343–45; and oxymorphone,
349
Oxycontin, 343–45
OxyFast, 343–45
OxyIR, 343–45
Oxymethalone, 346–48
Oxymetholone, 346–48
Oxymorphone, 349–50; and dronabinol,
140; and oxycodone, 343
Oxy-sleep, 182–85
Oyster stew, 95–99
Oz, 323–25
Ozone: as marijuana, 239–46; as nitrite,
323–25; as PCP, 351–55
P: as PCP, 351–55; as peyote, 367–68
Pack: as heroin, 191–98; as marijuana,
239–46
Packets, 100–103, 186–88
Pakalolo, 239–46
Pakistani black, 239–46
Palfium, 114–15
Palladone, 201–2
Pan, 326–29
Panama cut, 239–46
Panama gold, 239–46
Panama red, 239–46
Panatella, 239–46
Pancakes & syrup, 100–103, 186–88
Pane, 228–32
Pangonadalot, 191–98
Pan masala, 50, 51
Papaver album, 333–37
Papaver somniferum, 333–37
Paper acid, 228–32
Pappas, 167–70
Parabolan, 424–25
Parachute, 191–98
Paracodin, 125–26
Paradichlorobenzene, 310–11
Paradise, 95–99
Paradise white, 95–99
Paramorphine, 418–19
Paregoric, 334–35
Parenabol, 58–59
Parest, 285–88
Parlay, 95–99
Paroxetine: and clonazepam, 86; and
codeine, 102
Parsley: as marijuana, 239–46; as PCP,
351–55
Pastas, 167–70
Paste, 95–99
Pasto, 239–46
Pat, 239–46
Patico, 95–99
Pausinystalia yohimbe, 436–38
Paxane, 174–76
Paxipam, 189–90
Paz, 351–55
PBR, 135–36
PCE, 355
PCP, 351–55; and ketamine, 210; and
meperidine, 260
PCPA, 351–55
PCPy, 355
P-dogs, 239–46
P-dope, 191–98
Peace: as LSD, 228–32; as PCP, 351–55
PeaCe pill, 351–55
Peace tablet, 228–32
Peace weed, 351–55
Drug Name Index 477
Peanut butter, 275–79
Peanuts, 167–70
Pearl: as cocaine, 95–99; as nitrite, 323–25
Pearly gates: as LSD, 228–32; as morning
glory, 303–5
Pebbles, 95–99
Peca, 237
Pectolin, 383–84
Peep, 351–55
Pee wee, 95–99
Peg, 191–98
Pellet: as LSD, 228–32; as
methylphenidate, 291–94
Pellote, 367–68
Pemoline, 356–59
Penang pink, 191–98
Pentazocine, 360–63, and sibutramine,
402
Pentgin, 360–63
Pentobarbital, 364–66; and alcohol, 38;
and caffeine, 76
Pentobarbitone, 364–66
Pen yan, 333–37
Pen yen, 333–37
Percia, 95–99
Percio, 95–99
Perfect high, 191–98
Perica, 191–98
Perico, 191–98
Percocet, 343–45
Percodan, 343–45
Percodan-Demi, 343–45
Percolone, 343–45
Percutacrine Androge´nique Forte, 414–17
Performax, 432–33
Persian, 191–98
Persian brown, 191–98
Persian white, 164–66
Pertussin CS, 110–13
Peru apple, 206–9
Peruvian, 95–99
Peruvian flake, 95–99
Peruvian lady, 95–99
Pervertin, 275–79
Peter Pan, 351–55
Pethidine, 260–62
Pethoid, 260–62
Petrol, 179–81
Petroleum ether, distinguished from
ether, 154
Peyote, 367–68; as mescaline, 268–70
Peyotl, 367–68
P-funk: as cocaine-PCP combination, 95–
99; as heroin, 191–98
PG, 333–37
Phencyclidine, 351–55
Phendimetrazine, 369–70
Phenelzine sulfate, and MDMA, 258
Phen-fen. See fen-phen
Phenmetrazine, 371–73; and
benzphetamine, 56, 371
Phennies, 374–77
Phenobarb, 374–77
Phenobarbital, 374–77; and butalbital 68;
and diazepam, 119; and ephedrine,
143; and glutethimide, 187; and
LAAM, 221; and levorphanol, 224; and
meperidine, 260; and mephobarbital,
263; and meprobamate, 267; and
methadone, 273; and methylphenidate,
293
Phenobarbitone: as pentobarbital, 364–66;
as phenobarbital, 374–77
Phenos, 374–77
Phenoperidine, 378–79
Phenprocoumon, and buprenorphine, 65
Phentermine, 380–82; and fenfluramine,
161–62, 381; and phendimetrazine, 370;
as monoamine oxidase inhibitor, 162
Phenytoin: and alprazolam, 44; and
choral hydrate, 80; and clonazepam, 86;
and epilepsy, 264; and LAAM, 221;
and methadone, 273; and midazolam,
300; and modafinil, 302; and triazolam,
428
Pholcodine, 383–84
Pholtrate, 383–84
Phrenilin, 67–68
Phyamps, 271–74
Physeptone, 271–74
Piece, 95–99
Piedra: as cocaine, 95–99; as heroin, 191–
98
Pig killer, 351–55
Pikachu, as MDMA-PCP combination,
254–59, 351–55
Piles, 95–99
Pills, 201–2
Pimp, 95–99
Pimp’s drug, 95–99
Pin, 239–46
Pinang, 48–52
Pin gon, 333–37
Pingus, 167–70
478 Drug Name Index
Pink blotter, 228–32
Pink hearts, 369–70
Pink ladies, 390–93
Pink panther, 228–32
Pink robot, 228–32
Pink studs, 254–59
Pink wedge, 228–32
Pink witch, 228–32
Pin yen, 333–37
Piper betel, 51
Piper betle, 51
Piperidyl-methadone, 130–31
Pipero, 95–99
Piridolan, 385–86
Piritramide, 385–86
Pit, 351–55
Pixie, 271–74
Pizza toppings, 394–96
Placidyl, 150–52
Plant, 333–37
Planum, 408–11
Plegine, 369–70
PO, 333–37
Pocket rocket, 239–46
Pod, 239–46
Podophyllin, 237
Podophyllotoxin, 237
Podophyllum peltatum, 237
Poison: as fentanyl, 164–66; as heroin,
191–98
Poison black cherry, 53–55
Poison Lettuce, 336
Poke, 239–46
Pole, 110–13
Pollutants, 254–59
Polo, 110–13
Polvo: as heroion, 191–98; as PCP, 351–
55
Polvo blanco, 95–99
Polvo de angel, 351–55
Polvo de estrellas, 351–55
Ponderal, 160–63
Ponderax, 160–63
Pondimin, 160–63
Ponflural, 160–63
Pony, 95–99
Poor man’s heroin: as GHB, 182–85; as
methylphenidate-pentazocine
combination, 291–94, 360–63
Popcorn coke, 356–59
Popotillo, 233–35
Poppers, 323–25
Poppy: as heroin, 191–98; as opium, 333–
37
Poppy straw, 333
Pot, 239–46
Potato chips, 95–99
Potato: as flunitrazepam, 167–70; as LSD,
228–32
Potlikker, 239–46
Potten Bush, 239–46
Powder: as cocaine, 95–99; as heroin, 191–
98
Powder diamonds, 95–99
Pox, 333–37
Prazepam, 387–89
Predator, 191–98
Prefamone, 122–24
Prelu-2, 369–70
Preludin, 371–73
Prescription, 239–46
Press, 95–99
Pressouts, 285–88
Pretendica, 239–46
Pretendo, 239–46
Pretz-D, 141–44
Preza, 191–98
Prickly lettuce, 336
Primatene, 141–44
Prime time, 95–99
Primo: as cocaine, 95–99; as cocaineheroin
combination, 191–98; as cocainemarijuana
combination, 239–46
Primoteston, 414–17
Procomil, 436–38
Product, 95–99
Progesterone, 428
Proheptazine, 430–31
Prohim, 436–38
Promedol, 430–31
Propion, 122–24
Propoxyphene, 102, 390–93; and
alprazolam, 43; and diazepam, 119
Propoxyphene napsylate, 392
Propranolol, and phenoperidine, 378
Pro-65, 390–93
ProSom, 148–49
Prostrop, 318–22
Protector, 127–29
Provigil, 301–2
Provitar, 338–39
Proxagesic, 390–93
Prozac. See Fluoxetine
Pseudoephedrine, 143, 233, 234
Drug Name Index 479
Psilocibin, 394–96
Psilocin, 395
Psilocybin, 394–96
Psilocyn, 395
Psychosis, 132–34
Puffy, 351–55
Pugua, 48–52
Pulborn, 191–98
Pumpkin seeds, 390–93
Punk rocker, 191–98
Pupumala, 285–88
Pure, 191–98
Pure love, 228–32
Purple, 210–13
Purple barrel, 228–32
Purple flat, 228–32
Purple haze, 228–32
Purple hearts: as dextroamphetamine,
106–9; as LSD, 228–32
Purple ozoline, 228–32
Purple rain, 351–55
Pyrofax, 69–71
Q, 285–88
Qaad, 216–19
Qat: as khat, 216–19; as methcathinone,
289–90
Quaalude, 285–88
Quartz smokable, 275–79
Quazepam, 397–98
Quebrachine, 436–38
Queen Ann’s lace, 239–46
Quicksilver: as methcathinone, 289–90; as
nitrite, 323–25
Quill: as cocaine, 95–99; as heroin, 191–
98
Quill cocaine, 275–79
Raccoon berry, 237
Racehorse Charley, 95–99
Racehorse Charlie, 191–98
Ragweed: as heroin, 191–98; as
marijuana, 239–46
Railroad weed, 239–46
Rainbow, 228–32
Rainy day woman, 239–46
Ram, 323–25
Rambo, 191–98
Randy mandies, 285–88
Rane: as cocaine, 95–99; as heroin, 191–
98
Rangood, 239–46
Rasta weed, 239–46
Rave, 254–59
Raw, 95–99
Raw fusion, 191–98
Raw hide, 191–98
Ready rock: as cocaine, 95–99; as heroin,
191–98
Reasec, 127–29
Recycle, 228–32
Red, 191–98
Red bud, 239–46
Red caps, 95–99
Red chicken, 191–98
Red cross, 239–46
Red devil: as methamphetamine, 275–79;
as PCP, 351–55
Red dirt, 239–46
Red eagle, 191–98
Red lips, 228–32
Redneck cocaine, 275–79
Red rock: as heroin, 191–98; methadone,
271–74
Red rock opium, 191–98
Red rum, 191–98
Red stuff, 191–98
Reductil, 401–2
Redux, 160–63
Reefer, 239–46
Regenon, 122–24
Regibon, 122–24
Regular P, 95–99
Reindeer dust, 191–98
Remember all, 167–70
Remifentanil, 399–400
Rest in peace, 95–99
Restoril, 408–11
Retardinr, 127–29
Revonal, 285–88
Reynol, 167–70
Reynolds, 167–70
Rhine, 191–98
Rib, 167–70
Rifampin: and alprazolam, 44; and
LAAM, 221; and methadone, 273; and
midazolam, 300; and triazolam, 428;
and zolpidem, 443
Righteous bush, 239–46
Rip, 239–46
Ritalin, 291–94
Rities, 291–94
Ritonavir: and alprazolam, 43; and ergot,
146; and fentanyl, 165; and GHB, 184;
480 Drug Name Index
and meperidine, 260; and methadone,
273; and triazolam, 428
Ritz & Ts, 291–94, 360–63
Rivea corymbosa, 303
Rivotril, 85–87
Roach, 239–46
Roacha, 239–46
Roaches, 167–70
Roachies, 167–70
Roach-2, 167–70
Road runner, 254–59
Roapies, 167–70
Robe, 110–13
Robinol, 167–70
Robin’s eggs, 380–82
Robo, 110–13
Robotussin-DM, 110–13
Robutal, 167–70
Roca, 95–99
Rochas, 167–70
Rochas Dos, 167–70
Roche, 167–70
Roche Dos, 167–70
Roches, 167–70
Rochies, 167–70
Rock, 95–99
Rock attack, 95–99
Rocket fuel, 351–55
Rockets, 239–46
Rockmesc, 210–13
Rocks of hell, 95–99
R05–4200, 167–70
Rohibinol, 167–70
Rohypnol, 167–70
Rojo, 110–13
Rolling, 254–59
Rompums, 239–46
Roofenol, 167–70
Roofies, 167–70
Rooms, 394–96
Rooster, 95–99
Root, 239–46
Ropanol, 167–70
Rope, 239–46
Ropers, 167–70
Ropes, 167–70
Rophies, 167–70
Rophs, 167–70
Rophy, 167–70
Ropies, 167–70
Roples, 167–70
Rose marie, 239–46
Ro-shay, 167–70
Rough stuff, 239–46
Row-shay, 167–70
Rox, 95–99
Roxanne, 95–99
Roxanol, 306–9
Roxicet, 343–45
Roxicodone, 343–45
Roxilox, 343–45
Roxiprin, 343–45
Roxithromycin, 428
Royal blue, 228–32
Roz, 95–99
R-25, 167–70
R-2, 167–70
Rubia, 239–46
Rubies, 167–70
Ruffies, 167–70
Ruffles, 167–70
Rufus, 191–98
Running, 254–59
Rush: as cocaine, 95–99; as nitrite, 323–25
Russian sickle, 228–32
Rynatuss, 141–44
Sack, 191–98
Sacrament, 228–32
Sacred datura, 206–9
Sacred mushroom, 394–96
Safrole, 331
Salt, 191–98
Salt & pepper, 239–46
Salty water, 182–85
Sandoz, 228–32
Sandwich bag, as quantity of marijuna,
239–46
Sanorex, 247–49
Santa Marta, 239–46
Saquinavir: and GHB, 184; and MDMA,
258; and midazolam, 300
Sasfras, 239–46
Satan’s apple, 236–38
Scaffle, 351–55
Scag, 191–98
Scat, 191–98
Scate, 191–98
Schmeck, 95–99
Schmeek, 191–98
Schmiz, 275–79
Schoolboy: as cocaine, 95–99; as codeine,
100–103
Schoolcraft, 95–99
Drug Name Index 481
Scissors, 239–46
Scooby snacks, 254–59
Scoop, 182–85
Scootie, 275–79
Scopolamine: and belladonna, 53, 54;
and dextroamphetamine, 106; and
jimson weed, 206; and mandrake, 236
Scorpion, 95–99
SCOT, 191–98
Scott, 191–98
Scottie, 95–99
Scotty, 95–99
Scrabble, 95–99
Scramble: as cocaine, 95–99; as heroin,
191–98
Scruples, 95–99
Scuffle, 351–55
Sea grape, 233–35
Second to none, 191–98
Sedapap, 67–68
Seeds, 239–46
Selma, 351–55
Sen, 239–46
Seni, 367–68
Serax, 340–42
Serenid D, 340–42
Serenity, 137–38
Serensil, 150–52
Sernyl, 351–55
Sernylan, 351–55
Serpico 21, 95–99
Sertraline, and methylphenidate, 291
Sess, 239–46
Sets: as codeine-glutethimide
combination, 100–103, 186–88; as
methylphenidate-pentazocine
combination, 291–94, 360–63
Setups, 186–88
714, as name for methaqualone, 285–88
7–Up, as cocaine, 95–99
Sezz, 239–46
Shabu: as cocaine, 95–99; as MDMA, 254–
59
Shabu ice, 275–79
Shake, 239–46
Shaman, 367–68
Shat, 216–19
She, 95–99
Sheets, 351–55
Sherm: as cocaine, 95–99; as PCP, 351–55
Sherman, 351–55
Sherm stick, 351–55
Shiny tops, 285–88
Shit, 191–98
Shmeck, 191–98
Shoot, 191–98
Shoot the breeze, 326–29
Shoot-up, 191–98
Shrooms, 394–96
Sibutramine, 401–2
Siddi, 239–46
Sightball, 95–99
Silk, 191–98
Silly Putty, 394–96
Simple Simon, 394–96
Sinse, 239–46
Sinsemilla, 239–46
Sister, 306–9
Skag, 191–98
Skee, 333–37
Sketch, 275–79
Skid, 191–98
Skuffle, 351–55
Skunk: as heroin, 191–98; as marijuana,
239–46
Sky, 110–13
Slab, 95–99
Slamming, 254–59
Sleeper, 191–98
Sleeping nightshade, 53–55
Sleet, 95–99
Sleigh ride, 95–99
Slick superspeed, 289–90
Slime, 191–98
Slim-plus, 122–24
Smack, 191–98
Smear, 228–32
Smoke, 95–99; as cocaine-heroin
combination, 191–98; as marijuana, 239–
46; methamphetamine, 275–79
Smoke Canada, 239–46
Smoking, 351–55
Smoking gun, 95–99, 191–98
Smut Rye, 145–47
Snappers, 323–25
Snop, 239–46
Snort, 351–55
Snow: as cocaine, 95–99; as heroin, 191–
98
Snowball, 95–99, 191–98
Snow bird, 95–99
Snowcone, 95–99
Snowman, 228–32
Snow Seals, 95–99
482 Drug Name Index
Snow White, 95–99
Soap, 182–85
Soap dope, 275–79
Society high, 95–99
Soda, 95–99
Sodium metabisulfite: and meperidine,
260; and oxycodone, 344
Sodium oxybate, 182–85
Sodium oxybutyrate, 182–85
Solanax, 42–45
Solfoton, 374–77
Solis, 118–21
Soma, 351–55
Somali tea: as khat, 216–19; as
methcathinone, 289–90
Somatomax, 182–85
Somnafac, 285–88
Somnos 79–81
Somsanit, 182–85
Sonata, 439–40
Sopes, 285–88
Sopor, 285–88
Sorcerers berries, 53–55
Sorcerer’s cherry, 53–55
Sosegon, 360–63
Sosenyl, 360–63
Space base, as cocaine-PCP combination,
95–99, 351–55
Space cadet, as cocaine-PCP
combination, 95–99, 351–55
Space dust, as cocaine-PCP combination,
95–99, 351–55
Sparkle, 275–79
Special K, as ketamine, 210–13
Special LA coke, 210–13
Spectriol, 280–81
Spectrum, 432–33
Speed, 12–15, 76, 123, 260; as cocaine, 95–
99; methamphetamine, 275–79
Speedball, as cocaine-heroin
combination, 95–99, 191–98; as heroinmethylphenidate
combination, 191–98,
291–94
Speedboat, as cocaine, marijuana, and
PCP combination, 95–99, 239–46, 351–
55
Spider blue, 191–98
Spike, 191–98
Spivias, 254–59
Spliff, 239–46
Splim, 239–46
Spoon (heroin quantity), 191–98
Spoosh, 275–79
Spore, 351–55
Sporos, 285–88
Spur kernels, 145–47
Spurred rye, 145–47
Square mackerel, 239–46
Square time Bob, 95–99
Squaw tea, 233–35
Squirrel: as cocaine, marijuana, and PCP
combination, 95–99; 239–46, 351–55; as
LSD, 228–32
Stack, 239–46
Stadol, 72–73
Stadol NS, 72–73
Stanozolol, 403–4
Star: as cocaine, 95–99; as methcathinone,
289–90
Stardust, 351–55
Star dust, 95–99
Star-spangled powder, 95–99
Stat, 289–90
Stems, 239–46
Stenox, 171–73
Stesolid, 118–21
Stick: as marijuana, 239–46; as PCP, 351–
55
Stilnoct, 441–43
Stilnox, 441–43
Stimulex, 275–79
Stinkweed: as jimson weed, 206–9; as
marijuana, 239–46
Stinkwort, 206–9
Stones, 95–99
Stoney weed, 239–46
Stopayne, 265–67
Stop the police, 137–38
Stove top, 275–79
STP: as DOM, 137–38; as PCP, 351–55
Straw, 239–46
Strawberry: as LSD, 228–32; as
methaqualone, 285–88
Strawberry fields, 228–32
Strawberry shortcake, 254–59
Stromba, 403–4
Strombaject, 403–4
Stromba Winject, 403–4
Strong-scented lettuce, 336
Studio Fuel, 95–99
Stuff: as heroin, 191–98; as morphine,
306–9
Sublimaze, 164–66
Subutex, 63–66
Drug Name Index 483
Sufenta, 164–66
Sufentanil, 164–66
Sugar: as cocaine, 95–99; as heroin, 191–
98; as LSD, 228–32
Sugar block, 95–99
Sugar cubes, 228–32
Sugar lumps, 228–32
Sugar weed, 239–46
Sulfuric ether, 153–54
Sunshine, 228–32
Super, 351–55
Super acid, 210–13
Super C, 210–13
Super grass, as marijuana-PCP
combination, 239–46, 351–55
Super ice, 275–79
Super joint, 351–55
Super K, 210–13
Super kool, 351–55
Super Weed, 351–55
Superman, 228–32
Super pot, 239–46
Super terrific psychedelic, 137–38
Supeudol, 343–45
Surfer, 351–55
Sweet dreams, 191–98
Sweeties: as MDMA, 254–59; as
phenmetrazine, 371–73
Sweet Jesus, 191–98
Sweet Lucy, 239–46
Sweet stuff, 95–99, 191–98
Sweet vitriol, 153–54
Swell up, 95–99
Swishers, 239–46
Symoron, 271–74
Sympamin, 106–9
Synalgos, 125–26
Synergy, 432–33
Synthetic cocaine, 351–55
Synthetic heroin, 164–66
Synthetic, THT 351–55
Syrup: as codeine, 100–103; as
dextromethorphan, 110–13
T: as cocaine, 95–99; as marijuana, 239–
46; as pentazocine, 360–63
Tab: as LSD, 228–32; as morphine, 306–9
Tabernanthe iboga, 203–5
TAC, 351–55
Tafil, 42–45
Tagament. See Cimetidine
Tail light, 228–32
Taima, 239–46
Takkouri, 239–46
Talacen, 360–63
Talco, 95–99
Talwin, 360–63
Talwin Nx, 360–63
Tango & cash, 164–66
Tanks, 326–29
Tar: as heroin, 191–98; as opium, 333–37
Tardust, 95–99
Taste, 191–98
T-Buzz, 351–55
TCE, 405–7
TCP, 355
TCPy, 355
Tea; as marijuana, 239–46; as PCP, 351–
55
Teacher, 360–63
Teamster’s tea, 233–35
Tecata, 191–98
Teenager, 95–99
Teeth, 95–99
Temazepam, 408–11; and diazepam, 118;
and levorphanol, 224; and oxazepam,
340
Temazepam Gelthix, 408–11
Temazies, 408–11
Temesta, 225–27
Temgesic, 63–66
Temmies, 408–11
10, as name for MDMA, 254–59
Tenavoid, 265–67
Tension, 95–99
Tensium, 118–21
Tenuate, 122–24
Tenuate Dospan, 122–24
Teonanacatl, 394–96
Tepanil, 122–24
Teronac, 247–49
Teslac, 412–13
Testoderm, 414–17
Testolactone, 412–13
Testololactone, 412–13
Testomar, 436–38
Testoral Sublings, 414–17
Testosterone, 414–17; and alcohol, 38;
and cathinone, 218; and
fluoxymesterone, 172; and heroin, 193;
and LAAM, 220; and marijuana 242;
and methandrostenolone, 283; and
morphine, 307
Testoviron, 414–17
484 Drug Name Index
Testred, 295–97
Tetrahydrocannabinol. See Dronabinol
Tetrahydroharmine, 435
Texas pot, 239–46
Texas tea, 239–46
Tex-Mex, 239–46
Thai sticks, 239–46
Thalidomide, 33, 187
Thanie, 191–98
THC. See Dronabinol
Thebaine, 418–19
Theophylline: and alprazolam, 44; and
caffeine, 74; and cocaine, 98; and
ephedrine, 143; and pentobarbital, 365
Thing: as cocaine, 95–99; as heroin, 191–
98
13, as name for marijuana, 239–46
38, as name for cocaine-marijuana
combination, 239–46
3750, as name for cocaine-marijuana
combination, 239–46
Thorazine: and LSD, 231; and
meperidine, 260
Thorn apple, 206–9
3,4–methylenedioxyamphetamine, 250–51
3,4–methylenedioxyethylamphetamine,
252–53
3,4–methylenedioxymethamphetamine,
254–59
3s & 8s, 100–103, 186–88
Thrust: as nitrite, 323–25; as nitrous
oxide, 326–29
Thumb, 239–46
Thunder, 191–98
Thybine, 436–38
Tic, 351–55
Ticket, 228–32
Tick tick, 275–79
Tic Tac, 351–55
Tidigesic, 63–66
Tigre, 191–98
Tigre blanco, 191–98
Tigre del Norte, 191–98
Tish, 351–55
Tissue, 95–99
Titch, 351–55
Tits, 191–98
Tixylix Night-Time, 383–84
Tlitliltzin, 303–5
TNT: as fentanyl 164–66; as heroin, 191–
98
Tobacco, 18–19, 318–22. See also Nicotine
Toke, 239–46
Tolly, 420–23
Toluene, 420–23
Tongs: as heroin, 191–98; as opium, 333–
37
Too stupid to puke, 137–38
Toot, 95–99
Tootsie Roll: as heroin, 191–98; as
methadone, 271–74
Topergan, 127–29
Top gun, 95–99
Topi, 268–70
Topo, 95–99
Tops, 367–68
Toquilone Compositum, 285–88
Torbugesic, 72–73
Torch, 239–46
Tornado, 95–99
Torpedo, 239–46
Toss up, 95–99
Tox, 333–37
Toxy, 333–37
Toys, 333–37
Tragic magic, 95–99
Trails, 95–99
Tramadol, and alprazolam, 44
Trank, 351–55
Trankimazin, 42–45
Tranquility, 137–38
Tranxene, 88–90
Trash, 275–79
Tray, as quantity of marijuana, 239–46
Tren, 424–25
Trenbolone, 424–25
Triador, 285–88
Triazolam, 426–29
Trichlorethylene, 406
Trichloroethylene, 406
Trimeperidine, 430–31
Trip, 228–32
Trip & Fall, 167–70
Triple C, 110–13
Trips, 35–36
Troop, 95–99
Troxilan, 114–15
Ts & Bs, 360–63
Ts & Blues, 360–63
Ts & Rits, 291–94, 360–63
Ts & Rs, 291–94, 360–63
T-3s, 100–103
Tuazole, 285–88
Turbo, 239–46
Drug Name Index 485
Turkey, 95–99
Tuss, 199–200
Tussend, 199–200
Tussin, 110–13
Tussionex, 199–200
Tussokon, 383–84
Tussol, 271–74
Tustin, 239–46
Tweak: as cocaine, 95–99; as
methcathinone, 289–90
Tweek, 289–90
Tweeker, 289–90
25, as name for LSD, 228–32
24–7, as name for cocaine, 95–99
20 rock, 95–99
Twist, 239–46
Twisters, 275–79
Twistum, 239–46
2–CB, 432–33
2C-B, 432–33
Tylox: as hydrocodone, 199–200; as
oxycodone, 343–45
Ultimate, 95–99
Ultiva, 399–400
Umbrella plant, 237
Umine, 380–82
Unkie, 306–9
Unkie White, 306–9
Unotque, 239–46
USP, as MDMA, 254–59
V, 118–21
Val, 118–21
Valium, 118–21
Valley dolls, 228–32
Valproic acid, and methylphenidate, 293
Valrelease, 118–21
Vasorome, 338–39
Vebonol, 58–59
Vega, 239–46
Vegetable calomel, 237
Vegetable mercury, 237
Velvet, 110–13
Venus: as MDMA, 254–59; as 2C-B, 432–
33
Versed, 298–300
Verstran, 387–89
Vicodin, 199–200
Vicoprofen, 199–200
Vidrio, 191–98
Vine, 434–35
Vine of death, 434–35
Vine of the soul, 434–35
Viper’s weed, 239–46
Virilon, 295–97
Visionary Vine, 434–35
Vita-G, 182–85
Vitamin D, and mephobarbital, 263
Vitamin E, as MDMA, 254–59
Vitamin K: and mephobarbital, 264; and
phenobarbital, 376; as name for
ketamine, 210–13
Vival, 118–21
Vodka acid, 228–32
Wac: as marijuana-PCP combination, 239–
46; as PCP, 351–55
Wack, 351–55
Wacky weed, 239–46
Wafers, 271–74
Wagon wheels, 285–88
Wake & bake, 239–46
Warfarin: and chlordiazepoxide, 84; and
dihydrocodeine, 126; and glutethimide,
187; and methandrostenolone, 283; and
modafinil, 302; and stanozolol, 404
Water: as GHB, 182–85; as marijuana,
239–46; as methamphetamine, 275–79;
as PCP, 351–55
Water-water, 239–46
Wave, 95–99
Wedding bells, 228–32
Wedge, 228–32
Weed: as marijuana, 239–46; as PCP, 351–
55
Weed tea, 239–46
Wellconal, 130–31
West coast, 291–94
West coast turnarounds, 254–59
Wet: as marijuana-PCP combination, 239–
46; as methamphetamine, 275–79; as
PCP, 351–55
Wet Daddy, 351–55
Whack: as cocaine 95–99; as heroin-PCP
combination, 191–98; as marijuana, 239–
46; as PCP combination, 351–55
Whackatabacky, 239–46
Whacky Weed, 351–55
Wheat, 239–46
Wheels, 254–59
When-shee, 333–37
Whiffledust, 254–59
Whippets, 326–29
486 Drug Name Index
White, 191–98
White ball, 95–99
White boy, 191–98
White cross, 275–79
White devil, 351–55
White dove, 254–59
White dragon, 95–99
White dust, 228–32
White gasoline, 179–81
White ghost, 95–99
White girl: as cocaine, 95–99; as heroin,
191–98
White-haired lady, 239–46
White horizon, 351–55
White horse, 95–99
White junk, 191–98
White lady: as cocaine, 95–99; as heroin,
191–98
White lightning, as LSD, 228–32
White mosquito, 95–99
White nurse, 191–98
Whiteout, 323–25
White Owsley, 228–32
White pipe, 285–88
White powder, 351–55
White powder, 95–99
White stuff, 191–98
White sugar, 95–99
White tornado, 95–99
Whiteys, 167–70
Whiz bang: as cocaine, 95–99; as heroincocaine
combination, 191–98
Whiz bombs, 254–59
Whorehouse tea, 233–35
Wicked, 191–98
Wicky stick, 95–99, 239–46, 351–55
Wigits, 254–59
Wild cat, 95–99, 289–90
Wild jalap, 237
Wild lemon, 237
Wild lettuce, 336
Wild mandrake, 237
Window glass, 228–32
Window pane, 228–32
Wings: as cocaine, 95–99; as heroin, 191–
98
Winshee, 333–37
Winstroid, 403–4
Winstrol, 403–4
Witch: as cocaine, 95–99; as heroin, 191–
98
Witch Hazel, 191–98
Witch’s berry, 53–55
Wobble Weed, 351–55
Wolf, 351–55
Wolfies: as flunitrazepam, 167–70; as
GHB, 182–85
Wollie, 239–46
Wonder star, 289–90
Woolah, 239–46
Wooly, 351–55; as cocaine, 95–99;
marijuana, 239–46
Working man’s cocaine, 275–79
Worm, 351–55
Wrecking crew, 95–99
Wygesic, 390–93
X: as marijuana, 239–46; as MDMA, 254–
59
Xanax, 42–45
Xanor, 42–45
XTC, 254–59
Yage, 434–35
Yahoo, 95–99
Yaje, 434–35
Yale, 95–99
Yaxce’lil, 303–5
Yayoo, 95–99
Yeaho, 95–99
Yeah-o, 95–99
Yeh, 239–46
Yellow: as LSD, 228–32; as pentobarbital,
364–66
Yellow bam, 275–79
Yellowberry, 237
Yellow bullets, 364–66
Yellow dimples, 228–32
Yellow dolls, 364–66
Yellow fever, 351–55
Yellow footballs, 360–63
Yellow horse, 233–35
Yellow jackets, 364–66
Yellow powder, 275–79
Yellow submarine, 239–46
Yellow sunshine, 228–32
Yen pop, 239–46
Yen shee suey, 333–37
Yeola, 239–46
Yerba, 239–46
Yerba mala, 239–46
Yerhia, 239–46
Yesca, 239–46
Yesco, 239–46
Drug Name Index 487
Yeyo, 95–99
Yimyom, 95–99
Ying yang, as LSD, 228–32
Yocon, 436–38
Yohimar, 436–38
Yohimbe, 436–38; and
methyltestosterone, 295
Yohimbine, 436–38; and ephedrine, 143
Yohimex, 436–38
Yohydrol, 436–38
Yoman, 436–38
Yomax, 436–38
Yovital, 436–38
Yo-Yo, 436–38
Yuppie drug, 254–59
Z (heroin quantity), 191–98
Zacatecas purple, 239–46
Zaleplon, 439–40
Zambi, 239–46
Zay, 239–46
Ze, 333–37
Zen: as LSD, 228–32; as MDMA, 254–59
Zenith, 432–33
Zero, 333–37
Zig zag man: as LSD, 228–32; as
marijuana, 239–46
Zimbie, 351–55
Zip, 95–99
Zol, 239–46
Zoloft, and methylphenidate, 291
Zolpidem, 441–43
Zombie dust, 351–55
Zombie weed, 351–55
Zonked, 182–85
Zoom: as marijuana-PCP combination
239–46; as PCP, 351–55
Zoquete, 191–98
Zotran, 42–45
Zydone, 199–200

Subject Index
ADHD. See Attention deficit
hyperactivity disorder
Agranulocytosis: and AET, 35;
meprobamate, 266
Alice in Wonderland syndrome, 125
Alzheimer’s disease: and alcohol, 38;
areca nut, 49; dronabinol, 139; and
nicotine, 318–19
Amnesia: and ethchlorvynol, 151;
flunitrazepam, 168; flurazepam, 174;
gasoline, 180; GHB, 183; jimson weed,
207; ketamine, 211; lorazepam, 226;
meprobamate, 266; methadone, 272;
midazolam, 298; oxazepam, 341;
temazepam, 409; toluene, 421;
triazolam, 427; zaleplon, 439–40;
zolpidem, 441
Amphetamines, 12–15, 123; and caffeine,
76; meperidine, 260; military usage, 12
Animal testing, 33
Anorectics, 15–17
Anticholinergics, and hydrocodone, 200
Antihistamines: and estzolam, 148;
hydromorphone, 202
Apnea: and clonazepam, 86; modafinil,
301
Arthritis: and diethylpropion, 123;
ethylestrenol, 155; oxycodone, 343
Asthma: and alprazolam, 42; areca nut,
50; belladonna, 53; caffeine, 74;
mephobarbital, 263–64; morphine, 307
Astronauts: and dextroamphetamine, 106;
zaleplon, 439
Athletics: and cathine, 218;
dextroamphetamine, 107; etorphine,
157–59; fluoxymesterone, 172;
ibogaine, 203; levorphanol, 223; ma
huang, 218, 234; methandriol, 280;
methandrostenolone, 282–83;
methyltestosterone, 295, 296;
nalbuphine, 312–13; nandrolone, 316;
oxandrolone, 339; oxymetholone, 347;
pemoline, 356; pholcodine, 383;
testosterone, 415–16; trenbolone, 424;
zolpidem, 441. See also Mountaineering
Attention deficit hyperactivity disorder
(ADHD): and amphetamines, 12;
caffeine, 74; clonazepam, 85;
dextroamphetamine, 106; fenfluramine,
160; meprobamate, 265;
methamphetamine, 275;
methylphenidate, 291, 292, 293;
modafinil, 301; pemoline, 356, 357;
stanozolol, 404
Barbiturates, 20–21; and clonazepam, 86;
clorazepate, 90; diazepam, 119;
diphenoxylate, 128; estzolam, 148;
ethchlorvynol, 150; ethylestrenol, 156
490 Subject Index
Belladonna alkaloids, 206, 236
Benzodiazepines, 21–22; and cocaine, 98;
morphine, 308; nicotine, 321
Beriberi: and alcohol, 38; areca nut, 50;
toluene, 421
Birth control pills: and areca nut, 51;
caffeine, 76; mephobarbital, 263–64;
modafinil, 302; nicotine, 321;
phenobarbital, 375; temazepam, 410
Brewer’s yeast, and meperidine, 260
Candyflipping, 258
“Chasing the dragon,” 192
Churchill, Winston, and amphetamines,
13
Civil War, opium in American, 334
Coca-Cola, 17
Coleridge, Samuel Taylor, 335
Contraceptives, oral. See Birth control
pills
Cross-tolerance, 4
DAWN (Drug Abuse Warning
Network), 256
Delirium tremens, 20, 38; and
ethchlorvynol, 151; treatment of, 79, 88
Dependence, 3–4
Depressants, 19
De Quincey, Thomas, 335
Diabetes: and dextromethorphan, 111;
methamphetamine, 276
Dreiser, Theodore, 218
Drug abuse, 2–5
Drug Abuse Warning Network, 256
Drug screens: false positives for
levorphanol, 116, 224; LSD, 231;
marijuana, 330; methamphetamine, 276;
opiates, 336, 383–84, 418;
phenobarbital, 68; PCP, 210;
methadone, 391
Epilepsy: and mephobarbital, 264;
Phenytoin, 43, 80, 86, 221, 273, 300,
302, 428
Experiments, interpretation of, 33–34
False positives. See Drug screens, false
positives
FD&C Yellow No. 5. See Tartrazine
Flashback, 33, 230–31
Franklin, Benjamin, 334
Freud, Sigmund, 17
Grapefruit juice: and midazolam, 300;
pentobarbital, 365; triazolam, 428
Gutzkow, Karl Ferdinand, and choral
hydrate, 80
Hallucinogens, 25–26
Hemp, as legal product, 244
Hofmann, Albert, 228–29, 303
Holmes, Oliver Wendell, and ether, 153
Holy Fire, 146
Inhalants, 26–27
Kennedy, John F., and amphetamines, 13
Leary, Timothy, 54, 394–95
Licorice, and testosterone, 416
Lilliputian hallucinations, 125
Luding out, 287
Maintenance programs, 23
MAOIs. See Monoamine oxidase
inhibitors
Memory. See Amnesia
MDA (industrial chemical), 251
Military usage of amphetamines, 12–13;
atropine, 208; bufotenine, 60;
dextroamphetamine, 107;
dextromethorphan, 110–11; etorphine,
158; glutethimide, 187; meprobamate,
266; methamphetamine, 275;
methaqualone, 285; modafinil, 301;
pemoline, 356; temazepam, 408;
triazolam, 426, 427, 428; zolpidem, 441–
42
Milk, and phendimetrazine, 370
Monoamine oxidase inhibitors (MAOIs),
and amphetamines, 14; barbiturates, 20;
chlordiazepoxide, 83; clonazepam, 86;
opiates, 23; TCP, 355; tricyclic
antidepressants, 84; clorazepate, 90;
dextromethorphan, 112;
dextromoramide, 115; diazepam, 119;
diethylpropion, 123; diphenoxylate,
128; dipipanone, 131; ephedrine, 143;
estzolam, 148; ethchlorvynol, 151;
fenfluramine, 161; fentanyl, 165;
hydrocodone, 200; hydromorphone,
202; ma huang 234; MDMA, 258;
meperidine, 260; methadone, 273;
methylphenidate, 293; morphine, 308;
nicotine, 321; nutmeg, 331; oxycodone,
Subject Index 491
344; oxymorphone, 349; pemoline, 358;
pentazocine, 362; phendimetrazine, 370;
phentermine, 381; sibutramine, 401;
yage, 435; yohimbine, 438
Mountaineering: and methamphetamine,
275–76; midazolam, 298; temazepam,
408–9; zolpidem, 442. See also Athletics
Narcolepsy: and amphetamines, 12;
dextroamphetamine, 106; GHB, 183,
184; ma huang, 233;
methamphetamine, 275; yohimbine,
437
Narcotic, definition of, 22–23
Nietzsche, Friedrich Wilhelm, and
chloral hydrate, 80
Opiates, 22–24; and alcohol, 38;
clonazepam, 86; clorazepate, 90;
diazepam, 119; estzolam, 148; nicotine,
320; nitrous oxide, 328
Opioids, 24; and methamphetamine, 278;
nicotine, 321
Oral submucous fibrosis (OSF), and
areca nut, 51
Orphan drug, 438
Osteoporosis: and alcohol, 37–38;
boldenone, 58; caffeine, 74–75
Parkinson’s disease: and amphetamines,
12; areca nut, 50; belladonna, 53;
caffeine, 75; chlordiazepoxide, 83;
cabergoline, 147; methcathinone, 290;
modafinil, 301
Porphyria: and butalbital, 68; choral
hydrate, 80; chlordiazepoxide, 83;
clonazepam, 86; ethchlorvynol, 150;
ethylestrenol, 156; fluoxymesterone,
172; glutethimide, 186; mephobarbital,
263; meprobamate, 266;
methandrostenolone, 283; nicotine, 318–
19; pentobarbital, 364
Pregnancy: and amphetamines, 15;
barbiturates, 20–21; benzodiazepines,
22; opiates, 23–24
Pregnancy categories, 8–9
Psychedelics, 25–26
Pyridine alkaloids, 18–19
Rehnquist, William, and ethchlorvynol,
151
Resonance, 3
Robo-copping, 111
Rossetti, Dante Gabriel, and chloral
hydrate, 80
St. Anthony’s Fire, 146
Schedules, 6–7
Serotonin syndrome: and clonazepam, 86;
dextromethorphan, 112;
pseudoephedrine, 143; fenfluramine,
161; sibutramine, 402
Serotonin reuptake inhibitors: and
methylphenidate, 293; sibutramine, 402
Set, 5
Setting, 5
Shulgin, Alexander, 432
Soman, 110–11
Sports. See Athletics
Statistics, interpretation of, 8
Steroids, 24–25
Stimulants, 11–12
Sugar, and methcathinone, 290
Tartrazine, 108; and Dilaudid, 202;
ethchlorvynol, 151; Nembutal, 366;
Sonata, 440
Therapeutic ratio, 340
Time perception, 132–33
Toads, 60, 61
Tolerance, 4–5
Tomatoes, hallucinogenic, 206
Tranquilizers: and butalbital, 67;
diphenoxylate, 128
Tricyclic antidepressants: and
chlordiazepoxide, 84 clonazepam, 86;
cocaine, 98; dextroamphetamine, 107;
hydrocodone, 200; methadone, 272;
methaqualone, 288; methylphenidate,
293; methyltestosterone, 296;
modafinil, 302; morphine, 308;
yohimbine, 437
Ulcerative colitis: and areca nut, 49;
nicotine, 49
Urine tests. See Drug screens
Withdrawal, opiates, 23
World War II, drug usage, 12–13. See
also Military usage

About the Author
RICHARD LAWRENCE MILLER is an independent scholar. He has written
many books including The Case for Legalizing Drugs (1991) and Drug Warriors
and Their Prey: From Police Power to Police State (1996).
